HONG KONG — Customs officials in Hong Kong announced on Friday their third large seizure of smuggled ivory in less than three months, saying they had intercepted 779 elephant tusks weighing 2,900 pounds in a container originating from Kenya .The shipment was valued at around $1.4 million.In October, 1,209 tusks weighing 3.8 tons and worth about $3.5 million were seized from two containers shipped from Tanzania and Kenya. The next month, 1.6 tons were discovered in a container originating from Tanzania.Large seizures also have been made in other countries recently, notably in Port Klang, Malaysia, last month.Demand from an increasingly affluent Asia and improved international trade and transport links have caused the trade in ivory and other wildlife products to soar in recent years, pushing many species to the brink. At the same time, enforcement and penalties remain weak in many countries, constituting little deterrent to smugglers and poachers, conservationists say.About 10 tons of ivory was seized by customs officials around the world in 2007, according to Traffic, an organization that monitors wildlife trade. In 2011, that figure jumped to nearly 40 tons — a record. Much of that ivory came from large hauls — weighing 1,600 pounds or more — indicating the rising involvement of organized criminal gangs, Traffic said.Official records for 2012 are not yet complete, but the amount of raw ivory already reported seized last year totals nearly 27.5 tons, according to Traffic.Tom Milliken, Traffic's elephant expert, wrote in an e-mail that "2011 still reigns supreme as the 'annus horribilis,' but last December's Malaysia seizure pushes 2012 into the top four years of highest ivory seizures by weight, indicating the illegal ivory trade is still running rampant." No arrests have been made in connection with Friday's seizure in Hong Kong. Customs officials said Friday that a fictitious address in Hong Kong had been listed as the shipment's destination, and that their investigations were continuing.There are no indications that Hong Kong is becoming a more important transshipment point for ivory smuggling, they said, adding that the three recent hauls were "isolated" events.The smugglers, said Vincent Wong, a senior official in the Hong Kong customs department, are adopting new approaches all the time, diversifying routes and using different concealment measures.Friday's batch of ivory contained some whole tusks, but also many that had been cut into two or three pieces, allowing them to fit into five wooden crates transported among a shipment declared as containing "architectural stones."
BEIJING — As a work of propaganda, the images that North Korea circulated this week showing Google 's executive chairman, Eric E. Schmidt , touring a high-tech incubation center are hard to beat.With former Gov. Bill Richardson of New Mexico at his side, Mr. Schmidt, who is fond of describing the Internet as the enemy of despots, toured what was presented as the hub of the computer industry in one of the world's most pitiless police states. Both men gazed attentively as a select group of North Koreans showed their ability to surf the Web.It is unclear what the famously hermetic North Koreans hoped to accomplish by allowing the visit. But the photos of the billionaire entrepreneur taking the time to visit the nation's computer labs were bound to be useful to a new national leader whom analysts say needs to show his people that their impoverished nation is moving forward.It will matter little, those experts say, that the visitors were bundled against the cold, indoors — a sign of the country's extreme privation — or that the vast majority of North Koreans have no access to computers, much less the Web beyond their country's tightly controlled borders.The men's quixotic four-day trip ended Thursday much the way it began, with some analysts calling the visit hopelessly naïve and others describing it as valuable back-channel diplomacy at a time when Washington and Pyongyang are not on speaking terms (again)."I'm still spinning my wheels to figure out a plausible motivation for why they went," said Daniel Pinkston, a North Korea specialist at the International Crisis Group.Mr. Schmidt and Mr. Richardson insist they accomplished some good — showing the world has not forgotten the plight of an American detained in the North, and at least trying to nudge the tightly sealed nation a bit closer to the fold of globally connected nations."As the world becomes increasingly connected, their decision to be virtually isolated is very much going to affect their  physical world, their economic growth and so forth," Mr. Schmidt told reporters after arriving at Beijing International Airport. "We made that alternative very, very clear."The unofficial visit, however, raised hackles in Washington, and provided rich fodder for commentators and comedians. Even before the Americans left Pyongyang, someone created an account on Tumblr, the popular social blogging site, called "Eric Schmidt looking at things," that parodied sites (themselves parodies) featuring the country's leaders earnestly inspecting livestock, soldiers or leather insoles. (Mr. Schmidt is shown looking intently at computer screens, "the back of a North Korean Student," and Mr. Richardson.)Others were less kind. Senator John McCain, Republican of Arizona, took to Twitter to call the self-appointed delegation "useful idiots," and John R. Bolton, a former United Nations ambassador, said the delegation was unwittingly feeding the North Korean propaganda mill as it sought to burnish the credentials of Kim Jung-un, the nation's leader, who is in his 20s."Pyongyang uses gullible Americans for its own purposes," Mr. Bolton wrote in The New York Daily News.The State Department said it did not think the timing of the visit was "particularly helpful," given efforts by the United States to rally international support for tougher sanctions following North Korea's recent launching of a rocket that intelligence experts say could help in the development of missiles that could one day reach the United States.As if on cue, the North Korean news media hailed the visit by "the Google team" — which included Jared Cohen, who leads Google's think tank — highlighting their visit to the mausoleum where Mr. Kim's grandfather and father lie in state. There, Mr. Richardson and Mr. Schmidt "expressed admiration and paid respect to Comrade Kim Il-sung and Comrade Kim Jong-il," the North's main party newspaper, Rodong Sinmun, said.Although Mr. Richardson did not address the criticism during his brief remarks to reporters on Thursday in Beijing, he said he believed his visit was helpful in reducing tensions on the Korean Peninsula.
BEIJING — One Friday more than two years ago, an air-quality monitoring device atop the United States Embassy in Beijing recorded data so horrifying that someone in the embassy called the level of pollution "Crazy Bad" in an infamous Twitter post. That day the Air Quality Index, which uses standards set by the United States Environmental Protection Agency, had crept above 500, which was supposed to be the top of the scale.So what phrase is appropriate to describe Saturday's jaw-dropping reading of 755 at 8 p.m., when all of Beijing looked like an airport smokers' lounge? Though an embassy spokesman said he did not immediately have comparative data, Beijing residents who follow the Twitter feed said the Saturday numbers appeared to be the highest recorded since the embassy began its monitoring system in 2008.The embassy's @BeijingAir Twitter feed said the level of toxicity in the air was "Beyond Index," the terminology for levels above 500; the "Crazy Bad" label was used just once, in November 2010, before it was quickly deleted by the embassy from the Twitter feed. According to the Environmental Protection Agency, levels between 301 and 500 are "Hazardous," meaning people should avoid all outdoor activity. The World Health Organization has standards that judge a score above 500 to be more than 20 times the level of particulate matter in the air deemed safe.In online conversations, Beijing residents tried to make sense of the latest readings."This is a historic record for Beijing," Zhao Jing, a prominent Internet commentator who uses the pen name Michael Anti, wrote on Twitter. "I've closed the doors and windows; the air purifiers are all running automatically at full power."Other Beijing residents online described the air as "postapocalyptic," "terrifying" and "beyond belief."The municipal government reported levels as high as 500 on Saturday evening from some monitoring stations. The Chinese system does not report numbers beyond 500. Nevertheless, readings in central Beijing throughout the day were at the extreme end of what is considered hazardous according to the United States Environmental Protection Agency standards. (By comparison, the air quality index in New York City, using the same standard, was 19 at 6 a.m. on Saturday.)Pollution levels in Beijing had been creeping up for days, and readings were regularly surging above 300 by midweek. The interior of the gleaming Terminal 3 of the Beijing Capital International Airport was filled with a thick haze on Thursday. The next day, people working in office towers in downtown Beijing found it impossible to make out skyscrapers just a few blocks away. Some city residents scoured stores in search of masks and air filters.Still, there was little warning that the United States Embassy reading would jump above 700 on Saturday. Some people speculated that the monitoring system, which measures fine particles called PM 2.5 because they are 2.5 microns in diameter or smaller, might have malfunctioned once it got beyond 500.But Nolan Barkhouse, an embassy spokesman, said the monitor was operating correctly.It was unclear exactly what was responsible for the rise in levels of particulate matter, beyond the factors that regularly sully the air here. Factories operating in neighboring Hebei Province ring this city of more than 20 million. The number of cars on Beijing's streets has been multiplying at an astounding rate. And Beijing sits on a plain flanked by hills and escarpments that can trap pollution on days with little wind. Meanwhile, one person hiking at the Great Wall in the hills at Mutianyu, north of Beijing, took photographs of crisp blue skies there.Xinhua, the state news agency, reported on Dec. 31 that Beijing's air quality had improved for 14 years straight, and the level of major pollutants had decreased. A municipal government spokesman told Xinhua that the annual average concentration of PM 10, or particles 10 microns in diameter or smaller, had dropped by 4 percent in 2012, compared with one year earlier.Chinese officials prefer to publicly release air pollution measurements that give only levels of PM 10, although foreign health and environmental experts say PM 2.5 can be deadlier and more important to track.There has been a growing outcry among Chinese for municipal governments to release fuller air quality data, in part because of the United States Embassy Twitter feed. As a result, Beijing began announcing PM 2.5 numbers last January. Major Chinese cities have had the equipment to track those levels, but had refused for a long time to release the data.The existence of the embassy's machine and the @BeijingAir Twitter feed have been a diplomatic sore point for Chinese officials. In July 2009, a Chinese Foreign Ministry official, Wang Shu'ai, told American diplomats to halt the Twitter feed, saying that the data "is not only confusing but also insulting," according to a State Department cable obtained by WikiLeaks. Mr. Wang said the embassy's data could lead to "social consequences."
Brook Lopez had his feet planted in an ice bath, and Deron Williams's right thigh was wrapped thickly with gauze. Gerald Wallace had X-rays taken of his ribs. There was fear that a flu bug was going around.For as much as the Nets' locker room looked like an infirmary after Friday night's 99-79 victory against the Phoenix Suns, elation was evident. They had posted another double-digit comeback to win their fifth game in a row, matching a season high from November.Under P. J. Carlesimo, the Nets (21-15) are 7-1 and playing confidently again. They have won three consecutive games by at least 20 points for the first time in franchise history. And perhaps more significant, they have an opportunity to tie their season total of wins from last year (22) with a victory over Indiana on Sunday night. Not that anyone on this team is thinking about last year."You know, I bet you it never entered anybody's mind," Carlesimo said. "I don't think they consider us the same team, and we don't feel that way."Beyond the franchise's Brooklyn rebranding, it is a vastly different team from the one that finished 22-44 in a lockout-shortened season, and 24-58 the year before that, and 12-70 the year before that.Last season, distracting trade rumors involving Williams and Lopez were incessant. But the Nets also scrubbed their roster, and the disparity in talent between the clubs is astounding.Lopez missed nearly almost all of last season with foot injuries, and the Nets played many games with a lineup that included journeymen like DeShawn Stevenson and Shelden Williams.Five players who played in at least 20 games are now either playing overseas or out of basketball: Shelden Williams (France), Jordan Farmar (Turkey), Sundiata Gaines (China), Jordan Williams (free agent) and Shawne Williams (free agent). Others, like Damion James were relegated to the N.B.A. Development League.The new pieces that General Manager Billy King assembled have performed admirably, like Joe Johnson (17.1 points per game), Andray Blatche (11.4 points and 6.2 rebounds), Reggie Evans (8.9 rebounds), and Jerry Stackhouse (1.1 3-pointers per game)."Obviously, it's personnel," Lopez said. "We truly are playing together. I think we trust each other a lot. We're getting used to playing with each other and we're getting out there and D-ing up."Lopez said the players had not paid attention to the 22-win milestone, but he did not sound surprised that the turnaround had come swiftly."It's definitely big for us," Lopez said. "We're playing the way we're capable of playing. I think, honestly, we think we should have a few more wins by now."Carlesimo, who was an assistant coach on last year's team and took over last month after Avery Johnson was fired, considered the milestone "insignificant," considering the makeover in the off-season."We knew we were a lot better team," Carlesimo said. "They're pretty much coming night in and night out, and they've come and performed on a consistent basis recently, which is not an easy thing to do in this league."The Nets are averaging 102 points on 46.4 percent shooting in the eight games under Carlesimo. Their bench has outscored opposing second units in each of the past four games.Six of those games have come against teams near the bottom of the standings, so the victory at Oklahoma City on Jan. 2 serves as the best measuring stick. The Nets are 14-0 against teams with losing records, but the better gauge may be how they fare against the quality opponents they will play over the next two weeks.Starting with Indiana (22-14) on Sunday, the Nets face Atlanta (21-14) twice, the Knicks (23-13), Memphis (24-10), Houston (21-16) and Miami (23-11) this month."We went through some bumps and some rough patches, which taught us," Deron Williams said. "We are jelling a little bit more now. We are more comfortable playing now and it translates."The Nets will most likely make a game-time decision Sunday on whether Deron Williams can play after bruising his right thigh in a collision with Goran Dragic in the third quarter of Friday's win. Williams, who stayed in the game, said he would see how the leg recovered Saturday and early Sunday. Forward Gerald Wallace is also questionable; he sustained bruised ribs in a hard fall in the first quarter Friday.
GUANGZHOU, China — After a sharp economic slowdown through much of last year, China's economy is growing again — but not at its previous double-digit pace, and with signs that inflation might become a problem again.Shops were crowded this past weekend, construction sites show renewed activity and factories are hiring as exports and domestic demand recover — trends all underlined by government data released over the last several days.Further data to be released Friday and Saturday — including monthly, quarterly and annual figures for industrial production, fixed-asset investment, retail sales and overall economic output — are also expected to show that the Chinese economy, the world's second largest after that of the United States, is expanding once again.Many shopkeepers are noticing a rebound in retail sales. Among them was Liu Licai, a merchant in southern China who sells curtains and other household goods. Although some industries, like auto manufacturing, still suffer from bloated inventories, retailers like Ms. Liu are finding their shelves too empty and are starting to place more orders with suppliers, keeping factories busy."Business has gone up by more than 10 percent in the last several months," Ms. Liu said during a brief lull on an otherwise busy day.Yet the pace of China's expansion may not be fast enough to do much for the rest of the world. China's imports are growing less than half as fast as its exports, making it hard for China to become the locomotive to pull the global economy out of its half-decade funk. And overall growth is not rebounding to previous levels.Until last year, the Chinese government set 8 percent annual growth as a goal, and the economy frequently delivered several percentage points more than that.Then last March, the government pared the goal to 7.5 percent, and actual growth seems likely to be little higher."The potential growth rate of the economy has come down," Stephen Green, a China economist in the Hong Kong offices of Standard Chartered, said Sunday. "You don't have to be in the double digits to get inflation."Prices rose faster in December, according to government data released Friday. Consumer prices rose 2.5 percent from the level of a year earlier, their fastest pace since May.Economists inside and outside China say the true rate of inflation is as much as double the official rate because of methodological problems in the way China calculates inflation.Mr. Green and other Western economists warned Friday and over the weekend that officially measured inflation at the consumer level could reach 5 percent by the fourth quarter and lead to an increase in interest rates by China's central bank.Producer prices are still declining, but at a slower pace. They were down 1.9 percent in December from a year earlier, the smallest drop since last May.Early in an economic recovery, rising prices tend to be a sign that an economy may not have much unused capacity that can be brought into production quickly. Yet Wen Senrong, the sales manager of the Flying Gift Bag store in Guangzhou, said that she was already seeing costs rise, with increases for rent, materials and labor."Our lease was renewed recently and our rent went up by a double-digit percentage — I feel like I am working for the landlord," she said.Tang Chun, the owner of a factory that makes picture frames in Guangzhou, complained of rising costs for the full range of supplies that she buys, including aluminum, acrylic and glass. But store buyers lack the confidence to accept higher prices, fearing that they will not be able to pass them on to retail customers, she said."Every possible cost is going up, including raw material costs and my rent, but I can't raise prices. It's all coming out of my profit margins," Ms. Tang said.Part of the increase in inflation reflects rising prices for fruits and vegetables, as extremely cold weather in China over the past couple of weeks has damaged winter crops. At the fruit stand where Zeng Xiandan, 25, was stacking tangerines Saturday, prices had just jumped 10 percent to 20 percent for a wide range of produce, including tangerines, which were up 15 percent. Mr. Zeng said the increases had drawn surprisingly little criticism."They understand it's because of the cold weather. Customers have not complained," he said.But economists say the overall rising prices reflect broad shifts in the Chinese economy.China is awash in cash, since the government has expanded the broadly measured money supply over the past five years much more rapidly than the United States, even though the Federal Reserve's moves have attracted considerably more international attention. China's money supply is now larger than that of the United States, even though China's economy is half as large.Strong overall growth in credit is powering a recovery in China's construction sector this winter, as businesses and households are starting to find it easier to borrow.Total credit jumped 28 percent in December from a year ago, led by more corporate bonds and more loans from semi-regulated trusts set up by banks.Until the last several years, China seemed to be expanding its factories so fast and workers were moving into cities so quickly that China could sustain rapid growth just by fully using those factories and workers.But an emerging labor shortage, particularly of young workers, has changed that picture. The country's "one child" policy and more years spent in school have meant fewer young people entering the labor force. The Chinese economy remains dominated by manufacturing, and factory overcapacity still exists in some sectors.At the same time, the labor-intensive service sector is growing rapidly and has far less overcapacity that can be used without causing inflation.As the Chinese eat out more frequently and as its fast-growing population of elderly increasingly enters nursing homes, expansion is taking place in the catering and health care sectors. These sectors, along with education, have had trouble filling numerous but often low-paying positions.Rebounding exports and construction have also increased demand for low-wage workers.Exports leapt 14.1 percent in December from a year earlier, nearly three times as fast as expected, and were led by surging shipments to the United States, data released Thursday showed. Imports rose 6 percent in December, partly because of an 11 percent jump in iron ore imports as steel production rebounded.
SANYA, China — Zhang Xiaoping's mother dropped out of school after sixth grade. Her father, one of 10 children, never attended.But Ms. Zhang, 20, is part of a new generation of Chinese taking advantage of a national effort to produce college graduates in numbers the world has never seen before.A pony-tailed junior at a new university here in southern China, Ms. Zhang has a major in English. But her unofficial minor is American pop culture, which she absorbs by watching episodes of television shows like "The Vampire Diaries" and "America's Next Top Model" on the Internet.It is all part of her highly specific ambition: to work some day for a Chinese automaker and provide the cultural insights and English fluency the company needs to supply the next generation of fuel-efficient taxis that New York City plans to choose in 2021. "It is my dream," she said, "and I will devote myself wholeheartedly to it."Even if her dream is only dorm-room reverie, China has tens of millions of Ms. Zhangs — bright young people whose aspirations and sheer numbers could become potent economic competition for the West in decades to come.China is making a $250 billion-a-year investment in what economists call human capital. Just as the United States helped build a white-collar middle class in the late 1940s and early 1950s by using the G.I. Bill to help educate millions of World War II veterans, the Chinese government is using large subsidies to educate tens of millions of young people as they move from farms to cities.The aim is to change the current system, in which a tiny, highly educated elite oversees vast armies of semi-trained factory workers and rural laborers. China wants to move up the development curve by fostering a much more broadly educated public, one that more closely resembles the multifaceted labor forces of the United States and Europe.It is too early to know how well the effort will pay off.While potentially enhancing China's future as a global industrial power, an increasingly educated population poses daunting challenges for its leaders. With the Chinese economy downshifting in the past year to a slower growth rate, the country faces a glut of college graduates with high expectations and limited opportunities.Much depends on whether China's authoritarian political system can create an educational system that encourages the world-class creativity and innovation that modern economies require, and that can help generate enough quality jobs.China also faces formidable difficulties in dealing with widespread corruption, a sclerotic political system, severe environmental damage, inefficient state-owned monopolies and other problems. But if these issues can be surmounted, a better educated labor force could help China become an ever more formidable rival to the West."It will move China forward in its economy, in scientific innovation and politically, but the new rising middle class will also put a lot of pressure on the government to change," said Wang Huiyao, the director general of the Center for China and Globalization, a Beijing-based research group.To the extent that China succeeds, its educational leap forward could have profound implications in a globalized economy in which a growing share of goods and services is traded across international borders. Increasingly, college graduates all over the world compete for similar work, and the boom in higher education in China is starting to put pressure on employment opportunities for college graduates elsewhere — including in the United States.China's current five-year plan, through 2015, focuses on seven national development priorities, many of them new industries that are in fashion among young college graduates in the West. They are alternative energy, energy efficiency, environmental protection, biotechnology, advanced information technologies, high-end equipment manufacturing and so-called new energy vehicles, like hybrid and all-electric cars.China's goal is to invest up to 10 trillion renminbi, or $1.6 trillion, to expand those industries to represent 8 percent of economic output by 2015, up from 3 percent in 2010.At the same time, many big universities are focusing on existing technologies in industries where China poses a growing challenge to the West.
HONG KONG — Hong Kong's embattled chief executive on Wednesday used his first policy address to outline a series of populist proposals to alleviate the severe housing shortages and air pollution that have bedeviled the city.The chief executive, Leung Chun-ying — who took office in July and has already weathered one legislative vote of no confidence, one vote to start an impeachment process and a series of large street protests — pledged to help produce 100,000 housing units over the next five years by streamlining approvals, opening undeveloped land for housing and even using rock caverns and other underground spaces for development.Despite a moderation in apartment prices, demand for housing remains intense, Mr. Leung said."Many families have to move into smaller or older flats, or even factory buildings," he said. "Cramped living space in cage homes, cubicle apartments and subdivided flats has become the reluctant choice for tens of thousands of Hong Kong people."Large developments in Hong Kong take 10 to 20 years to approve and build because they involve considerable public consultation, elaborate engineering for building on the city's steep slopes and sometimes the construction of subway stops. Mr. Leung, 58, cautioned that his suggested measures might not bring quick relief.His address came amid an increasing drumbeat of criticism over his administration, centering on his perceived close ties to the Chinese leadership and his actions during his election campaign. During the race, he concealed the fact that he had expanded his $64 million home without receiving government planning permission, while criticizing his opponent for similar transgressions.Mr. Leung's tenure in office has been star-crossed almost from the start. A plan for patriotic education, which had been under preparation for a decade, set off huge demonstrations, sit-ins and hunger strikes at the local government's headquarters when schools began moving to introduce it two months after Mr. Leung took office.The subsequent revelation that Mr. Leung had sealed up an illegal extension of his basement with a brick wall several days before he began his run for office — and then upended his opponent's election campaign by accusing him of illegal basement construction — left him vulnerable to accusations of hypocrisy. Even Mr. Leung's moves to improve the affordability of housing have been troubled, as his steep taxes on home purchases by people without permanent residency cards have antagonized wealthy developers, who want to be able to sell their apartments to whoever will pay the most.In his speech on Wednesday, Mr. Leung tried to change the political narrative by addressing the bread-and-butter concerns of the residents of Hong Kong, where an influx of money, much of it from the Chinese mainland, has led to yawning wealth disparities."While Hong Kong is a generally affluent society, there are still many people who live a hand-to-mouth existence," he said. "Public resources should be devoted to those who cannot provide for themselves."Mr. Leung also promised to reduce air pollution, notably through the retirement of diesel trucks. He said his government would offer a total of $1.29 billion to the owners of more than 80,000 old, heavily polluting trucks, who will be required to retire them or replace them with new models.The government said the plan would reduce roadside emissions of particulates by 80 percent and emissions of smog-causing nitrogen oxides by 30 percent.While cars tend to draw more attention than trucks as pollution sources because of their greater numbers, American air pollution researchers working in Asia have found that the diesel engines in trucks and buses are a far bigger threat. They account for over 90 percent of vehicular emissions of particulates and nitrogen oxides in mainland China, studies have found. Some studies have also found that diesel exhaust is carcinogenic, but this aspect of Chinese air pollution has been studied less.In a bid to blunt the criticism against his leadership, Mr. Leung has sought the support of young people, who have become increasingly active in the past year in street protests, which have traditionally drawn more middle-aged demonstrators. The city's young people face higher unemployment than previous generations and more worries about housing affordability. But they also tend to be sympathetic to environmental concerns about encroachment on the city's many hillside parks, which developers regard as a hindrance."Our young people should recognize that the planning proposals and development options under discussion today are intended to address their future needs," Mr. Leung said. "It is all too easy for the government to sidestep the problem, but it is today's young people who will have to bear the adverse consequences in the future."
BEIJING — Viewed through the lens of the Marxist tenets he so ardently promoted, Yi Junqing's relationship with a female researcher would have probably been categorized as exploitive.Mr. Yi, 54, an impish scholar who held the job of China's top guardian of Communist literature, is said to have provided the woman with a fellowship at his research institute in exchange for $1,600. The sex and jewelry came later.The allegations came to light last month after the woman, Chang Yan, 34, posted online a self-indulgent and occasionally scintillating diary that recounted a yearlong affair between the two married scholars. A few days later, Ms. Chang tried to retract her sprawling tell-all, but the damage was done.On Thursday, Mr. Yi, the director of the Central Compilation and Translation Bureau, was dismissed. Xinhua, the state news agency, kept its dispatch brief and clean: Mr. Yi, it said, was let go over "lifestyle issues."In a season when dozens of ethically challenged Chinese officials have been felled by their lust for women, money and luxury watches, the downfall of Mr. Yi prompted a hearty round of snickering and schadenfreude, and not just because his vice minister's rank made him one of the more senior party members to lose his job over malfeasance."People have come to treat such news as entertainment, but that's only because we feel so helpless," said Zhu Ruifeng, a muckraking journalist.Mr. Yi's main job, after all, was to propagate the leftist and often puritanical teachings of Mao Zedong and other Communist luminaries at a time when many Chinese have grown disenchanted by the seeming lack of rectitude among their leaders.The headline in The Qianjiang Evening News of Hangzhou seemed to sum up the public's disgust: "Mouthful of Marxism-Leninism, Mind Full of Filth and Vice." The commentary went on to criticize Mr. Yi for selling positions at his institute, which has a staff of nearly 300 and is charged with translating Marxist tracts into Chinese. It also translates Chinese government documents into a number of foreign languages.More than a theoretician, Mr. Yi was a vocal critic of vulgarity in popular culture and an advocate for enhancing China's soft power by selling the notion of Chinese virtue to the world.  Speaking to the state news media in 2011, he said the nation should be "selecting moral models and setting positive examples" that portray China's image in a positive light, "so the world would see the true glamour and strength of modern China."While it was the party leadership that ultimately tossed Mr. Yi overboard, it was the Internet that sealed his fate. Over the past two months, a parade of corrupt officials have been exposed by enterprising journalists, anonymous tipsters or, in Mr. Yi's case, jilted lovers.Recent cases include the relatives of a housing official in Henan Province who had amassed 31 properties and a deputy mayor in Guangdong Province who was fired and placed under investigation after his cozy ties to a drug gang were publicly revealed by a disgruntled underling.Given China's normally tight censorship restrictions, some analysts have suggested that the spate of scandals appearing online is a sign that the new leadership is committed to fighting corruption in the party. During his inaugural address in November, Xi Jinping, the new Communist Party chief and incoming president, warned that unchecked graft threatened to destroy the party.Xinhua, on its microblog account, tried to put a positive spin on the latest scandal, saying, "The resolute management of problematic officials shows the determination of the party's fight against corruption."Judging from the deluge of biting commentary on Sina Weibo, the Chinese equivalent of Twitter, however, few people were convinced. "The shameful step-down of this minister-level official once again proves the Internet wisdom: rumors are but prophecies," Xue Manzi, a widely followed businessman, wrote on his microblog.When it comes to Chinese-style scandal, Mr. Yi's transgressions — at least those alleged by his former lover — are not particularly spectacular. He seems to have had a fondness for sushi and sake, and for lunchtime tête-à-têtes at a Beijing hotel with Ms. Chang — 17 of them, by her count.She described a man who enjoyed talking politics, but also about his own achievements. "I am quite talented after all," he supposedly said after recounting the favorable impression he had made on Mr. Xi, the party chief.Ms. Chang does not exactly come off as a naïf. After giving him an additional $8,000 (and a bottle of Boss cologne), she said she grew angry when Mr. Yi failed to secure her a permanent position at his institute. She was also not pleased to learn he had other lovers, one of whom she claims was a postdoctoral student he was advising. In the end, she admitted that she tried to blackmail him, demanding more than $96,000 to leave him alone.After the diary's release, Ms. Chang tried to backpedal, saying she was depressed and nearly delusional from working too much when she wrote its 100,000 characters. "In my spare time I put together a work of fiction," she said.
HONG KONG — The giant Chinese economy picked up steam during the last few months of 2012, closely watched data from Beijing on Friday confirmed. But at the same time the figures underlined the view that the pace of future growth is likely to remain well below that seen in recent years.China's gross domestic product expanded 7.9 percent during the final quarter of last year, compared to a year earlier — slightly better than expectations, and significantly above the 7.4 percent pace recorded during the previous quarter.Separate data for the month of December also came in a touch better than analysts had forecast: Retail sales expanded 15.2 percent from a year earlier, and industrial output grew 10.3 percent. Both figures were slightly better than those recorded in November.The growth data "was the best we could have wished for," Dariusz Kowalczyk, an economist at Crédit Agricole in Hong Kong, commented in a note. The figures "should put at rest any remaining doubt about China escaping a hard landing," he added, referring to widespread fears last year that China could slow down sharply as the global turmoil, feeble domestic demand and a weak property market weighed on growth.Stock market investors also welcomed the data. The Shanghai composite index rose 1.4 percent, and in Hong Kong, the Hang Seng climbed 1.1 percent.China's mild re-acceleration has been helped by a gradual recovery in overseas demand for Chinese-made goods in recent months, as well as a string of economic stimulus measures announced by the government over the course of last year. These have helped put a floor under the beleaguered property market, and ramped up infrastructure construction activity, in particular.The batch of data released by the Chinese statistics bureau on Friday also underlined that China's once red-hot economy has now settled into a much slower pace of expansion.The head of the statistics authority, Ma Jiantang, acknowledged as much at a press conference in Beijing: "I think you could use these two sentences to give a relatively concise assessment of economic performance in 2012," he said. "First, national economic performance maintained stability while slowing; second, economic and social development made advances while maintaining stability."Annual expansion has slowed to around 8 percent — the pace for 2012 was 7.8 percent, down from the 9.3 percent in 2011 and the 10.4 percent in 2010 — and many economists expect a similar or slightly better pace for 2013.Xianfang Ren, an economist at IHS Global Insight in Beijing, commented that Friday's data confirmed "that the worst is probably over for the economy and that China has avoided a hard landing," But it was "quite a narrow escape." The economy will likely be "wiggling within quite a narrow band of growth rates in 2013, as the upside pull only marginally outweighs the downside drag," Ms. Ren added in an e-mailed note.Many analysts believe that the economy's momentum may ease again later this year if the government alters policies in a bid to prevent inflation and property prices from heating up again.Regulators also are watching out for potential problems caused by lending activities outside the regulated banking system, which have been an important driver of economic activity.The growth of such non-bank credit, commented Yao Wei, an economist at Société Générale in Hong Kong in a recent research report, "is likely to slow once regulators respond seriously to risks rising from the shadow banking system." Along with tighter property policies, Ms. Yao said, this factor is likely to cause the recovering momentum to fade late in the second quarter of this year.Longer term, analysts believe the pace is likely to slow even further over the coming decade as the authorities pursue a shift towards higher-quality growth, and grapple with the gradual aging of the country's population."China's working-age population experienced its first absolute decline for some considerable time, and we are certainly taking this issue seriously," Mr. Ma, the statistics bureau head, said Friday."For quite some time to come, and at least up until 2030, China's working-age population aged from 15 to less than 60 years old will, I think, steadily and gradually shrink," Mr. Ma said. This, he added, meant that it was important for China to raise labor productivity.
GUANGZHOU, China — This city of 15 million on the Pearl River is the hub of a manufacturing region where factories make everything from T-shirts and shoes to auto parts, tablet computers and solar panels. Many factories are desperate for workers, despite offering double-digit annual pay increases and improved benefits.Wang Zengsong is desperate for a steady job. He has been unemployed for most of the three years since he graduated from a community college here after growing up on a rice farm. Mr. Wang, 25, has worked only several months at a time in low-paying jobs, once as a shopping mall guard, another time as a restaurant waiter and most recently as an office building security guard.But he will not consider applying for a full-time factory job because Mr. Wang, as a college graduate, thinks that is beneath him. Instead, he searches every day for an office job, which would initially pay as little as a third of factory wages."I have never and will never consider a factory job — what's the point of sitting there hour after hour, doing repetitive work?" he asked.Millions of recent college graduates in China like Mr. Wang are asking the same question. A result is an anomaly: Jobs go begging in factories while many educated young workers are unemployed or underemployed. A national survey of urban residents, released this winter by a Chinese university, showed that among people in their early 20s, those with a college degree were four times as likely to be unemployed as those with only an elementary school education.It is a problem that Chinese officials are acutely aware of."There is a structural mismatch — on the one hand, the factories cannot find skilled labor, and, on the other hand, the universities produce students who do not want the jobs available," said Ye Zhihong, a deputy secretary general of China's Education Ministry.China's swift expansion in education over the last decade, including a quadrupling of the number of college graduates each year, has created millions of engineers and scientists. The best can have their pick of jobs at Chinese companies that are aiming to become even more competitive globally.But China is also churning out millions of graduates with few marketable skills, coupled with a conviction that they are entitled to office jobs with respectable salaries.Part of the problem seems to be a proliferation of fairly narrow majors — Mr. Wang has a three-year associate degree in the design of offices and trade show booths. At the same time, business and economics majors are rapidly gaining favor on Chinese campuses at the expense of majors like engineering, contributing to the glut of graduates with little interest in soiling their hands on factory floors."This also has to do with the banking sector — they offer high-paying jobs, so their parents want their children to go in this direction," Ms. Ye said.Mr. Wang and other young, educated Chinese without steady jobs pose a potential long-term challenge to social stability. They spend long hours surfing the Internet, getting together with friends and complaining about the shortage of office jobs for which they believe they were trained.China now has 11 times as many college students as it did at the time of the Tiananmen Square protests in the spring of 1989, and an economy that has been very slow to produce white-collar jobs. The younger generation has shown less interest in political activism, although that could change if the growing numbers of graduates cannot find satisfying work.Prime Minister Wen Jiabao acknowledged last March that only 78 percent of the previous year's college graduates had found jobs. But even that figure may overstate employment for the young and educated.The government includes not just people in long-term jobs but also freelancers, temporary workers, graduate students and people who have signed job contracts but not started work yet, as well as many people in make-work jobs that state-controlled companies across China have been ordered to create for new graduates.Yin Weimin, the minister of human resources and social security, said in a speech last spring that "the major emphasis will be on solving the employment problem among college graduates."
HONG KONG — A survey of manufacturing activity in China on Thursday provided more reassurance that the Chinese economy, buoyed by somewhat improved global trade and a string of government stimulus measures last year, has settled into a muted recovery.The reading of the purchasing managers' index, published by the British bank HSBC, rose to 51.9 in January from 51.5 in December. It was the fifth consecutive improvement in the monthly index, and took the number to its highest level in two years.The early version of the HSBC index, which is based on about 90 percent of the survey results, provides one of the earliest insights into the world's second-largest economy each month, and is thus closely watched by analysts and investors."The upbeat manufacturing PMI reading heralds a good start to China's economic growth into the New Year," commented Qu Hongbin, chief China economist for HSBC, in a note accompanying the data release. While export growth was likely to remain tepid, he added, infrastructure construction was regaining momentum, and companies had started to step up hiring and manufacturing again.The reading underlined a picture that has been crystallizing since last year: That the years of double-digit growth are a thing of the past, and that China's economy has, for now, settled into a more modest pace of expansion.Data released last week showed that the Chinese economy expanded just 7.8 percent last year — from 9.3 percent in 2011 and 10.4 percent in 2010.The last few months have shown an improvement as government-mandated measures aimed at propping up growth filtered through to the economy.But that recovery has been modest. The January HSBC index released Thursday, for example, was just 4.3 points higher than its last trough in August, Mr. Qu noted. By comparison, the rebound of 2009 saw the index jump more than 9 points in just five months.
BEIJING — The young women met the officials for illicit trysts with video cameras hidden in their purses. Every detail of the encounters was recorded. Then a group of men confronted the officials with the video recordings and made demands.China's state news media reported on Friday details of a sex extortion ring that brazenly operated "honey traps" in the southwest metropolis of Chongqing for several years. The widening scandal, which first emerged late last year, has led to the dismissals of at least 11 officials of the Communist Party, the government or state-owned companies for having sex with women from the ring and then being blackmailed by the men who had set up the snares.Xi Jinping, China's new top leader, has vowed to root out official corruption and said this week that "flies," or relatively low-level bureaucrats, as well as top officials he referred to as "tigers," must be brought down.The most famous victim of the sex ring scandal is Lei Zhengfu, a middle-aged district party chief who was secretly filmed having sex in a hotel room in 2008 with a young woman. In late November 2012, the leaked video of Mr. Lei began circulating on the Internet, and he became the poster boy for a series of low-level or midlevel officials who had been brought down by scandals, often sexual in nature, across the nation. Mr. Lei was removed from his job and placed under investigation soon after the video appeared online.Now, according to Xinhua, the state news agency, 10 other officials have been removed as well for falling prey to the sex ring. Five of them were executives in state-owned companies.The sex scandal might have come out earlier, but Bo Xilai, the Chongqing party chief at the time, and Wang Lijun, his police chief, buried the results of an investigation into the ring, according to news reports. Mr. Bo and Mr. Wang were both felled last year by the fallout from the murder of a British business executive that the party said was arranged by Mr. Bo's wife; Mr. Bo is expected to be tried soon on a wide range of criminal charges. While the two scandals are unrelated, the airing of the blackmail ring at this time could reflect a decision by the Chinese leadership to highlight other problems in Chongqing under Mr. Bo's rule.The ring's mastermind was a man named Xiao Ye, according to a report by Southern Metropolis Daily on Wednesday that was cited by Xinhua in its Friday article. Three women were used as bait.The state media reports did not say exactly what the officials gave the men in return for keeping the officials' involvement secret, but one report said that a company run by Mr. Xiao was involved in a real estate development project in the district that was governed by Mr. Lei.Mr. Xiao gave the women a list of Chongqing officials whom the women were to contact, Xinhua reported. The women sent text messages, telling the officials that they worked for a local real estate company and had met the official at a banquet."Hope we can stay in touch a lot," they wrote. If the officials said they had no memory of the meeting, the women would invoke the name of a chief executive and pretend to be angry that the official had forgotten the woman already. If the official bit, the woman would continue flirting by text or transmit seductive photos of herself, Xinhua said.A woman would then meet with the official in an upscale hotel to have tea, coffee or a snack. The official would hand her gifts, like jewelry. At a later rendezvous, when the two were ready to have sex, the woman would make sure to show up at the hotel room with a hidden camera. This happened over and over until the video was clear enough, Xinhua reported. Then, at a later tryst, several men in the ring would show up while the official and the woman were in the middle of having sex. One of the men would pretend to be the woman's boyfriend and throw a fit. Behind him would be another man pretending to be a private detective. A third man would then show up and say he was a member of a gang.They would beat up the official and show him the video. Mr. Xiao entered the scene afterward to work out an agreement with the official and assure him that the video would remain buried, as long as the demands were met.The police first investigated the ring in 2008, after Mr. Lei, fearing the videos would eventually leak out anyway, told senior officials about the ring, the news reports said. But the results were buried or ignored by Mr. Bo and Mr. Wang.
BEIJING — Jiang Hao, a senior court administrator, seemed genuinely surprised on Monday morning when he arrived to find dozens of journalists huddling outside his courthouse in the southwestern city of Guiyang expecting the "trial of the century" to begin at any moment."I never thought so many of you would actually come all the way down here," Mr. Jiang said as reporters and camera operators sighed, stewed or just laughed off the absurdity of having flown more than 1,000 miles from Beijing based on what proved to be a false rumor.Justice for Bo Xilai, the fallen party aristocrat and former Politburo member, would have to wait another day.The episode, prompted by a Hong Kong newspaper report that promised a three-day trial in Guiyang, the provincial capital of Guizhou, highlighted a longstanding quandary facing the Chinese leadership that came to power in November: the disjunction between the Communist Party's aversion to transparency and the public's lack of trust in those who run the courts, the news media and every other lever of power.The lack of reliable information is so pervasive that even Xinhua, the state-run news agency, sent reporters to the courthouse in Guiyang."Turns out we were all fooled," said Zhan Jiang, a journalism professor at Beijing Foreign Studies University.The mad rush to chase a nonexistent trial was partly aggravated by the government's prolonged silence regarding Mr. Bo, a once-rising political star who has been held incommunicado since his detention last March. But it also reflected the intense interest in one of China's most lurid scandals in recent memory.After all, not only have the authorities accused Mr. Bo of serial infidelity, "massive bribe taking" and abuse of power, but investigators have been exploring his role in covering up his wife's killing of a British businessman who she said was out to harm her son.After a one-day trial in August, Mr. Bo's wife, Gu Kailai, received a suspended death sentence after she confessed to poisoning the Briton, Neil Heywood, in a hotel room in Chongqing, the southwestern municipality then run by her husband.Just over a month later, Wang Lijun, the police chief under Mr. Bo, was convicted of numerous crimes, including trying to cover up the killing and briefly seeking refuge at the United States Consulate in Chengdu, where, according to information disclosed at his trial, he revealed to diplomats the details of Mr. Bo's and Ms. Gu's misdeeds.Analysts say that Mr. Wang's 15-year sentence, seen as especially lenient, was a reward for cooperating with investigators seeking to build a case against Mr. Bo. Among legal experts, there is little doubt that Mr. Bo will be severely punished; the question is how much party leaders will allow to be made public during what is certain to be a thoroughly stage-managed trial.The initial news about the trial, based on a "usually well-informed source," was published on Friday by Ta Kung Pao, a party-backed newspaper in Hong Kong that is viewed as a reliable mouthpiece for Beijing's interests.Professor Zhan and other experts said the government erred by failing to dispel the misinformation once the report had been picked up by domestic social media and foreign publications. "The central government should have responded directly, openly and in a timely manner," he said.The official silence, and noncommittal statements by the law firm hired to defend Mr. Bo, only helped feed the speculation. Even court employees seemed to waffle, telling reporters on Friday that they had "yet to receive the case," which some interpreted as a coded acknowledgment that the case could arrive on Monday.The government's flat-footed response was not unlike the way it handled Internet-fed speculation two years ago that the retired leader Jiang Zemin had died. Only after foreign publications began writing about Mr. Jiang's rumored demise did the state news media issue a statement that he was still alive.Although the government is required by law to provide at least a three-day public notice before a trial starts — and inform defense lawyers 10 days in advance — many journalists have become accustomed to the party's favoring its own interests over the niceties of Chinese law.Jerome A. Cohen, an expert on Chinese law at New York University, said that he had tried to warn off those who believed the trial was imminent, but he also said that he understood why so many got caught up in the wild-goose chase to distant Guiyang."It does show the understandably huge mistrust of the Chinese legal system by experienced reporters and their willingness to believe that, in the biggest political case since the trial of the Gang of Four, the government would openly violate its declared legal procedures before the world," Professor Cohen said. He was referring to the 1981 show trial in which Mao's wife and three other party leaders were convicted of persecuting hundreds of thousands during the Cultural Revolution.The only rebuttal of the article appeared on Sunday afternoon in the English-language version of Global Times, a nationalistic tabloid that also cited an anonymous source. By then, however, most reporters were already en route to Guiyang.In its article, Global Times — which did not run the article in its Chinese edition — claimed that the trial would take place in the early spring and would last 10 days. Citing a source "close to the country's top judicial body," it cautioned against speculating about Mr. Bo's day of judgment."The information in terms of the date and location for the trial will certainly be made public in advance," it said.On Monday, Mr. Jiang, the court official in Guiyang, tried his best to calm the crowd of journalists. After inviting them into a conference room, he promised to provide adequate notice should the trial in fact take place there — a detail he could not confirm."We appreciate your hard work, but you don't need to waste your time here anymore," he said. "I think it's better for you all to go home."
HONG KONG — A truck laden with fireworks exploded on an elevated expressway in central China on Friday, unleashing a blast that threw vehicles 30 yards to the ground below and killing at least nine people, state news reports said.The truck was on an expressway near Sanmenxia in Henan Province in morning fog when the it erupted, causing an 87-yard section of the Yichang Bridge to collapse, according to the Web site of Dahe Daily, a newspaper in Henan, which quoted rescue officials at the site. Earlier, officials had raised the possibility that a bridge collapse set off the explosion.Fireworks play a large role in China's traditional Lunar New Year celebrations, which begin Feb. 9, and the explosion was a reminder of the dangers brought by the crush of people and goods on the move before the holiday.China Central Television reported that one witness injured in the accident said that because of an earlier accident before the explosion, traffic had been snarled on the expressway and a number of vehicles had crashed into one another.The deadly accident may also rekindle questions about China's transportation infrastructure, which has expanded at a heady pace in recent years. In August, a 330-foot-long ramp section of a bridge in the northeast collapsed 100 feet to the ground, taking four trucks with it, resulting in three deaths. That was the sixth major bridge in China to collapse since July 2011, according to a Xinhua report at the time.None of the reports about the latest bridge accident raised questions about the quality of construction. One initial news report said at least 26 people were killed, but officials on the scene later dismissed that number as too high, according to the Web site of People's Daily, which said about 11 people were injured.Images on Chinese television and news Web sites showed rescuers clambering over the shattered remains of trucks that had plunged to earth, with part of one truck hanging off the severed section of the bridge. Reports from the scene said 10 to 25 vehicles fell off the bridge."A number of vehicles were crushed under the fallen bridge section, adding to the difficulties of the rescuers," said a report on China Central Television.After the explosion, the Ministry of Public Security convened a video conference with police officials across the country, urging them to tighten controls on the production and transportation of fireworks, according to the Web site of Legal Daily, a state-run newspaper.
The Chinese author Wang Xiaofang learned to write corruption exposés the hard way. His decade as a pen-pushing civil servant culminated in a three-year investigation for corruption while his boss, the deputy mayor of the rust-belt city of Shenyang, was executed for gambling away $3.6 million of public money in Macau's casinos.Wang was eventually exonerated, but this history adds a frisson of reality to the 13 novels he's written, each of which details Machiavellian office politicking along the corridors of local government. Did Wang really hide a block of money from anticorruption investigators, as did one of his characters? He's loath to address his personal experience, but he calls China's anticorruption efforts the equivalent of thieves catching thieves. "My boss was given a lethal injection," he told me in November. "And the person who investigated the case, a senior official in the provincial anticorruption bureau, was given a first-class merit citation. But later he too was caught, and was found to be even more corrupt than my boss."In China, "bureaucracy lit" is a hot genre, far outselling spy stories and whodunits as the airport novel of choice. In these tales of overweening ambition, the plot devices that set readers' pulses racing are underhanded power plays, hidden alliances and devious sexual favors. The current craze began in 1999 with "Ink Painting," by Wang Yuewen, and has become so intense that last year a deputy bureau chief who writes a series under the pseudonym Xiaoqiao Laoshu was named China's 17th-richest author. "Officialdom lit" is hugely popular, not just as a peek behind the curtains, but also as a go-to guide for aspiring cadres in search of their own sycophancy strategies."I never thought I would drink urine for a full five years," reflects one unfortunate flunky on his attempts to ingratiate himself with his boss in the opening scene of Wang Xiaofang's "Civil Servant's Notebook," which has sold more than 100,000 copies in China since its publication in 2009 and has just been published as an e-book in English. "Urine is a metaphor for the culture of officialdom that has existed in China for thousands of years," Wang told me. "Urine is the garbage excreted from people's bodies. And this book is an attack on the culture of officialdom." Bribery, he explained, is ingrained in every aspect of Chinese culture. "When devotees go to worship Buddha, they don't cleanse their souls, like Christians confessing their sins in church," he said. "They kneel down and donate money to the collection box, to bribe the Buddha."It might seem surprising that China allows the publication of such books. One typical passage in Wang's book reads, "The main thing is the 'rule of corruption': helping the horse both to race and also to get a mouthful of hay." It goes on to say: "It's what all civil servants are secretly thinking. Our expectations for our civil servants are far too high, far too grandiose. The pressure is more than their flesh-and-blood bodies can stand." But for China's censors, unschooled in nuance or allegory, so long as corruption is punished by the ending, bureaucracy lit can work as a modern morality tale, nominally allowing writers to cleave to the role intended by Chairman Mao, who in a famous speech in 1942 declared, "Proletarian literature and art are part of the whole proletarian revolutionary cause; they are, as Lenin said, cogs and wheels in the whole revolutionary machine."However, as China undergoes a transition of power, censors have tightened their grip. Wang has not put out a new book in two years, with publishers refusing to release his three most recent novels. Despite tighter censorship over the last couple of years, since the 2009 introduction of China's microblog service, Weibo, Chinese Internet users have been awash in a tidal wave of scandals, usually involving some combination of misbehaving officials, naked women, blackmail and luxury goods. The country's best authors — including Mo Yan, Su Tong and Yu Hua — have long skewered the petty corruption, venality and violence of grass-roots-level officials. But the literary conundrum running parallel to China's warp-speed development and culture of impunity is that real life outpaces fiction in its absurdity. China's authors, already marginalized by strict censorship, may risk irrelevance.
HONG KONG — A French-owned oil tanker that went missing off the Ivory Coast is believed to have been hijacked by pirates who are holding the 17 sailors on board, a maritime agency said Monday.The seizure of the tanker, registered in Luxembourg, likely took place Sunday, said Noel Choong, a spokesman for the International Maritime Bureau, based in Kuala Lumpur, Malaysia. He added that the seizure may be tied to a recent series of attacks by pirates operating in the Gulf of Guinea, where patrols, particularly off the Ivory Coast, are scarce."It's an ongoing attack," Mr. Choong said. "It's still going on."In a telephone interview, Mr. Choong said that, once they seize a ship, the pirates in the area typically take it to the coast off Nigeria, where they siphon off all its fuel, and then steal all the valuables from crew members and from the ship. Such operations typically last five or six days and can net the pirates millions of dollars, he said.Mr. Choong said that he hoped the increasing frequency of attacks would prompt greater vigilance by the government of the Ivory Coast."We are hoping they will increase patrols," he said. "We don't have the sorts of patrols along the Ivory Coast" that are common in other areas and serve to deter such attacks.The attack was the most serious in a series of raids by pirates recently.On Monday a sailor was shot as pirates tried to hijack a ship off the coast of Nigeria's largest city, Lagos, Mr. Choong said. And last week, pirates fired a rocket-propelled grenade at a tanker off the Nigerian coast during an hourlong chase, but the tanker was able to evade the pursuing skiffs.
HONG KONG — The Chinese police said on Tuesday that they had detained Gong Aiai, popularly known as House Sister, in a corruption case that has gripped China for weeks after it was revealed that Ms. Gong and her family had accumulated dozens of houses and other properties. She was caught on Sunday, the police said, and is being held on suspicion of forging official identity papers and other documents she used in an effort to escape detection.Ms. Gong and her collection of properties struck a raw nerve with millions of Chinese who are outraged over graft and brazen self-enrichment by officials and their confederates, and frustrated by the high cost of homes in cities where it seems many rich and powerful people have invested in housing that often sits empty."House Sister is a microcosm of China's problems," said Li Xinde, a freelance journalist who runs a Web site devoted to exposing official corruption. "Many ordinary people simply can't afford to buy a single home, but House Sister suddenly accumulated one after another. It's a classic case that shows the crazy extent of the intertwining of money and power in China."A former vice president of the Shenmu Rural Commercial Bank in the northwestern province of Shaanxi, Ms. Gong owned 41 residential and commercial properties in Beijing alone, the police in the capital said last week. They said Ms. Gong bought at least 10 of the properties by using an illegally obtained national identity card and Beijing residence registration, apparently to try to evade detection and skirt limits on nonlocal residents buying housing in Beijing.That is not counting the two properties that earlier newspaper reports said she held in the northwestern city of Xi'an, and two in her home county, Shenmu.Before being taken into custody on Sunday, Ms. Gong had disappeared from public view for about two weeks, and many bloggers accused the police of failing to pursue her. In an interview in mid-January, she said the money for the property came from legitimate family investments. The police statement issued by state news media said that Ms. Gong had submitted her resignation from the bank in June, but that the bank board formally approved it on Jan. 2.The country's top leader, Xi Jinping, has repeatedly vowed to stamp out graft and greed by officials since he was appointed head of the ruling Communist Party in November. Emboldened by such promises, Chinese Internet sites and newspapers have published a spate of accusations about officials and associates exploiting their illicit wealth and connections to acquire luxury-brand watches, expensive four-wheel-drive vehicles and other symbols of excess. Those accusations have in turn kindled growing demands for officials to disclose their wealth to the public.Almost inevitably after House Sister rose to notoriety, the news media have given each subsequent case a similar nickname. Zhang Xiuting, called House Brother, is an anticorruption official in northeast China who is under investigation for amassing 19 properties along with his former wife. Shenzhen, in southern China, has offered up a House Uncle, Zhou Weisi, a local official whose family was accused on the Internet of piling up 80 properties and 20 cars.Zhai Zhenfeng, a former housing administration official in Zhengzhou, capital of Henan Province, in central China, was arrested in early January after accusations emerged that he and his wife had illegally obtained and sold 100 or more apartments.Such exploits, however, appear puny next to those of Zhao Haibin, a party official and former public security chief in Lufeng in southern China, who was accused by a local businessman of accumulating at least 192 apartments and other units of real estate, the Southern Metropolitan Daily reported on Tuesday. Mr. Zhao told the paper he was merely minding the properties for his younger brother.Many of these cases appear to have come to light only after rivals or disgruntled associates leaked accusations on the Internet.Nearly all the scandals have also involved officials using multiple identity cards and household residence permits, called "hukou," in efforts to evade detection and the limits that many big cities impose on how many residences an individual can buy.
HONG KONG — The tensions between residents here and mainland Chinese visitors dominate the headlines of the city's papers, with mainlanders blamed for a shortage of school slots, bad manners in stores and a hypercharged property market.So it should come as little surprise that a television show would come along to tap into these anxieties and, perhaps in a gift to the show's producers, also draw the attention of mainland censors."Inbound Troubles" tells the story of two cousins — one from Hong Kong and the other from the mainland — and the tensions in a city whose wealth increasingly rests on a flood of mainland visitors who nevertheless draw scorn for lavish spending and, some say, boorish ways.In the show, the cousin from mainland China is shown littering, running red lights and parking illegally, while the one from Hong Kong makes his living with a travel agency that specializes in encouraging new arrivals from the mainland to part with more of their cash.The TVB network program, which has just ended its monthlong run, was shown as the city's leadership struggled to confront the latest supposed peril attributed to mainlanders: a shortage of baby formula said to have been caused by the hoarding of supplies by mainland Chinese who have crossed the border into Hong Kong (apparently out of fear of tainted supplies in China).Some Hong Kong residents have become so agitated about the formula milk problem that they have asked the United States to intervene, using a petition on the White House Web site titled, "Baby Hunger Outbreak in Hong Kong, International Aid Requested."The petition, created in late January, has already drawn 23,000 signatures.The show's candid depictions of mainland-Hong Kong relations — one scene focuses on the formula shortage — have drawn hundreds of complaints to Hong Kong regulators from viewers upset at things like its portrayals of mainlanders and its depiction of the Hong Kong's tourism industry as predatory. And Chinese officials censored trailers for the program on the mainland, where it could be viewed on TVB's overseas channel or through video streaming.China also did some trimming of the version shown on the mainland, once the program began there. It deleted a depiction of a protest outside a Hong Kong clothing store, a scene apparently based on a demonstration against a Dolce & Gabbana store that let free-spending mainlanders photograph merchandise while barring Hong Kong residents from doing the same.Still, the show clearly struck a nerve, becoming the TVB channel's highest-rated drama this year.To some, the tensions captured in the show are a natural outgrowth of fears about Beijing's increasing influence in Hong Kong, a former British colony that retained considerable legal autonomy and civil rights after it was handed back to China in 1997."Politically, more and more Hong Kongers resent the fact that Beijing is tightening its control over Hong Kong's political development," Willy Lam, a scholar on Chinese history and politics at the Chinese University of Hong Kong, wrote in an e-mail.He added that the current leader of Hong Kong, Leung Chun-ying, "is seen as a yes-man chief executive bowing to every instruction from the mainland authorities.""There is a common feeling that fat-cat mainlanders are driving up real estate prices," he said. "You have witnessed of course the drama over formula milk powder."Although polls show that an increasing number of Hong Kong residents hold pessimistic views about the city's future and Hong Kong-mainland relations, in "Inbound Troubles" the two cousins gradually acclimate to each other, with the one from the mainland adapting to local ways.Viewers say they appreciate the show's realistic depictions of the shifting social dynamics of Hong Kong and the growing impact of mainland China and its visitors on the city."I have a few bad experiences with mainlanders — most of them have to do with them jumping queues or being rude," said Tai Wing-yi, a student at Hong Kong Baptist University. "But not all are like that. Some of my classmates are from the mainland, and they are nice to be around, and they work hard. In fact, they are the ones who contribute more than the locals in group projects."The show highlighted the tension between mainland Chinese and locals in a funny way, and got the message across in a lighthearted manner," she said.Chen Min, a mainland journalist who has visited Hong Kong many times, said his social circle in the city included many more-educated and better-off local residents, who were usually polite, but that not all encounters were so smooth."Occasionally you run into problems that you didn't encounter before," he said. "Like a taxi driver who refuses to take you because you speak Mandarin, although you're holding a map and address in Chinese."On another occasion, Mr. Chen said, he was lugging a heavy suitcase to a taxi. "The driver joked, 'Carrying cash to buy an apartment?' "The popularity of the show — there is already talk of a movie — suggests that it could pave the way for treatments with similar themes, much as, in the United States, "All in the Family" started a subgenre of politically tinged situation comedies during the turbulence of the Vietnam War.In an opinion piece in Global Times, a populist mainland newspaper, Wendy Wang, a freelance writer from Shanghai, noted that mainlanders had long been derided on Hong Kong television, with men often portrayed as mobsters and women as flirty or worse.But after the 1997 return of Hong Kong to Chinese rule, "mainlanders' characters grew wealthier but not wiser," she wrote.
HANJING, China — Wu Yiebing has been going down coal shafts practically every workday of his life, wrestling an electric drill for $500 a month in the choking dust of claustrophobic tunnels, with one goal in mind: paying for his daughter's education.His wife, Cao Weiping, toils from dawn to sunset in orchards every day during apple season in May and June. She earns $12 a day tying little plastic bags one at a time around 3,000 young apples on trees, to protect them from insects. The rest of the year she works as a substitute store clerk, earning several dollars a day, all going toward their daughter's education.Many families in the West sacrifice to put their children through school, saving for college educations that they hope will lead to a better life. Few efforts can compare with the heavy financial burden that millions of lower-income Chinese parents now endure as they push their children to obtain as much education as possible.Yet a college degree no longer ensures a well-paying job, because the number of graduates in China has quadrupled in the last decade.Mr. Wu and Mrs. Cao, who grew up in tiny villages in western China and became migrants in search of better-paying work, have scrimped their entire lives. For nearly two decades, they have lived in a cramped and drafty 200-square-foot house with a thatch roof. They have never owned a car. They do not take vacations — they have never seen the ocean. They have skipped traditional New Year trips to their ancestral village for up to five straight years to save on bus fares and gifts, and for Mr. Wu to earn extra holiday pay in the mines. Despite their frugality, they have essentially no retirement savings.Thanks to these sacrifices, their daughter, Wu Caoying, is now a 19-year-old college sophomore. She is among the growing millions of Chinese college students who have gone much farther than their parents could have dreamed when they were growing up. For all the hard work of Ms. Wu's father and mother, however, they aren't certain it will pay off. Their daughter is ambivalent about staying in school, where the tuition, room and board cost more than half her parents' combined annual income. A slightly above-average student, she thinks of dropping out, finding a job and earning money."Every time my daughter calls home, she says, 'I don't want to continue this,' " Mrs. Cao said. "And I say, 'You've got to keep studying to take care of us when we get old', and she says, 'That's too much pressure, I don't want to think about all that responsibility.' "Ms. Wu dreams of working at a big company, but knows that many graduates end up jobless. "I think I may start my own small company," she says, while acknowledging she doesn't have the money or experience to run one.For a rural parent in China, each year of higher education costs six to 15 months' labor, and it is hard for children from poor families to get scholarships or other government financial support. A year at the average private university in the United States similarly equals almost a year's income for the average wage earner, while an in-state public university costs about six months' pay, but financial aid is generally easier to obtain than in China. Moreover, an American family that spends half its income helping a child through college has more spending power with the other half of its income than a rural Chinese family earning less than $5,000 a year.It isn't just the cost of college that burdens Chinese parents. They face many fees associated with sending their children to elementary, middle and high schools. Many parents also hire tutors, so their children can score high enough on entrance exams to get into college. American families that invest heavily in their children's educations can fall back on Medicare, Social Security and other social programs in their old age. Chinese citizens who bet all of their savings on their children's educations have far fewer options if their offspring are unable to find a job on graduation.
The building off Datong Road, surrounded by restaurants, massage parlors and a wine importer, is the headquarters of P.L.A. Unit 61398. A growing body of digital forensic evidence — confirmed by American intelligence officials who say they have tapped into the activity of the army unit for years — leaves little doubt that an overwhelming percentage of the attacks on American corporations, organizations and government agencies originate in and around the white tower.An unusually detailed 60-page study, to be released Tuesday by Mandiant, an American computer security firm, tracks for the first time individual members of the most sophisticated of the Chinese hacking groups — known to many of its victims in the United States as "Comment Crew" or "Shanghai Group" — to the doorstep of the military unit's headquarters. The firm was not able to place the hackers inside the 12-story building, but makes a case there is no other plausible explanation for why so many attacks come out of one comparatively small area."Either they are coming from inside Unit 61398," said Kevin Mandia, the founder and chief executive of Mandiant, in an interview last week, "or the people who run the most-controlled, most-monitored Internet networks in the world are clueless about thousands of people generating attacks from this one neighborhood."Other security firms that have tracked "Comment Crew" say they also believe the group is state-sponsored, and a recent classified National Intelligence Estimate, issued as a consensus document for all 16 of the United States intelligence agencies, makes a strong case that many of these hacking groups are either run by army officers or are contractors working for commands like Unit 61398, according to officials with knowledge of its classified content.Mandiant provided an advance copy of its report to The New York Times, saying it hoped to "bring visibility to the issues addressed in the report." Times reporters then tested the conclusions with other experts, both inside and outside government, who have examined links between the hacking groups and the army (Mandiant was hired by The New York Times Company to investigate a sophisticated Chinese-origin attack on its news operations, but concluded it was not the work of Comment Crew, but another Chinese group. The firm is not currently working for the Times Company but it is in discussions about a business relationship.)While Comment Crew has drained terabytes of data from companies like Coca-Cola, increasingly its focus is on companies involved in the critical infrastructure of the United States — its electrical power grid, gas lines and waterworks. According to the security researchers, one target was a company with remote access to more than 60 percent of oil and gas pipelines in North America. The unit was also among those that attacked the computer security firm RSA, whose computer codes protect confidential corporate and government databases.Contacted Monday, officials at the Chinese embassy in Washington again insisted that their government does not engage in computer hacking, and that such activity is illegal. They describe China itself as a victim of computer hacking, and point out, accurately, that there are many hacking groups inside the United States. But in recent years the Chinese attacks have grown significantly, security researchers say. Mandiant has detected more than 140 Comment Crew intrusions since 2006. American intelligence agencies and private security firms that track many of the 20 or so other Chinese groups every day say those groups appear to be contractors with links to the unit.And the Chinese Ministry of Foreign Affairs said Tuesday that the allegations were ''unprofessional.''''Making unfounded accusations based on preliminary results is both irresponsible and unprofessional, and is not helpful for the resolution of the relevant problem,'' said Hong Lei, a ministry spokesman. ''China resolutely opposes hacking actions and has established relevant  laws and regulations and taken strict law enforcement measures to defend against online hacking activities.''
Two Tibetan teenagers killed themselves by self-immolation on Tuesday to protest Chinese rule in Tibet , according to reports on Wednesday by a Tibet advocacy group and Radio Free Asia. The two were among the youngest Tibetans to kill themselves in protest, and the act was a rare instance in which Tibetans committed self-immolation together.The teenagers were identified as Rinchen, 17, who went by only one name, and Sonam Dargye, 18. They had been elementary school classmates in Sichuan Province, in western China, according to Radio Free Asia, which is financed by the United States government. They killed themselves in Ngaba Prefecture, or Aba in Chinese, which has a large Tibetan population and has been at the epicenter of the self-immolation protests.At least 104 Tibetans have self-immolated since 2009 in protests against China. Since a widespread Tibetan uprising against Chinese rule in 2008, tensions between Tibetans and Chinese officials have been high across the Tibetan plateau, and officials have deployed large numbers of security forces, mostly ethnic Han, who rule China, in the crucial areas of the region.Twenty of the self-immolators have been 18 or younger, according to statistics compiled by the International Campaign for Tibet, an advocacy group based in Washington.Free Tibet, an advocacy group based in London, said the two teenagers who killed themselves on Tuesday had died at the scene of their self-immolation at about 9:30 p.m., and that their families had retrieved the bodies.On Sunday, a Tibetan man, Namlha Tsering, 49, set himself on fire in the main street of Labrang, an important monastery town in Gansu Province. A photograph released by Tibet advocacy groups shows a man aflame and sitting in the street. Another photo shows security troops in riot gear marching in a street in Labrang, known as Xiahe in Chinese. The reports said the man was from a nomadic area.The self-immolations began with monks, mostly from Kirti Monastery, in Ngaba. Since then, the profile of Tibetans who have self-immolated has widened. They have included women, middle-aged parents and nomads. Tibetans have self-immolated together a handful of other times, including in Lhasa, the capital of Tibet, and in Ngaba.The Chinese government has blamed outside forces for the self-immolations, particularly the Dalai Lama, the exiled spiritual leader of the Tibetans, who is regarded by China as a subversive. The Dalai Lama's supporters have denied such accusations."Beijing should stop playing the blame game," Lobsang Sangay, the prime minister of the Tibetan government in exile, which is based in Dharamsala, India, said in an e-mail last week. "Instead, it should thoroughly overhaul its failed hard-line policies, which are the main cause of the self-immolations."
BEIJING — China considered using a drone strike in a mountainous region of Southeast Asia to kill a Myanmar drug lord wanted in the murders of 13 Chinese sailors, but decided instead to capture him alive, according to an influential state-run newspaper.The plan to use a drone, described to the Global Times newspaper by a senior public security official, highlights China's increasing advances in unmanned aerial warfare, a technology dominated by the United States and used widely by the Obama administration for the targeted killing of terrorists.Liu Yuejin, the director of the Ministry of Public Security's antidrug bureau, told the newspaper in an article published online on Tuesday that the plan called for using a drone carrying explosives to bomb the outlaw's hide-out in the opium-growing area of Myanmar, in the Golden Triangle at the intersection of Laos, Thailand and Vietnam.China's law enforcement officials were under pressure from an outraged public to take action after 13 Chinese sailors on two cargo ships laden with narcotics were killed in October 2011 on the Mekong River. Photos of the dead sailors, their bodies gagged and blindfolded and some with head wounds suggesting execution-style killings, circulated on China's Internet.It was one of the most brutal assaults on Chinese citizens abroad in recent years. Naw Kham, a member of Myanmar's ethnic Shan minority and a major drug trafficker, was suspected in the murders.A manhunt by the Chinese police in the jungles of the Golden Triangle produced no results, and security officials turned to a drone strike as a possible solution.Dennis M. Gormley, an expert on unmanned aircraft at the University of Pittsburgh, said of the reported Chinese deliberations, "Separating fact from fiction here is difficult." But he added, "Given the gruesome nature of the 2011 killings and the Chinese public's outcry for action, it's not at all surprising to imagine China employing an armed drone over Myanmar's territory."Mr. Gormley said the decision not to carry out a drone strike might reflect a lack of confidence in untested Chinese craft, control systems or drone pilots. "I think China's still not ready for prime time using armed drones, but they surely will be with a few more years of determined practice," he said. "And they surely will have America's armed drone practice as a convenient cover for legitimating their own practice."China's global navigation system, Beidou, would have been used to guide the drones to the target, Mr. Liu said. China's goal is for the Beidou system to compete with the United States' Global Positioning System, Russia's Glonass and the European Union's Galileo, Chinese experts say.Mr. Liu's comments on the use of the Beidou system with the drones reflects the rapid advancement in that navigation system from its humble beginnings more than a decade ago.The experimental navigation system was started in 2000 and has since expanded to 16 navigation satellites over Asia and the Pacific Ocean, according to an article in Wednesday's China Daily, an English-language state-run newspaper. The Chinese military, particularly the navy, is now conducting patrols and training exercises using Beidou, the paper said.As an example, China Daily quoted the information chief at the headquarters of the North Sea Fleet, Lei Xiwei, as saying a fleet with the missile destroyer Qingdao, along with the missile frigates Yantai and Yancheng, entered the South China Sea on Feb. 1 using the Beidou navigation system to provide positioning, security and protection for the fleet.As China has been vastly improving its navigation system, it is also making fast progress with drones, and many manufacturers for the military have research centers devoted to unmanned aerial vehicles, according to a report last year by the Defense Science Board of the Pentagon.Two Chinese drones, apparently modeled on the American Reaper and Predator unmanned aerial vehicles, were unveiled at the Zhuhai air show in November. A larger drone Western experts say is akin to the American RQ-4 Global Hawk is also known to be in the Chinese arsenal.One of the Chinese drones, the CH-4, had a range of about 2,200 miles and was ideal for surveillance missions over islands in the East China Sea that are the subject of a dispute between China and Japan, an official with the China Aerospace Science and Technology Corporation said at the Zhuhai air show.China has acknowledged a pilot program that uses drones as part of its stepped-up surveillance of its coastal areas, as well as in the South China Sea and the East China Sea.The State Oceanic Administration has said that by 2015, it plans to use drones along China's coastline on a permanent basis and will establish monitoring bases in provinces along the coastline for drones.As for Naw Kham, the fugitive, he was captured by Laotian authorities at the Mekong River port of Mong Mo after a six-month hunt in the jungles of the Golden Triangle by the combined police forces of China, Myanmar, Thailand and Laos. After his extradition to China, Naw Kham received a death sentence from a Chinese court in Yunnan Province and awaits execution."We didn't use China's military, and we didn't harm a single foreign citizen," Mr. Liu bragged after the arrest in April 2012.
BEIJING — The Chinese leader, Xi Jinping , has selected Moscow as his first foreign capital to visit as president, to be followed immediately by a trip to South Africa for a summit meeting of the group of leading emerging-market countries.His predecessor, Hu Jintao, also chose Moscow as his first overseas stop after assuming office, but Mr. Xi's journey to Russia has a special significance, analysts say. It comes as China tries to answer the Obama administration's shift toward Asia, a policy that is viewed with suspicion in Beijing as an effort to contain China.By going to Russia, Mr. Xi will be working to ensure that China's relationship with Moscow — a sometimes prickly affair in which the balance of power has tilted sharply in China lately — is in good shape before he meets with President Obama later in the year, analysts said.There have also been indications that Mr. Xi and the Russian president, Vladimir V. Putin, would try to hammer out a long-sought energy deal that would provide China with Russian oil and gas. "China wants to consolidate its position with Russia before dealing with the United States," said Jin Canrong, associate dean at the School of International Studies at Renmin University. In particular, he said, China is likely to seek Russian support in its territorial dispute with Japan, an American ally, over islands in the East China Sea.Mr. Xi is not expected to meet Mr. Obama until September, when both leaders will attend a summit meeting of the Group of 20 nations in St. Petersburg, Russia, Chinese officials said.The Chinese have not released a precise date for Mr. Xi's visit to Moscow, largely because he will not formally become president until the National People's Congress meets in Beijing starting on March 5. He is now leader of the Communist Party, a post he assumed in November.In Moscow on Tuesday, Mr. Putin said he looked forward to the visit of Mr. Xi "soon." The Chinese foreign minister, Yang Jiechi, who was in Moscow on Tuesday, confirmed the planned visit.Chinese state media reported this week that Mr. Xi would stop in Russia on his way to the meeting of the leaders of the so-called BRICS nations in Durban, South Africa, on March 26 and 27. BRICS stands for Brazil, Russia, India, China and South Africa.There were few expectations that Mr. Xi and Mr. Obama would meet earlier than September, although the men are expected to speak by telephone once Mr. Xi assumes the presidency, officials said. Mr. Obama welcomed Mr. Xi to the White House in February 2012 when Mr. Xi was vice president.Word of Mr. Xi's itinerary comes as the new American secretary of state, John Kerry, is starting his first overseas trip this weekend, a nine-country tour of Europe and the Middle East. In contrast, his predecessor, Hillary Rodham Clinton, departed from tradition and visited Asia first, including China.Tensions between China and the United States have grown lately over a variety of issues, including accusations that China's military is responsible for cyberattacks of American companies. Those strains mean there are hazards in delaying a face-to-face meeting for very long, according to Bonnie S. Glaser, senior adviser for Asia at the Center for Strategic and International Studies in Washington."In the absence of presidential dialogue, there is risk of intensifying suspicion and potential for the relationship to drift apart," Ms. Glaser said. "An early summit would be undoubtedly welcomed by the entire region, which is somewhat anxious about U.S.-Chinese friction."China and Russia, on the other hand, have drawn closer lately on major international issues, displaying common interests on issues that are important to the United States, like the conflict in Syria and the nuclear ambitions of Iran and North Korea. Those matters are likely to be on the agenda for Mr. Xi's visit to Moscow, along with increased cooperation on energy policy.
Chinese Army units have been undergoing intense training near the border with Myanmar in anticipation of an ethnic war there spilling into southwest China , according to official Chinese news media reports on Friday.The training has been taking place in the hills of Yunnan Province. It borders Kachin State in northern Myanmar, where a civil war between an ethnic Kachin rebel army and the Burmese Army has been unfolding. The fighting intensified in late December, and Chinese officials and news organizations reported that shells had landed in China and that Kachin refugees had begun living in hotels and the homes of family and friends in Yunnan.Last month, the Myanmar government announced a cease-fire with the rebels of the Kachin Independence Army in order to hold peace talks, but foreigners in the area reported continuing attacks by the Burmese Army in the days after. One Chinese news report on Friday said there had been "no significant improvement" in the peace talks.The goal of the military training in Yunnan was to ensure that the Chinese army units can "fight a battle, and be victorious in battle," according to a report on Thursday by Xinhua, the state news agency, that was cited by several other news Web sites.The Xinhua report said the training began this month, after the start of the Lunar New Year, and has focused on preparing border guards for "real combat." Among other things, the soldiers have trained to march in bad weather and work in areas that have blind spots for communications signals.The report said the hilly terrain in Yunnan presented special challenges, and troops were training to fight in the jungle, ravines and water. Some units have been setting up communications posts along the border.Earlier, Yunnan military leaders set up a command center in the area. An article in January on the Web site of People's Daily, a newspaper that speaks for the Communist Party, said border guards and police officers could be seen throughout one border town, Nabang, checking the identification cards of civilians. Many businesses had shut down because transportation was halted, and artillery fire could be heard through the night, the article said.Chinese leaders have been emphasizing in general that the Chinese military should be prepared to fight and should proceed vigorously with modernization. Xi Jinping, the new leader of the Communist Party, visited army and navy units in southern China late last year and spoke of the need to strengthen the military.The current round of fighting in Kachin State has centered on the town of Laiza, from which the Kachin army controls an autonomous area of the state. This winter, the Burmese Army has been pressing an offensive to capture Laiza or crucial military positions around it. The army has deployed fighter jets and heavy artillery, and residents have said civilians were killed.Until a flare-up in tensions in June 2011, the Burmese military and Kachin rebels, who insist on maintaining autonomy, had been adhering to a 17-year cease-fire.Chinese officials have expressed concern this winter over the violence, especially artillery shells falling within Yunnan; at least four have landed since Dec. 30. There are also worries about a potential flood of refugees.Thousands of Kachin, who are mostly Christian, entered Yunnan after the war started again in 2011. Chinese Christians went to the refugee camps to provide aid, as did ethnic Kachin living in China, who are called Jingpo in Mandarin. Then in August, officials in Yunnan forced most of the refugees to leave the camps and return to Kachin State.Thein Sein, the president of Myanmar and a former general, has been trying to introduce democratic practices to the nation's authoritarian political system. But ethnic civil wars have afflicted the country for decades, and the conflicts raise questions about whether the demands of ethnic minorities like the Kachin will be given serious consideration by the evolving ethnic Burmese-dominated government.
TAIPEI — Two computer-making neighbors in the technologically inclined economy of Taiwan seem headed in opposite directions.Personal computer sales have slumped worldwide as smartphones and tablets have proliferated and gained in popularity. One Taiwan heavyweight, Acer, has shared in the suffering: It is expected to report a second straight annual loss in 2012 after losing 6.6 billion Taiwan dollars, or $223 million at the current exchange rate, in 2011.But another Taiwan-based PC company, Asustek, which sells computers under the Asus name, grew 43 percent in the quarter that ended in September, to 6.7 billion dollars in net income. The company's PC sales rose 6.4 percent even as industrywide PC shipments declined 4.9 percent in the last three months of 2012, according to the research firm Gartner.The companies' divergent fortunes expose both the mistakes and the opportunities for PC makers in an epic shift in the way consumers use technology.For more than a decade, with no serious alternatives for consumers, Acer, Dell and Hewlett-Packard treated the PC as a commodity: All of their machines used the same Intel chips and Microsoft software and even looked similar, analysts said. In that environment, PC makers made money by focusing on marketing and by cutting costs.For Acer, much of that strategy was driven by the former chief executive, Gianfranco Lanci, who led the company from 2004 to 2011. During his tenure, the company focused only on marketing and distribution, while gutting research and development and outsourcing design and production, analysts said.The spread of smartphones and tablets has challenged that business model. Consumers have more choices and increasingly focus on how their devices look and feel, how mobile they are and what content they can provide access to."At the moment, the PC market is saturated," said Tracy Tsai, an analyst at Gartner. "When most users have a PC already, they are not looking for just a cheaper notebook. They want something better."That has meant meager profits or none for global PC brands. H.P. reported a $12.7 billion loss in the business year that ended in September 2012, while Dell's poor performance has resulted in an effort to take the company private.It is a problem that has manifested itself on the street as well. Stam Chuang, a manager at a retail shop in the Guanghua Digital Plaza in Taipei, said notebook sales at his store had dropped 10 percent during the past year."There's only a set amount of demand for computing out there," Mr. Chuang said. "So if consumers decide they want a tablet or smartphone, that share will get taken out of PCs."Because of its research and development cuts, Acer has struggled to produce smartphones and tablets that can compete with the sleek products from mobile powerhouses like Amazon.com, Apple and Samsung, analysts said.Asustek, however, followed a strategy that emphasized design and innovation. Its personal computer growth in 2012 was driven by the Zenbook, an ultrathin laptop with a metallic finish, stereo speakers and backlit keys.Jonney Shih, the chairman of Asustek, said he had foreseen the mobile revolution and wanted his company to differentiate itself from the competition."Even 10 years ago, I knew I had to be prepared," Mr. Shih said.He added that with computer architecture and chips shrinking, he had recognized that "the 'phone computer' was going to happen."Mr. Shih has become a cheerleader for what he calls "design thinking," pushing his employees to be creative about building products that enrich the experience for consumers. Asustek incorporated a design and artistry category into its employee evaluation system.The two companies' revenue numbers are similar: In the third quarter of 2012, Acer brought in 87.4 billion dollars in revenue, compared with 96 billion dollars for Asustek, according to Bloomberg data.
The New York Times Company said on Monday that it was planning to rename The International Herald Tribune, its 125-year-old newspaper based in Paris, and would also unveil a redesigned Web site for international audiences.Starting this fall, under the plan, the paper will be rechristened The International New York Times, reflecting the company's intention to focus on its core New York Times newspaper and to build its international presence."This recognizes our global reach and is an exciting and logical move," said Jill Abramson, the executive editor of The New York Times.Mark Thompson, president and chief executive of The New York Times Company, said in a statement that the company recently explored its prospects with international audiences, and noted there was "significant potential to grow the number of New York Times subscribers outside of the United States."He added: "The digital revolution has turned The New York Times from being a great American newspaper to becoming one of the world's best-known news providers. We want to exploit that opportunity."A Times Company spokeswoman would not provide details on how the name change would affect The International Herald Tribune's employees. Currently, half of the staff members who work in Paris are subject to French labor law, while Herald Tribune employees spread throughout the rest of the world are governed by local labor laws.The masthead of the paper will also change, the spokeswoman said, but she declined to elaborate.Stephen Dunbar-Johnson, publisher of The International Herald Tribune, said in an interview that the name change was driven by "extensive research" showing that there was substantial potential, under the new name, to increase the number of international subscribers to the digital editions of The New York Times.Mr. Dunbar-Johnson said the name change would be accompanied by new investments aimed at enhancing the paper's international appeal. New employees will be hired to work on NYTimes.com — currently the combined Web site of The New York Times and The Herald Tribune — in Europe and Asia, he said.The renamed paper will remain based in Paris, where it was founded 125 years ago as the European edition of The New York Herald, Mr. Dunbar-Johnson said. It will also keep its sizable office in Hong Kong where the Asian edition is edited. Mr. Dunbar-Johnson said there also would be investments in other locations. Until the fall it will continue to be published as The International Herald Tribune."Everyone at The New York Times thinks fundamentally that for this to be successful, the paper needs to be edited and curated for an international sensibility," Mr. Dunbar-Johnson said. "The core attributes of The International Herald Tribune will be retained and refined."Through a series of ownership changes, the paper became The New York Herald Tribune, European Edition, in 1935. In 1967, it became The International Herald Tribune when The Times and the Washington Post Company invested in the paper to keep it afloat after The New York Herald Tribune folded. In 1991, the Post and Times companies became co-owners of the paper, and in 2003 The Times bought out The Post's share and became the sole owner.The announcement is part of the company's larger plan to focus on its core brand and build its international presence, the Times spokeswoman said. Last week, the Times Company said it was exploring the sale of The Boston Globe and its other New England media properties. Last year, the company sold its stake in Indeed.com, a jobs search engine, and the About Group, the online resource company.
BEIJING — Growth in the giant China manufacturing sector in February withdrew from the highest point in nearly two years despite a fourth consecutive month of expansion, a private survey showed Monday, as foreign demand remained unsteady.The HSBC flash purchasing managers' index for February slipped to 50.4, the lowest reading in four months and down from the January reading of 52.3, which had been the best showing since January 2011. Index readings higher than 50 indicate expansion, while those lower than 50 indicate contraction.The flash P.M.I. is the earliest indicator of China's economic health each month and should not alter expectations that China, which has the world's second-largest economy, after that of the United States, is enjoying a gentle recovery, experts said. That would be a welcome development for China's new leaders, who take office in March."The underlying strength of the Chinese growth recovery remains intact, as indicated by still-expanding employment and the recent pickup of credit growth," said Qu Hongbin, an economist at HSBC.In line with recent trends, the flash P.M.I. showed demand for Chinese exports wobbling in February. A subindex measuring new export orders slipped to 49.8.The export sector has been a weak point for the Chinese economy in the past two years, as faltering global economic growth has caused net exports to drag on growth.Although export growth surged to a 21-month high in January in a sign that business was picking up, most economists say that exporters face continued difficulty as demand from Europe and the United States languishes.Still, the survey did not suggest that China's factories were re-entering a slowdown. While most P.M.I. subindexes fell in February, they were pulling back from highs of several months, suggesting that manufacturers were only taking a breather.Some economists may attribute the dip in the February data to the Lunar New Year holiday, which began Feb. 10 this year and fell in January last year, although the survey's publisher, Markit, says the data are seasonally adjusted.The output subindex fell from a 22-month high; new orders backed away from a 20-month high; factory employment edged down from its highest level in 20 months; input prices fell from a 16-month peak; and output prices slid from a 14-month high.As in previous months, the February survey showed that domestic demand had held up better than demand from abroad. The new-order subindex remained comfortably above 50, even after falling from its January level.China holds its annual full-session parliamentary meeting March 5, when the incoming president, Xi Jinping, officially takes the reins of state power, while the departing prime minister, Wen Jiabao, presents the government's 2013 economic goals.Most analysts believe Beijing will retain its 2012 goal for gross domestic product growth of 7.5 percent for this year, giving itself some room to surpass expectations slightly.The Chinese economy grew 7.8 percent in 2012, about in line with expectations, but still the slowest rate in 13 years. Analysts polled by Reuters expect the economy to grow 8.1 percent in 2013.The rebound, though gentle, would comfort investors banking on a modest Chinese economic recovery to lift global growth.Indeed, February was still the fourth consecutive month in which the flash P.M.I. was above 50, despite the retreat. Before the turnaround that began in November, the index had languished at less than 50 for 12 consecutive months.The HSBC P.M.I. survey is based on a poll of purchasing executives from more than 420 manufacturing firms. The flash P.M.I. is compiled from responses from 85 percent to 90 percent of that pool. The final results will be published March 1.
HONG KONG — More than 100 Chinese scholars, journalists, lawyers and writers urged their national legislature on Tuesday to ratify a major human rights treaty, in the latest challenge from intellectuals seeking to curtail arbitrary Communist Party power.The petition calling on the party-controlled National People's Congress to ratify the International Covenant on Civil and Political Rights came a week before the congress holds its annual full session, which is to install Xi Jinping as China's president, succeeding Hu Jintao.Copies of the document appeared on Chinese blogging Web sites and Internet forums, but were often often removed and quickly reappeared. It was unclear whether government censors demanded the removals.The proposal "was originally intended for a Thursday release through a prominent Chinese newspaper," David Bandurski, a researcher at the China Media Project of Hong Kong University, wrote in a comment on a translation of the petition. "Authorities, however, learned of the letter by late Monday and the authors had no choice but to release it to the public" on Tuesday, Mr. Bandurski wrote, citing unnamed sources.Ratification of the treaty would "promote and realize the principles of a country based on human rights and a China governed by its Constitution," the petition said. "We fear that due to the lack of nurturing of human rights and absence of fundamental reverence and assurances for individuals' freedom, rights and dignity, if a full-scale crisis breaks out, the whole society will collapse into hatred and brutality."The call, also circulated by e-mail, carried the names of 121 backers, including several who said they lived in Hong Kong or Macau.The petition was the latest display of the demands for political change confronting China's new leadership. Several people who signed it said they hoped to press Mr. Xi and his colleagues to live up to vows of greater respect for the rule of law and citizens' rights that Mr. Xi and other officials have made since he became Communist Party leader in November, when Mr. Hu retired from that post."This has become increasingly important because on the one hand violations of rights have become so common, while on the other hand citizens' awareness of their rights has risen sharply," said Cui Weiping, a translator and essayist in Beijing who signed the petition. "This proposal is really quite mild," said Ms. Cui, who formerly taught at the Beijing Film Academy. "I see this as giving the government a chance to show that it is willing to make improvements."Since Mr. Xi came to power, Chinese advocates of political liberalization have urged the Communist Party to abide by the Constitution, which in theory offers some protection of free speech and other rights. Some reform advocates see some signs of hope in the government's vow to overhaul "re-education through labor," which is used to jail citizens without trials, and some point to Mr. Xi's own promises of greater official accountability."Any organization or individual must act within the scope of the Constitution and the laws," Mr. Xi said Saturday at a meeting of the Communist Party's 25-member Politburo, the official Xinhua news agency reported.Mr. Xi has, however, also said that the top-down, one-party rule must remain sacrosanct, and the drafters of the petition took care not to challenge the party directly, instead calling on it to live up to past vows to respect citizens' rights."This is an important moment when the new leadership has expressed its commitment to rule of law, and we want those words to be acted on," said He Weifang, a professor of law at Peking University and a prominent advocate of political liberalization, who confirmed he signed the petition.But the Chinese government appears reluctant to ratify the treaty, despite saying over many years that it was preparing to do so, said Nicholas Bequelin, a senior researcher in Hong Kong for Human Rights Watch.The Chinese government signed the International Covenant on Civil and Political Rights in 1998, but ratification by the legislature would bring greater international scrutiny through a monitoring committee, Mr. Bequelin said.The covenant came into force in 1976, and 167 states are party to it. Yet even North Korea has acceded to the treaty, with no discernible improvement in its harsh treatment of its people, Mr. Bequelin said."What is at stake in ratification for the Chinese government is not so much the international legal obligations that would come, but rather the domestic pressures to live up to its own promises," he said.
TOKYO — The Japanese government on Thursday nominated Haruhiko Kuroda, a proponent of more aggressive stimulus for the ailing Japanese economy, to lead the country's central bank.The nomination of Mr. Kuroda, who is head of the Asian Development Bank and whose views on bolstering the economy echo those of Prime Minster Shinzo Abe, had been widely expected.If confirmed by Parliament, Mr. Kuroda will succeed the current governor of the Bank of Japan, Masaaki Shirakawa, who is stepping down on March 19. Also nominated Thursday as deputy governors were were Kikuo Iwata, an economics professor at Gakushuin University, and Hiroshi Nakaso, an executive director at the central bank, according to a government statement submitted to the upper house of Parliament."The nominees announced today will lead the charge in the bold financial policies that Prime Minister Abe aims for, and his economic growth strategy that has now been dubbed 'Abenomics,' " Yoshihide Suga, Japan's top government spokesman, said at a news conference.Mr. Kuroda, 68, has publicly said the Bank of Japan has not gone far enough to resuscitate Japan's stagnating economy by fight deflation, the across-the-board decline in prices that has eroded profits, incomes and investment for years.Mr. Kuroda's views are closely in line with those of Mr. Abe, who took office after a landslide victory by his party in elections last December. Mr. Abe argues that to propel economic growth, Japan must pursue more aggressive monetary easing, ramp up government stimulus spending and push ahead with economic reforms, including entry into free trade agreements, a controversial move."The onus is on this generation to rebuild and strengthen Japan's economy to convince younger generations that their future is bright. We will do this by launching three powerful arrows: a bold monetary policy, a flexible fiscal policy and a growth strategy that stimulates private investment," Mr. Abe said in a televised address to Parliament."To compete in an ever more competitive global economy, Japan cannot stick with its current ways. Japan's economic growth depends on our will and courage to venture out into the rough seas that is global competition," he added.Years of near-zero interest rates and asset-purchase programs by the Bank of Japan have so far done little to reverse deflation. Mr. Kuroda is widely expected to expected to ramp up purchases of government debt and other assets to pump more money into the economy and to meet a 2 percent inflation target the Bank of Japan adopted in January, under pressure from the government.It is clear that the new Bank of Japan stewardship "will pursue easier policy far more aggressively," Tom Kenney, an analyst at ANZ Bank, said in a research note on Thursday. "This will primarily be achieved by a step up in the central bank's Q.E. program," he added.Finance Minister Taro Aso said Japan could provide a model for other industrialized nations struggling to kick-start growth in their stagnating economies."Japan will become a pioneer by beating deflation," Mr. Aso told Parliament. "We will show the world the way forward toward a solution."The country's benchmark Nikkei average closed up 2.71 percent at 11,559.36 on Thursday after the announcement, while the broader Topix index gained 2.30 percent to 975.66.Bettina Wassener reported from Hong Kong, and Makiko Inoue and Hisako Ueno contributed from Tokyo.
HONG KONG — As the United States prepares for mandatory budget cuts on Friday, Hong Kong is grappling with a very different problem: spending money as fast as it sluices into government coffers.John Tsang, the financial secretary of Hong Kong, the semiautonomous Chinese territory, presented on Wednesday a budget that calls for a long list of one-time subsidies, particularly for the poor and aging. He also said the government would waive business registration fees and reduce the profits tax, particularly for small businesses.The stimulus measures come after heavy criticism in Hong Kong that the government consistently produces large budget surpluses even during periods of weak economic growth, including the last year. The Hong Kong economy grew only 1.4 percent last year, well below its average of 4.5 percent over the last decade.Hong Kong consistently runs budget surpluses mainly because it has low social spending and no military. By comparison, the federal government in the United States dedicates roughly half its spending to assisting the aging — through Social Security, Medicare and the nursing home portion of Medicaid — and directs another quarter of spending to the military.The Hong Kong government is now sharply increasing social spending in percentage terms but from such a low base that spending still falls short of revenue. After years of accumulated surpluses, the city is sitting on cash accumulated from previous surpluses equal to 23 months' total spending.Some of the heaviest criticism of previous budgets has come from advocates speaking on behalf of what are known locally as the "multiple have-nots." These are low-income residents, often young, who have not been on the waiting list long enough to qualify for public rental housing, so they do not qualify for a two-month rent waiver that Mr. Tsang announced on Wednesday.They are not older citizens, so they do not qualify for the extra month of old-age allowance payments that Mr. Tsang also announced, nor are they destitute enough to qualify for the extra month of welfare payment that was announced. And they live in shared apartments where they may not benefit directly from the government's $230 subsidy in the coming fiscal year for each residential electricity bill.To help them, Mr. Tsang announced that the government would give an extra $1.9 billion to the government-controlled Community Care Fund, which does social work like rent assistance."I have every confidence that we will be able to assist more people in need, particularly that group of people who used to complain that they were being left out from the budget relief measures — the so-called multiple have-nots," Carrie Lam, the territory's chief secretary, said Wednesday.Marcellus Wong, a senior adviser in the Hong Kong office of PricewaterhouseCoopers, a global professional services firm, noted that Mr. Tsang's figures showed that government expenditures have risen twice as fast as economic output over the last 15 years, and expenditures are creeping above one-fifth of output. "The government needs to closely monitor this benchmark," he said.The Hong Kong government uses conservative budget forecasts, consistently predicting small deficits that turn into large surpluses. The government predicted a year ago that it would run a deficit of $449 million for the fiscal year through the end of March, but its most recent estimate is that it will now run a surplus of $8.3 billion instead, and Mr. Wong predicted that the final figure would be a surplus of more than $9 billion.For the coming fiscal year, Mr. Tsang again predicted a deficit of $628 million.Social spending has stayed low until now partly because Hong Kong has a single-payer government health care system with low pay for doctors and nurses by American standards, and with supplemental charges and waiting lists for expensive medical procedures. But recurrent social spending is on track to rise 33 percent in the coming year, mainly because the government is introducing a monthly payment of $282 to all low-income residents 65 and older.Hong Kong has also begun gradually building a mandatory retirement savings system based on bank-managed mutual funds. But many of the current older citizens retired before it was started and do not benefit. Many current workers have had extremely low returns on their savings because of annual fees of 2 percent of assets or more.Families have tended to look after aging members, further limiting social spending for the government.In western Hong Kong island, an area with a large population of older residents, four elderly people on the street each said in interviews on Wednesday that they did not expect much money from the government because they lived with their children, who supported them.A fifth resident, Wu Jinyao, a retired construction worker who is recovering from oral cancer, did complain that the government was too frugal in only promising an extra month's payment of disability allowances in the coming fiscal year starting on April 1. He said he had high medicine and transportation costs to go to a distant government hospital for continued chemotherapy and radiation therapy."I have been to the various government agencies and they tell me to come back when I am down to my last 500 Hong Kong dollars," or about $64, he said. "What system is this?"
HONG KONG — China accused Japan on Thursday of escalating the maritime tensions in their relationship by harassing Chinese ships, continuing a succession of tit-for-tat accusations that reflect increasing distrust between the two countries.A spokesman for the Chinese Ministry of National Defense, Geng Yansheng, made the accusations on the same day that the Japanese prime minister, Shinzo Abe, likened recent intrusions by Chinese ships into Japanese-controlled waters near contested islands to Argentina's 1982 invasion of the Falkland Islands, which set off a brief war with Britain.Tensions over the East China Sea islands, known as the Senkaku in Japan and the Diaoyu in China, deepened this month when Japan said that a Chinese Navy frigate had briefly used missile-directing radar to lock onto a Japanese military ship. China vehemently denied doing that.At a briefing for Chinese journalists in Beijing, Mr. Geng repeated that denial and said he had proof that Japan would be to blame for any mishaps."For a long time, Japan has closely tracked Chinese vessels and craft to monitor and interfere with them," Mr. Geng said, according to a transcript on the Chinese Ministry of National Defense Web site."This is the source of the maritime security problems between China and Japan," he said. "The Chinese side has ample evidence of this, and reserves the right to take corresponding measures."Mr. Geng suggested that Mr. Abe was seeking to raise tensions."China has always taken maritime safety very seriously and does not want to see accidents at sea," Mr. Geng said. "But the Japanese leader has repeatedly made provocative statements, exaggerated the China threat and made much of military issues, intentionally provoking military confrontation."In a speech to Japan's Parliament, however, Mr. Abe used a comparison to the 1982 Falkland Islands war to cast China as the provocateur. He cited the memoir of the British prime minister at the time, Margaret Thatcher, who said her decision to go to war was an effort to defend the principle that rule of law should prevail over the use of force."I want to appeal to international society that in modern times, efforts to change the status quo by the use of force will justify nothing," said Mr. Abe, referring to the standoff with China.The festering dispute over the islands erupted in September, when Japan bought three of the five islands from a private owner in what it said was as an effort to stop them from falling into the hands of an ardent Japanese nationalist. China, however, called the purchase a provocative act that effectively denied its territorial claims, and violent protests broke out in dozens of Chinese cities.In the months since, China has sought to demonstrate its claim to the islands by sending government vessels and military ships and aircraft near them, in areas where Japanese Coast Guard ships conduct patrols.Last Friday, Japan said it had asked the Chinese government to explain why it had placed several buoys in waters near the disputed islands. A Chinese official said on Tuesday that the buoys were meant to monitor the weather, despite Japanese news reports that they could be used for tracking Japanese submarines.At the news briefing, Mr. Geng repeated China's denials that it was behind Internet hacking attacks aimed at United States government, corporate and media Web sites. He said the Ministry of National Defense Web site and another Chinese Web site devoted to military news were targeted by an average of 144,000 hacking attacks a month from abroad last year, almost two-thirds of them from the United States.He did not explain how he defined such hacking attacks, nor say if any were successful.
BEIJING — Security officials in the northwestern Chinese province of Gansu have arrested five Tibetans and accused them of inciting a series of self-immolations late last year by convincing participants that they would become heroes in death, state news media reported. Four of those detained were Buddhist monks, who the police said were guided by a Tibetan exile organization.The arrests, announced Wednesday by Xinhua, the state news agency, are part of an increasingly desperate government campaign to stop the suicidal protests through intimidation, jail time and rewards for those who cooperate with the police.Human rights groups have criticized the crackdown as counterproductive, saying it will only fuel the desperation that has convinced at least 107 people to set themselves on fire since 2009. In February alone there have been seven self-immolations in Tibetan regions of China, including an episode in which two teenagers killed themselves together last week in Sichuan Province.Recently the authorities have detained 70 people accused of helping organize, encourage or publicize self-immolations. Chinese courts have so far shown little leniency toward the accused, sentencing more than a dozen ethnic Tibetans to long prison terms, and in one case in January, a suspended death sentence.Those jailed include a 20-year-old artist who received two years in a labor camp after the police found images of self-immolators on his cellphone during a routine check, Radio Free Asia reported last week.
PUZHAI, China — Chinese investors have anointed it "white gold." Carvers and collectors prefer the term "organic gemstone." Smugglers, however, use a gruesomely straightforward name for the recently harvested African elephant tusks that find their way to this remote trading outpost on the Vietnamese border."We call them bloody teeth," said Xing, a furniture maker and ivory trafficker who is part of a shadowy trade that has revived calls for a total international ban on ivory sales.To the outrage of conservation groups trying to stop the slaughter of African elephants and the embarrassment of Chinese law enforcement agencies, Xing's thriving ivory business is just one drop in a trail of blood that stretches from Africa, by air, sea and highway, to Chinese showrooms and private collections."The Chinese hold the key to the elephants' future," said Iain Douglas-Hamilton, founder of Save the Elephants. "If things continue the way they are, many countries could lose their elephants altogether."Critics say the Chinese government is not doing enough to stem the illicit ivory trade, which has exploded in the five years since conservationists and governments agreed to a program of limited ivory sales intended to stifle poaching and revive a centuries-old handicraft. Since the beginning of 2012, more than 32,000 elephants have been illegally killed, according to the Born Free Foundation, a wildlife organization, and conservationists say the majority of ivory sold in China, which sells for more than $1,300 a pound on the black market, is of questionable origin.Legalized ivory sales have been a boon to carvers and brokers, who have helped fuel the demand for ever greater supplies. But those who investigate the trade in China say the skyrocketing sales — and the incentive for poaching — can be tied to a combination of incompetence by law enforcement and official corruption, especially by the military.The only way to save the African elephant, conservationists say, is to outlaw the sale of ivory entirely.Though the clandestine nature of ivory smuggling makes it difficult to fully map out, experts say Africa's elephants are being slaughtered at the highest rate in two decades, largely to satisfy soaring demand among China's growing middle class. "China is clearly driving the illegal ivory trade more than any other nation on earth," said Tom Milliken, an elephant expert with the wildlife trade-monitoring network Traffic.Things were meant to turn out differently. In 1989, the United Nations-backed Convention on International Trade in Endangered Species, or Cites, banned the sale of ivory in an effort to stop what conservationists say was an elephant "holocaust."But as herds recovered, Cites officials in 2008 agreed to a contentious one-time auction of stockpiled African ivory to Japan and China, with the money going toward wildlife conservation. As part of the arrangement, the Chinese government introduced a complex documentation system to track every trinket and carving produced from the 68 tons of auctioned ivory it won. Supporters hoped a flood of cheap, regulated ivory would undercut the illegal trade, saving more elephants.The sale, however, has proved to be a colossal failure. Like the forest canopy that protects poachers from detection, the regulated ivory trade has provided unscrupulous Chinese carvers and collectors with the ideal legal camouflage to buy and sell contraband tusks.Things went wrong from the start, and wildlife groups say the Chinese government is partly responsible.After obtaining the auctioned ivory at artificially low prices, state enterprises in China began selling limited amounts to carving factories for up to eight times the winning bid. Instead of smothering the sale of illicit ivory, the spike in prices made poaching even more attractive.In 2011, for example, auctioned ivory fetched about $94 million, double the previous year's total, according to the China Association of Auctioneers. "Buyers wouldn't even take home the carvings they bought before putting them up for bid again," said an employee with a major Beijing auction house who asked for anonymity because of the sensitivities involved.Even though the Chinese government in 2011 barred auction houses from selling ivory, sales continue — as does the bloodshed.First opened in 1898, the Old Phoenix Auspicious Jade and Ivory Carving Company in Shanghai is a tradition-bound shrine to China's newfound prosperity. Its shelves bulge with cabbage-shaped jade carvings and coral broaches, though customers mostly come for the blindingly white array of ivory bookmarks, chopsticks and idols. In one corner, spotlights illuminate a large tusk carved into a 360-degree-panorama of pagodas, palm trees and robed scholars. The price: about $205,000.
BEIJING — During a two-hour television broadcast that was part morality play, part propaganda tour de force, the Chinese government on Friday sent four foreign drug traffickers to their deaths after convicting them of killing 13 Chinese sailors two years ago as they sailed down the Mekong River through Myanmar .Although the live program ended shortly before the men were executed by lethal injection, it became an instantly polarizing sensation, with viewers divided on whether the broadcast was a crass exercise in blood lust or a long-awaited catharsis for a nation outraged by the killings in October 2011. Some critics said the program recalled an era not long ago when condemned prisoners were paraded through the streets before being shot in the head."Rather than showcasing rule of law, the program displayed state control over human life in a manner designed to attract gawkers," Han Youyi, a criminal law professor, wrote via microblog. "State-administered violence is no loftier than criminal violence."One prominent rights lawyer, Liu Xiaoyuan, insisted that the show, by the national broadcaster CCTV, violated Chinese criminal code by making a spectacle of the condemned. "I found it shocking," he said in an interview.The program largely focused on Naw Kham, the Burmese ringleader of a criminal gang who investigators say ordered the brutal execution of the sailors after they refused to pay protection money. To confuse investigators, the men reportedly planted methamphetamines on the victims' boats.In a nation where millions work overseas, sometimes in dangerous corners of the world, the killings were especially unsettling.Last April, six men, including Mr. Naw Kham, were apprehended in Laos by investigators including officers from China, Thailand, Laos and Myanmar.Mr. Naw Kham and his accomplices were convicted last November in China's southwest Yunnan Province. The condemned men, including a Laotian, a Thai and a third of "unknown nationality," reportedly confessed to the crime.The two other men who escaped execution received long prison terms.Last month, a Chinese public security official told a newspaper that Beijing had considered using a drone strike to kill Mr. Naw Kham but later decided to capture him alive.Given the considerable viewership on Friday, that decision proved to be a public relations coup. The program included interviews with police officers, images of the condemned men in shackles and the sort of blustery talking heads that would be familiar to Americans. The graphic elements that flashed behind the CCTV news anchor featured the tagline "Killing the Kingpin."In one segment, Liu Yuejin, director general of the central government's Narcotics Control Bureau, cast the executions as a pivotal moment for a newly confident China and for ethnic Chinese across the globe. "In the past, overseas Chinese dared not say they were of Chinese origin," said Mr. Liu, who led the task force that spent six months hunting the culprits. "Now they can hold their heads high and be themselves."Supporters of the program were many, and enthusiastic. One blogger suggested that death by lethal injection was too lenient.Some critics said the broadcast, and the subsequent public gloating, displayed an ugly side of China, which executes more people than all other countries combined. To Murong Xuecun, a well-known Chinese author, the program revealed a national psyche, fed by decades of Communist Party propaganda, that craves vengeance for the years of humiliation by foreigners. "It proves that hatred-education still has a market in China," he said in an interview.In a commentary posted on Sina Weibo, the Chinese equivalent of Twitter, CCTV defended the program. "There were no glimpses of the execution. We only saw the drug ringleaders' weaknesses and fear of death," it said. "In contrast to brutal murder by his gang, the methodical court trial and humane injections have shown the dignity and civilizing effects of rule of law."Shortly before the men were led from their cells to the van that would take them to the death chamber, a reporter asked Mr. Naw Kham to talk about his family and then taunted him by showing him photos of the victims' relatives. "I want to raise my children and have them educated," Mr. Naw Kham said with a faint smile. "I don't want to die."
The Las Vegas Sands Corporation , an international gambling empire controlled by the billionaire Sheldon G. Adelson , has informed the Securities and Exchange Commission that it likely violated a federal law against bribing foreign officials.In its annual regulatory report, filed with the commission on Friday, the Sands reported that its audit committee and independent accountants had determined that "there were likely violations of the books and records and internal controls provisions" of the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act.The disclosure comes amid an investigation by the Securities and Exchange Commission as well as the Department of Justice and the Federal Bureau of Investigation into the company's business activities in China.It is the company's first public acknowledgment of possible wrongdoing. Ron Reese, a spokesman for the Sands, declined to comment further.The company's activities in mainland China, including an attempt to set up a trade center in Beijing and create a sponsored basketball team, as well as tens of millions of dollars in payments the Sands made through a Chinese intermediary, had become a focus of the federal investigation, according to reporting by The New York Times and The Wall Street Journal in August.In its filing, the Sands said that it did not believe the findings would have material impact on its financial statements, or that they warranted revisions in its past statements. The company said that it was too early to determine whether the investigation would result in any losses. "The company is cooperating with all investigations," the statement said.The Sands' activities in China came under the scrutiny of federal investigators after 2010, when Steven C. Jacobs, the former president of the company's operations in Macau, filed a wrongful-termination lawsuit in which he charged that he had been pressured to exercise improper leverage against government officials. He also accused the company of turning a blind eye toward Chinese organized crime figures operating in its casinos.Mr. Adelson began his push into China over a decade ago, after the authorities began offering a limited number of gambling licenses in Macau, a semiautonomous archipelago in the Pearl River Delta that is the only place in the country where casino gambling is legal.But as with many lucrative business spheres in China, the gambling industry on Macau is laced with corruption. Companies must rely on the good will of Chinese officials to secure licenses and contracts. Officials control even the flow of visitors, many of whom come on government-run junkets from the mainland.As he maneuvered to enter Macau's gambling market, Mr. Adelson, who is well known in the United States for his financial and political clout, became enmeshed in often intertwining political and business dealings. At one point he reportedly intervened on behalf of the Chinese government to help stall a House resolution condemning the country's bid for the 2008 Summer Olympics on the basis of its human rights record.In 2004, he opened his first casino there, the Sands Macau, the enclave's first foreign owned gambling establishment. This was followed by his $2.4 billion Venetian in 2007.Some Sands subsidiaries have also come under investigation by Chinese authorities for violations that included using money for business purposes not reported to the authorities, resulting in fines of over a million dollars.Success in Macau has made Mr. Adelson, 78, one of the richest people in the world. He and his wife, Miriam, own 53.2 percent of Las Vegas Sands, the world's biggest casino company by market value. Last year, Forbes estimated his fortune at $24.9 billion.Mr. Adelson became the biggest single donor in political history during the 2012 presidential election, giving more than $60 million to eight Republican candidates, including Newt Gingrich and Mitt Romney, through "super PACs." He presides over a global empire of casinos, hotels and convention centers.
Then officials in this city got confirmation that a chemical spill had taken place at a fertilizer factory upstream. They shut off the tap water, which sent residents into a scramble for bottled water. In the countryside, officials also told farmers not to graze their livestock near the river.The spill, which occurred on Dec. 31, affected at least 28 villages and a handful of cities of more than one million people, including Handan. Officials here were irate that their counterparts in Changzhi, where the polluting factory was located, had delayed reporting the spill for five days. For the past two months, Changzhi officials and executives at the company running the factory, Tianji Coal Chemical Industry Group, have generally stayed silent, exacerbating anxiety over water quality.The conflict over the Changzhi spill has drawn attention to the growing problems with water use and pollution in northern China. The region, which has suffered from a drought for decades, is grappling with how industrial companies should operate along rivers. Local officials are shielding polluting companies and covering up environmental degradation, say environmentalists."Problems with water weren't so serious before, but they have become much worse with industrial consumption," said Yin Qingli, a lawyer in Handan who filed a lawsuit in January against Tianji, which uses water to convert coal to fertilizer at the factory in Changzhi.Environmental degradation has led many Chinese to question the Communist Party's management of the country's economic growth. Addressing the problem is one the greatest challenges for the administration of Xi Jinping, the new chief of the Communist Party. Environmental issues will most likely be on the agenda at the annual meeting of the National People's Congress, scheduled to begin on Tuesday.The results of an official investigation into the Tianji spill were announced on Feb. 20 by Xinhua, the state news agency, which reported that a faulty hose had resulted in the leakage of about 39 tons of aniline, a potential carcinogen, from the fertilizer factory. Thirty tons were contained by a reservoir, but nearly nine tons leaked into the Zhuozhang River, which feeds into the Zhang River that runs to Hebei Province, where Handan is, and Henan Province. The Xinhua report said 39 people had been punished, including Zhang Bao, the mayor of Changzhi, who was removed from his post. But the party chief, Tian Xirong, the city's top authority, was recently promoted to deputy director of the provincial Parliament.Some critics say officials may be slow to divulge information because the acting governor of Shanxi Province, where Changzhi is, is Li Xiaopeng, the "princeling" son of Li Peng, a powerful Communist Party elder. At a news conference in January after news of the spill had emerged, the younger Mr. Li urged officials to make safety a top priority.Handan officials first got a tip about a potential spill on Jan. 4 from a water management agency upstream. But when they tried contacting Changzhi officials, there was no response. "After more than 30 calls, we still weren't able to reach them," a Handan environmental official told Xinhua. Only the next day did Changzhi officials agree to meet with Handan officials.At least two managers of Tianji have been fired, but the company, which is the foundation of Changzhi's economy, appears to have suffered no other significant consequences. It is one of many companies in China's booming coal-to-chemicals industry, in which a water-intensive gasification process is used to convert coal to chemicals that are critical for a wide range of products. The process results in large amounts of wastewater that is supposed to be treated and then contained.After sending a team to Handan in January, Greenpeace East Asia issued a report on the spill. It said that there were about 100 coal-to-chemical factories on the upper reaches of the Zhuozhang River. "There is a history of clashes between heavily water-consuming coal-to-chemical factories and citizens downstream who are trying to compete for water to drink," the report said. Larger factories like those of Tianji use 2,000 to 3,000 tons of water per hour, equivalent to the amount of water that more than 300,000 people use in a year.The factory in Changzhi dumps more than six million tons of wastewater per year, about 30 percent of the water taken from the river, according to Greenpeace. The wastewater is supposed to drain into a receptacle.Greenpeace said Tianji is "notorious for its pollution." In 2010 and 2011, Tianji had been judged by Shanxi's environmental protection bureau to be polluting above normal levels in four quarters and was fined each time. Tianji's pollution was abnormally high throughout most of 2011, so provincial officials asked the Changzhi environmental protection bureau to monitor the factory, Greenpeace reported.On Jan. 9, the Handan Winter Swimming Association announced that it had filed a lawsuit in a Handan court against Tianji, seeking more than $3 million in compensation. But like the lawsuit of Mr. Yin's, it has gone nowhere. Mr. Yin said he had been asked by local officials to withdraw his lawsuit. The Handan officials had entered into secret negotiations with their Changzhi counterparts for compensation.Calls to the Changzhi propaganda department and Tianji seeking comment went unanswered. Mr. Zhang said on Jan. 7 that an initial assessment of the spill had inaccurately put the aniline leak at 1.5 tons, not important enough to require notification of officials, according to Chinese news reports. Wang Junyan, Tianji's general manager, apologized for the "inaccurate survey and imprecise calculation."Recently, official Chinese news organizations have run articles or editorials on water pollution, in part spurred by the recent spill. People's Daily, the mouthpiece of the Communist Party, published a commentary on Feb. 21 by Yan Houfu, who specializes in environmental law, saying that fines against polluting companies have little impact because the amounts typically range from $8,000 to $80,000. And "the Ministry of Environmental Protection, intentionally or otherwise, has not been strict in enforcing the law," he wrote.In 2011, inspections in 200 cities across China found that water in 55 percent of the tests was rated "fairly poor to extremely poor," Mr. Yan said. Zhang Lei, an associate professor of environmental studies at Renmin University in Beijing, said that her research showed that there had been about 3,600 spillage accidents related to the chemical industry from 1970 to 2010, of which about 900 were on a large scale.
WASHINGTON — When Secretary of State John Kerry was scrambling last week to prevent the leader of the Syrian opposition from boycotting a meeting with him in Rome — a snub that could have spoiled his maiden voyage as the nation's chief diplomat — he leaned on an old Senate colleague to help him out: Vice President Joseph R. Biden Jr.After Mr. Kerry extracted an agreement from the Syrian opposition leader, Moaz al-Khatib, to show up, Mr. Biden sealed the deal with a follow-up call. The vice president, who had met Mr. Khatib at a security conference in Munich, praised him for his courage, told him how important the meeting was and promised to stay in touch, according to the White House.It was a classic example of how Mr. Biden has used personal relationships to amass influence in the Obama administration — a talent that current and former officials predicted would allow him to further expand his influence on foreign policy during President Obama's second term.Mr. Biden will shift to another part of the Middle East on Monday, when he will set the stage for Mr. Obama's first presidential trip to Israel later this month, in a speech to the annual conference of the American Israel Public Affairs Committee, an influential pro-Israel lobbying group.When Mr. Biden last spoke to the group in 2009, he warned them "you're not going to like this," before laying out Mr. Obama's demand, largely rebuffed, that Israel stop building Jewish settlements in the West Bank. This time, officials said, he will be more conciliatory, presaging a less confrontational approach during the president's visit."Biden has great credibility with the pro-Israel community," said Israel's ambassador to the United States, Michael B. Oren. "He has always been able to speak candidly and openly with us, all the while making it clear that he stands foursquare with the president."Mr. Biden, officials said, used his ties on Capitol Hill to champion another unpopular cause: Chuck Hagel, also an old Senate friend. With Mr. Hagel under attack over his positions on Iran and remarks he made about Israel, officials said Mr. Biden worked the phones to reassure skeptical senators and help eke out his confirmation as defense secretary.Just as important to Mr. Biden's rise is his role in policy debates. With the exception of the raid on Osama bin Laden, which Mr. Biden famously advised delaying, there are few big policy deliberations in which he has not lined up with Mr. Obama. On issues like Afghanistan or Syria, his cautious instincts have prevailed over those advocating a more aggressive course.In addition to pushing for a faster timetable for withdrawing troops from Afghanistan, he was also among those who opposed supplying weapons to the rebels in Syria — a proposal developed by David H. Petraeus, the former director of the C.I.A., and supported by Hillary Rodham Clinton, then the secretary of state. Mr. Biden was joined in resisting the proposal by Thomas E. Donilon, the national security adviser, with whom he — not surprisingly — also has longstanding personal ties.Besides being advocates of more aggressive policies, Mrs. Clinton and Mr. Petraeus, along with former Defense Secretary Robert M. Gates, each brought to the administration stature and independence that their successors cannot match, another contributor to Mr. Biden's increased role."It's not so much that he intends to expand his influence, but his stature will rise by default," said Vali Nasr, a former State Department official who is the dean of the Johns Hopkins School of Advanced International Studies.Mr. Kerry and Mr. Hagel are not the only Biden allies to have prominent places in the second term. Mr. Biden's top foreign-policy aide, Antony J. Blinken, has been promoted to be Mr. Obama's deputy national security adviser, replacing Denis R. McDonough. In that low-profile but powerful job, Mr. Blinken will help resolve disputes between the State Department, the Pentagon and the C.I.A.To replace Mr. Blinken, Mr. Biden last week hired Jacob J. Sullivan, a rising star who was a top adviser to Mrs. Clinton. Mr. Sullivan, 36, who traveled with the secretary of state while serving as the State Department's policy planning director, has deep experience on issues like the Arab uprisings and China.The recruitment of Mr. Sullivan — which included a phone call to him from Mr. Obama on Air Force One — was noted in political circles because if Mrs. Clinton were to run for president again in 2016, he would be likely to work on her campaign, as he did in 2008. Mr. Biden has conspicuously refused to rule out his own run for the presidency.Mr. Obama gave Mr. Biden his own turf in the first term by handing him the Iraq portfolio, and the vice president helped engineer the brisk American withdrawal from that war. But with Iraq receding as an issue for the United States, the question is what turf might Mr. Biden try to claim now?China offers a tantalizing possibility, given that he has cultivated ties to its incoming leader, Xi Jinping. Mr. Biden spent hours with Mr. Xi, the Chinese vice president, in China in 2011, and again last year when he played host to him in Washington.With Mr. Xi slated to become president at the end of the National People's Congress in Beijing, Mr. Obama will become his official counterpart. But Mr. Biden's relationship with Mr. Xi, officials said, would give him an insight into China's leadership that could expand his role informally.Mrs. Clinton and the former Treasury secretary, Timothy F. Geithner, each staked their claim to China through an annual meeting known as the Strategic and Economic Dialogue. While that dialogue is expected to continue, neither Mr. Kerry nor the new Treasury secretary, Jacob J. Lew, has the China experience that they did."There is reasonable speculation about whether Kerry and Lew are going to be Hillary-Geithner redux," said Jeffrey A. Bader, a senior director for Asia at the National Security Council from 2009 to 2011.Mr. Biden's aides declined to comment on his foreign-policy aspirations, saying he was immersed in efforts to pass gun control laws. They were less concerned with Mr. Xi last week than his meeting with Mayor Michael R. Bloomberg of New York.But for a White House intent on controlling foreign policy, an enhanced role for the vice president raises few qualms."Biden is very closely integrated into the foreign policy portfolio," said Benjamin J. Rhodes, a deputy national security adviser. "He's a key player that can take on specific issues, build specific relationships."
HONG KONG — On the eve of the National People's Congress, the chief of China 's Communist Party, Xi Jinping , is emphasizing his role as a champion of the military, using the armed forces to cement his political authority and present a tough stance in growing territorial disputes in the Pacific region.Mr. Xi will be appointed president at the end of the Congress, the party-run parliament that opens Tuesday for an annual session of about 10 days. The 2,987 carefully vetted delegates are also virtually certain to approve another rise in military spending, after an 11.2 percent increase to $106 billion in 2012.On Monday, a spokeswoman for the parliament, Vice Foreign Minister Fu Ying, broke with recent precedent and declined to announce Chinese military outlays for the year at a news conference about the Congress session. The number will be disclosed in a budget released when the session opens, she said."We in China have endured the grievous lessons of having a weak national defense and suffering bullying by others," Ms. Fu told reporters. "The Chinese people have deep historical memories of this problem, and so we need solid national defense."Since Mao Zedong rode to victory in a revolutionary war, the country's Communist leaders have regarded an utterly loyal military as the ultimate shield of their political power. Nearly four months since his appointment as party chief in November, Mr. Xi has made that shield his own, with greater speed and sureness than his recent predecessors."Compared with the two previous leaders at a similar stage, Xi has already established closer, better relations with the military. They didn't come to power with the same confidence," said Chen Ziming, a commentator in Beijing who studies party affairs.Beyond being the only member of the powerful seven-member Politburo Standing Committee to also sit on the Central Military Commission, Mr. Xi already leads the military body, which controls the People's Liberation Army.Mr. Xi is taking over from Hu Jintao, who had to wait two years before his predecessor, Jiang Zemin, handed him chairmanship of the Central Military Commission. Mr. Jiang dealt gingerly with the military in his first years as leader, Mr. Chen said, overshadowed by the party patriarch Deng Xiaoping.Since succeeding Mr. Hu as party chief and military chairman in November, Mr. Xi has visited army units or met commanders and troops at least nine times, according to state news reports. His activities included a brief trip on a new naval destroyer that is deployed in the South China Sea, and meeting commanders of the Second Artillery Corps, which manages China's strategic missiles, including nuclear weapons.Mr. Xi has also assumed charge of a secretive civilian-military group steering strategy in maritime disputes, particularly the clash with Japan over a cluster of islands in the East China Sea, Western analysts say.The Chinese military owes its paramount loyalty to the party and its leader, not the civilian government. In private, Mr. Xi has said absolute military obedience to the party is essential to ensuring the Chinese Communist Party is not wiped out like its Soviet counterpart."Any paramount leader needs the support of the P.L.A. and makes gestures in that direction. I think that's what Xi's doing," Andrew Scobell, a senior political scientist for the RAND Corporation who studies Chinese security policy, said of the People's Liberation Army. "It's kind of like how a kid holds on to a security blanket. The party is more secure than it thinks, but it needs that security blanket of the P.L.A."Mr. Xi's background also helps to explain his relative ease with generals, said Mr. Chen, the analyst. The son of a revolutionary leader, Mr. Xi worked early on as an aide to a veteran general, Geng Biao, who served as defense minister in 1981-82.Many Western experts believe real Chinese military spending is higher than the public number by a large degree. A Pentagon annual report to Congress last year estimated that China actually spent $120 billion to $180 billion on its armed forces in 2011. Richard A. Bitzinger, a researcher at the Nanyang Technological University in Singapore, said he believed the public military budget was now reasonably accurate.Even with generous budget increases, Mr. Bitzinger said, China's military strength remains far behind that of the United States, which has a military budget about five times higher than China's official figures. "There's a lot of progress in modernizing the P.L.A., but a lot of it is just a high-tech veneer that goes over a system that is still pretty conservative," he said.Mr. Xi has signaled that he wants to shake off the inefficiency and corruption that have undermined the military. Since taking the top party post, he has repeatedly demanded "battle readiness" from the military and sent ships and aircraft to assert China's claims over islands also claimed by Japan.Mr. Xi's comments were a call to vigilance from the military, not war footing, said several experts. "He's not beating the drums for an imminent battle. It's all about training," said Dennis J. Blasko, a former United States military attaché in Beijing and author of the book "The Chinese Army Today."In the view of army commanders, China remains plagued by enmity and hazards and is the target of military belligerence, not its initiator."The United States and Japan are worried that we will catch up, and are doing their utmost to contain China's development, and by no means should we be fooled," said Liu Yuan, a Chinese general, in comments published last month by Global Times, a popular Chinese newspaper.China's first security priority should be "vigilance against and prevention of the West's strategy of infiltration and subversion," Qi Jianguo, a People's Liberation Army deputy chief of staff, told a party newspaper, The Study Times, in January.The main risk posed by China's mix of military swagger and insecurity is not a deliberately initiated conflict, analysts say. Rather, combined with poor communication between the opaque military and civilian bureaucracies, it could lead to missteps that spiral into dangerous confrontation.
YANJI, China — At the Red Sun restaurant, a short-order joint on Crab and Beer Streets, live crabs with plump legs wriggle in a cooled tank, fresh from the North Korean coast just two and a half hours away by road.The cook and owner, Jin Yuansheng, douses the prized crabs in boiling water and adds them to the steaming platters of sea cucumbers, shrimp and squid, also from North Korean waters, that he brings to the table.This border town in China's cold and poor northeast abuts North Korea along the icy Tumen River, where a bridge serves as the gateway for a lively commerce in shellfish plumbed from the Sea of Japan off North Korea. It is an exotic niche business in the more than $11 billion annual trade between North Korea and China, which is dominated by China's purchases of cheap North Korean iron ore and coal.Since a third nuclear test by North Korea last month, China had resisted until this week the request of the United States to impose new United Nations sanctions intended to slow North Korea's expanding nuclear weapons capacity. China has also balked at suggestions that North Korea's commercial trade should be put under United Nations sanctions.By encouraging trade with North Korea, China aims to prevent North Korea's government from collapsing, an outcome that could result in a Korean Peninsula allied to the United States. And business with North Korea serves a domestic goal: it helps employment and incomes in needy Jilin Province, where an estimated two million ethnic Koreans live.That is where the crabs come in. Scooped from 3,000-foot-deep waters by trawlers crewed by North Korea workers, they are first taken to the North Korean port of Rason, a special enterprise zone serving foreign investors and largely financed by China. The crabs are trucked in ice to the Chinese border town of Quanhe, and then brought to the market in Yanji, or flown to cities across China as a delicacy for the affluent."Getting the crabs here is a delicate operation," said Mr. Jin. "If they are too hot en route, they can die, and if they are too cold, they can freeze to death."Like many border towns in tough regions around the world, Yanji offers a peephole into forbidden territory. People here, especially the ethnic Koreans, talk of a love-hate relationship with their neighbor, run by one of the most isolated and brutal governments in the world. For the repressed people of North Korea, there appears to be sympathy among residents on the Chinese side of the border.The shadow of North Korea can be felt in many ways here. Underground, refuges protect defectors from North Korea who are brave enough to risk escaping across the Tumen River. Aboveground, shops sell North Korean foodstuffs: expensive mushrooms advertised as truffles, ginseng root, and powder ground from the gall bladder of bears and sold as a boost to the immune system.At the Kuanshi Art Gallery, pastel paintings of landscapes by North Korean artists sell briskly, bought by Chinese collectors with a taste for nostalgia, said Li Hezhang, the gallery director. Five North Korean artists are invited every year to Yanji, where they stay for a few months painting made-to-order images requested by the gallery, Ms. Li said.For centuries Korea was a part of the Chinese feudal tributary system, sending gifts to the Chinese court and submitting to the pre-eminence of the Chinese emperor, an arrangement that bred an attitude of superiority by the Chinese toward Koreans.Here in proximity, tinges of that arrogance persist, and seafood traders who travel to Rason, reputed to be a showcase of modernity compared with much else in North Korea, remark at how backward it is. "Like China in the '50s," said Mr. Jin.For Chinese traders, importing crab is a lucrative business. They sell not only to upscale restaurants around China, but also to banquet organizers. The sales pitch stresses what is called the purity of the waters around impoverished North Korea compared with the more polluted seas around industrialized Japan and South Korea."The fishermen capture the crab deep down, so it is high quality," said Qu Baojie, whose company imports crab from Rason. "South Korea and Japan can't compete."His crab, branded as Crab Earth, Crab Heaven, is featured at the buffet of the Golden Jaguar, a fashionable Beijing restaurant, and is sold in red boxes suitable for business gifts, he said.The fishing operations in Rason, an ice-free port that gives year-round sea access to China's northeastern provinces, work fairly smoothly, Mr. Qu said. Fishing trawlers equipped with South Korean gear ply the waters at night, returning to shore about 4 a.m.Their catches are then transferred to a state-owned plant where some crabs are packed live and others are processed, he said. About 300 North Korean workers are employed during the peak September to December fishing season. Fishing during the breeding season of June to September is banned, he said.His crab business flourishing, he recently bought a new processing factory in Yanji, Mr. Qu said.Some of the crab meat was vacuum packed in clear plastic, and sold to other Chinese traders, who in turn dispatched it to the United States, he said. The brand name of North Korean crab meat sold in the United States? "They slap on their own brands," he said of the American buyers.He said North Korea's recent nuclear test would have few consequences for his business. China will continue to invest in Rason, where business conditions had steadily improved, he said. The Agricultural Bank of China, one of China's big banks, recently opened a branch in the city, making it possible to pay his suppliers, and the North Koreans now allow Chinese traders to take their cellphones into North Korea.Even though China is by far North Korea's biggest investor, the North Korean government distrusts the traders, and they are kept apart from North Korean workers, he said. When he has driven to Rason, he has stayed at a state-owned hotel catering specifically to Chinese."I don't care about politics," said Mr. Qu. "There hasn't been any impact from the test on my business, and I don't think there will be. Anyway, China has rented Rason for 50 years."
SHANGHAI — Faced with a difficult combination of an economy addicted to cheap credit, exorbitant real estate prices fueled by that credit and mounting public concern that housing is no longer affordable, China's government is laying plans for steep new taxes on home sellers.But those plans set off a sharp drop in Chinese stocks on Monday, as investors worried that the taxes could take a heavy toll on developers, an important sector of the Chinese economy. Any slowdown in real estate investment could ripple quickly across the entire economy, reducing demand for steel, cement, household appliances and many other mainstays of China's manufacturing-dependent economy.China's cabinet, or State Council, said late Friday that it would insist that home sellers pay a uniform 20 percent capital gains tax on their profit. The government also said it would make it harder for people to buy a second home.Because China, as the world's second-largest economy behind the United States, now plays an increasingly important role in global demand for many goods, the drop in Chinese share prices quickly reverberated through stock and commodity markets across Asia. Stocks in Europe also fell; in the United States the stock market dipped early but recovered to register modest gains by the end of the day.Fearing a real estate bubble, the Chinese government began imposing a series of administrative measures through 2011 and engineered a slowdown in bank lending that, by last spring, had turned into an actual credit squeeze. Real estate prices weakened slightly, but the measures also resulted in a steep deceleration in the construction industry last spring and summer, causing a sharp slowdown in economic growth across China."This shows the government is determined to dampen the property market," said Patrick Chovanec, chief strategist at Silvercrest Asset Management in New York and a former professor at Tsinghua University in Beijing. "But they go through cycles when they want to pump up the economy, and then they want to cool it down. And this is what's happening again."The slowdown alarmed China's leaders and prompted them to unleash a flood of fresh credit last autumn and this winter from banks, semiregulated trusts and other sources.With loans readily available again, there are signs now that rising real estate prices might be back. The National Statistics Bureau reported that prices jumped in 54 of the 70 cities tracked by the government in January. In Shanghai, for example, average property prices were up as much as 40 percent in the first two months of the year, compared to the same time last year."Despite the policy-induced slowdown in activity, Chinese property remains on a wildly unsustainable path," Mark Williams, an economist at Capital Economics, wrote in a research note. "Developers actually completed just short of 11 million properties last year."In another worrying trend for the Chinese government, the flood of credit in the last few months has failed to cause a sharp uptick in sectors other than real estate; instead, the Chinese economy seems to be settling into a slower long-term growth rate even when receiving strong monetary stimulus.The Chinese state news media said in recent days that the government was considering other measures in the hope of holding down housing prices. The announcements led to a weekend rush among those eager to buy and sell properties before the policy took effect.With analysts predicting a sharp drop in property transactions after the policy takes effect, the Shanghai composite index fell 3.65 percent Monday to close at 2,273.40. In Hong Kong, the Hang Seng Index dropped 1.5 percent, to 22,537.81. Property developers were hit particularly hard. Shares of Vanke, one of the biggest property developers in China, fell the daily limit of 10 percent in Shenzhen. Poly Real Estate also dropped 10 percent in Shanghai. Early Tuesday, Chinese markets showed signs of stabilizing as shares gained slightly.
BEIJING — Wen Jiabao , in his final address as China 's prime minister, warned on Tuesday of the growing divisions between rich and poor, the hazards of unchecked environmental degradation and the risks posed by unbalanced economic growth."Social strains are clearly increasing," he said in a speech that was otherwise thick with glowing statistics and rosy socialist-style jargon about the nation's achievements.Addressing nearly 3,000 delegates at the opening of the annual National People's Congress, Mr. Wen also announced that the government would continue to lavishly finance the Chinese military, spending $116 billion in 2013, a 10.7 percent rise over last year, but slightly below the 11.2 increase that occurred in 2012.Mr. Wen, the nation's top economic steward, set a 7.5 percent target for growth in the coming year, an enviable rate in much of the world but well below the double-digit increases that have in recent years made China one of the world's fastest growing economies. He also pledged to create more than nine million jobs in Chinese cities and to keep the rate of inflation at 3.5 percent."Development is still the key to solving all our problems," he said.But the speech, his last state-of-the-nation address before he retires at the end of the 13-day congress, was notable for what was missing. In contrast to his speeches of years past, there was no mention of political reform and only a passing reference to the rampant corruption that Communist Party leaders have acknowledged could threaten their hold on power. Instead, Mr. Wen, famous for his liberal pronouncements, coolly reaffirmed the party's heavy-handed approach to the nation's political and economic affairs."China is still in the primary stage of socialism and will remain so for a long time," he said.Also absent in Mr. Wen's sprawling 29-page report was any discussion of re-education through labor, the widely detested system of extralegal detention that allows the police to jail petty thieves, prostitutes and antigovernment bloggers without trial for up to three years."In a sense, his speech was quite disappointing," said Willy Lam, a professor at the Chinese University of Hong Kong. "He spent a lot of time trying to justify his last years in office."An emotive populist, Mr. Wen became the party's human face during his decade as prime minister. He was dispatched to disaster zones to comfort earthquake victims or, in 2008, to calm migrant workers stranded by a snowstorm that disrupted travel for millions during the Chinese New Year holiday. But despite his popularity among ordinary Chinese, his vocal advocacy of political reform often put him at odds with the party's conservative leadership.Mr. Lam, for one, said he thought the muted reaction to Mr. Wen's speech at the Great Hall of the People on Tuesday reflected his diminished stature among party stalwarts."Compared to the long applause that followed the swan song of Zhu Rongji, the response was pretty weak," Mr. Lam said, referring to Mr. Wen's predecessor.Although it is never easy divining the intentions of China's cautious and cryptic leadership, the highly scripted speeches delivered during the annual legislative sessions often provide clues about the government's priorities.Mr. Wen's work report pledged a continuation of policies to promote technological innovation, increased spending on rural health insurance and the creation of 6.7 million units of low-cost housing.But Mr. Wen, and the departing president, Hu Jintao, leave behind a host of nettlesome problems, including a perilous wealth gap and an economy increasingly dominated by state-owned enterprises and a privileged elite. Increasingly urgent, too, is the pollution that has fouled the nation's water, soil and air, a point underscored by the noxious haze that settled over the capital on Tuesday.Broadcast live on national television, the prime minister's work report is a highlight of tightly choreographed political theater that rarely strays from a stolid procession of speeches, news conferences and invariably pro-government votes — all of it intended to give a united and untroubled public face to a reliably secretive party leadership.Last year, however, the script was challenged by a divisive scandal surrounding Bo Xilai, the combative party chief of Chongqing, whose fall unleashed months of revelations about murder, corruption and political infighting. Most analysts agree that the proceedings this year will ignore the plight of Mr. Bo, who is awaiting prosecution on charges of corruption, abuse of power and obstruction of justice.The new president, Xi Jinping, and the man who will succeed Mr. Wen, Li Keqiang, have raised expectations for change by vowing to end flagrant privileges and self-enrichment by officials and their families. "Now we're looking for signs that the hopes can be satisfied," said Deng Yuwen, an editor for The Study Times, a newspaper published by the Central Party School in Beijing. "The congress won't have any breakthroughs, but it can indicate where and how fast the leaders want to take things."The delegates at the gathering are selected through a process that rewards loyalists; about 70 percent are Communist Party members, and many are officials. Few dare defy the leadership's will by voting against proposals or abstaining from ballots, and the congress has never voted down a proposal put before it.The meeting is likely to approve a modest restructuring of government ministries and agencies. Over the past few months, analysts and well-connected business executives have said that Mr. Li wanted a drastic reorganization, to create enlarged ministries for financial regulation, environmental protection and other areas.But recent Chinese news reports have described a more limited plan that is most likely to include folding the scandal-laden and deeply indebted Ministry of Railways into the Ministry of Transport, and strengthening food and drug safety regulators to bring greater oversight of industries that are frequently hit by consumer safety concerns.
HONG KONG — The Vietnamese government has opened a dialogue with Amnesty International , allowing the human rights group to meet with crucial dissidents and government officials in the first such contacts since the end of the Vietnam War, Amnesty said Wednesday.The dialogue comes as Vietnam begins drafting a constitution that seeks to address civil liberties and religious tolerance, areas where Vietnamese leaders have drawn criticism from human rights groups and Western governments.Frank Jannuzi, an Amnesty official, said that during a six-day trip that ended Saturday, he met with two dissidents, Pham Hong Son and Nguyen Van Dai; representatives of the main evangelical churches; and Cardinal Jean-Baptiste Pham Minh Man, the Roman Catholic archbishop of Ho Chi Minh City. The government "gave me wide latitude" with the visits, Mr. Jannuzi said.Amnesty International has been sharply critical of the Vietnamese government, most recently criticizing the sentencing of 13 Catholic activists to up to 13 years in prison, calling the punishment "part of an escalating government crackdown on freedom of expression."Mr. Jannuzi acknowledged that the government had a long way to go in addressing such concerns, but he said that the efforts to write a constitution suggested a willingness to confront human rights issues.
SHANGHAI — When the Chinese government announced new curbs on property prices this month, homeowners bombarded social networking sites with complaints. They formed long lines at property bureaus to register to sell their homes before the restrictions went into effect.And some couples went even further: they filed for divorce.Divorce filings shot up here and in other big cities across China this past week after rumors spread that one way to avoid the new 20 percent tax on profits from housing sales was to separate from a spouse, at least on paper.The surge in divorce filings is the latest indication of how volatile an issue real estate has become in China in the past decade and how resistant people are to additional taxes.Worried that housing prices are spiraling out of control and threatening social stability, the central government regularly rolls out measures aimed at damping demand and weeding out speculators.Then home buyers, sellers, property developers and even local governments — which are typically heavily dependent on land sales for income — try to find ways to get around the restrictions."They always do this," said Du Jinsong, a property analyst in Hong Kong for Credit Suisse. "When they implement new measures, people are always trying to circumvent the rules."China's housing market has been one of the prime engines of economic growth in the past decade, and recently a sharp upturn in prices has reignited fears about inequality and a housing bubble.On March 1, just days before the opening of China's annual legislative session, the powerful State Council, which is led by Prime Minister Wen Jiabao, announced a series of new property measures that analysts say unsettled the housing market.In its statement, the State Council, or cabinet, said that local governments should strictly enforce an earlier rule that ordered people selling a secondary home to pay a 20 percent tax on the profit.Almost immediately, housing administration bureaus and real estate trading centers in big cities were flooded with people hoping to sell their apartments before the restrictions took effect. (Most local governments have not yet announced a deadline.)And in a bizarre twist, marriage registration centers in Shanghai, Nanjing, Wuhan and other big cities were also inundated with couples who admitted they were filing for fake divorces in hopes of avoiding the property tax.By filing for divorce, many reasoned, a couple with two homes could then claim that each had only one home. That way they could technically avoid having one of the homes classified as a second home, which under the new rules would be subject to the 20 percent capital gains tax if sold. After the divorce and the sale of one of the homes, the couple could file to be remarried.Here in Shanghai, a registration center in the Zhabei district said it had a record 53 divorce filings on Tuesday, well above normal.On Friday, at a marriage registration center in the Pudong district, a 33-year-old woman named Frances Tao arrived with her husband. She acknowledged that they were filing for divorce, not to avoid the 20 percent capital gains tax on second homes, but to get around another restriction, which requires home buyers to put down a much higher deposit on a second home than on a primary residence.Ms. Tao said that by divorcing, one of them would be able to purchase a first home and put down less money and get a better interest rate."We don't have other choices," Ms. Tao said. "But the government and developers continue to make a lot of money."
BEIJING — China 's foreign minister said Saturday that Beijing would not abandon North Korea , reiterating China's longstanding position that dialogue, not sanctions, is the best way to persuade the North to abandon its nuclear weapons .At a news conference during the National People's Congress, the foreign minister, Yang Jiechi, suggested that Chinese support for tougher United Nations sanctions against North Korea should not be interpreted as a basic change in China's attitude."We always believe that sanctions are not the end of the Security Council actions, nor are sanctions the fundamental way to resolve the relevant issues," said Mr. Yang, who addressed foreign policy questions from Chinese and foreign reporters.But the careful remarks masked the unparalleled plain-spoken discussions among China's officials and analysts about the value of supporting North Korea even as it continues to develop nuclear weapons and unleashes new threats to attack the United States and South Korea.In the aftermath of North Korea's third nuclear test in February, China last week joined the United States to push for tougher United Nations sanctions against the North. Although it remained to be seen whether China would actually enforce the sanctions, its decision to support them also raised the possibility that it might take even bolder steps against its recalcitrant ally.The clearest sign of China's exasperation with North Korea came Thursday at a side session of the Chinese People's Political Consultative Conference, an advisory group to the government that was open to the news media.Delegates to the conference, according to a senior Communist Party official, Qiu Yuanping, talked about whether to "keep or dump" North Korea and debated whether China, as a major power, should "fight or talk" with the North.In the annals of Communist Party decorum, Ms. Qiu's description of the spirited debate was quite extraordinary. She made the remarks in the presence of reporters at a session titled "Friendship with Foreign Countries" that was attended by several Chinese ambassadors who were visiting Beijing from their posts abroad.As deputy director of the Communist Party's Central Foreign Affairs Office, a secretive body that gives foreign policy advice to top leaders, Ms. Qiu usually opts for discretion. The admission by a senior Communist Party official that North Korea is a nettlesome neighbor is especially striking because China conducts its relations with North Korea chiefly through the comradely auspices of the party, rather than the Foreign Ministry.Just days before Ms. Qiu's remarks, a prominent Communist Party analyst, Deng Yuwen, a deputy editor of Study Times, the journal of the Central Party School of the Communist Party, wrote that China should "give up" on North Korea.Writing in The Financial Times late last month, Mr. Deng asked what would happen if the United States launched a pre-emptive attack on North Korea: "Would China not be obliged to help North Korea based on our 'alliance.' Would that not be drawing fire upon ourselves?"Moreover, Mr. Deng wrote, there was no hope that North Korea would overhaul its economy and become a normal country, a path urged in the past several years by the Chinese government. Even if the North's new ruler, Kim Jong-un, wanted reform, the entrenched ruling elite "would absolutely not allow him to do so," because they know change would result in the overthrow of the government, Mr. Deng said.Mr. Deng's analysis was widely read, in part, because he has a habit of expressing provocative views that meld into the mainstream. Last year, he wrote an article that appeared in the online version of Caijing, a business magazine, that said failures had outweighed achievements in the decade-long rule of President Hu Jintao and Prime Minister Wen Jiabao. After the article appeared, the era of Mr. Hu and Mr. Wen was often referred to as the "lost decade."For all the concern about North Korea since the nuclear test in mid-February, there have been no concrete signs that China plans to take any action against the North beyond the United Nations sanctions.Traders in Jilin Province, which abuts North Korea in northeastern China, said there was not a noticeable slowdown of goods passing across the border. It is possible that there will be a crackdown on smugglers, but that has not happened yet, said an official in the Yanbian Prefecture in Jilin Province, where much of the smuggling takes place.It is doubtful that China will reinforce the United Nations sanctions by imposing penalties of its own, said Cai Jian, the deputy director of the Center for Korean Studies at Fudan University in Shanghai.The biggest element of China's trade with North Korea is the export of oil that keeps the North Korean military going and its creaky industrial base more or less functioning. "Oil will not be cut," Mr. Cai said. Chinese companies buy North Korean coal and iron ore, a trade that the Chinese government has encouraged and that helps North Korea by generating hard currency. Those imports are unlikely to be curbed.The extent to which China will enforce the new United Nations sanctions remains unclear, an expert on the North Korean economy, Marcus Noland of the Peterson Institute for International Economics in Washington, wrote in a blog post. There are plenty of loopholes for China to exploit if it wanted to, he noted.The new restrictions against the North, including efforts to block the opening of North Korean banks abroad if they support weapons purchases, are limited by a "credible information" clause, Mr. Noland wrote, which allows a government to say that it lacks the information needed to assess the situation or apply the sanctions.The support of the sanctions at the United Nations are a fine balancing act by China, said Jia Qingguo, the associate dean of the School of International Studies at Peking University.China backed the new sanctions in the hope that they would be sufficient to encourage North Korea to return to the negotiating table to discuss denuclearization, but not so harsh that they would cause the North's collapse.If that were to occur, American troops stationed in South Korea could move north and help unite the Korean Peninsula under an American umbrella, the last thing China would want, Mr. Jia said.For now, China's position on North Korea will remain the same. "If China's policy changes, it would be because of a North Korean provocative act," he said, "like another nuclear test, closer to China's borders."
HONG KONG — Delegates at a major international meeting on wildlife trade voted on Monday to add several shark species to a list of plants and animals whose international trade is regulated. The vote was welcomed by conservationists, though it is still subject to final approval by the conference later this week.The decisions on the five shark species — the oceanic whitetip, the porbeagle and three types of hammerhead sharks — were high on the agenda of the Convention on International Trade in Endangered Species, or Cites, in Bangkok this month. Scientists and conservationists have been saying for years that shark populations around the world have come under severe pressure from overfishing, largely because of soaring demand in China and several other Asian nations.Soup made from shark fins is highly prized in Chinese culture. The dried fins sell for more than $50 a pound.There are more than 300 known species of sharks in all, including the five designated for protection on Monday. Sharks are particularly vulnerable to overfishing because they grow slowly, mature late and produce few young."It's a bittersweet day for sharks," said Glenn Sant, the marine program leader with Traffic, an organization that monitors the trade in endangered wildlife, in a statement. "While their adoption on Cites is warmly welcomed, it's a sad indictment that their populations have fallen to such a low level that such measures have become a necessity."The list of regulated species could still change before the plenary session of the Cites meeting this week, when it is due for a final approval vote. "Between now and plenary," said Ali Hood of the Shark Trust, a conservation and advocacy group, "we will be urging governments to remain vigilant and ensure final adoption of these vital international trade controls."
BEIJING — More than 3,300 dead pigs have been found in a major river that flows through Shanghai, igniting fears among city residents of contaminated tap water, according to official reports on Tuesday.Officials were trying to determine who had dumped the carcasses into the river, the Huangpu, which slices through the heart of Shanghai. Some reports blamed farmers. Officials were seeking to track the source of the pigs from marks on their ears, and a preliminary inquiry found that the dumping occurred in Zhejiang Province, which is south of Shanghai and upstream on the Huangpu.Photographs of the carcasses floating in the river were circulating widely on the Internet. One photograph on the Web site of Global Times showed sanitation workers in orange vests and blue uniforms lifting carcasses from Hengliaojing Creek with long wooden poles.An accompanying report, citing a Shanghai news Web site, said the first carcasses were discovered Thursday near a water treatment plant in an area that is a protected water resource. Their numbers increased quickly over the weekend, and the tally was expected to grow further as search barges returned to Shanghai.Shanghai Waterworks, which manages the city's tap water, said Sunday night that the water still met drinking standards, according to Xinhua, the state news agency. Shanghai officials said the group was checking the water hourly."So far, water quality has not been affected, but we have to remove the pigs as quickly as possible and can't let their bodies rot in the water," Xu Rong, the director of Shanghai's Songjiang District Environmental Protection Bureau, told Global Times, a state-run English-language newspaper.Mr. Xu said samples of the pigs had been sent to an agricultural commission to determine what killed them. Officials will have answers within three days, he said.A sample of the river water tested positive for porcine circovirus, which officials said does not spread to humans, Xinhua reported. One strain of the virus can cause pigs to waste.Many Chinese are expressing growing concern over air, soil and water pollution. In recent weeks, several official news organizations have run articles and editorials casting a spotlight on pollution of some of China's major waterways.In one prominent case, a 39-ton chemical spill on Dec. 31 from a fertilizer factory in Shanxi Province affected two other provinces downstream. Local officials delayed reporting the chemical spill for five days.A statement issued Monday by the Shanghai government and posted on its Web site said that there were piglets in the river as well as adult swine weighing hundreds of pounds. Residents in the Songjiang district, the area southwest of downtown Shanghai where most of the pigs have been discovered, said this was not the first time they had seen dead pigs in the Huangpu. But this time, the number was higher than in the past, according to the city government's statement.Songjiang district officials said they were gathering all the dead pigs in one place to safely dispose of them, Xinhua reported.
One of the world's largest manufacturers of solar panels, Suntech Power, has nearly run out of cash and is poised to be taken over partly or entirely by the municipal government's holding company in its hometown, Wuxi, China, solar industry executives and a Wuxi official said Wednesday.A woman answering the phone in the executive offices of the group headquarters of Wuxi Guolian, the holding company, said that a deal had already been reached for the acquisition of Suntech, which is traded on the New York Stock Exchange. The woman declined to identify herself.Rory Macpherson, Suntech's director of investor relations, declined to address a question about Wuxi Guolian, saying by e-mail only, "It's our policy not to comment on market rumors."Suntech has been driven to the financial brink by an obligation to pay more than $541 million to holders of convertible bonds at the end of this week. It stopped releasing financial reports last year after disclosing in July that it had invested in 530 million euros, or $690 million, worth of German bonds that might prove fraudulent. The company's cash reserves have been dwindling, analysts have said, and Chinese state-owned banks have been reluctant in recent months to lend more.Suntech said it reached a deal with three-fifths of the bondholders early this week to give it a two-month reprieve to find an answer to its financial troubles. But some bondholders have questioned the announcement, saying that they were not even approached about a reprieve. Suntech's convertible bonds have been trading this week for as little as 30 cents on the dollar. Its shares closed at $1.09 on Tuesday, down 5.2 percent for the day and down 63.2 percent in the last 12 months.It was unclear late Wednesday in Asia what terms might be offered to Suntech's bondholders or long-suffering shareholders. The shareholders might have to pass judgment on a merger, particularly if a merger were to take place without an initial bankruptcy filing to erase debt.Suntech announced Tuesday that it was closing its factory in Goodyear, Ariz., at the cost of 43 jobs there. The factory put aluminum frames and electrical junction boxes on solar cells imported from China so that the fully assembled solar panels would qualify for "Buy American" incentives.The collapse of Suntech is a milestone in the precipitous decline of China's green energy industry in the last four years. More than any other country, China had bet heavily on renewable energy as the answer to its related problems of severe air pollution and heavy dependence on energy imports from politically unstable countries in the Middle East and Africa.China is also exposed to global warming on its low-lying, densely populated coastline, which the Energy Department in Washington has estimated to have more people vulnerable to displacement from rising sea levels than anywhere else on earth.But China's approach to renewable energy has proved ruinous, financially and in terms of trade relations with the United States and the European Union.State-owned banks have provided $18 billion in loans on easy terms to Chinese solar panel manufacturers, financing an increase of more than tenfold in production capacity from 2008 to 2012. This set off a 75 percent drop in panel prices during that period, which resulted in losses to Chinese companies of as much as $1 for every $3 in sales last year.The huge loans and extremely low prices prompted SolarWorld, a German company, and its American subsidiary to file antidumping and antisubsidy cases in the United States and the European Union against solar panel exports from China. The United States has responded with tariffs of about 40 percent on solar cells and solar panels from China, and the European Union is concluding its deliberations and is expected to deliver an initial verdict this summer.Yotam Ariel, the managing director of Bennu Solar, a consulting firm in Shanghai, said that the closing of the Arizona factory was "yet another indication of a tough struggle."
HONG KONG — Almost a year after the Chinese human rights advocate Chen Guangcheng made an audacious escape from detention in his home village, his family there remains under surveillance and his jailed nephew has said he was beaten and warned by officials not to challenge his conviction, Mr. Chen and his older brother say.Mr. Chen, who is blind, catapulted to international fame in April, when he evaded walls, security cameras and guards who kept him under house arrest for one and half years in Dongshigu, a village in eastern China. Helped by supporters, he found refuge for six days in the United States Embassy in Beijing and left after Chinese officials agreed to let him study at a university and to investigate his complaints of brutal abuse by officials and guards.But, worried that he and his family could suffer reprisals, Mr. Chen then asked to go to the United States, prompting testy negotiations between Chinese and American officials that resulted in his departure to New York in May, accompanied by his wife and two children.Since then, Mr. Chen has repeatedly criticized the Chinese government as failing to live up to vows of rule of law and respect for rights. Now he and an older brother have described threats and surveillance that Mr. Chen said showed that tethers on dissent remain tight under the new Communist Party leader, Xi Jinping, who was appointed in November."In fact, they've never stopped monitoring us for one day after Chen Guangcheng left," the brother, Chen Guangfu, who lives in Dongshigu, in Shandong Province, said Wednesday. "There's still surveillance in the village. The guards, they're still here, just a bit more hidden."He said he was followed recently. "The situation is still quite tense here," he said. He also reported new pressure on his son, Chen Kegui, who was sentenced to three years and three months in prison in November for assaulting and injuring a government official who broke into the family's home in April during a frantic search for the escaped Mr. Chen. The brief trial was riddled with irregularities that thwarted the defense, lawyers supporting the family said.When Chen Guangfu and other family members visited on Feb. 28, Chen Kegui told them he was beaten and threatened by guards before the trial, and that he had since been warned by prison officials not to try any appeals of his sentence, the father said.And in New York, Chen Guangcheng said that detention center guards repeatedly "threatened him that if he did not follow their demands or if he appealed, he'd face a life sentence.""They also said that if he disobeyed then his parents and child could come under threat at any time," said Mr. Chen, who cited accounts of the visit from the family. "That's the reason why Chen Kegui told the court that he wouldn't appeal."Prison guards kept close watch on the visit, and Chen Kegui appeared reluctant to recount details of what he has been through, Chen Guangcheng said. "It's clear that there are other things he's holding back from saying," he added.Chen Kegui, 34, said officials never told him that his family had arranged a lawyer to defend him at the trial. "He said that he felt very disillusioned about the law," said his father, who is a farmer and manual laborer. "He didn't think it offers any hope."Chen Guangcheng, 41, taught himself law and was once praised by the government for his charismatic advocacy for aggrieved farmers and the disabled. But officials in Shandong Province turned against him after he took up the cause of thousands of women forcibly sterilized by family planning officials. In 2006, he was sentenced to 51 months in jail on charges of wrecking property and assembling a crowd to disrupt traffic — charges that he and his supporters have said were concocted to silence him.During Chen Guangcheng's imprisonment and house arrest, Chinese human rights lawyers and advocates took up his case as one of the most egregious recent examples of the Communist Party trampling on rudimentary legal protections in a bid to silence dissent.Chen Guangfu, the brother, said their home village remained under constant watch by teams of guards based at its main entrance and that last week a family planning official visited a school looking for his 5-year-old grandson — Chen Kegui's son — in what he took to be an intimidating gesture.Government media and propaganda officials in Shandong Province contacted by telephone refused to comment on the accusations from Mr. Chen's family, or they said they had not heard of them, as did officials in the town of Shuanghou, which administers the village."I don't know," said an official in the town family planning office, who gave only his surname, Yue. "I just sit in the office."
JIAXING, China — Hard as it may be to believe, the recent discovery of thousands of pig carcasses floating in a river that supplies drinking water to Shanghai may represent an encouraging step forward in Chinese public health.In May, for example, the police in this hog-producing city arrested four people who had sold dead pigs to slaughterhouses. And in December, a Zhejiang Province court sentenced 17 people to prison sentences, one for life, for processing and selling meat from pigs that had died of various diseases. In less than two years, the group had collected about 77,000 animals.So, as the authorities have cracked down on people selling diseased or dead pigs, agriculture experts say, it is possible that someone may have decided it was better to dump dead pigs into the river.If that was the case — and there is no proof right now that it was — a mystery remained: Where did the pigs — 7,545 at last count, with the number still rising — die, and who threw the carcasses into the Huangpu River?After the pigs began showing up by the thousands in the river last weekend, teams of pitchfork-bearing men fanned out on barges to fish the rotting carcasses out of the water.With food safety a growing concern in this country, and cities like Shanghai just beginning to enforce new rules that discourage restaurants from using recycled gutter oil, officials moved quickly to assure the public that the city's water supply met national standards, and that its pork supply was safe.The city embarked on a major cleanup. Early this week, pig carcasses that had been dragged from the river were buried in deep trenches, and uniformed inspectors lugging suitcases filled with laboratory equipment tested pork samples at outdoor markets throughout the city.The Ministry of Agriculture announced that it would undertake its own investigation.One government department suggested that a likely explanation for the deaths was cold weather, even though the Shanghai area rarely gets snow and was in the midst of unusually warm temperatures last week.The remark provoked ridicule on social networking sites, where some suggested that the comment was as ludicrous as believing that the pigs had engaged in mass suicide.A more likely cause, porcine circovirus, a disease common among pigs but believed not to be harmful to humans, turned up in samples of the carcasses taken by the Shanghai authorities.Jiaxing, which sits on the Huangpu River about 70 miles from Shanghai, was an obvious suspect as the source. Those suspicions seemed to be confirmed when Shanghai officials said that more than a dozen of the pigs carried ear tags indicating that they were from Jiaxing. The authorities then announced that they had detained a farmer who confessed to throwing his animals into the river.But in Jiaxing, farmers denied dumping pigs into the river, calling it preposterous and saying that the animals could not possibly have floated all the way to Shanghai. "If we dumped pigs in the river near here, by the time they arrived in Shanghai, they'd be unrecognizable," said one farmer, Xu Jinfu.Another farmer, Xu Jinhua, who was standing outside his pens with a shovel, said, "It feels a little uncomfortable to hear Jiaxing blamed for this." The farmer continued: "This river flows slowly. Do you think pigs from here would get all the way to Shanghai?"Xu Jinfu, who helps manage a collective with about 3,000 hogs, said that piglets were often sold to farmers closer to Shanghai to raise, and that that may explain why some ear tags showed Jiaxing. Indeed, in photographs many of the dead pigs appeared to be relatively small.He also said that Jiaxing had a designated disposal area for pigs that died of sickness.Several other farmers in Jiaxing insisted that farms in the area had not experienced a high number of deaths or other problems, and that Jiaxing pigs were generally healthy."We treat our animals here well. We feed them well," said another farmer, Zhang Bing, who was pointing to large sacks of animal feed. "In Shanghai, they often just feed them table scraps. Those pigs are more likely to get sick."Unscrupulous farm practices, though, are not uncommon in Jiaxing, or in other hog-producing areas.Cracking down on food safety violations has not been easy. In 2007, the government executed the leader of the country's Food and Drug Administration for taking bribes from drug makers and failing to adequately protect citizens. The country also announced a nationwide crackdown on illegal food processors.In Jiaxing, a local official named Huang Hao said one possible explanation was that the pigs had died while being transported to Shanghai, and that the truck drivers had simply dumped them in the river.On a drive through Jiaxing, with a reporter following in another car, Mr. Huang stopped and pointed at a truck that was preparing a hog shipment. With three levels of cages stuffed with hogs, it was about to embark when Mr. Huang walked over and started pointing."Look! See how crowded this cage is? Look at that one, and that one," he said, pointing to hogs that seemed to be suffering beneath the weight of other hogs. "Some of those pigs will definitely die on the road!"Three men finished loading the truck and locked the top level.Not realizing he was a government official, the men largely ignored him and snapped back, "No, it's safe!"Then the truck pulled away, and Mr. Huang shrugged his shoulders.
HONG KONG — A major international meeting on wildlife trade ended on Thursday with final decisions to extend protections for dozens of animal and plant species — including five types of sharks — that have come under severe pressure from soaring demand and overfishing.Conservationists welcomed the decisions by the Convention on International Trade in Endangered Species, or Cites, to regulate trade in the threatened species, including for the first time trade in mantas and five shark species: the oceanic whitetip, the porbeagle and three types of hammerhead sharks. Shark populations have fallen sharply in recent years as demand for their fins, predominantly from China, has risen.The group reached a preliminary agreement on Monday to add those species to the protected list, but there was concern that it might be overturned at the conference's final plenary session. South American and West African countries rallied to block efforts by Japan to reopen the debate; Japan, like China, has long opposed restrictions on fishing."Today was the most significant day for the ocean in the 40-year history of Cites," said Susan Lieberman, the deputy director of international policy at the Pew Charitable Trusts, in a statement. "This victory indicates that the global community will collaborate to address the plight" of threatened ocean species, she added.Even so, conservationists warned that the decisions to protect the sharks and mantas and similar actions to regulate trade in various turtles and in ebony and rosewood, did not necessarily herald a broad or lasting shift toward more effective wildlife protection."We've certainly had some important approvals," said Colman O'Criodain of the World Wildlife Fund International, speaking by phone from Bangkok, where the conference took place. He noted that national governments and nongovernmental organizations had formed broad-based coalitions to push through decisions, a new phenomenon at Cites meetings, which take place about every three years.Previous Cites meetings had "a mixed record of successes and failures," Mr. O'Criodain said, so it was yet to be seen whether the latest measures would be effective. Ultimately, that depends on whether national governments put them into effect, since Cites has no enforcement mechanism of its own. For example, Thailand permits trade in ivory from domestic elephants, a policy that is exploited by smugglers to launder ivory from African elephants.
HONG KONG — Xi Jinping , the new leader of the Communist Party, assumed the presidency of China on Thursday, completing his formal transition to power. He did so at a legislative meeting that has signaled a more responsive approach to an impatient public, while defending the party's top-down control.The National People's Congress anointed Mr. Xi as president four months after he was appointed as Communist Party general secretary and chairman of the Central Military Commission, putting him at the top of all three major power centers in China, the party, the army and the state.There was never any doubt that compliant delegates to the annual Parliament would overwhelmingly endorse Mr. Xi for president. They also named his ally Li Yuanchao as vice president. Only one of the 2,956 delegates who cast valid ballots in the Great Hall of the People on Tuesday voted against Mr. Xi; three abstained.The new president faces conflicting expectations of how he will apply the power in his hands — expectations that he kindled himself. Since he succeeded Hu Jintao as party leader in November, he has used meetings, speeches and visits to a frenetic coastal city and a dirt-poor village to signal that he wants some economic liberalization, more room for citizens to criticize the government, and a crackdown on the official corruption that has infuriated Chinese citizens.Yet Mr. Xi has also rejected any turn to Western-inspired political liberalization, and has demanded utter loyalty from officials and the military."I think that he's attracted to the idea of a kind of enlightened dictatorship, or neo-authoritarianism," said Li Weidong, a former magazine editor in Beijing who is a prominent commentator on politics. "He rejects fundamental political reform, but he wants a cleaner, more efficient government that is closer to the public.""I think in the end it will be difficult for them to avoid issues of political reform because otherwise it will be impossible to eradicate corruption," Mr. Li said. "Relying on personal authority and party indoctrination and traditions won't solve the problems they face."Meeting Parliament delegates this week and last, Mr. Xi repeated vows to counter slowing economic growth by encouraging consumer spending and pulling down barriers to farmers migrating to towns and cities. He told People's Liberation Army delegates that a strong, loyal military was essential to his "China dream" of patriotic revival.He has also shown a lighter public touch than his predecessor, the stiffly disciplined Mr. Hu. After an uproar this week over thousands of pig carcasses in a river near Shanghai, state news media highlighted Mr. Xi's earlier comments on water pollution."The standard that Internet users apply for lake water quality is whether the mayor dares to jump in and swim," Mr. Xi told officials from the area near the polluted Lake Tai in eastern China, according to a state media report.Mr. Xi, 59, is the son of a Communist Party official who served under Mao Zedong and became a supporter of Deng Xiaoping's reforms to curtail party controls and nurture markets. Vice President Li is also the "princeling" son of a senior cadre.Many party insiders thought that Mr. Li was destined for a place on the elite, seven-member Politburo Standing Committee, but he was left out of the lineup announced in November. Mr. Li's new post will keep him close to Mr. Xi, and he could still climb into the Standing Committee at a party congress in 2017.Before Parliament ends its session on Sunday, it will appoint Li Keqiang as prime minister on Friday, succeeding Wen Jiabao, and install new deputy prime ministers, ministers and other senior officials."They are all the sons of the party," said Yao Jianfu, a retired party official and a researcher in Beijing."For them, there's no conflict between defending their own power and developing a capitalist economy in China," he said, adding that Mr. Xi "will have to lean more to the left in politics than he can lean to right in economic policy, otherwise he won't be able to stabilize his place on the emperor's throne."Outwardly, at least, Mr. Xi has accumulated the levers of power more smoothly than his recent predecessors. After becoming party leader in late 2002, Mr. Hu waited almost two years to take the Central Military Commission chairmanship from Jiang Zemin, who remained a constraint on Mr. Hu. Mr. Jiang was long overshadowed by Mr. Deng, the aged patriarch who installed him and once threatened to remove him.
HONG KONG — Looming over a modest Chinese medicine shop here that sells dried deer penises for virility and bat feces for vision is a 40-story monolith of dark glass and gray steel: the Hong Kong offices of the Chinese Communist Party.For Wu Beihan, who sells traditional remedies from ancient wood drawers at the medicine shop, the dark-suited cadres next door have become an unexpected source of extra business this winter, snapping up anxiety relievers like winter mulberry leaves."They have worried hearts and are coming here more often," he said.Anxiety is understandable at the skyscraper, the Central Liaison Office. Factional struggles in Beijing have spilled into Hong Kong, with the abrupt removal this winter of the long-serving director and deputy director at the liaison office, together with a rapid-fire series of transfers and retirements among other aides.Turmoil at the liaison office has coincided with, and possibly fed, mounting frictions between Hong Kong and the mainland. Tens of thousands of people have joined large street demonstrations against the Beijing-backed government here, scuffles have broken out between Hong Kong residents and the many mainland visitors, and plans are under way for a large-scale civil disobedience campaign.The Beijing-backed local government has responded with a series of initiatives to allay residents' objections. These have included steep taxes on apartment purchases by anyone who is not a permanent resident, notably mainlanders; a ban on pregnant visitors from the mainland, who had been clogging Hong Kong's obstetric wards so as to gain legal residency for their offspring; and the shelving of a plan for schools to teach a patriotic education course extolling the Communist Party.But government supporters have also organized a series of noisy but peaceful counterdemonstrations. According to local news media, they have paid as much as $25 apiece to hire protesters for an afternoon, including young street thugs with the bleached blond hair that often signifies gang membership.Few expect Beijing to respond to political difficulties here by granting greater democracy. The new member of the seven-person Politburo Standing Committee who is expected to oversee Hong Kong policy in the years ahead is Zhang Dejiang, a North Korean-educated hard-liner from the so-called Shanghai Faction in Chinese politics, led by former President Jiang Zemin.Yu Zhengsheng, another member of the Standing Committee, and Mr. Zhang gave strong warnings at the National People's Congress last week that Hong Kong residents must safeguard national security — a thinly veiled threat against embracing Western concepts like democracy. Wang Guangya, the director of the Hong Kong and Macau Affairs Office in Beijing, went further in asserting that China's enemies see Hong Kong as a beachhead "for subverting the socialist system."Willy Lam, a longtime Chinese politics specialist, said that the new team installed at the Party Congress in November was united in its hostility toward greater political pluralism in Hong Kong. They also share a deep suspicion that democracy advocates are being manipulated by the United States so as to create trouble in China's backyard at a time of geopolitical tensions in the region, as China asserts its territorial claims in the East China Sea and South China Sea."There's no difference at the top regarding Tibet, Hong Kong and Taiwan; there are no liberals," Mr. Lam said.Ever since Britain returned Hong Kong to China in 1997, mainland China's influence over the city has been divided between the Hong Kong and Macau Affairs Office in Beijing, which is a cabinet agency of the Chinese government, and the Central Liaison Office here, which is under the Chinese Communist Party. The Hong Kong and Macau Affairs Office has been under the control of Jiang Zemin's allies for many years, while the Central Liaison Office has been run by allies of former President Hu Jintao, who stepped down on Thursday.But the longtime liaison office director, Peng Qinghua, an ally of Mr. Hu's, was abruptly moved in late December to become the party secretary of impoverished Guangxi Autonomous Region. His recently arrived replacement is Zhang Xiaoming, a lifetime civil servant at the Hong Kong and Macau Affairs Office who retains close connections there.Li Gang, the longtime deputy director of the Central Liaison Office, also lost his post in late December, and was transferred to the liaison office in much smaller Macau.Mr. Peng and Mr. Li both resisted their transfers, lobbying unsuccessfully for postings in Beijing instead, said a Beijing adviser on Hong Kong policy who insisted on anonymity because of the political delicacy of the issue. The Central Liaison Office declined to provide a comment.Mr. Zhang has quickly established a reputation for himself by calling for greater political obedience here to Beijing's will. In a column in a Hong Kong newspaper shortly before he was named to run the liaison office, Mr. Zhang called for Hong Kong to enact new internal security regulations.A previous effort to enact such legislation, in 2003, triggered pro-democracy demonstrations that drew hundreds of thousands of protesters and forced the local government to shelve the plan.
As the Hai Nei Guan Guang 2 blasted its deafening foghorn and pulled into the Yangtze River port of Fengjie, I brimmed with confidence. Two days earlier, I had nervously boarded a similar workaday passenger boat along another leg of the Yangtze, no idea what was in store. But now, I knew the routine. I'd say san-deng (third-class), hand over some cash, receive a handwritten slip with my cabin number, step over sunflower-seed-spitting passengers camped on the floor and settle into whatever rock-hard bunk remained in a room of instant-noodle-slurping Chinese passengers.Soon enough, the ship would arrive at my destination — in this case, about 24 hours later in the mega-city of Chongqing.But for novice travelers in China, there is always a surprise. I entered Cabin 2012 to find its four bunks overflowing with a family of five and a fluffy white cat with butterscotch splotches. I returned to reception, typed "cabin full" into my Google Translate app, and a woman accompanied me back to the room. She addressed the slumbering family — did I mention it was 4 a.m.? — in Chinese. This prompted a boy to vacate his bunk and climb into one with his sister. His bed became mine. There was no apology or change of sheets.The mistake was mine: four beds didn't mean four people.By the next morning I was in a better rhythm, making stunted conversation with the family via a phrase book and accepting a free meal in the ship's dining room from a young physical education teacher who ordered a whole fish in pungent sauce from a menu on the wall I did not even know was a menu. From the deck, I gazed through a ubiquitous haze at new Yangtze River cities, the result of the Three Gorges Dam project, completed in 2006. I posed for cellphone photos with passengers amused by the presence of a non-Asian.I was an ignorant, hapless and occasionally clownish first-time tourist in the world's most populous nation, and one of its most mysterious to Westerners. And I was enjoying (almost) every minute.Here was the daunting mission: a 10-day trip up the Yangtze River, taking trains and boats, for $50 a day, enough to pay for food, bottom-end hotels and public transport, but not enough for the organized tours and cruises that travelers commonly take through this part of the country.Along the way, I learned some key lessons that will help travelers avoid my mistakes. Don't worry: you'll still make plenty of your own.It's Not Like Traveling Anywhere ElseGetting ready for a trip through China, especially planning anything outside major cities like Shanghai and Nanjing, is unlike planning a trip elsewhere. The usual sources — guidebooks, Web searches, user review sites — either don't provide the information you need or are in Chinese. Compared with, say, Southeast Asia, China has not been overrun, and thus well-documented, by independent travelers.So what should you do? First, learn how to use Google Translate. It works and is cheap to use, even if you have to turn on international roaming. Second, get a phrase book in which key phrases are written out in large-font Chinese characters. (Don't count on your Mandarin pronunciation.) Third, learn how to count from 1 to 10 on (mostly) one hand as the Chinese do: this is how prices will be relayed you. (Online videos can help.)Fourth, familiarize yourself with the English pages of Elong.com and Ctrip.com, China-based online travel agencies, where you can find endless English-language listings for cheap Chinese hotels. I usually paid about $20 a night.When I travel to far-off countries, I tend to guard my possessions maniacally. But everyone told me crime was a nonissue in China, and by the time I reached Fengjie (where I would be boarding the Hai Nei Gun Guang 2), I was taking them at their word.So when a portside shopkeeper offered to watch my bag for 5 renminbi (78 cents at 6.1 renminbi to the dollar), I thought, why not, and took off to explore the hilly town unburdened. But I had to come back when she closed at 6 p.m., and the boat wouldn't pull in until 4 a.m. "Where can I wait?" I typed into Google Translate.It was as if a starter's gun had been fired. She grabbed my suitcase and bolted across the street. I chased her down an alley full of drying clothes and rotting trash, into a wide-open door and up a decrepit staircase. In some parts of the world murder would have seemed imminent. But I trusted this woman. She led me to a family-run flophouse with crumbling walls and dirty, squat toilet bathrooms, but also bedrooms with crisp white sheets, working Internet and a TV with about 100 cable stations. It cost 30 renminbi, and it was perfect. I left my bags, computer included, and continued to explore Fengjie by night.
Street signs in English, not-so-spicy cuisine, locals who don't stare, contemporary art galleries, modern youth hostels and even interpreter hot lines for cabdrivers who don't speak English. For independent travelers about to start an expedition into the huge, mysterious nation of China, I have some advice: stop in Shanghai and take a deep breath.Not literally, at least without checking the air quality index; the smog can be brutal. But do stick around for a few days — as I did before I set off up the Yangtze — to ease into Chinese ways in the city where expatriates have flocked since the First Opium War ended in 1842. Here, strangers are less strange.Even on $50 a day, Shanghai is perfectly feasible — once you accept you will not be taking a sightseeing boat along the Bund, eat in fancy restaurants or stay in luxury (or even midrange) hotels. That's because much of the city is yours free or, in the case of public transportation, hostels and noodle shops, close to it.That includes the Shanghai Museum (shanghaimuseum.net/en), which is free. It also provided a lesson in the sort of friendliness I'd encounter on the rest of my trip. Just as I'd placed my passport, wallet and camera through the museum's X-ray machine, two guards pointed me to the coat check, signaling they would watch my valuables. Returning two minutes later, I was outraged to find them intently leafing through my passport."We like your passport!" one exclaimed, beaming. My cultural-disconnect alert sounded, just in time. "Thanks," I said. "Lots of countries, but my first day in China." I feebly joked that I would be fatter when I left. "You like Chinese food!" the other exclaimed. Smiles all around.It was as if China were tapping me on the shoulder and saying, "Psst, we do things differently here."I found a more historical lesson inside the halls of the museum, a powerful reminder of just how old and complex Chinese civilization is. I gazed at an almost-4,000-year-old battle ax and ancient instruments in the bronze gallery, gawked at stone heads of Lokapala from the Tang dynasty in the sculpture section and tried to come to grips with the gorgeousness of the porcelain collection. Finally, I headed to the top floor to see the traditional costumes and art from China's minority ethnic groups: the Kirgiz, the Uighur, the Bai.But Shanghai is also into newer creations; luckily, just as budget-friendly. M50 (www.m50.com.cn), an enclave of galleries in former industrial buildings in north Shanghai, is as funkily contemporary as the museum is dazzlingly ancient. I especially liked the ShanghART H-Space (shanghartgallery.com), a cavernous space showing large-scale installations by Chinese artists. At the Pacific Perspectives gallery (ppl.bz/en/), I became intrigued with landscapes by the Chinese-American artist Thomas Leung, pierced with fiery, near-neon lighting, and I said as much to a man working in the gallery. "I'm Thomas Leung," he responded.Frugal shopping options are limited, but you can try Tianzifang, a web of back alleys in the French Concession that now house restaurants (too expensive) and artsy boutique gift shops (not always). Check out La Woo's reasonably priced felt animal figures, handmade on site, more Velveteen Rabbit than Hello Kitty adorable.For any great city to be budget-friendly, it needs intriguing street life to stroll through — and Shanghai doesn't disappoint there. I spent a good hour wandering behind the Peach Garden Mosque near the Old City section, in one of the city's dwindling traditional neighborhoods of residential alleyways, and found life lived in the open: a man and woman washing a fish at an outdoor sink, a pair of red and purple rubber gloves hanging near just-scrubbed sweet potatoes, a cart full of fluorescent light bulbs lining a side alley.Bustling (but fully Chinese) commercial streets on the outer edges of the French Concession also drew me in, eliciting more questions than answers. Why were fish hanging out of that second-story window, each with a playing card attached? What services were rendered in that small store with nothing more than a person behind a desk and signs I did not understand? Did people really have no qualms about stopping for conversations and completely blocking the narrow sidewalk to all coming pedestrians? Could that temptingly wrapped gelatinous candy taste as good as it looked? (I do have an answer for the last: it was disgusting.)The Chinese apparently look down on the city's native dishes. Shanghai's cuisine "is the redheaded stepchild of Chinese food," said Jamie Barys, an American who, with Kyle Long, runs UnTour Shanghai (untourshanghai.com), a food company. Yet Shanghai food is a good baby step toward eating in the nearby provinces. Take the most famous Shanghai export, soup dumplings called xiao long bao, comfort food even for nonlovers of Chinese cuisine.UnTour Shanghai charges $60 for a three-hour tour (too much for my budget), but you can cheat using articles by Ms. Barys and Mr. Long in the Shanghai pages of CulinaryBackstreets.com. Or (less likely) you can be connected to them through a Chinese neighbor back home and have them invite you to dinner, as I was. We had sesame paste noodles (8 renminbi, or $1.30 at 6.1 renminbi to the dollar) at Wei Xiang Zhai; soup dumplings at their favorite place, Nanjing Tang Bao (which has Nanjing-style dumplings similar to xiao long bao; eight for 7 renminbi); and Macao-style Portuguese egg tarts (4 renminbi) from Lillian Bakery. (At those prices, I took the rare opportunity to treat.)Even on my own, my initial language-based trepidations about eating out in China dissolved. English speakers would materialize out of nowhere to help me order a bun filled with shepherd's purse, a green related to mustard; I fumbled through China's hand-counting system (1 through 10 on one hand) to pay street vendors for roasted sweet potatoes, misshapen beauties with crispy skin and soft yellow flesh.My biggest expense was lodging, but even there Shanghai came through. Unlike most other cities I visited, it has good hostels, and good hostels often have private rooms mostly indistinguishable from (though often smaller than) those you'd find in decent hotels. That was true of the Shanghai Soho International Youth Hostel, (yhachina.com), where I booked a private room for 180 renminbi a night. Though the mattress was hard as a rock — par for the course during my trip — the place had amenities that most Chinese business hotels in a similar price range do not: English-speaking staff members, and no-smoking policies that are not entirely ignored.It also had a great location, on a pleasant pedestrian path along the downtown bank of the Wusong River, a five-minute walk from the Xinzha Road subway stop. Actually, plan on six minutes: if you can resist a 60-second stop at Xiaocheng Shengjian to grab four scallion-and-sesame-seed-sprinkled pot stickers for 4.5 renminbi (at 392 Xinzha Road), you probably shouldn't be budget-traveling in Shanghai at all.
When Gemma Bond was 14 and training at the Royal Ballet School in London she entered a choreographic competition. "It seems really silly now," she said with the sort of half-embarrassed laughter that frequently trickles into her speech. "But I thought: 'Well, I should have a go. Everyone else is trying.' " Her ballet, she added, wasn't experimental in the least. "I just wanted it to be pretty."To her amazement she won third place and her ballet, a pas de trois, was shown as part of the school's performance that year. But after joining the Royal Ballet, where she danced for seven years before joining American Ballet Theater — she is now a member of the corps de ballet — Ms. Bond set such aspirations aside. "I was so busy doing other things that I never choreographed again," she said in a phone interview from Hong Kong, where Ballet Theater recently performed.But recently Ms. Bond, a delicate 30-year-old blonde with a disarming air, has regained her choreographic footing. On Friday at Florence Gould Hall she will unveil "Silent Titles," which marks her second work for the intimate New York Theater Ballet. Ms. Bond may not have the same opportunities as the rising New York City Ballet star Justin Peck, but like him she is a member of the corps with a choreographic voice.Ms. Bond came to the attention of Diana Byer, the artistic director of New York Theater Ballet, at a performance of Ballet Theater's Innovation Initiative workshop, started by the dancer David Hallberg to encourage choreographic exploration by a new generation."I thought, 'Wow, she needs to be developed, but this is a real talent,' " Ms. Byer said at the company's Midtown studios. She then spoke to Kevin McKenzie, the artistic director of Ballet Theater, about approaching Ms. Bond to create a piece for her company. "I explained that I could take a risk, being such a small company, that maybe ABT couldn't take and she could develop a little bit, and he said: 'Sure, why not? Let her try it.' So after that first piece I asked Kevin if she could do something a little bigger, and he said yes."In "Silent Titles," set to a collection of piano pieces by Gottschalk — each section of the ballet has a French title — Ms. Bond was inspired by the movie musicals she loved as a child. "Last year I saw 'The Artist,' and I thought it would be fun to do a silent-movie ballet where the dancers were all in black and white."Using that palette and a 1950s sensibility, "Silent Titles" is a homage to movies like "White Christmas" and "Gigi," one of Ms. Bond's favorites. The ballet begins and ends with a dressing-room scene; in between are three miniature dances that show Ms. Bond's flair not just for petit allegro but also for full-bodied expansiveness, humor and an inherent dramatic touch that is apparent in even the smallest of her roles for Ballet Theater."Antony Tudor used to say that he didn't want to work with dancers trying to be people; he wanted to work with people that happened to dance," Ms. Byer said. "That's Gemma. It's very real, and she's brought that imagination into her choreography." Mr. Hallberg said he admires the way Ms. Bond listens to her true voice and lets that drive her work. "Gemma brings a simplicity, a heritage that she has from a different culture and of ballet," he said in a phone interview. "She's not veering off, she's adding on, which I think is great."But for all her naturalness onstage, when Ms. Bond first joined the Royal Ballet she said she felt awkward. A transformative experience came while watching the principal dancer Tamara Rojo perform "Romeo and Juliet." Ms. Rojo didn't hold back. "If you put everything in it, then you've got nothing to lose," Ms. Bond said.Before the Innovation Initiative, Ms. Bond was part of a group at American Ballet Theater that focused on developing female choreographers. Sessions focused on all aspects of creating a dance, from securing music rights to arranging bodies in space. The instructor Stephen Pier guided the dancers through choreographic tasks."He would say, 'Scribble on a piece of paper,' " Ms. Bond recalled, "and that would be our floor map, and we would choreograph a two-minute piece with it."It led to the opportunity to create a short dance for a Ballet Theater children's matinee, but Ms. Bond had trouble standing her ground with her dancers. "People would just take advantage," she said. "I felt like I didn't have a voice where I could say, 'This is what you're doing, and I like it that way.' They just saw me as Gemma, the girl that they danced with."At New York Theater Ballet she has a chance to work under the radar. The first section in "Silent Titles" is a number for showgirls who carry huge feather fans. "We're sexy but in a quiet way," said the dancer Amanda Treiber after a recent rehearsal of the ballet. "We're showgirls, but we've already made it."For Ms. Bond the music reminds her of the way a ballerina rotates in a music box. "I wanted the first movement to be very simple," she said. "They turn a lot, and I feel like they're just drifting. I wanted something smooth."In the second dance four men chase a flirtatious woman, and in the third Ms. Bond experiments with a tango, in which a man gradually wears down his partner. "You're always trying to get away from that boy," Ms. Bond said, "but you just have to give in eventually."She's no longer afraid to tell dancers what she's after. In a roundabout way Ballet Theater's artist in residence, Alexei Ratmansky, gave her confidence. "Working with Ratmansky and seeing how people would react to what he was doing was interesting," she said. "His steps are earthy and grounded and very different from what ABT was doing before. To have Alexei say, 'No, I want you off your leg,' and 'Jump, but don't jump — skim the floor,' and then to see him trying to tell people who didn't understand made me think, 'If you believe in something, you should really just make them believe it too.' "She also realized that the performance is the key. "As dancers, I don't think we really see what the audience sees," she said. "We're too involved or too 'Oh, they didn't make this turn. Their show is ruined.' Or 'They're not in a perfect line. It looks a mess.' But the audience doesn't care about that. The audience wants an experience of something different."
Rooms start at 1,300 renminbi (about $213, at 6.1 renminbi to the dollar).For years, the Shangri-La's Kerry Center Hotel in Beijing was a popular destination for the upscale business traveler. Then about a year and a half ago, the company reopened the hotel as the 486-room Kerry Hotel, the second in its new portfolio of "vibrant, unpretentious" hotels for the traveler seeking an "energetic vibe." (The first was the Kerry Hotel Shanghai, which opened in February 2011.) The extreme comfort of the newly redone surroundings more than made up for the noise of the renovations, in progress when I stayed there last year.It's in the central business district, making this a prime spot for business travelers. Yet because the hotel is linked to the Kerry Center, an upscale mall that has shops, restaurants and bars, it is convenient for tourists as well.My room, on the club level, was meticulously designed with the traveler's requirements. Need to do some work? There's a drawer filled with paper clips, a ruler, pencils, a stapler and stationery. Need to charge your gadgets? Pull back a slender panel underneath the 40-inch LED television, and you'll find a row of electrical outlets. There's a Bose sound dock, a coffee maker and a DVD player (you can borrow DVDs from the concierge). Everything in the minibar is free.The bed — just firm and soft enough — was incredibly comfortable, too. The leather clock by the bed was a nice old-school touch. So were free shoe shines. (We sent a pair around midnight, requesting them back at 8 a.m., and they showed up on the dot.)With a built-in TV in the mirror, a bathtub and a rain forest shower, L'Occitane toiletries and an entire drawer filled with items like shaving cream, toothbrushes and even a scrunchie for your hair, I was already satisfied.But the toilet won my heart: this Toto gizmo came with a panel of buttons allowing you to conjure water to wash and massage various bits. One drawback: because of its proximity to the door, any movement near it caused the automated lid to pop up. When you find yourself saying things like "Not now, dear," to a toilet, it can't be good.Besides a 24-hour gym, the fitness center includes a large indoor swimming pool, tennis and basketball courts, a sauna and Jacuzzi. The old Shangri-La's popular Centro bar (where you can hear live jazz) is still alive and kicking, and the hotel has two restaurants (the Horizon, a Chinese restaurant, and the pan-Asian Kerry's Kitchen) and a deli, Kerry's Pantry. Wireless Internet in rooms is free, and those on the club level have access to a lovely happy hour where wine is served along with a buffet of finger sandwiches, hot treats and (my favorite) a big tray of slabs of chocolate complete with a mallet for you to break off whatever you want.The club-level breakfast included with our room was a spread that included a vast selection of pastries (some came studded with refreshing dragonfruit), cheeses, cold cuts, sushi, cereal, smoked fish as well as congee, steamed dumpling and eggs-to-order stations. Additionally, you could order waffles, French toast or noodles from your table. I sampled the divine "Beijing noodle," which came topped with minced pork cooked with salty soy bean paste.With its sheer size, the Kerry experience could feel cold and corporate. Not so. The very attentive service, comfort and terrific amenities make for a warm and very inviting stay.
HONG KONG — The Chinese police arrested the husband of a Tibetan woman who died last week after setting herself alight in protest, an overseas group said on Monday, following a separate fatal self-immolation at a Tibetan Buddhist monastery over the weekend.The two acts bring the number of self-immolations by Tibetans within China to 109 since February 2009, based on a count compiled by the Tibetan government in exile, which is based in Dharamsala in northern India.The woman, Kunchoek Wangmo, set herself ablaze on Wednesday in Aba Prefecture, a heavily Tibetan area of Sichuan Province in southwest China, and her husband, Dolma Kyab, was detained by the police after he refused to blame domestic problems for her protest, said Free Tibet, a group based in London that campaigns for Tibetan self-determination. Aba is called Ngaba by Tibetans.Alistair Currie, a media officer for Free Tibet, said that the group was not sure precisely when the man was arrested and that it had not received any more news about his case.The predominantly Tibetan parts of Sichuan Province, which lies next to the official Tibetan Autonomous Region, have been among the restive areas that have experienced self-immolation protests against the Chinese presence and policies.On Saturday, Lobsang Thogmey, a monk at the Kirti Buddhist Monastery, also in Aba Prefecture, set himself on fire outside the monastery and died, according to an account issued by the Tibetan government in exile on Sunday. The monastery has been a center of opposition to Chinese restrictions on Tibetan Buddhism.Tibetans have said the self-immolations reflect anger and despair about the damage wrought by Chinese control of the region. The Chinese government has placed blame for the acts on followers of the Dalai Lama, the exiled Tibetan Buddhist leader who has campaigned for self-determination for his homeland.The Dalai Lama has not made any explicit statements in support of self-immolations, and his supporters have said the accusations of a conspiracy are groundless attempts to divert attention from Tibetan discontent about Chinese rule.
The Stuart Weitzman ballet flats from Neiman Marcus sported sweet faux fur pom-poms. The Alice and Olivia coat was trimmed with a dark faux fur collar.The problem was that the faux fur was, in fact, real fur.That's right: it was faux faux fur.In a forehead-slapping development, Neiman Marcus and two other retailers, DrJays.com and Eminent, on Tuesday settled federal claims that they had marketed real fur as fake fur. The supposedly fake stuff was actually rabbit, raccoon and, possibly, dyed mink.Animal protection groups applauded the settlement, reached with the Federal Trade Commission, saying many retailers have been selling real fur disguised as fake fur.On the face of it, the real-for-fake switch might not seem to make business sense. But because many people are no longer buying real fur, manufacturers and retailers are scrambling to meet growing demand for faux fur. As a result, some products are being mislabeled."The lines between real and fake have gotten really blurry," said Dan Mathews, a senior vice president with People for the Ethical Treatment of Animals. "In this global marketplace, there are fur farms in China that raise dogs for clothing that is labeled as fake fur here in the U.S. because that's what the market best responds to."Others chalk up the incorrect labeling to sloppy product descriptions.Hymie Betesh, the founder and chief executive of DrJays.com, says his company sells about 50,000 styles of products each year on its Web site."There were a handful of instances where a word may have been omitted in our product descriptions, and others where the word 'fur' was used to describe the style of a product, not intending to describe fabric content," Mr. Betesh said in an e-mail.Eminent, doing business as Revolve Clothing, according to the F.T.C., did not respond to an e-mail requesting a comment.Under the F.T.C. settlement, which is preliminary and carries no financial penalties, the retailers will be subject to significant fines if they mislabel fur again in the next 20 years.Mislabeling real fur — inexpensive rabbit as luxurious mink, say — is an old game. But mislabeling real fur as fake fur is relatively new. The three retailers were accused of violating a fur law that was enacted in the 1950s and, at the time, was meant to prevent people from marketing furs like rabbit under its English name, Coney, or selling muskrat as Hudson Seal.The F.T.C. investigation was prompted by a petition filed last fall by the Humane Society of the United States.Each year since 2006, when the Humane Society received an anonymous communication that a retailer was going to be advertising an animal fur product as fake fur in a printed circular, the group has conducted investigations. It scours Web sites and stores for mislabeled products. Suspected real-fur items are sent to a lab for testing.Last fall, the group found fur where it was not supposed to be in a handful of products sold at 11 retailers, including the three in settlement announced Tuesday, as well as Dillard's and Barneys New York, according to a complaint filed by the organization."We continue to find animal fur sold as faux fur every single season," said Pierre Grzybowski, the research and enforcement manager of the Fur-Free campaign for the Humane Society.Neiman Marcus is a frequent target of the group. In 2007, for instance, the Humane Society found a children's Andrew Marc jacket whose label said it was 100 percent polyester.Testing, however, identified fur from a raccoon dog, a member of the Canid family, which includes dogs, wolves, foxes and coyotes.A later investigation by the F.T.C. resulted in no action.In 2008, when the Humane Society discovered raccoon dog fur misidentified as fake fur on several coats sold at Neiman Marcus and other national retailers, it sued the retailers. In 2010, Neiman Marcus paid a $25,000 judgment after a District of Columbia court found that the retailer had violated consumer protection laws.That same year, a $1,895 St. John coat that was advertised as raccoon fur on the Neiman Marcus Web site tested as being raccoon dog.In an e-mailed statement, a spokeswoman for Neiman Marcus said the company maintained a robust program to comply with all laws and regulations. And under the F.T.C. agreement, Neiman Marcus "has committed to identify correctly and promote accurately the fur and faux fur products offered in our catalogs and on our Web sites," the statement said.
HONG KONG — It was the Icarus of the solar power industry. And, on Wednesday, it fell to earth.The main subsidiary of Suntech Power, one of the world's largest makers of solar panels, collapsed into bankruptcy in a remarkable reversal for what had been part of a huge Chinese government effort to dominate renewable energy industries.The bankruptcy is a sign of the worldwide consolidation of the solar industry, which has been crippled by a glut of products on world markets and Western tariffs on Chinese products. It also signals China's unwillingness to continue to subsidize struggling manufacturers in the industry, which is contributing to the steep decline of its green energy pursuits.More than any other country, China had leaned heavily on renewable energy to solve its problems of severe air pollution and dependence on energy imports from politically unstable countries in the Middle East and Africa.Suntech, a centerpiece of the country's efforts, had grown to 10,000 employees in its hometown, Wuxi, on China's east coast, and even set up a small factory in Arizona to assemble panels. But a tenfold expansion of Chinese solar panel manufacturing capacity from 2008 to 2012 pushed down the price of solar panels about 75 percent, undermining the economics of the business.The rapid expansion of natural gas production in the United States and a curtailment of subsidies in the European Union also hurt prices, as did the United States's imposition of import tariffs totaling about 40 percent after an antidumping and antisubsidy investigation last year.The European Union is completing its own trade investigation of Chinese solar panel shipments that could lead to steep tariffs there as well.After Suntech grew spectacularly, with production that soared year after year on heavy investment, and after Western investors bought up its New York-traded shares and its international debt issues, the company was battered by plummeting prices as the overall manufacturing industry sank.Ocean Yuan, the president of Grape Solar, an importer of solar panels based in Eugene, Ore., said he foresaw a series of bankruptcies by big Chinese solar panel manufacturers, some of which, like Suntech, have very high debt. Chinese manufacturers lost as much as $1 for every $3 of sales last year as they struggled to keep factories open despite falling prices."They are bleeding every day," Mr. Yuan wrote in an e-mail. "The more they sell, the more they lose money."He predicted that solar panel manufacturers in Europe and the United States would also face crippling financial pressures and that the long-term survivors in the industry would be manufacturers in Taiwan, who have low costs and are not subject to the American import tariffs or the likely European tariffs.Chinese banks quietly asked a court in Wuxi on Monday to declare the operating subsidiary, Wuxi Suntech, insolvent and begin reorganizing it. The subsidiary notified the court on Wednesday that it did not object to the insolvency petition.Suntech Power, the parent, said that it was not filing for bankruptcy and would continue to honor warranties on the company's solar panels.The bankruptcy filing is widely expected to lead to a takeover of the Wuxi operations by Wuxi Guolian Development Group, a financial conglomerate controlled by the city government of Wuxi.A woman who answered the phone at Wuxi Guolian's headquarters on March 13 said that her company was involved in a Suntech acquisition but declined to provide details or her name.On Tuesday, Suntech Power announced the appointment of a new president, Weiping Zhou, a longtime Wuxi Guolian executive who had been the chairman of that company's futures trading subsidiary.In its statement announcing the bankruptcy of Wuxi Suntech, Suntech Power did not mention any immediate role for Wuxi Guolian. David W. King, the chief executive of Suntech Power, said the company would "continue to work closely with all of our stakeholders and take the necessary steps to put Suntech back on track for growth."
BEIJING — China's state leadership transition has taken place this month against an ominous backdrop. More than 16,000 dead pigs have been found floating in rivers that provide drinking water to Shanghai. A haze akin to volcanic fumes cloaked the capital, causing convulsive coughing and obscuring the portrait of Mao Zedong on the gate to the Forbidden City.So severe are China's environmental woes, especially the noxious air, that top government officials have been forced to openly acknowledge them. Fu Ying, the spokeswoman for the National People's Congress, said she checked for smog every morning after opening her curtains and kept at home face masks for her daughter and herself. Li Keqiang, the new prime minister, said the air pollution had made him "quite upset" and vowed to "show even greater resolve and make more vigorous efforts" to clean it up.What the leaders neglect to say is that infighting within the government bureaucracy is one of the biggest obstacles to enacting stronger environmental policies. Even as some officials push for tighter restrictions on pollutants, state-owned enterprises — especially China's oil and power companies — have been putting profits ahead of health in working to outflank new rules, according to government data and interviews with people involved in policy negotiations.For instance, even though trucks and buses crisscrossing China are far worse for the environment than any other vehicles, the oil companies have delayed for years an improvement in the diesel fuel those vehicles burn. As a result, the sulfur levels of diesel in China are at least 23 times that of the United States. As for power companies, the three biggest ones in the country are all repeat violators of government restrictions on emissions from coal-burning plants; offending power plants are found across the country, from Inner Mongolia to the southwest metropolis of Chongqing.The state-owned enterprises are given critical roles in policy-making on environmental standards. The committees that determine fuel standards, for example, are housed in the buildings of an oil company. Whether the enterprises can be forced to follow, rather than impede, environmental restrictions will be a critical test of the commitment of Mr. Li andXi Jinping, the new party chief and president, to curbing the influence of vested interests in the economy.Last month, after deadly air pollution hit record levels in northern China, officials led byWen Jiabao, then the prime minister, put forward strict new fuel standards that the oil companies had blocked for years. But there are doubts about whether the oil companies will comply, especially since oil officials resisted a similar government order for higher-grade fuel four years ago. State-owned power companies have been similarly resistant. The companies regularly ignore government orders to upgrade coal-burning electricity plants, according to ministry data. And as with the oil companies, the power companies exert an outsize influence over environmental policy debates.In 2011, during a round of discussions over stricter emissions standards, the China Electricity Council, which represents the companies, pushed back hard against the proposals, saying that the costs of upgrading the plants would be too high."During the procedure of setting the standard, the companies or the industry councils have a lot of influence," said Zhou Rong, a campaign manager on energy issues for Greenpeace East Asia. "My personal opinion is even if we have the most stringent standards for every sector, the companies will violate those."On Feb. 28, Deutsche Bank released an analysts' note saying that China's current economic policies would result in an enormous surge in coal consumption and automobile sales over the next decade. "China's air pollution will become a lot worse from the already unbearable level," the analysts said, calling for drastic policy changes and "a strong government will to overcome the opposition from interest groups."The report estimated that the number of passenger cars in China was on track to hit 400 million by 2030, up from 90 million now.For the most part, Chinese automakers have supported upgrading cars with cleaner technology, which makes them more marketable worldwide, environmental advocates say. But better technology cannot operate properly without high-quality fuel, and this is where the bottleneck occurs.The system of forging fuel standards has led to fierce bureaucratic infighting.
BEIJING — Three Tibetans from Qinghai Province have been given prison sentences for "inciting state secession," according to a statement on an official provincial Web site. On Monday, a court in Haidong Prefecture sentenced the Tibetans — Kalsang Dhondup, Jigme Thabkey and Lobsang — to terms of six, five and four years, respectively. The online announcement said that the men used self-immolations by Tibetans for publicity purposes and circulated texts and photographs related to Tibetan independence, spreading "bad influence locally and internationally." Since 2009, at least 109 Tibetans have set fire to themselves to protest Chinese rule, and most have died. To deter the act, Chinese officials are trying to prosecute people associated with those who commit self-immolation. Tibetans opposed to Chinese rule say those who self-immolated did it out of frustration with Chinese policies.
HONG KONG — Manufacturing activity in China has perked up in March after a lull during the Lunar New Year holiday in February, underlining that China's economy appears on track for solid — but not sizzling — growth this year.A closely watched index of sentiment in the vast Chinese manufacturing sector, published by the British bank HSBC on Thursday, showed a reading of 51.7 points in March. That was a better-than-expected improvement from the 50.4 in February, when many factories shut during the Lunar New Year break, and took the reading well above the level of 50 that separates expansion from contraction.But despite the rebound, the March result was shy of the level seen in January — yet another indicator that the economy has settled into more modest growth than it experienced prior to the global financial crisis.The purchasing managers' index reading "implies that the Chinese economy is still on track for gradual growth recovery," Qu Hongbin, chief China economist for HSBC, wrote in a statement accompanying the data release. "Inflation remains well behaved, leaving room for Beijing to keep policy relatively accommodative in a bid to sustain growth recovery."Improving overseas orders for Chinese-made goods and a flow of government-mandated investment into infrastructure projects helped pull the economy out of a slowdown last year, averting a "hard landing."The upturn has, however, been gradual, in part because policy makers have been eager to steer the economy toward more modest expansion in the hope of easing the risks of inflation, potential loan defaults and inefficient investment.Balancing the various pressures will be tricky, analysts warn.A renewed climb in property prices, for example, earlier this month prompted fresh efforts to cool the market — potentially hurting some developers and their lenders.Likewise, the surge in credit that supported growth in recent years has created new risks that will need to be reined in. Zhiwei Zhang, an economist at the investment bank Nomura, warned in a report last Friday that "China is displaying the same three symptoms that Japan, the U.S. and parts of Europe all showed before suffering financial crises: a rapid build-up of leverage, elevated property prices and a decline in potential growth."The government is likely to tighten policy to contain financial risks, Mr. Zhang wrote, but this will come at the cost of slowing overall growth in the second half of this year.Longer term, Chinese demographics — its labor force will shrink as the population ages — mean that the productivity of workers and companies will have to rise. The new leadership in Beijing is betting on faster urbanization as a major driver of future growth.Analysts cautioned, however, that potentially tough changes would also be needed — including, for example, allowing more competition in areas dominated by sprawling state-owned enterprises, and weaning the economy off its reliance on state-driven investment and exports."China's new leaders pledged to make the Chinese dream come true by bringing benefits of growth to the people," economists at Citibank wrote in a research note Monday. "This requires a difficult balance between growth and reform. Reform is likely painful but there is no alternative."
BEIJING — Peng Liyuan, China 's new first lady, is glamorous, fashionable and one of her nation's best-known singers, a startling contrast to her dour-looking predecessors. As she accompanies her husband, President Xi Jinping , on his first trip abroad as China's leader, Ms. Peng appears ready to carve out a new role for herself.China's fashion editors were scrutinizing the first sightings of her wardrobe — a dark trench coat and a handsome handbag — as she descended onto the tarmac at the Moscow airport on the first stop of the couple's trip, which also includes visits to Tanzania and South Africa. Music aficionados are waiting to see whether she offers any performances. (Unlikely.) Policy advisers hope she gives a speech on AIDS on the sidelines of a summit meeting Mr. Xi is attending in South Africa. (Possible, because she is a United Nations ambassador for health.)At a time when China's Foreign Ministry is struggling to improve China's international image, Ms. Peng, 50, who has dazzled audiences at home and abroad with her bravura soprano voice, comes as a welcome gift."Because of her performer's background and presence, I think she will definitely add points for her husband," said Tian Yimiao, an associate professor at the Shanghai Conservatory of Music. "It could make her into a diplomatic idol."Concerned about China's difficulties in projecting a global soft power presence, the government recently established a Public Diplomacy Association made up of former ambassadors and other notable figures.The association's task is to make the "voice of China and the story of China more engaging and more convincing," said Yang Jiechi, the new state councilor in charge of foreign affairs. Officials now talk publicly about the need for Chinese companies, especially mining and construction conglomerates, to be more sensitive to local needs in Africa and Asia.It could be that Ms. Peng's star power will push the diplomats into the background. Although Mr. Xi may not like the comparison, some see her as a figure akin to Raisa Gorbachev, the wife of Mikhail S. Gorbachev, who helped humanize the Soviet leader as the Soviet Union fell apart. Mr. Xi has singled out Mr. Gorbachev as a man who let down the cause of Communism.Others see her as roughly equivalent to Michelle Obama: modern, outgoing, intrigued by fashion. They await the moment when Ms. Peng and Mrs. Obama stand with their husbands at a state visit, either in Washington or Beijing, a lineup that is likely to happen in the next four years. The couples share some common ground. The Obamas have two daughters; Mr. Xi and Ms. Peng have one daughter, Xi Mingze, who is registered under a pseudonym as an undergraduate at Harvard.Ms. Peng became a household name in China well before her husband. She joined the People's Liberation Army as a civilian when she was 18.She soon emerged as a talented singer with a voice suited to folk tales and operatic scores that heralded the bravery of China's soldiers. For several decades, she starred in the nation's annual New Year's television extravaganza, where she wore boldly hued gowns with well-fitted bodices and flouncy skirts.In 2004, Ms. Peng took the role of Mulan, the heroine of a Chinese folk tale depicted in "Mulan Psalm," an opera about a young woman who disguises herself as a man to take the place of her ailing father in the army. The virtues of peace, the hard times of war and the glory of victory, assured by Mulan, make for a stirring spectacle.The work combines musical theater, drama and dance with elements of Western opera, according to the composer of the score, Guan Xia. Ms. Peng performed the central role with a full orchestra at Avery Fisher Hall at Lincoln Center in New York in 2005, and at the Vienna State Opera House in 2008."She has deep technical roots, and very good technique," Ms. Tian said. "In the folk singer category, no one can surpass her."When Mr. Xi became vice president in 2007, Ms. Peng began cutting back her performances, in step with the traditional secondary role played by the wives of Chinese leaders. Still, the Chinese news media have reported that she remains the leader of the Chinese Song and Dance Ensemble in the General Political Department of the People's Liberation Army.In 2011, the World Health Organization selected her as a good-will ambassador for AIDS and tuberculosis, a position that lasts for two years.Ms. Peng will join Mr. Xi at the annual meeting of the emerging markets group, known as the BRICS, in Durban, South Africa, an appropriate place for her to talk about health, according to speculation in the Chinese news media.As for her fashion taste, a Chinese fashion blog, Jing Daily, reported that the trench coat Ms. Peng wore for her arrival in Moscow was from Exception de Mixmind, a domestic ready-to-wear brand that she favors. The clothes sell for $300 to $400. In brand-crazy China, her handbag, a Tod lookalike, stood out for being "no brand," the blog said."Many people online are saying, 'Finally we have a beautiful first lady,' " Ms. Tian said.
One of Yahoo 's newest employees is a 17-year-old high school student in Britain. As of Monday, he is one of its richest, too.That student, Nick D'Aloisio, a programming whiz who wasn't even born when Yahoo was founded in 1994, sold his news-reading app, Summly, to the company on Monday for a sum said to be in the tens of millions of dollars. Yahoo said it would incorporate his algorithmic invention, which takes long-form stories and shortens them for readers using smartphones, in its own mobile apps, with Mr. D'Aloisio's help."I've still got a year and a half left at my high school," he said in a telephone interview on Monday. But he will make arrangements to test out of his classes and work from the Yahoo office in London, partly to abide by the company's new and much-debated policy that prohibits working from home.Mr. D'Aloisio, who declined to comment on the price paid by Yahoo (the technology news site AllThingsD pegged the purchase price at about $30 million), was Summly's largest shareholder.Summly's other investors, improbably enough, included Wendi Murdoch, Ashton Kutcher and Yoko Ono. The most important one was Li Ka-shing, the Hong Kong billionaire, whose investment fund supported Mr. D'Aloisio's idea early on, before it was even called Summly."They took a gamble on me when I was a 15-year-old," Mr. D'Aloisio said, by providing seed financing that let him hire employees and lease office space.The fund read about Mr. D'Aloisio's early-stage app on TechCrunch, the Silicon Valley blog of record, found his e-mail address and startled him with a message expressing interest.The others signed up later. "Because it was my first time around, people just wanted to help," he said.For teenagers who fancy themselves entrepreneurs — and their parents, too — the news of the sale conjured up some feelings of inadequacy, but also awe. For Brian Wong, the 21-year-old founder of Kiip, a mobile rewards company, the reaction was downright laughable: "I feel old!"A few years ago, Mr. Wong was described in the news media as the youngest person ever to receive venture capital funding. But a couple of younger founders came along — "and then Nick broke all of our records," Mr. Wong said on Monday.Among the attributes that helped Mr. D'Aloisio, he said, was a preternatural ability to articulate exactly what he wanted Summly to be. "There were no umms, no uhhs, no hesitations, no insecurities," Mr. Wong said.Mr. D'Aloisio, for his part, sounded somewhat uninterested in answering questions about his age on Monday. He acknowledged that it was an advantage in some pitch meetings, and certainly in the news media, "but so was the strength of the idea." He was more eager to talk about his new employer, Yahoo, which is trying to reinvent itself as a mobile-first technology company (having dropped the digital media tagline it used before Marissa Mayer became chief executive last year)."People are kind of underestimating how powerful it's going to become and how much opportunity is there," he said.For a company that badly wants to be labeled innovative, those words are worth a lot.Mr. D'Aloisio's father, who works at Morgan Stanley, and his mother, a lawyer, had no special knowledge of technology. But they nurtured their son's fascination with it and he started coding at age 12. Eventually he decided to develop an app with what he calls an "automatic summarization algorithm," one that "can take pre-existing long-form content and summarize it." In other words, it tries to solve a problem that is often summed up with the abbreviation tl;dr: "too long; didn't read."Summly officially came online last November. By December, Mr. D'Aloisio was talking to Yahoo and other suitors.Yahoo said in a statement that while the Summly app would be shut down, "we will acquire the technology and you'll see it come to life throughout Yahoo's mobile experiences soon."Other news-reading apps have attracted corporate attention as of late, reflecting the scramble by media companies to adapt to skyrocketing traffic from mobile devices. The social network LinkedIn was said to be pursuing an app called Pulse earlier this month. Still, the eight-figure payday for a teenage entrepreneur on Monday struck some as outlandish and set off speculation that Yahoo was willing to pay almost any price for "cool."Mr. D'Aloisio, though, will have plenty of time to prove his and his algorithm's worth. As for the sizable paycheck from Yahoo, he said he did not have any specific plans for the sudden windfall. "It's going to be put into a trust fund and my parents will help manage it," he said.He did say, however, that "angel investing could be really fun." When not working at Yahoo, he will keep up with his hobbies — cricket in particular — and set his sights on attending college at Oxford. His intended major is philosophy.
HONG KONG — Hong Kong's highest court ruled unanimously on Monday that a woman from the Philippines who had lived and worked here for nearly 27 years as a domestic helper was not entitled to permanent residency, ending an acrimonious legal fight over the immigration rights of migrant workers.Public opinion surveys had shown that a large majority of Hong Kong citizens opposed granting permanent residency to the city's domestic helpers, which would give them the right to live here for the rest of their lives and use the nearly free public health care system and other social services. Many residents and the local government feared that granting permanent residency would have resulted in increased social spending.But activists for domestic helpers, along with Mark Daly, the lawyer who championed their cause in the legal battle, contended that denying permanent residency would cement lasting divisions in Hong Kong based on gender and race. Virtually all of the estimated 300,000 foreign domestic helpers in this city of seven million are women, and they are not mainland Chinese, who qualify for separate rules for permanent residency and passports under Hong Kong's Basic Law, the city's miniconstitution.The decision on Monday by the Court of Final Appeal, Mr. Daly said, "is a regrettable decision; it basically entrenches their being second-class citizens."Lai Tung-kwok, Hong Kong's secretary for security, welcomed the court's decision, saying at a news conference that the government would rely on it in handling a recent surge in applications from domestic helpers for permanent residency. There were 1,067 such applications filed between September 2011, when the legal effort on behalf of foreign domestic helpers began attracting attention, and the end of last week, according to the city's Immigration Department.The Hong Kong decision coincides with debates in the European Union and the United States over what legal rights should be extended to illegal immigrants, as opposed to the contract workers in the dispute here.The landmark case highlighted questions of judicial independence, with Hong Kong's government having put heavy pressure on the court to reject permanent residency for foreign domestic helpers.In an unusual and highly contentious move, the local government asked the court in advance to refer a central issue in the case to the Standing Committee of the National People's Congress in Beijing, which could be expected to side with the Hong Kong government. In issuing its decision in the government's favor, the court said that its ruling meant there was no need to seek a binding legal interpretation from Beijing.Yet the ruling also made it clear that there could be circumstances in the future in which the court would seek such an interpretation.With the decision, the judges "on the one hand maintain the authority of the Court of Final Appeal, and at the same time try not to be too aggressive to the National People's Congress," James Sung, a political science professor at the City University of Hong Kong, said in an interview outside the courthouse, a brick mansion downtown.The decision had been watched around Asia as a sign of whether Hong Kong, a vast majority of whose population is ethnic Chinese, would embrace a more multiethnic future. Rimsky Yuen, Hong Kong's secretary for justice, said that the territory would "certainly endeavor to maintain Hong Kong as a cosmopolitan society."The ruling also comes as China's new president, Xi Jinping, has spoken in a series of speeches of a "China dream" that blends nationalism and socialism in calling for a muscular military combined with an economic rejuvenation of China under Communist Party guidance.There was no immediate reaction to the ruling from the Hong Kong consulates of the Philippines and Indonesia, the two countries that provide the largest number of domestic helpers to Hong Kong. Both countries have also been warily watching China's increasingly assertive territorial claims in the South China Sea and the East China Sea, which particularly affect Brunei, Japan, Malaysia, the Philippines and Vietnam.The Basic Law provides that people who are "ordinarily resident" in the city for at least seven years are entitled to permanent residency. But Hong Kong's immigration ordinance says that no matter how many years people live in the city as contract workers, they do not count as "ordinarily resident" during those years.
BEIJING — Life for the almighty Chinese government official has come to this: car pools, domestically made wristwatches and self-serve lunch buffets.In the four months since he was anointed China's paramount leader and tastemaker-in-chief, President Xi Jinping has imposed a form of austerity on the nation's famously free-spending civil servants, military brass and provincial party bosses. Warning that graft and gluttony threaten to bring down the ruling Communists, Mr. Xi has ordered an end to boozy, taxpayer-financed banquets and the bribery that often takes the form of a gift-wrapped Louis Vuitton bag.While the power of the nation's elite remains unchallenged, the symbols of that power are slipping from view. Gone, for now, are the freshly cut flowers and red-carpet ceremonies that used to greet visiting dignitaries. This month, military officers who arrived here for the annual National People's Congress were instructed to share hotel rooms and bring their own toiletries."Car-pooling feels so good because it provides a way to bond and chat with each other while saving money and increasing efficiency," one senior military official told the People's Liberation Army newspaper.Not everyone has been so embracing of the change. Last Tuesday, the country's top disciplinary body dismissed six functionaries, including a neighborhood party chief who spent $63,000 to entertain 80 colleagues at a seaside resort, and a county official who marked the opening of new administrative offices by throwing a feast for 290 people.The crackdown appears to be real, as far as it goes, which may not be very far. After a year of scandal that led to the toppling of a member of the Politburo, Bo Xilai, and numerous reports of widespread official corruption, Mr. Xi's highly public campaign seems aimed at curtailing the most conspicuous displays of wealth by people in power. He has done little to tackle the concentrations of money and power in China's state-directed economy that have allowed numerous members of the Chinese elite and their extended families to amass extravagant fortunes.Some analysts note that even a modest first step toward reducing corruption, a proposed regulation that would require top officials to disclose their personal assets publicly, appears to be stalled, highlighting the elite's resistance to real change.Wu Qiang, a political science professor at Tsinghua University in Beijing, expressed cynicism about the moderation campaign, saying it distracted attention from the kinds of political reform necessary to make government more accountable and transparent. "More than just restricting people's eating habits, we need to restrain the party's power, otherwise this is just political farce," he said.Even so, Mr. Xi has garnered attention and some praise for his eight-point guide for official conduct, which he issued in January. Mr. Xi warned that his administration would swat both "tigers and flies" in the anticorruption drive, which he said was vital for winning back public trust."If we don't redress unhealthy tendencies and allow them to develop, it will be like putting up a wall between our party and the people, and we will lose our roots, our lifeblood and our strength," Mr. Xi said.Mr. Xi's campaign even has a new catchphrase, based on his vision of gastronomic self-restraint: "Four dishes and a soup."So far, most victims of the frugality drive have been purveyors of the good life: high-end caterers, abalone wholesalers, five-star hotels and makers of Yellow Pavilion cigarettes, the $300-a-carton brand coveted by up-and-coming bureaucrats.The ripple effects have reached all corners of the economy. First-class airline ticket sales have dropped by a tenth in recent months, and luxury goods dealers have reported a 20 percent to 30 percent decrease in sales. Moutai, the $600-a-bottle gut-searing grain alcohol that is an omnipresent intoxicant at official banquets, has also seen its growth slow recently.The China Cuisine Association said that 60 percent of restaurants surveyed last month had experienced a drop in reservations, with government-sponsored banquets down by nearly a third compared with the same period last year.Shen Danyang, a Ministry of Commerce spokesman who in normal times champions consumer spending, seemed to relish this particular slowdown. During a news conference last month, he noted that sales of shark fins had dropped more than 70 percent, and sales of edible swallow nests, the main ingredient of a $100-a-bowl delicacy, were down 40 percent.
HONG KONG — Two courts in China 's far northwestern Xinjiang region have convicted and sentenced 20 people accused of militant separatism in this area where members of the Uighur ethnic minority bridle at Chinese rule and restrictions on their Islamic beliefs.The sentences, ranging from five years in jail up to life in prison, were given Tuesday in five separate cases by courts in Kashgar and Bayingol Prefectures, Xinjiang's official Tianshan news Web site said on Tuesday.The Chinese-language report did not describe the ethnicity of the people convicted or their genders. But their distinctive names and the separatist accusations left little doubt that they are Uighur, a mainly Muslim ethnic group with a Turkic language and culture that sets them apart from China's Han majority. And details in the report offered a picture of volatile resentment among Uighur men drawn to militancy spread over the Internet.The accused were "seduced by ideas of religious extremism and terrorist violence" and "used the Internet, mobile phones and digital storage devices to organize, lead and participate in terror organizations, provoke incidents, and incite separatism," the Chinese report said."It's not clear what is being alleged against these people beyond being members of a clandestine organization," said Nicholas Bequelin, a researcher based in Hong Kong for Human Rights Watch, an advocacy group with headquarters in New York."China has for a long time conflated religious activities taking place outside of state control with extremism," said Mr. Bequelin, who closely follows developments in Xinjiang."There's been so many unsupported accusations by the Chinese government about extremist Islamic activities and terrorist activities in Xinjiang that it makes its difficult to have faith in these kinds of announcements, he said.Uighurs once formed the vast majority of people in Xinjiang, which came under the control of Chinese Communist forces in 1949. Over the last few decades, however, the number of Han Chinese residents has multiplied, aided by migration. Recent Chinese government estimates say Uighurs make up about 46 percent of Xinjiang's civilian population of 22 million, while Han Chinese account for 40 percent, and the remainder belong to other ethnic groups.Chinese government controls on the region and Islam have become a source of persistent tensions. Experts also say some Uighurs have been drawn to stricter currents of Islam, including among some the ideal of an independent homeland based on strict Muslim precepts.Xinjiang has come under increasingly pervasive security in recent years, especially since July 2009, when the regional capital, Urumqi, suffered the worst ethnic violence in China in many years as Uighurs attacked Han Chinese residents after a protest by Uighurs that was broken up by the police then spiraled into bloodshed. At least 197 people were killed, most of them Han, according to the Chinese government, and Uighur neighborhoods became the target of violent demonstrations and trashing by Han Chinese, as well as sweeping arrests by the police.Since then, Xinjiang has experienced sporadic flare-ups of protest and violence. But advocates of Uighur self-rule and human rights groups say the Chinese government has exaggerated the level of organization behind these incidents in an effort to discredit legitimate Uighur grievances.In Beijing this month, Zhang Chunxian, the Communist Party head of Xinjiang, told reporters at the annual meeting of the national Parliament that "although the situation remains tough, the overall stability in Xinjiang is improving and under control."The latest report said that some of the people convicted in Kashgar, in southwestern Xinjiang, used cellphones and videos to spread the militant ideas of the East Turkestan Islamic Movement and Islamic Movement of Uzbekistan — two groups accused by China and its Central Asian neighbors of fomenting separatism. Parts of Xinjiang border Pakistan, and a small and isolated patch adjoins Afghanistan.In one case in Kashgar, eight people formed a group that "organized training in terrorist capabilities, bought weapons, and planned to assassinate local law enforcement officers and police," engaged in illegal religious proselytizing, and collected money to send supporters abroad, the report said. It did not say how far advanced the plots were, or which country the followers intended to travel to. Two of the accused ringleaders were sentenced to life in prison.In another case in Kashgar, three people were accused of forming a group that committed similar crimes, and of beating people and smashing vehicles. The court in Bayingol, in northern Xinjiang, convicted one person of setting up an Internet chat room to "promote ethnic separatism, terrorist violence and religious extremism."Several government offices contacted in Xinjiang could not give the Uighur rendering of the names of the accused or other details, and nor did the offices or the report say whether they pleaded innocent or guilty or intended to appeal the sentences.China's party-run courts rarely find in favor of defendants, especially in politically sensitive cases.
HONG KONG — A decade after severe acute respiratory syndrome, or SARS, swept through Hong Kong and then around the world, the city is among the first to become worried about the emergence and spread of another, genetically related virus in the Middle East.Medical researchers emphasize that they do not know if the new virus will develop the same ability as SARS to spread from person to person. The World Health Organization is taking a cautious stance.The health organization announced Tuesday that the virus, known as a coronavirus, had killed 11 of the 17 people infected so far, including a man in Britain who fell ill after traveling to Saudi Arabia and Pakistan. The health organization asked member governments to report any new cases, but it stopped short of urging any special measures."W.H.O. does not advise special screening at points of entry with regard to this event, nor does it recommend that any travel or trade restrictions be applied," the agency said.But Hong Kong is already taking preventive measures. Without a single confirmed human case of the new virus in East Asia so far, the government of the autonomous Chinese territory has already begun alerting and training employees at hospitals, clinics and the airport to identify possible cases. Wide-ranging medical research is already under way.Senior government officials held an extensive exercise on Wednesday to simulate the oversight of the quarantine and treatment of patients and their associates if a single person infected with the new virus arrived at the Hong Kong airport and began spreading it. The Health Department announced that it would "stay vigilant and continue to work closely with the W.H.O. and other overseas health authorities to monitor the latest development of this novel infectious disease."No cases have been documented in the United States. In Europe, in addition to the death in Britain, a 73-year-old man died in Germany on Tuesday after being evacuated from the United Arab Emirates a week earlier.The Hong Kong government's measures reflect a continued preoccupation with public health — some say an obsession — that came about after nearly 1,800 people in Hong Kong became extremely ill with SARS in a few weeks during the spring of 2003, with 299 of them dying."At the moment, I think Hong Kong is likely to be the one with the strongest border control against this new virus for obvious historical reasons," said Dr. Yuen Kwok-yung, chairman of the infectious diseases section of the microbiology department at Hong Kong University.Some health experts in the West have been wary of drawing too much attention to the new virus, a coronavirus like SARS. They point out that as researchers have begun looking harder for coronaviruses after the SARS outbreak, they have found more of them.Much of the research has been done in Hong Kong, which became a leading center for disease research as a British colony before the handover to China in 1997; the bacteria that causes bubonic plague was discovered in Hong Kong in 1894. The World Health Organization has long sent samples from all over Asia to Hong Kong University for testing, and Dr. Yuen and his colleagues at the university played a central role in identifying the SARS virus in 2003 and then tracing its genetic similarities to a virus that infects wild bats.Hong Kong University researchers are now expressing growing concern about the new coronavirus that has emerged in the Middle East, known as novel coronavirus. Dr. Malik Peiris, a co-discoverer of SARS who is the director of the center for influenza research at Hong Kong University, warned in a speech on Tuesday that while SARS faded away after a year, with 8,445 cases and 790 deaths worldwide, two other coronaviruses had jumped from animals to people in the past two centuries and become endemic.Both of those coronaviruses cause common colds. One of the concerns about the novel coronavirus is that it seems deadlier, having killed more than half of the people with confirmed cases. A study published this week in The Journal of Infectious Diseases by Dr. Yuen and 12 colleagues in Hong Kong and mainland China found that the new virus also infects a wider range of human tissue types than the SARS virus and kills them more quickly.The new virus also infects cells from a variety of animals, including monkeys, rabbits and pigs, which could offer further opportunities for the new virus to develop greater transmissibility in people. The virus appears genetically close but not identical to viruses found in wild bats in Asia and in Europe.One big question is whether far more people are being infected without detection, in which case the disease may kill a lower percentage of victims but also be more transmissible. Dr. Yuen said that when 2,400 people were screened recently in Saudi Arabia for antibodies to the virus, none had them.That suggests that the virus is periodically infecting people from an unknown animal host, but it has not developed the ability to pass easily from person to person, he said. However, the man in Britain who fell ill with the virus after traveling to Saudi Arabia and Pakistan infected two members of his household in Britain before he died of the disease. And one of them, with a pre-existing health problem, has also died.The H5N1 avian influenza virus has been periodically jumping from birds to people and causing sporadic deaths for 16 years without developing sustained transmissibility among people. On the other hand, the SARS virus appears to have developed transmissibility after only a few months of sporadic infections of people in southern China in late 2002.For the new virus, "we may be at the 2002 situation at this time, and that would be very, very bad," Dr. Yuen said. "But this also may be like H5N1."
HONG KONG — The Hong Kong government said late Thursday, just before the start of a four-day Easter public holiday, that it had put on hold its plans to block public access to residential address information and the identity card numbers or passport numbers of company directors.The decision by the Financial Services and Treasury Bureau represents a sharp reversal of what had been portrayed by the government as an attempt to protect privacy.But the proposed policy drew criticism from bankers, corporate lawyers, accountants and journalists.They assailed the plan as a retreat from corporate transparency that would damage Hong Kong's position as a financial center and could facilitate money laundering and other criminal activity.Hong Kong makes it extremely easy to set up companies, so many individuals create them, even simply to own their residences. Extensive data are available only from the Companies Registry, which has long been open to the public, including online, although fees are charged for documents.Many wealthy mainland Chinese, including from prominent Communist Party families, own companies in Hong Kong and have provided personal information to the Companies Registry. Banks, law firms and accounting firms routinely check the registry and gather data on mainland Chinese citizens to verify identities and detect fraud in initial public offerings and other transactions.The Financial Services and Treasury Bureau said it would proceed this year with a long-planned rewrite of the city's Companies Ordinance, but the rewrite would not include the contested provision to limit public access."Given the complexity of the issues involved and very diverse views of different stakeholders, we believe that the community should be given more time to build consensus on the issue" of public access, the bureau said in a statement sent to the Foreign Correspondents' Club of Hong Kong, which was one of the groups that had protested the proposed curbs on public access.
HONG KONG — The Hong Kong government said late Thursday, just before the start of a four-day Easter public holiday, that it had put on hold its plans to block public access to residential address information and the identity card numbers or passport numbers of company directors.The decision by the Financial Services and Treasury Bureau represents a sharp reversal of what had been portrayed by the government as an attempt to protect privacy.But the proposed policy drew criticism from bankers, corporate lawyers, accountants and journalists.They assailed the plan as a retreat from corporate transparency that would damage Hong Kong's position as a financial center and could facilitate money laundering and other criminal activity.Hong Kong makes it extremely easy to set up companies, so many individuals create them, even simply to own their residences. Extensive data are available only from the Companies Registry, which has long been open to the public, including online, although fees are charged for documents.Many wealthy mainland Chinese, including from prominent Communist Party families, own companies in Hong Kong and have provided personal information to the Companies Registry. Banks, law firms and accounting firms routinely check the registry and gather data on mainland Chinese citizens to verify identities and detect fraud in initial public offerings and other transactions.The Financial Services and Treasury Bureau said it would proceed this year with a long-planned rewrite of the city's Companies Ordinance, but the rewrite would not include the contested provision to limit public access."Given the complexity of the issues involved and very diverse views of different stakeholders, we believe that the community should be given more time to build consensus on the issue" of public access, the bureau said in a statement sent to the Foreign Correspondents' Club of Hong Kong, which was one of the groups that had protested the proposed curbs on public access.
HONG KONG — The brother-in-law of Liu Xiaobo , China 's jailed Nobel Peace Prize winner, is likely to face trial soon on fraud charges that a lawyer for the family said on Friday lacked sufficient evidence and that supporters said appeared to be an effort to deter Mr. Liu's wife from defying house arrest.Mr. Liu was sentenced to 11 years in prison on subversion charges in late 2009 after helping to organize a petition that urged uprooting one-party rule through a sweeping democratic transformation. He won the Nobel Peace Prize in 2010, prompting vehement denunciations from China's Communist Party. Previously, he had been jailed for supporting the 1989 pro-democracy demonstrations.Since Mr. Liu won the prize, his wife, Liu Xia, a shave-headed artist and writer, has lived under house arrest in an apartment in western Beijing, herself becoming a symbol of China's shackles on dissent, and lately a test of whether the new party leader's vows to respect the law could extend to stopping extrajudicial detention of dissidents. Especially since December, Ms. Liu has attracted a trickle of visitors who have tried to outwit guards and police officers outside her apartment, sometimes successfully.But the arrest of Liu Xia's younger brother, Liu Hui, appears to be intended to intimidate her and her family and supporters, said Hu Jia, a well-known human rights activist in Beijing, who briefly visited Ms. Liu late last year and has tried several times to see her again."Liu Xia has felt under massive pressure," Mr. Hu said. "When I contacted her, she said, 'I'll soon go mad,' and I think one important reason she feels this way is because of her younger brother's arrest, that she sees a cause-and-effect relationship." He recounted a hurried exchange with her in February, when she spoke from her apartment window."One point that is very clear is that they may be using her younger brother to put pressure on her," Mr. Hu said, adding that he did not understand the specific allegations against the brother.The Associated Press first reported the indictment of Liu Hui. The case involves a complex dispute with a company he once worked for, which accused him and a colleague of taking three million renminbi ($483,000), said one of the brother's two lawyers, Mo Shaoping, whose firm also defended Liu Xiaobo.Liu Hui was first arrested last year, released on bail and rearrested in late January, Mr. Mo said. Ms. Liu was briefly visited by Associated Press reporters in December and later that month by Mr. Hu and four other Chinese rights advocates. Asked about a possible link between the indictment and the visits, Mr. Mo said, "It's up to others to make their own analysis."He added: "We believe that the evidence is insufficient to justify the charges, and that this should be dealt with as a civil dispute. Liu Hui has denied doing anything wrong."If Liu Hui is found guilty, he could be imprisoned for 10 years or longer, said Shang Baojun, his other lawyer. Mr. Shang said the lawyers received the indictment from prosecutors in Huairou, a northern district of Beijing, on March 18. "There's been no notification of a trial date yet," Mr. Mo added. "I expect it will be within a month or so."Phone calls to the prosecutor's office in Huairou were not answered on Friday evening.China's judiciary is under firm party control, and rarely finds defendants innocent. The artist Ai Weiwei has maintained that his arrest on tax evasion charges in 2011 was political vengeance for his raucous challenges to party controls.On March 8, an activist from Hong Kong tried to visit Ms. Liu and was briefly detained by the police, while two Hong Kong news cameramen who tried to record the event were beaten up, prompting widespread criticism in the Hong Kong news media of the Beijing authorities' actions."They have become much tougher about keeping people from visiting her," said Mr. Hu, the rights advocate. "There are more police there now, not just guards. She's been warned not to respond to any visits by going to her window or even turning on a light — nothing to give people any encouragement."
BEIJING — The cost of environmental degradation in China was about $230 billion in 2010, or 3.5 percent of the nation's gross domestic product — three times that in 2004, in local currency terms, an official Chinese news report said this week.The statistic came from a study by the Chinese Academy of Environmental Planning, which is part of the Ministry of Environmental Protection.The figure of $230 billion, or 1.54 trillion renminbi, is based on costs arising from pollution and damage to the ecosystem, the price that China is paying for its rapid industrialization."This cuts to the heart of China's economic challenge: how to transform from the explosive growth of the past 30 years to the sustainable growth of the next 30 years," said Alistair Thornton, a China economist at the research firm IHS Global Insight. "Digging a hole and filling it back in again gives you G.D.P. growth. It doesn't give you economic value. A lot of the activity in China over the last few years has been digging holes to fill them back in again — anything from bailing out failing solar companies to ignoring the 'externalities' of economic growth."And the costs could be even higher than the ministry's estimate, he said. The $230 billion figure is incomplete because the researchers did not have a full set of data. Making such calculations is "notoriously difficult," Mr. Thornton said.The 2010 figure was reported on Monday by a newspaper associated with the ministry, and so far only partial results of the study are available. In 2006, the ministry began releasing an estimate of the cost of environmental degradation. The ministry has issued statistics only intermittently, though its original goal was to do the calculation — what it called "green G.D.P." — annually.The rapidly eroding environment across the country has become an issue of paramount concern to many Chinese. In January, outrage boiled over as air pollution in north China reached record levels, well beyond what Western environmental agencies consider hazardous. The public fury forced propaganda officials to allow official Chinese news organizations to report more candidly on the pollution.Chinese state-owned enterprises in the oil and power industries have consistently blocked efforts by pro-environment government officials to impose policies that would alleviate the pollution.There have also been constant concerns over water and soil pollution. The discovery of at least 16,000 dead pigs in rivers that supply drinking water to Shanghai has ignited alarm there. This week, China Central Television reported that farmers in a village in Henan Province were using wastewater from a paper mill to grow wheat. But one farmer said they would not dare to eat the wheat themselves. It is sold outside the village, perhaps ending up in cities, while the farmers grow their own wheat with well water.The Beijing government on Thursday released details of a three-year plan that is aimed at curbing various forms of pollution, according to a report on Friday in China Daily, an official English-language newspaper. The report quoted Wang Anshun, Beijing's mayor, as saying that sewage treatment, garbage incineration and forestry development would cost at least $16 billion.In 2006, the environmental ministry said the cost of environmental degradation in 2004 was more than $62 billion, or 3.05 percent of G.D.P. In 2010, it released partial results for 2008 that totaled about $185 billion, or 3.9 percent of G.D.P. Several foreign scholars have criticized the methods by which Chinese researchers have reached those numbers, saying some crucial measures of environmental degradation are not included in the calculations.There is consensus now that China's decades of double-digit economic growth exacted an enormous environmental cost. But growth remains the priority; the Communist Party's legitimacy is based largely on rapidly expanding the economy, and China officially estimates that its G.D.P., which was $8.3 trillion in 2012, will grow at a rate of 7.5 percent this year and at an average of 7 percent in the five-year plan that runs to 2015. A Deutsche Bank report released last month said the current growth policies would lead to a continuing steep decline of the environment for the next decade, especially given the expected coal consumption and boom in automobile sales.
BEIJING (AP) — Rescuers in Tibet digging for victims of a huge landslide at a gold mining site found one body on Saturday, a day after 83 workers were buried in the disaster, Chinese state news media reported. The fate of the other victims was unknown.The workers were buried early Friday when about 2.6 million cubic yards of mud, rock and debris swept through the mine in Gyama, a village in Maizhokunggar County, about 45 miles east of Lhasa, the capital of Tibet, and covered an area measuring around 1.5 square miles.More than 3,000 rescuers with sniffer dogs and excavators were scouring the high-altitude, mountainous area on Saturday, but search efforts were slowed after snow started to fall early in the afternoon, the official Xinhua News Agency said.Xinhua said the body was retrieved at 5:35 p.m., nearly 36 hours after the landslide slammed through the area.The disaster has highlighted the extensive mining activities on the Tibetan plateau and prompted questions about whether they have been excessive and are destroying the region's fragile ecosystem. Criticisms, however, only flashed through China's social media on Saturday before they were scrubbed off or blocked from public view by censors.Officials in Beijing said the cause of the disaster had yet to be fully investigated.A Tibetan writer, Tsering Woeser, who has been following the development of mining projects in Gyama and surrounding areas since 2007, said that China's powerful, resource-hungry state-owned companies had ravaged the landscape."Unchecked mining has polluted water, sickened animals and humans, dislocated herdsmen and now caused a massive mudslide," she wrote on her blog.The Chinese government has been encouraging the development of mining and other industries in Tibet to promote its economic growth and raise living standards. The region has abundant deposits of precious minerals and metals, yet Tibet remains among China's poorest areas despite its production of a large share of the county's minerals.
SHANGHAI — In an effort to cool the resurgent property market, two of China 's biggest cities announced over the weekend that they would put in place a series of new restrictions and penalties on housing sales.In the nation's capital, the Beijing municipal government said that unmarried individuals would now be allowed to purchase only one residence. The city also increased the minimum down payment for buyers of a second home and imposed a 20 percent capital gains tax on owners' selling a residence.In Shanghai, an identical capital gains tax was announced and took immediate effect, and city officials pledged to install and enforce other measures aimed at stabilizing housing prices. The stiffer capital gains taxes take the place of a 1 percent to 2 percent transaction tax that was previously assessed on the final price of the property being sold.The announcements came weeks after China's State Council, or cabinet, said the government would take stronger action to ensure that property prices do not continue to soar, fueling what many analysts believe is a real estate bubble that could seriously damage the economy and exacerbate social tensions between the rich and the poor.Property prices in China have been rising sharply in the last year, with housing prices in many big cities up an average of 3.1 percent in February, according to a government survey. In many cities, the cost of buying a new home has doubled in the last five years.In a country where investment options can be limited, property is considered a good store of value.Michael Pettis, who teaches finance at Peking University and is a senior associate at the Carnegie Endowment for International Peace, said China was facing challenges that many other emerging markets were struggling with: It is awash in too much cash and credit."China has a liquidity problem, and so it's not clear to me changing the tax structure or fiddling around the edges addresses the real problem," Mr. Pettis said. "Raising interest rates would be the single biggest thing they could do. But they also need to stop credit and monetary growth."Some of the new measures detailed Saturday had been anticipated after the State Council's announcement in early March. The threat of tougher rules had set off a nationwide rush to sell properties before city governments detailed the specific measures they would take, as well as their starting dates.Shanghai and other big cities had even seen a surge in the number of divorce filings at marriage bureaus, with many couples openly admitting that they were filing for divorce simply to get around property rules and that they would later remarry.It was clear in the announcements that the city governments were trying to close that loophole.China's state-run news media also said over the weekend that the central government was planning to introduce a unified national property registration system by the end of 2014, which could eventually make it possible to impose an annual property tax on households — yet another way the authorities expect to fight housing speculation and fend off bubbles.Although Chinese cities do not impose annual taxes on holding residential properties, the government has rolled out detailed measures virtually every year for the past decade in an effort to penalize speculation in the housing market.The efforts have often been effective at temporarily holding down prices, but the market usually roars back as investors, homeowners — and even banks and property agents — identify loopholes in the restrictions, analysts say.Because China's booming economy is tied so closely to the property market — and because the property market is a major source of income for banks, which issue mortgages, and local governments, which profit from land sales — any strong government measures to rein in the sector have the potential to affect the larger economy.In Shanghai, a city of about 22 million, banks are no longer allowed to offer loans to residents buying a third home; those seeking a second mortgage are now expected to make larger down payments and to pay higher mortgage rates. Shanghai officials also said they would make it tougher for foreigners, people from other cities in China and divorced individuals to buy homes, a clear hint that they intended to counter attempts by local residents to seek divorces in order to circumvent some restrictions.The authorities in Beijing and Shanghai also promised to build more moderately priced residences. This year, Beijing said it planned to build 70,000 units of such housing; Shanghai said it expected to build 10,000 units."The central government is feeling the heat and not just for social reasons," Joe Zhou, a property analyst at Société Générale, said in a report released last week. He said a push by Prime Minister Li Keqiang, who took office in March, to promote urbanization as a new key growth driver "only adds to the urgency to cap property prices, as the strategy implicitly requires housing prices to be within the reach of future migrants whose purchasing power is likely to be more limited than those who have already earned their way into the urban area."
BEIJING — Twenty minutes' drive from Shanghai's glitzy financial district, dozens of migrant workers are preparing to abandon homes in old shipping containers, as one of the more unusual solutions to the housing shortage in China faces the wrecking ball.Cheap but crowded neighborhoods are being cleared across China as part of a stepped-up urbanization campaign by the country's new leaders. China aims to spend an estimated 40 trillion renminbi, or $6 trillion, on infrastructure, including housing, as a projected 400 million people become urban residents over the next decade.But the clearance of so-called villages within cities removes cheap housing stock for the very people chosen to fuel that migration without providing sufficient replacement units. The land is sold by municipalities to developers who generally erect expensive apartments.That throws into question how the government can achieve its ambitious goal."On the one hand, the law doesn't allow former farmers to expand housing for migrant workers; on the other hand, local governments don't have the money to build affordable housing either," said Li Ping, senior attorney for Landesa Rural Development Institute in Beijing.About 130 million Chinese migrants live in tiny, subdivided rooms rented out by former farmers whose villages have been surrounded by sprawl, according to government surveys.Policies to provide government-built housing while razing these villages within cities result in a net loss of housing units, according to urban planners and academics, while choking off the private rental market that for decades has enabled China's massive urban migration.The dilemma poses harsh choices for those who have made lives in the cities on the slimmest of margins, like the migrants in the converted shipping containers in Shanghai."They can't just come and ask me to move. I have so many products here that I sell. So much stuff worth at least tens of thousands of yuan," said Li Yanxin, a migrant from nearby Anhui Province who runs a small convenience store out of his container. His profits — and therefore his ability to pay for his teenager's education — depend on the low rent he found in the container village.Local officials put muscle behind a policy of clearing such sites, often declaring these dwellings illegal by noting nonagricultural land allocated to villagers cannot be used for commercial purposes. Land reclassified as "urban" can be sold at a huge profit."Not everyone can live in a high rise. Especially those of us who work in the recycling business," said Zhang Baofa, who rents out used shipping containers. "This is zoned as village land. I borrowed the land. I bought the containers. I rented it out. I would know if it were illegal," Mr. Zhang said.Local officials, embarrassed by photos of the container village circulating on the Internet, have vowed to remove the site within days. On Thursday, after four years of operation, they declared Mr. Li's store to be unregistered.Chinese cities lack the visible slums of other developing countries, thanks in part to communities like Xinzhuang in Beijing that collectively house about 3.4 million migrants just within the capital.A high, whitewashed wall and strip of green lawn hide Xinzhuang's 10,000 residents from surrounding luxury apartment blocks. Three black chickens scratch along a filthy gutter of blue-grey water next to the public latrine. Rooms of about 12 square meters, or 130 square feet, each house families of three, for 500 renminbi a month."A regular apartment would be more comfortable, but it's about 2,000 renminbi a month. That's too much for the type of people who live here. They want to save what they can. We fill the lowest niche," said the landlord Dong Gang, whose former farmhouse is now a two-story concrete structure divided into about 30 makeshift rooms.
SHANGHAI — In an effort to cool the resurgent property market, two of China 's biggest cities announced over the weekend that they would put in place a series of new restrictions and penalties on housing sales.In the nation's capital, the Beijing municipal government said that unmarried individuals would now be allowed to purchase only one residence. The city also increased the minimum down payment for buyers of a second home and imposed a 20 percent capital gains tax on owners' selling a residence.In Shanghai, an identical capital gains tax was announced and took immediate effect, and city officials pledged to install and enforce other measures aimed at stabilizing housing prices. The stiffer capital gains taxes take the place of a 1 percent to 2 percent transaction tax that was previously assessed on the final price of the property being sold.The announcements came weeks after China's State Council, or cabinet, said the government would take stronger action to ensure that property prices do not continue to soar, fueling what many analysts believe is a real estate bubble that could seriously damage the economy and exacerbate social tensions between the rich and the poor.Property prices in China have been rising sharply in the last year, with housing prices in many big cities up an average of 3.1 percent in February, according to a government survey. In many cities, the cost of buying a new home has doubled in the last five years.In a country where investment options can be limited, property is considered a good store of value.Michael Pettis, who teaches finance at Peking University and is a senior associate at the Carnegie Endowment for International Peace, said China was facing challenges that many other emerging markets were struggling with: It is awash in too much cash and credit."China has a liquidity problem, and so it's not clear to me changing the tax structure or fiddling around the edges addresses the real problem," Mr. Pettis said. "Raising interest rates would be the single biggest thing they could do. But they also need to stop credit and monetary growth."Some of the new measures detailed Saturday had been anticipated after the State Council's announcement in early March. The threat of tougher rules had set off a nationwide rush to sell properties before city governments detailed the specific measures they would take, as well as their starting dates.Shanghai and other big cities had even seen a surge in the number of divorce filings at marriage bureaus, with many couples openly admitting that they were filing for divorce simply to get around property rules and that they would later remarry.It was clear in the announcements that the city governments were trying to close that loophole.China's state-run news media also said over the weekend that the central government was planning to introduce a unified national property registration system by the end of 2014, which could eventually make it possible to impose an annual property tax on households — yet another way the authorities expect to fight housing speculation and fend off bubbles.Although Chinese cities do not impose annual taxes on holding residential properties, the government has rolled out detailed measures virtually every year for the past decade in an effort to penalize speculation in the housing market.The efforts have often been effective at temporarily holding down prices, but the market usually roars back as investors, homeowners — and even banks and property agents — identify loopholes in the restrictions, analysts say.Because China's booming economy is tied so closely to the property market — and because the property market is a major source of income for banks, which issue mortgages, and local governments, which profit from land sales — any strong government measures to rein in the sector have the potential to affect the larger economy.In Shanghai, a city of about 22 million, banks are no longer allowed to offer loans to residents buying a third home; those seeking a second mortgage are now expected to make larger down payments and to pay higher mortgage rates. Shanghai officials also said they would make it tougher for foreigners, people from other cities in China and divorced individuals to buy homes, a clear hint that they intended to counter attempts by local residents to seek divorces in order to circumvent some restrictions.The authorities in Beijing and Shanghai also promised to build more moderately priced residences. This year, Beijing said it planned to build 70,000 units of such housing; Shanghai said it expected to build 10,000 units."The central government is feeling the heat and not just for social reasons," Joe Zhou, a property analyst at Société Générale, said in a report released last week. He said a push by Prime Minister Li Keqiang, who took office in March, to promote urbanization as a new key growth driver "only adds to the urgency to cap property prices, as the strategy implicitly requires housing prices to be within the reach of future migrants whose purchasing power is likely to be more limited than those who have already earned their way into the urban area."
SHANGHAI — China said Tuesday that four more people in the coastal part of the country had been infected with a new strain of bird flu , which is believed to have killed two Shanghai residents last month and left one person in critical condition.The four new patients, ages 32 to 83, are hospitalized and critically ill, according to a government Web site that cited the authorities in the city of Nanjing, in Jiangsu Province northwest of Shanghai. The officials said laboratory tests had confirmed that all four were infected with a strain of bird flu identified as H7N9, which was not found in humans before the Shanghai cases.The cases are troubling because there is no vaccine for the H7N9 strain and because another strain of bird flu, identified as H5N1, killed hundreds of people in Asia beginning in 2003.The World Health Organization says that most H5N1 cases had involved contact with infected poultry. One of the four people in Nanjing infected with the H7N9 virus is a poultry butcher. Health authorities had previously reported that H7N9 could not easily be contracted by humans, and officials said that no one who had contact with the four infected patients had developed symptoms.The government said Monday in Shanghai that no link was found between the bird flu virus and the 15,000 dead pigs found recently in the Huangpu River.
HONG KONG — There are all sorts of reasons for the Hong Kong stock market to have the jitters these days. The Chinese economy remains wobbly. North Korea is threatening nuclear war. And perhaps most worrisome this week, a leading Hong Kong actor has a new movie coming out.Hong Kong investors call it the Ting Hai effect: When the actor Adam Cheng has a new television show or a new movie, the Hang Seng index often takes a dramatic turn for the worse. And in a city where superstitions can guide daily routines, the financial sector is worried.Mr. Cheng's new movie, "Saving General Yang," has its debut in theaters Wednesday, and investors in the Hong Kong market, which has been generally buoyant of late, are on guard, while acknowledging that it is unlikely that a movie opening could drive a major market index."Of course, investors need to be wary to an extent," said Thomas Wong, a Hong Kong banker. "That is part of the job, but they shouldn't let a movie decide whether the stock market will do well or not. That is not how the market works. People may talk about it, but they are not going to take it seriously."The Ting Hai effect has its roots in the 1992 debut of a television series called "The Greed of Man," which turned a critical eye on members of the city's investment community and their supposed shady doings, with Mr. Cheng in the role of Ting Hai, who made it rich selling derivatives during a bear market. As the first episode was being broadcast, the Hang Seng dropped an alarming 13 percent at one point.Investor concerns about his acting appearances were reinforced two years later when the market took a drop of nearly 14 percent with the debut of his television series "Instinct."The unpredictability of financial markets has long fed superstitions about stock market behavior. One school of thought suggests that market downturns coincide with the construction of the world's tallest building: Think the Empire State Building in New York in 1931; the Sears Tower in Chicago in 1974; and the Petronas Twin Towers in Kuala Lumpur in 1998. And until recent years, there was a notable correlation between bear markets and victories by teams from the American Football Conference in the Super Bowl.In Mr. Cheng's case, the Hang Seng declined in early trading Wednesday, bucking earlier jumps in the New York and Tokyo markets hours before the movie was to open. ("Saving General Yang" has the actor in the lead role of a drama about a general in the pre-derivatives Song Dynasty 1,100 years ago.)"Hong Kong investors can be very superstitious," Francis Cheung, an analyst at the brokerage firm CLSA, wrote about the Ting Hai phenomenon. "And Adam Cheng is a very well-known actor with a large following."Investors spooked by superstitions already have reason to worry. This is the Year of the Snake, and four of the past five snake years, beginning with 1953, produced down markets, according to the financial services group CLSA, which publishes a tongue-in-cheek "Feng Shui Index."Snakes are skin shedders, whose years are associated with major transformations and change, like the Tiananmen Square crackdown, bombing of Pearl Harbor and the onset of the Great Depression.A CLSA report on the Ting Hai effect — again, tongue in cheek — found that the more tragic the story line in an Adam Cheng movie, the worse the impact for the market. While the details of the plot of "Saving General Yang" have not been revealed, in history, the general met a bad fate — dying of starvation after being captured in battle.
HONG KONG — There are all sorts of reasons for the Hong Kong stock market to have the jitters these days. The Chinese economy remains wobbly. North Korea is threatening nuclear war. And perhaps most worrisome this week, a leading Hong Kong actor has a new movie coming out.Hong Kong investors call it the Ting Hai effect: When the actor Adam Cheng has a new television show or a new movie, the Hang Seng index often takes a dramatic turn for the worse. And in a city where superstitions can guide daily routines, the financial sector is worried.Mr. Cheng's new movie, "Saving General Yang," has its debut in theaters Wednesday, and investors in the Hong Kong market, which has been generally buoyant of late, are on guard, while acknowledging that it is unlikely that a movie opening could drive a major market index."Of course, investors need to be wary to an extent," said Thomas Wong, a Hong Kong banker. "That is part of the job, but they shouldn't let a movie decide whether the stock market will do well or not. That is not how the market works. People may talk about it, but they are not going to take it seriously."The Ting Hai effect has its roots in the 1992 debut of a television series called "The Greed of Man," which turned a critical eye on members of the city's investment community and their supposed shady doings, with Mr. Cheng in the role of Ting Hai, who made it rich selling derivatives during a bear market. As the first episode was being broadcast, the Hang Seng dropped an alarming 13 percent at one point.Investor concerns about his acting appearances were reinforced two years later when the market took a drop of nearly 14 percent with the debut of his television series "Instinct."The unpredictability of financial markets has long fed superstitions about stock market behavior. One school of thought suggests that market downturns coincide with the construction of the world's tallest building: Think the Empire State Building in New York in 1931; the Sears Tower in Chicago in 1974; and the Petronas Twin Towers in Kuala Lumpur in 1998. And until recent years, there was a notable correlation between bear markets and victories by teams from the American Football Conference in the Super Bowl.In Mr. Cheng's case, the Hang Seng declined in early trading Wednesday, bucking earlier jumps in the New York and Tokyo markets hours before the movie was to open. ("Saving General Yang" has the actor in the lead role of a drama about a general in the pre-derivatives Song Dynasty 1,100 years ago.)"Hong Kong investors can be very superstitious," Francis Cheung, an analyst at the brokerage firm CLSA, wrote about the Ting Hai phenomenon. "And Adam Cheng is a very well-known actor with a large following."Investors spooked by superstitions already have reason to worry. This is the Year of the Snake, and four of the past five snake years, beginning with 1953, produced down markets, according to the financial services group CLSA, which publishes a tongue-in-cheek "Feng Shui Index."Snakes are skin shedders, whose years are associated with major transformations and change, like the Tiananmen Square crackdown, bombing of Pearl Harbor and the onset of the Great Depression.A CLSA report on the Ting Hai effect — again, tongue in cheek — found that the more tragic the story line in an Adam Cheng movie, the worse the impact for the market. While the details of the plot of "Saving General Yang" have not been revealed, in history, the general met a bad fate — dying of starvation after being captured in battle.
SHANGHAI — For those frustrated with air travel in the United States, arriving at this city's domestic airport can be a treat.New arrivals are whisked on electronic walkways through a bright, spacious airport terminal that features elegant lounges, free Wi-Fi, speedy security checks and an efficient baggage handling system.This is what the best airports now look like in the world's second-largest economy.Three years after it opened, Terminal 2 at Hongqiao International Airport in Shanghai stands as a testament to China's economic ambitions, and to its unique approach to infrastructure development.With extraordinary government support, Shanghai built a massive airport terminal in 32 months as part of a $9 billion transportation hub that connects the air terminal with the city's buses, subway platforms and a new high-speed railway network."They know how to build things and how to do it efficiently," said Jeffrey N. Thomas, chief executive of Landrum & Brown, an American firm that helped design the new Shanghai terminal. "That area went from plans on a piece of paper to a complex that has 14 million square feet in less than four years. That's hard to do."At a time when many American airports are falling into disrepair, China is quickening its air travel development, with plans to build nearly 100 more airports by 2015, including some at high altitudes, where special landing gear is required. Many of those airports are expected to lose money, but that hasn't deterred the government, which views the expansion of infrastructure as vital to economic development.China's big-city airports are already colossal. Last year, Beijing Capital International Airport handled 81 million passengers, up from 27 million in 2002.This year, it could surpass Atlanta's Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport to become the world's busiest.In Shanghai, Pudong Airport — which operates 25 miles east of Hongqiao as the city's international gateway — has so many flights it plans to add a fourth and fifth runway, something few other airports in the world possess.The quality and speed with which China builds its big city airports is impressive. But whether China holds any lessons for airport development in America, or Europe for that matter, is unclear, analysts say.China's building programs are supported by an authoritarian political system that brooks no challenges. When the government decides to build or expand an airport, there are no public hearings or any public protests of note.And while economists ponder the long-term consequences of that decision-making process, this country's leaders push ahead with new megaprojects."There's a pro-investment bias here, partly because the country still has so much surplus labor, which makes it a lot cheaper to build," said Louis Kuijs, an economist at the Royal Bank of Scotland based in Hong Kong. "And this is a country that knows how to build. Look at the Great Wall!"Terminal 2 at Hongqiao Airport is one of those "this could only happen in China" developments. With Terminal 1 congested, the city announced plans in 2006 for a new transportation hub to cover 10 square miles, a project that when complete is likely to be the world's largest transit hub with about 1.1 million passengers a day.To build it, the city cleared 10,000 residents from a huge plot of land west of Hongqiao by building new apartments for them a few miles away. Because the state owns all land in China, and residents have little bargaining power, local governments and developers often benefit from lower development costs.And in the case of the transportation hub, once the land was cleared, state-run banks lined up to lend money to the project."The relocation and acquiring of land this size, only China can do it," said Cao Longjin, general manager of Shanghai Rainbow Investments, a state-run company that helped develop the hub. "It's a miracle."When China went on an earlier airport-building spree in the 1980s and early 1990s, things didn't go quite so smoothly. The airports tended to be poorly designed and minimally functional, and usually lost money.
BEIJING — Somewhere in the next world, the spirit of Zhao Wen's brother has struck it rich.On Wednesday night, the eve of the annual "tomb sweeping" festival known as Qingming, Ms. Zhao, 51, set alight wads of fake Chinese renminbi and American dollars in a street just off a major thoroughfare here in the capital. She also burned ceremonial checks, which her brother could deposit in heaven's bank. In case he got bored with the immortal realm, she had thrown in a passport for easy interdimensional travel."This saves me a lot of trouble," she said, poking at the flames with a stick. "They probably have the same system as we have on Earth, so now he can buy whatever he wants."Qingming, which was observed on Thursday, is an age-old festival in which the living pay respect to their dearly departed ancestors — and in-laws — by tidying graves and burning paper offerings so that the spirits can afford the good afterlife.Banned by the victorious Communist Party in 1949 for its feudal links, Qingming has had a resurgence in recent years. Since the festival was officially reinstated by the mainland government as a public holiday in 2008, the masses have flocked to their relatives' graves to sweep away debris and leave behind the deceased's temporal favorites, like oranges, cigarettes and beer.Regardless of whether the living believe the dead actually enjoy such tokens, Qingming has become a prime opportunity to celebrate filial piety, the Confucian value that is deeply embedded in the DNA of Chinese society. According to the Ministry of Civil Affairs, more than 520 million people visited cemeteries during the festival last year, up from 420 million in 2011.In the days leading up to Qingming this year, Beijingers appeared at cemeteries carrying brooms and gifts like flowers and snacks. Last Saturday alone, 133,000 people visited the city's 20 public cemeteries, some of which drew nearly double the attendance from a year earlier, according to the Beijing municipal government.For the living, Qingming stirs up an anxiety that goes beyond the question of what happens after death. According to a government report issued this week, China is expected to run out of burial space in the coming decade. The shortage comes at a time when there are already more than 181 million people older than 60, leading many to worry just where their remains will be interred.The crisis has spurred a growing black market, particularly in large cities. In 2010, for example, about 31 percent of ashes were buried in legal Beijing cemeteries; in the southeastern city of Guangzhou, the number was 6 percent, according to a funeral industry report. Illegal cemeteries are cheaper.High demand and limited space have made the cost of a final resting place soar. At the well-tended Tianshouyuan Cemetery in Beijing, an idyllic spot on the outskirts of the city that is famous for its feng shui, grave plots for ashes sell for as much as $46,000 per square meter.While the Babaoshan People's Cemetery to the south is completely full, those looking for an alternative can store their relatives' cremated remains at the nearby Laoshan Ashes Hall in a small locker for as much as $140 annually for three years.The market forces pervading those hallowed grounds are tolerated but not welcomed. "Burial plots are absurdly expensive nowadays," said a retired public servant leaving the hall last Sunday. "We can afford to spend tens of thousands on a plot, but why? Looking after your elders while they're alive is what's important."Wanan Cemetery, an hour's drive from central Beijing, is a tranquil testament to China's contemporary prosperity. Gleaming marble tombs adorned with floral bouquets, bottles of rice wine and pastries stretch out in rows under pine trees. All is quiet except for the occasional bird song. But amid the expensive displays of filial devotion lie remnants of a past the Communist Party has tried to hide: broken tombstones that were destroyed by Mao's Red Guards in the 1960s, during the Cultural Revolution, are covered in lichen.Qingming is a rare occasion when the ghosts of that terrible era cannot be ignored. As he repaired the cracks on his mother's grave, a 75-year-old retired professor who would give only his surname, Yue, because the Cultural Revolution remains politically delicate, grimaced at the memory. "I could see those rogues breaking gravestones, but I couldn't stop them," he said.
BEIJING — China 's new leader, Xi Jinping , remains something of a mystery, but he has made one element of his agenda abundantly clear: The government will no longer tolerate the rampant corruption that he says is threatening the Communist Party's grip on power.But President Xi's apparent war on graft has limits, at least judging by the detention on Sunday of four activists after they unfurled banners in central Beijing expressing support for the party's self-described war on official malfeasance."Unless we put an end to corrupt officials, the China Dream will remain a daydream," said one of the banners, in a pointed reference to Mr. Xi's pledge to revitalize the nation through more equitable economic growth, a strong military and increased government transparency. Those are main elements of his so-called Chinese dream.Another banner called for officials to disclose their assets publicly, a proposal that has met resistance from powerful interests within the party. The activists also demanded that officials reveal whether they secretly hold foreign passports, an increasingly common practice that in recent years has helped thousands of corrupt civil servants escape Chinese justice by fleeing abroad with their ill-gotten loot.The short-lived demonstration at a public plaza not far from China's leadership compound was promptly, and roughly, broken up by the police as a small crowd listened to a speech by one of the protesters. By Thursday evening, the three men and one woman were still being held on criminal charges of illegal assembly, according to their lawyers, charges that carry a penalty of up to five years in prison.Ma Gangquan, one of the lawyers, said the activists were dumbfounded by their treatment."Our leaders are the ones who came up with the 'China Dream' slogan, vowing to rule by law and to fight corruption," said Mr. Ma, who represents Ma Xinli, 47, an employee in the logistics department of a Beijing bus company. "Their goal was simply to make his cause their own."Another lawyer, Ding Xikui, complained that the police bloodied the face of his client, Hou Xin, as they dragged her away.Although it is unlikely that Mr. Xi and other top leaders were aware of the protest, rights advocates say the detentions, coupled with the recent harassment of other people fighting corruption, are a worrying sign that the leadership is determined to constrain any populist campaigning on an issue central to the president's agenda.A petition calling for senior leaders to disclose their wealth publicly has been largely scrubbed from the Internet in China, and a number of citizen activists across the country have been detained in recent weeks for trying to collect signatures or for staging similar demonstrations against graft.Last month, two activists were held in a secret "black jail" here in Beijing for more than a week, rights advocates say.Despite Mr. Xi's vow to take down "tigers and flies" in his crusade against cronyism and self-dealing, Nicholas Bequelin, a senior researcher at Human Rights Watch in Hong Kong, said the recent detentions suggested a lack of resolve among top leaders.Even if the party is wary of public protests, Mr. Bequelin said, previous leaders had harnessed popular sentiment to promote agendas that faced resistance from powerful interests."If society is kept in shackles, there is little chance of overcoming the status quo within the party," he said, noting how a previous leader, Deng Xiaoping, enlisted public support in the early 1990s to overcome conservative opposition to his economic reforms.So far, much of Mr. Xi's campaign against corruption has focused on extravagance and waste among government employees.The austerity measures he announced late last year, which include a ban on frivolous overseas travel and taxpayer-financed banquets, have chastened the nation's formerly free-spending bureaucrats.Ordinary Chinese have been heartened by the results, but many are still awaiting further signs that Mr. Xi is determined to stamp out the culture of kickbacks and bribery that have enriched countless party members."When officials see citizens arrested for calling for a law that would require officials to disclose their assets, it doesn't exactly send the message that the party is serious about fighting corruption," Mr. Bequelin said.
In his 2008 Masters address, the Augusta National chairman Billy Payne introduced a program that allowed children ages 8 to 16 free admission to the tournament when accompanied by a ticketed patron. Five years later, a 14-year-old will experience the Masters from inside the ropes as one of the 94 competitors, the beneficiary of another grand plan conceived by the club in 2008 to help the sport grow: the creation of the competition that became the Asia-Pacific Amateur Championship.Guan Tianlang of China, the event's reigning champion, will bring his budding game to Augusta National for the first men's major this week. The vision set forth by Augusta National in concert with the Royal and Ancient to pursue, in Payne's words, "the development of amateur golf for the purpose of creating heroes and legends among the representative countries and establishing role models who attract other kids to the game," has, in Guan, its embodiment.An eighth grader built like a bamboo stalk, Guan will be the seventh Chinese player to tee it up in the Masters and easily the most precocious. He is the youngest participant in the tournament's 77-year history, his presence portending the men's game's Asia craze. The pipeline of talent includes Ye Wocheng, who qualified for this year's China Open on the European Tour at age 12, surpassing the record set by Guan, who was 13 when he competed in the event last year.Also in the mix are Andy Zhang of China, who qualified for last year's United States Open at age 14; Miguel Tabuena, 18, of the Philippines, a rising star on the Asian Tour; and Hideki Matsuyama, 21, a two-time winner of the Asia-Pacific and a winner on the Japan Tour who is scheduled to make his professional debut this month in his native Japan.Inspired by Tiger Woods, a four-time Masters champion who is part Thai, and spurred by golf's inclusion in the Olympics starting in 2016, young men in Asia are taking to the game. Nan Qiong, who reports on golf for Sports Illustrated China, said golf's inclusion in the Olympics led China's General Administration of Sport to identify a pool of potential participants. "And more provincial authorities are attaching greater importance to this sport," she said.Ian Poulter, the English Ryder Cup star who beat out the likes of Ernie Els and Phil Mickelson to win a World Golf Championships event in China last November, said: "We get to spend a bit of time with a lot of the juniors that are coming through from their junior programs and we see it. We've seen it already in the last couple of years, and we continue to see that there's more and more that swing it fantastic. Their work ethic is incredible."They work very, very hard, and they're being fine-tuned to play golf. I'm not sure if it's for the Olympics or what they're playing for, but there are lots of them and they're working very hard. So if I do my math, I think it's only a couple of years away before we see someone very special."The women's game already has a constellation of Asian stars. Led by Se Ri Pak, a five-time major winner, 38 South Koreans earned their L.P.G.A. Tour playing privileges in 2013. Last year, Shanshan Feng, 23, became the first golfer from China to win a major, at the L.P.G.A. Championship, and in recent years, Yani Tseng of Taiwain and Ai Miyazato of Japan have held the No. 1 ranking.Feng is from the same hometown, Guangzhou, as Guan, who was introduced to the game by his father, Guan Han Wen, at age 4. Over the years, she said, she has seen quite a bit of him on the practice range."I could always tell he was really talented," Feng said. "He has a very nice swing, he hits the ball very well, he has a very good short game."Guan does not yet possess the strength to drive the ball far. He averages around 250 yards off the tee, which means he will be using longer clubs for his shots into Augusta National's small, fast greens. If he hopes to make the cut, his short game will have to be very good.
HONG KONG — Chinese and World Health Organization officials said Monday that they had still not yet found any human-to-human transmission of a spreading form of avian influenza , after confirming five more infections among humans over the weekend and three more on Monday.Public health officials around the world have been closely watching the emergence of the illness, H7N9 influenza, in Shanghai and three nearby provinces in central-eastern China over the past week, and researchers at the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention in Atlanta have begun work on a vaccine.Chinese health officials have acknowledged 24 cases and 7 fatalities in the past week, counting the eight infections confirmed by laboratories over the last three days.Liang Wannian, the director of the H7N9 influenza control and prevention office at the National Health and Family Planning Commission, said at a news conference in Beijing on Monday that the government was monitoring 621 people who had been in close contact with the infected patients and had found no sign that any of them were getting sick."At present, the cases have been sporadic in nature, and no evidence of human-to-human transmission has been discovered," Mr. Liang said, but he cautioned that "currently, due to the limited understanding of the origin and dissemination of this disease, there are still uncertainties remaining as regards the aspects of epidemic prevention and control work."Chinese officials are still investigating two families in which multiple cases of H7N9 are suspected, according to the W.H.O. One of the cases involves an 87-year-old man who died on March 4 and was later found to have had the disease. Two of his sons developed severe pneumonia about the same time, and one died on Feb. 28. But while severe pneumonia is rare, H7N9 has not been confirmed in either of the sons. And even if it had, the sons, as well as their father, could have been infected through animals instead of humans.The Chinese authorities have not released details of the other family under investigation.Mr. Liang said the Chinese government would be open about the outbreak's progression, and the W.H.O. said it was in discussions about whether to send international experts to work with China in halting the spread of H7N9.Xinhua, the state-run news agency, said one of the 24 people who were infected, a 4-year-old boy in Shanghai, appeared to have recovered, although he remained in a hospital for observation. While the boy's improvement is a sign that the disease is not necessarily fatal, it also raises the question of whether more people are coming down with mild or even asymptomatic cases and recovering without becoming sick enough to visit a hospital or clinic for testing.Because the virus can continue to mutate in people who are infected, scientists are eager to know whether H7N9 manifests itself only in cases that are serious enough to lead victims to seek medical attention. The W.H.O. lists 3 of the 24 cases as mild, although those patients were still in a hospital."The key point is whether there are milder cases — I'm not completely clear," said Dr. Malik Peiris, director of the Center for Influenza Research at the University of Hong Kong.Two of the eight main gene segments of the virus seem to come from wild birds, while the other six segments come from a well-known and widely distributed poultry virus, Dr. Peiris said. But the genes have changed to acquire patterns found in human influenza viruses, causing scientists to worry whether a further evolution of the virus could increase its ability to be transmitted.Dr. Ko Wing-man, Hong Kong's secretary for food and health, announced Monday that Hong Kong and mainland Chinese inspectors would begin extensive testing on Thursday of poultry being shipped to Hong Kong to determine whether any of the birds carry the disease. They will be released for sale only after they have been certified to be free from the disease, he said.
SHANGHAI — Christie's auction house said Tuesday it had been granted a license that would enable it to become the first international auction house to operate independently in China , which has overtaken the United States as the world's largest art and auction market.The move allows Christie's to sell directly to buyers from a growing class of wealthy collectors in China, many of whom have been spending vast sums of money in recent years on fine art, wine, watches, jewelry and other items at auctions around the world.Sotheby's and Christie's have been operating in Hong Kong for several decades and have seen their business explode in the city, which is governed separately.But the world's two biggest auction houses have long sought greater access to mainland China to cultivate collectors, hold auctions and compete with China's own formidable auction houses, Beijing Poly International and China Guardian, entities that have recently moved into the ranks of the world's biggest auction houses.Last year Sotheby's formed a joint venture in Beijing with the state-owned Beijing Gehua Cultural Development Group to hold auctions in China. Sotheby's is the 80 percent owner of that enterprise.Now Christie's has signed its own agreement with the City of Shanghai and plans to hold its first auction this fall, although the company said the agreement restricted it from dealing in "cultural relics." The company can operate throughout China but will be based in Shanghai and pay taxes there.In a statement Steven P. Murphy, Christie's chief executive, emphasized how important China is to the auction house's future."In recent years we have seen phenomenal developments take place in the global art market, particularly in China, where the market has grown at an unprecedented rate," he said. "Today's announcement further solidifies Christie's position and commitment in a market which possesses a strong heritage and deep appreciation of art."Last year revenue in China's auction market was estimated at more than $4 billion, down sharply from $9 billion in 2011, when the market was blistering hot. Auction revenue in the United States market was estimated at more than $3 billion in 2012.But China's homegrown auction houses have been troubled by fakes, smuggling and longstanding suspicions of price manipulation.Analysts say Sotheby's and Christie's hope to capture a share of the market and compete by pledging higher standards for authenticating and evaluating art and other collectibles.Sotheby's joint venture plans to hold an auction in China this year, a spokesman said. It has also begun talks with the organizers of the European Fine Art Fair about holding a similar fair in Beijing.Christie's said in a statement that the number of clients from mainland China that now bid at its auctions in various cities was twice what it was in 2008."Now Christie's will be able to engage with our clients in Shanghai in the same way that we have done over many years in London, Paris, New York and Hong Kong," Mr. Murphy said.Officials at that auction house, founded in 1766, said the application for the license was filed last year and was approved on March 28.
HONG KONG — The economies of developing Asia appear to have settled into a new growth path that will allow the region to expand by between 6 percent and 7 percent a year — a pace that is significantly slower than that seen before the global financial crisis, yet represents a firm trajectory that could last over the next decade."It looks like we're in a new trend," said Changyong Rhee, the chief economist of the Asian Development Bank, which on Tuesday released its new forecasts for emerging Asia. The region spans developing countries like China, India, Indonesia and Thailand, but not Japan.After relatively muted growth last year, when the region expanded by 6.1 percent, developing Asia is expected to pick up speed again with growth of 6.6 percent this year and 6.7 percent next year, according to the bank's projections."The era of double-digit growth is over," Mr. Rhee said. But, he added in an interview in Hong Kong, the United States is showing signs of recovery, and the euro zone likely to "muddle through" its debt crisis for the foreseeable future. That backdrop leaves developing Asia enjoying a relatively stable growth that was not yet visible just six months ago, when the development bank made its last projections for the region.Faster growth in China — by far the region's largest economy — and what Mr. Rhee called the "remarkable" resilience of southeast Asian economies have been the main drivers of growth there growth, lifting domestic consumption and intraregional trade, and in the process also reducing the region's reliance on the world's advanced, and slower-growing, economies.Growth, however, will be very uneven, with China likely to grow at between 7 percent and 8 percent; the Asean region, comprising countries like Thailand and Malaysia, growing around 5 percent; and more developed economies like Hong Kong, Singapore or Taiwan expanding at little more than 3 percent.Moreover, events in other parts of the world continue to pose major potential risks to Asia.Among them, the development bank said, are the wrangling over the U.S. debt ceiling and the struggles to implement austerity measures in Europe. Border disputes within Asia, potential asset bubbles inflated by the monetary stimulus efforts of the world's developed economies, and the possible reversal of capital inflows once that monetary stimulus ends also represent risks to Asia.The Asian Development Bank also issued a stark warning on Asia's rapidly growing energy needs. The region, the bank said, is moving along a "dangerously unsustainable energy path" that "could result in environmental disaster" and increase the region's reliance on the oil-exporting nations of the Middle East."Asia could be consuming more than half the world's energy supply by 2035, and without radical changes carbon dioxide emissions will double," Mr. Rhee said. "Asia must both contain rising demand and explore cleaner energy options, which will require creativity and resolve, with policymakers having to grapple with politically difficult issues like fuel subsidies and regional energy market integration."
HONG KONG — Consumer prices rose less than expected last month in China as the unappetizing and widely televised spectacle of thousands of dead pigs floating upstream from Shanghai helped push pork prices down sharply, the government reported on Tuesday.The National Bureau of Statistics announced that consumer prices were 2.1 percent higher in March than a year ago. Prices had been 3.2 percent higher in February.Pork is a staple of the Chinese diet and its price has long been such a significant component of the country's consumer price index that it can influence overall inflation. Pork prices tumbled 5.5 percent last month from a year earlier, the National Bureau of Statistics said.Factories and other producers also faced falling prices last month. Producer prices in China were down 1.9 percent in March, compared with a year-over-year decline of 1.6 percent in February."Meat prices slumped due to concerns about mysterious pig deaths and bird-flu contagion risk," Asia economists at Standard Chartered said in a research report.Fitch Ratings separately expressed concern Tuesday evening about the long-term consequences for China's financial stability of the country's huge buildup in debt, particularly borrowing by local governments. Fitch reduced its default rating on China's long-term local currency debt to A+, from AA–.Fitch, however, maintained its rating on China's long-term foreign currency debt at A+, citing the country's $3.39 trillion in foreign currency reserves, compared with just $34 billion in foreign currency-denominated sovereign debt.The General Administration of Customs announced on Wednesday that China had a rare trade deficit of $884.3 million in March. Moody's Analytics said in a research report that the deficit reflected a lull in exports leaving Chinese docks as many factories closed for much of February to observe Chinese New Year, while imports continued to grow.Chinese policy makers have been struggling with two intertwined problems related to inflation.They allowed banks to engage in a large expansion of lending and off-balance sheet credit last autumn to reverse an economic slowdown. That expansion of credit fanned fears of inflation that has already brought a sharp appreciation in real estate prices in recent months, prompting the government to renew warnings about problems of housing affordability.But while asset prices may be rising, the price of goods has stayed weak, as many industries still face overcapacity. Companies have been unable to raise prices, often making it hard for them to make regular payments of interest and principal on their debts.Manufacturers in China say that while the cost of materials like steel has stabilized or even fallen, wages continue to increase. "Raw material prices have so far been stable, but we have had to increase worker wages by 20 percent," said Kevin Mao, the export business manager at the Zhejiang Zhongli Group, a manufacturer of bicycle and motorcycle locks in Wenzhou in east-central China.Randall Liu, a sales executive at Xiamen Tawa Enterprise, a maker of wine sacks and sleeping bags in Xiamen in southeastern China, said that weak demand for exports made it hard to raise prices to cover wage increases."We are only able to transfer a portion of our cost increases to our end customers, so we do take a hit on our margin," he said.Usha C. V. Haley, the director of the Robbins Center for Global Business and Strategy at West Virginia University, said in a speech in Hong Kong on Monday that industrial overcapacity was likely to persist in China, given numerous corporate subsidies provided by the national and provincial governments. "They do want to maintain social stability and create jobs," and so are unlikely to reduce subsidies, she said.Chinese and World Health Organization officials said Monday that they had not documented any evidence that pigs had been dying from a recent outbreak of H7N9 avian influenza, although an investigation into the deaths continued.The price of pork tends to follow long cycles in China that lag behind animal feed prices.When feed prices are high, farmers raise fewer pigs, which tends to push pork prices up and feed prices down. The cycle then reverses itself as farmers rush to raise more hogs before feed prices bounce up again.Pork prices were little changed in February, sustained by demand during the Chinese New Year, but had fallen sharply before then. Many economists had expected pork prices to begin strengthening this spring, however, before the carcasses began showing up near Shanghai. The drop in pork prices meant that overall consumer prices for all food rose only 2.7 percent in March from a year earlier, the National Bureau of Statistics said. Food prices had been up 6 percent in February. The National Bureau of Statistics has scheduled for next Monday the release of a long list of other economic statistics, including economic output during the first quarter of this year.
HONG KONG — Of all the mysteries surrounding the emergence of a new and deadly strain of avian influenza around Shanghai, one of the biggest is why China 's hundreds of medical and veterinary labs did not spot the problem sooner — or if they did, why it was not disclosed.Even the censored Chinese news media has begun cautiously questioning why the authorities did not say anything sooner about a disease that resulted in the first known human case in eastern China on Feb. 19, but was not announced to the public until March 31. The announcement came two weeks after the closing of the National People's Congress, a show event during which the Communist Party traditionally avoids acknowledging problems."People are still asking, why did it take the government so long to confirm the outbreak?" The Communist Youth Daily, the official newspaper of the Communist Youth League, said in a column several days ago. "The transparency of information from the government is still being called into question by the public, and the actions the government has taken have not convinced the public."China's health ministry is now finding three to five human cases a day, a brisk pace for a disease that Chinese officials and the World Health Organization assert is still transmitted from animals to people, and not from person to person. The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention in Atlanta activated its emergency operations center this week as governments around the world began making preparations in case of a flu pandemic.Yet Chinese government officials have not yet publicly identified any farms with poultry infected with the new strain of bird flu, H7N9 avian influenza. The government has focused so far on closing wholesale markets in Shanghai and several nearby cities, and it has sent guards with nets to chase pigeons in Shanghai parks, to snare and later euthanize the potentially infected birds.Chinese health officials assert that they have acted promptly upon laboratory confirmation of cases. Agriculture officials have said less, but they have also said that they are being transparent.Western health officials and scientists say that they do not know whether China deliberately concealed the disease for six weeks after the first person fell sick with it; China says lab confirmation did not come until March 29. But they note that unusual properties of the virus, together with a controversial Chinese response to a previous bird flu outbreak of distributing millions of free vaccines, may have made the outbreak harder than usual to detect at first.The virus can be detected in animals in two ways: a widely used, easily performed test for antibodies in the serum or plasma of poultry, known as a serology test, or a much more expensive and difficult experiment to isolate specific viruses from the birds, which can only be done in a few well-equipped labs in China.The crucial question is whether veterinary technicians were doing serology tests only for H5N1 bird flu, which has been a chronic problem in China for 16 years, or whether they were testing for a broader range of avian influenza viruses and misread, ignored or decided not to publicize any detection of H7N9.Chinese officials have been largely silent on the details of their test protocols. The Agriculture Ministry had no immediate response to questions submitted by fax on Wednesday.Dr. Juan Lubroth, the chief veterinary officer of the United Nations' Food and Agriculture Organization, said that he suspected China had been testing broadly for more avian influenza viruses than just H5N1. "When you are running a serology, you usually don't run it against one, you run it against a battery of viruses that you know are circulating," he said in a telephone interview.But while H7N9 has been spotted before in the West, it has not been documented before this spring in East Asia. Dr. Lubroth said that he did not know the details of the Chinese test protocol, and that if the Chinese were focused on H5N1 test results, these tests would not detect H7N9.At least 31 human cases, including nine deaths, have been confirmed by the Chinese government so far, and the Chinese police have been detaining people who assert on the Internet that there are more cases. Chinese officials say that one patient has recovered and the rest are still sick in hospitals, mostly in serious or critical condition.
HONG KONG — The American film "Django Unchained" was abruptly pulled from theaters in China on Thursday, its opening day, a surprising move that underscored the fragility of Hollywood's evolving relationship with the Chinese movie industry.No reason was given for the decision to suspend "Django Unchained," which was written and directed by Quentin Tarantino and won two Oscars in February. The move comes after some scenes were reported to have been edited to conform with the wishes of Chinese censors.Workers at Beijing theaters said the film, which tells a bloody revenge story set in America's pre-Civil War South, had been pulled because of unspecified technical problems.But Mr. Tarantino's representatives and financial backers in Los Angeles and New York on Thursday were still scrambling to learn what had gone wrong, and looking for a way to reopen their movie in what has become the world's second-largest film market, after the United States. American film studios are seeking increased access to the vast new audience in China as a way to shore up their business, but have often been frustrated by Chinese laws, customs and tastes."We regret that 'Django Unchained' has been removed from theaters and are working with the Chinese authorities to determine whether the film can be rescheduled," Steve Elzer, a spokesman for Sony Pictures Entertainment, which released the film, said in a statement. Mr. Elzer declined to discuss possible reasons for the cancellation."Django Unchained" was to have made its debut after weeks of heavy promotion. News reports have said that some of the film's graphic violence was edited to make it acceptable to state censors, including altering the color of fake blood in violent scenes and limiting how far the blood splattered.Such revisions are becoming increasingly common before American films are shown in China, with American filmmakers adhering to the demands of Chinese censors.Sony's indication that "Django Unchained" may be rescheduled suggested some relatively narrow problem, rather than broad objections to the movie's celebration of rebellion.The film focuses on a slave, Django, and a bounty hunter who try to outsmart a particularly brutal slave owner.Before the film's planned opening, the Chinese media quoted a Sony Pictures official who described the changes made to appease censors and suggested that Mr. Tarantino had played a role in the changes."What we call bloodshed and violence is just a means of serving the purpose of the film, and these slight adjustments will not affect the basic quality of the film — such as turning the blood to a darker color, or lowering the height of the splatter of blood," Zhang Miao, director of Sony Pictures' Chinese branch, told Southern Metropolis Daily. "Quentin knew how to adjust that, and it's necessary that he is the one to do it. You can give him suggestions, but it must be him."Mr. Tarantino, whose films are known for their no-holds-barred depictions of gory violence, has not commented on reports that he toned the film down for Chinese censors.His agents at William Morris Endeavor Entertainment declined on Thursday to discuss the film's withdrawal.Chinese media and film blogs were filled with speculation that the movie had been withdrawn because state censors somehow missed a brief scene with nudity. That explanation seemed unlikely, however, given the careful vetting the film is said to have undergone before it was approved for release.Whatever the reason, the last-minute nature of the decision was surprising. Potential problems with Chinese censors are usually identified and addressed long before the film's opening."Django Unchained" is the first of Mr. Tarantino's violent movies to be cleared for distribution in Chinese theaters, though parts of his "Kill Bill" movies were filmed in Beijing.Its sudden disappearance from theaters across the country prompted consternation even among some of the Chinese government's staunchest defenders.
HONG KONG — The Hong Kong police on Thursday filed manslaughter charges against the captains of two boats that collided off Lamma Island in October, an accident that took the lives of 39 people in the city's deadliest maritime disaster in more than four decades.Chow Chi-wai, 56, captain of the Lamma IV, and Lai Sai-ming, 54, captain of the catamaran Sea Smooth, were charged with manslaughter in connection with their roles in the Oct. 1 disaster, which also left 92 passengers injured.The collision took place as Hong Kong was getting ready for a holiday fireworks display in Victoria Harbor. The Lamma IV, a boat belonging to Hong Kong Electric, was carrying more than 120 passengers when it collided with the Sea Smooth, a scheduled passenger ferry, causing the Lamma IV to quickly submerge in the water. The 39 people who died were all aboard the Lamma IV.The collision set off a frantic nighttime search for survivors, an effort that was hampered by strong currents and poor underwater visibility. Many of the victims died after being trapped underwater in the Lamma IV.At the time of the accident, the Lamma IV had been ferrying people to visit Hong Kong Electric's power plant on Lamma Island and also to watch the fireworks for China's National Day.Lamma is a bucolic island a half-hour ferry ride from Hong Kong's bustling Central district, and it attracts many expatriates and residents who enjoy its more laid-back feel.The deadly accident was a jolt to Hong Kong, where such disasters are extremely rare compared with other Asian cities. Hong Kong's chief executive, Leung Chun-ying, appointed a commission to look into the disaster and devise ways of improving maritime safety. The commission is expected to release its recommendations later this month after hearing testimony from more than 100 witnesses.In seeking clues to the cause of the collision, investigators have looked into the structural integrity of the Lamma IV, why it sank so quickly and whether the captains followed the rules of the sea. They have also sought records of the ships' radars. One accident survivor told the commission that he saw the bow of the other vessel heading for the window of the boat he was on.In addition to the two captains charged Thursday, five other crew members of the boats were facing charges and are to appear at a bail hearing in mid-April.
HONG KONG — China's Agriculture Ministry issued a strongly worded defense late Friday afternoon of its policy of large-scale vaccination of poultry against the H5N1 avian influenza virus over the last decade, saying that it was not interfering with its efforts now to identify the emerging H7N9 virus.Dr. Alex Thiermann, the president of the standard-setting Code Commission of the World Organization for Animal Health, had expressed concern in a telephone interview earlier this week that vaccination against the earlier bird flu strain might have made it harder this spring for Chinese veterinary technicians to spot the recent spread of the H7N9 virus.The new bird flu virus has sickened at least 43 people and killed 11 of them in recent weeks, all in Shanghai and three nearby provinces, except for one case in Beijing, where the infection of a 7-year-old girl was confirmed Saturday morning.Dr. Thiermann reiterated his organization's longstanding support for poultry culling as a way to fight outbreaks of disease while preserving the ability to test surviving poultry reliably for disease. Culls involve euthanizing not only infected poultry, but also all poultry in a radius that can extend several miles around each site of infection.In a statement on Friday in response to questions submitted by fax on Wednesday, the Agriculture Ministry said tests for the two viruses were different. "Vaccinating poultry against H5N1 on a large scale does not make it harder to identify H7N9 in poultry," the statement said, adding that vaccination had been effective in greatly reducing the incidence of H5N1 in recent years.The statement did not address a separate question about whether the Agriculture Ministry had been testing only for H5N1 in recent years or had also tested for other avian influenza viruses.Virologists at Hong Kong University, which has the best-known center for research on avian influenza in China, disagree among themselves on whether China's practice of distributing free H5N1 vaccines to millions of farmers has made it harder to detect H7N9.The question mainly involves whether the antibodies produced after the H5N1 vaccine is administered require technicians to set a higher cutoff point in determining whether antibodies against other avian influenza viruses are also present. But while vaccination might make an emerging avian influenza virus harder to detect, it also greatly reduces the quantity of virus that is shed by those birds that do become infected despite vaccination. Some virologists say that vaccination in China has helped largely prevent the transmission of H5N1 virus to people and has helped greatly reduce the number of birds that become infected.The World Organization for Animal Health, based in Paris, issued a separate statement late Thursday in which it endorsed humane culls at infected farms but also said a supplemental policy "could be to apply a suitably adapted vaccination policy of limited duration."
BEIJING — The last known face-to-face contact between Kim Jong-un , the North Korean leader, and senior Chinese officials did not end well.A member of China's Politburo, Li Jianguo, led a small delegation to Pyongyang, North Korea's capital, in November. He carried a letter from China's new leader, Xi Jinping, which is said to have contained a simple message: Do not launch a ballistic missile.Twelve days later, Mr. Kim did just that.The relationship between North Korea and China, extolled in the past to be as close as "lips and teeth," has faltered ever since as Mr. Kim, a political neophyte believed to be in his late 20s, has continued to defy Mr. Xi, a 59-year-old seasoned statesman.How far the alliance between the powerhouse China and the impoverished North Korea has soured is now debated openly in the Chinese news media. Few call it a serious rift, though a spirited debate appears to be under way within the Chinese government over how to handle Mr. Kim.But with Secretary of State John Kerry in China this weekend on his first visit as the United States' chief diplomat, some things are clear.The personal relationships among Mr. Kim and his Chinese counterparts appear to be less familiar than when his father, Kim Jong-il, was in charge. Analysts suggest that could be a result of the significant age differences between the inexperienced Mr. Kim and the much older Chinese leaders.There has been no publicized visit of Chinese leaders to North Korea since the embarrassing trip in November when Mr. Kim thumbed his nose at Mr. Xi's request for restraint.As relations frayed after Mr. Kim carried out North Korea's third nuclear test in February, China suggested sending several senior officials to Pyongyang, including Dai Bingguo, a state councilor and experienced North Korea hand who retired in March, Chinese analysts said.But Mr. Kim rebuffed the overture, the analysts said, a sign that the Chinese interpreted as the new leader wanting to show he is less dependent on Beijing than his father.It not clear whether Mr. Xi has ever met Mr. Kim.Mr. Xi last visited Pyongyang in June 2008 when he was vice president. He arrived before Kim Jong-il had a stroke, a period when the succession process that led to the appointment of Kim Jong-un as president had not yet begun.Speculation mounted in 2010 and 2011 that Mr. Kim would replace his ailing father after the son was reported to have participated in one or more of the four official North Korean delegations to China in those years, a period when the Chinese were encouraging North Korea to open up its economy.On at least one of those trips, Kim Jong-il did meet with Mr. Xi, who at that time was vice president, said John Delury, associate professor of East Asian studies at Yonsei University in Seoul, South Korea. "However, there was never evidence Kim Jong-un did in fact go with his dad," Mr. Delury said. "I assume he did not, until there is positive evidence."In August 2012, Mr. Kim's uncle by marriage, Jang Song-thaek, a four-star general who is considered a close adviser to the new leader, visited Beijing and met with the Chinese leaders at the time, President Hu Jintao and Prime Minister Wen Jiabao.It was assumed that Mr. Jang was setting the stage for a visit to China by the new, young leader, an idea that the Chinese appeared to be pushing as a way of showing what promise economic overhaul held for the repressed North Korea. Little came of the visit.In the Chinese news media, Mr. Kim is getting a mixed reception. The state-run news media here have stopped short of calling Mr. Kim unflattering names, as they did when they labeled President George W. Bush "Little Mr. Bush."In contrast, China's social media sites have unleashed waves of satirical jokes, images and names aimed at Mr. Kim, who is often described in disparaging terms by ordinary Chinese.China often censors comments on the Internet that run counter to Communist Party policy or are too critical of foreign policy. The barbs against Mr. Kim have been left intact.A common description of Mr. Kim on social media sites is "The Kid." Another favorite: "Fatty, the Third."That is a reference to the portly men who have made up the Kim dynasty: the founder of the state, Kim Il-sung, whose birth on April 15, 1912, will be celebrated Monday; his son, Kim Jong-il, who died in December 2011 after ruling the country since 1994; and his son, the current leader, Kim Jong-un. Their girth stands in contrast to the fact that much of the North Korean population struggles to get enough to eat.In China's state-run news media, the once-generous coverage of the North has become less tolerant. Some commentators called North Korea's announcement that it would restart its Yongbyon nuclear reactor as "out of control" and "crazy."A fairly stern editorial in Global Times on the eve of Mr. Kerry's visit on Saturday suggested there was a limit to China's forbearance. "When Pyongyang's acts seriously violate China's interests, we will by no means indulge it," the editorial said.The People's Daily online edition on Thursday urged North Korea not to "misjudge the situation," and criticized the government for violating United Nations resolutions against nuclear testing and the launching of ballistic missiles.The less favorable news media coverage of North Korea is also accompanied with tough words for the United States. "Do not add fuel to the flames," People's Daily said, a reference to the sending this month of nuclear capable B-52 and B-2 bombers by the Obama administration as a show of support for the American ally, South Korea.
Nestled in a river valley and edged by low, tranquil mountains covered in tea shrubs, Taipei is home to 2.6 million people. The cultural and political center of Taiwan, it flaunts its modernity in high-tech company headquarters, an ultraefficient public transportation system and bustling retail centers. Yet it also encompasses teeming street markets, polytheistic temples, recreational green space and other vestiges of ancient traditions reflecting generations of cultural influx from nearby and far-off lands. A haven for insomniacs of all types, Taipei is truly a city that never sleeps, welcoming residents and visitors to brush up on their history, explore their spirituality and, most of all, satisfy their taste buds.Take a taxi, the city bus or gondola lift to the Muzha Tea Plantations, a mountainside tea-cultivating district just outside the city center that is dotted with vibrant temples and teahouses. Tea plants thrive in Taiwan's climate and topography, and Taipei's tea drinkers are discriminating connoisseurs. Be sure to sample varieties of Tieguanyin ("iron goddess of mercy"), a source of local pride. Produced in a delicate roasting process, it's a robust, fragrant brew that is low in tannin and easy on the palate. Depending on its quality, a 300-gram tin of tea leaves is 200 to 3,000 Taiwan dollars, or $7 to $105, at 28 Taiwan dollars to the U.S. dollar. Visit the Three Stone Teapot Museum (36 Zhinan Road, Section 3, Lane 34; 886-2-2938-3797) for demonstrations of artisan teapot and tea making, offered with free tastings. Admission, 50 dollars. Descend the mountains after sunset to catch a view of the Taipei skyline at twilight.For more than three decades, Newfulou (2 Jinshan South Road; 886-2-2351-9690) has dished up cuisine from Jiangsu, an eastern Chinese province that borders Shanghai. One specialty is succulent sautéed baby eel, finished at the table with shredded ginger and a dramatic drizzle of sizzling oil (300 dollars). Newfulou also prepares an award-winning fotiaoqiang ("Buddha jumps over the wall"), a mélange of meats, seafood and vegetables that takes a full day (or two) to braise (980 dollars). According to ancient folklore, even the most devout vegetarian will abandon his faith for a sampling of these delicacies.When night falls, vendors peddle snacks, massages, clothes, accessories and electronics in the city's famed night markets. Shop and haggle the night away, snacking as you go on oyster omelets (30 dollars), salt-crusted kebabs (30 dollars), pressed-to-order sugarcane nectar (15 dollars), and the legendary stinky tofu (30 dollars), a fermented specialty that tastes much better than it smells. The night market at Huaxi Street is known for edible preparations from venomous snakes, rats and the like, believed by some to be rich in health benefits. The Shida District appeals to the young and chic, and the Shilin District market is impressive for its sheer size. For a change of scenery, visit the flagship Eslite Bookstore (245 Dunhua South Road, Section 1; eslite.com), a giant emporium of domestic and international books, periodicals, stationery, music, food and drinks (drinks, 100 to 200 dollars). Open 24/7, it is a popular rendezvous for locals as well as a prime spot for celebrity sightings. At dawn, follow the sound of roosters crowing to Dongmen Market (81 Xinyi Road, Section 2, Lane 79), where generations of day merchants have expertly butchered livestock, pickled vegetables, roasted meats, wrapped dumplings and sliced tree-ripened fruits (ready-to-eat meals, 50 to 100 dollars).9 a.m.4. Above It AllGo early for your visit to Taipei 101 (7 Xinyi Road, Section 5; taipei-101.com.tw), the 1,670-foot skyscraper that reaches so far above the skyline that it looks as if it belongs in some other city (or on some other planet). Taiwan's entry into the ongoing competition for the tallest building in the world, it held the title after its completion in 2004, only to be surpassed in 2008 by the Burj Khalifa in Dubai. The observation decks on the 89th and 91st floors afford sweeping views in every direction (admission, 450 dollars). While at the top, take a good look at the steel pendulum hanging in the center; the world's largest and heaviest tuned mass damper, it stabilizes the tower against large lateral movements from tropical winds and earthquakes. Beginning at ground level, you can enjoy five floors of high-end shopping and dining.Take a stroll on the palm-lined west campus of the National Taiwan University Hospital at 1 Changde Street. Its oldest building, an imposing redbrick and stone-pillared structure built in 1912, is an architectural relic of Japanese sovereignty at the turn of the 20th century. The paternalistic side of the Japanese era brought advancements in agriculture, education and urban planning, but the price was political and cultural suppression. Around the corner, 228 Peace Memorial Park (3 Ketagalan Boulevard) commemorates victims of a heavy-handed government response to a 1947 protest under another set of rulers, Chiang Kai-shek and his Nationalist Party. In public parks like these, the elderly perform morning exercises, the secret to their vigor and youthful appearance.
Closets, the Bigger the BetterThe cover article last week, "Hooked by a Closet," described how closets in New York City apartments have evolved into an important factor in real estate decisions. Following are edited excerpts of reader comments from nytimes. com:Here's one way to double your closet space: Get a divorce. It was a benefit I hadn't thought of.Having just downsized from a house into a condo with, you guessed it, few and small closets,I can attest that ridding yourself of "stuff" is — exhilarating. Here's to fewer and smaller closets. It does a soul good.I live in a 650-sqare-foot NYC apartment with my fiancé and our cat. I work from home, with tons of books and binders everywhere.It is a daily struggle to find places to store our items.The following disparate items live in our one medium-size closet: winter coats, cat litter, camping backpacks, wedding dress, beach towels, regular clothing, six-pack of paper towels, Christmas tree stand.I love NYC! But the constant climbing on chairs to stack things to the ceilings, storing things behind sofas and never getting to shop at Costco, does get really old.It is really not the closets that are the problem per se. It is that everything built nowadays is so open and streamlined that there are few nooks and crannies to store stuff.I go into newer homes or apartments, even ones with lots of square footage, and I wonder where I would put a cat box so it's not just out there for all to see, or where to put a coat rack or where to store my luggage, and really, there's nowhere.But if you go into older homes, there's a space by the fridge where you could put brooms or a vacuum, a notch near the entryway perfect for a table to put keys on, an alcove off the living room where you could stack a collection of board games.The very idea of needing all this space to hold so much stuff sends a shiver down my spine.I periodically need to purge my own belongings because I dislike being tied down to my material belongings. Our identities should not be based on what we have, but who we are and the good we do in the world.Let's all remember: you can't take it with you. Fiona, BeijingPHOTO (PHOTOGRAPH BY SASHA MASLOV FOR THE NEW YORK TIMES)
HONG KONG — The Chinese economic recovery lost some of its momentum during the first quarter of this year, official data released on Monday showed, surprising analysts who had expected growth to accelerate on the back of ample credit, strong infrastructure spending and firm exports.The economy expanded by just 7.7 percent during the first three months of the year, compared with a year earlier, short of the 8 percent that economists polled by Reuters had projected, and slower than during the previous three months, when gross domestic product rose 7.9 percent year-on-year.Industrial output data for March also underlined the fading momentum. Growth dropped to 8.9 percent compared with March 2012, well below expectations.The spokesman for the Chinese statistics bureau, Sheng Laiyun, played down the shortfall."Over all in the first quarter the economy had a steady start and has advanced in a stable way," Mr. Sheng said at a news conference in Beijing. "Generally, it's operating within the range of 7.4 percent to 7.9 percent — that is, steady growth."China's industrialization and urbanization would remain powerful engines for relatively rapid growth, Mr. Sheng said.Analysts had widely expected China's economy, the world's second biggest after the United States, to have picked up more steam during the first months of the year, as a tide of credit flowed into the economy, and government-mandated investment in infrastructure projects picked up.In fact, the growing scale of credit has begun to worry an increasing number of analysts, who warn that the resulting buildup of debt bears substantial risks, including asset price bubbles and potentially destabilizing defaults.Fitch Ratings last week expressed concerns about the long-term consequences for China's financial stability over the country's huge buildup in debt, particularly borrowing by local governments.
The 10-foot putt dropped, and Adam Scott's star ascended. Nine years before a 10-foot birdie putt on the second playoff hole won him the Masters, Scott drained a putt from the same distance at the Players Championship to become, at 23, the youngest winner of the event, prompting the golf analyst Johnny Miller to say, "This might be another Tiger Woods in the making."Scott's 2004 victory at T.P.C. Sawgrass was heralded as the changing of the guard in Australian golf, with Greg Norman, the Arnold Palmer of Down Under, passing the baton to Scott, a Queenslander with a swing purer than a mountain spring. Butch Harmon declared that Scott had a better swing than Woods and was "on the verge of breaking out."The bookmakers agreed, installing Scott as one of the favorites at the Masters, which followed the Players Championship that year. Scott posted rounds of 84 and 79 at Augusta National Golf Club, missing the cut. Between his breakthrough at the Players Championship and the end of last year, Scott won six tour events, including the 2006 Tour Championship and the 2011 World Golf Championship-Bridgestone Invitational. He built a handsome résumé, but it did not do justice to the beauty of his swing.The problem was Norman did not pass Scott his putter, which Norman wielded with deadly efficiency in his heyday. Scott's inexorable march to superstardom became a decade-long slog through greens that swallowed him like quicksand. In 2010, the year before Scott switched to the long putter that he anchors to his chest, he ranked 186th on the PGA Tour in putting, in a relatively new advanced statistic, strokes gained-putting.The long putter did not look like a miracle cure last July at the British Open, where Scott had a four-shot lead, then played the last four holes in four over. On Sunday he became an overnight success 10 years in the making with birdies on three of the last six holes of regulation and a birdie on the second hole of sudden death to beat Ángel Cabrera.Scott, 32, is the first Masters winner and the fourth winner in the last six majors to use an anchored putting stroke. His victory surely is the last nail in the anchored stroke's coffin, never mind that at this year's spring golf festival at Augusta National, the long putter was the maypole around which spun many of the best stories.Fred Couples and Bernhard Langer, both green jacket owners and stars on the 50-and-older Champions Tour, played their way onto the first page of the leader board early Sunday using long putters. They ran out of magic on the back nine but not before infusing the tournament with a double shot of nostalgia.Guan Tianlang, the 14-year-old from China, used a belly putter on his way to becoming the only amateur to make the cut.Then there was Scott, whose graciousness after his British Open collapse won him more fans than any claret jug possibly could. Last summer he spoke as if it were better to have led and lost than never to have led at all. He vowed to build on the experience of having put himself in a position to win, leading those with less sunny dispositions to wonder if he was sincere or simply in shock."Everything I said after the Open is how I felt, and I meant it," Scott said Sunday night. "It did give me more belief that I could win a major. It proved to me, in fact, that I could."Scott, who was introduced to the game at a young age by his father, Phil, a club pro, has the kind of genial personality that makes him everybody's favorite practice round partner or pub companion. At Scott's postround news conference, journalists from all over the world greeted him with a round of applause more enthusiastic than what followed the announcement in the press room that alcoholic beverages were available in the dining area.On Twitter, the PGA Tour player Brad Faxon wrote, "Has to be as popular a player to win in awhile."Perhaps not with officials of the United States Golf Association and the R&A, the rule-making bodies that have proposed a ban on the anchored putting stroke. Their final decision on the issue is expected soon, which leads to the question: now that Scott finally has a major victory to celebrate, are the rulers of golf going to break up his party?"We are all waiting to hear what's going to happen," Scott said.Referring to his victory, he said, "I don't know that this is going to impact any decisions at all."It was inevitable, he added, that players using anchored strokes would leave their marks on the majors."Because you know, these are the best players in the world," Scott said, "and they practice thousands of hours. They are going to get good with whatever they are using."For Scott, it may not be the end of the world if the anchored stroke is banned. He will adapt and endure, the way he always has. Besides, it is not as if he has never performed well using a conventional flat stick. The year he won the Players Championship, Scott finished No. 1 on tour in putting.
The Pulitzer Prizes were announced on Monday. The list of winners in the journalism categories follows.The Sun Sentinel won its first Pulitzer Prize for a three-part series by Sally Kestin, 48, an investigative reporter, and John Maines, 57, a database editor, that examined the driving speeds of off-duty police officers in South Florida. Using data from highway tolls and GPS technology, the reporters found 800 police officers from a dozen different agencies driving at average speeds of 90 to more than 120 miles per hour.As a result of the series, there was an 84 percent drop in the number of officers driving more than 90 miles per hour and many of the officers faced disciplinary action."I think we really ended up saving lives," Ms. Kestin said.The Post was awarded the prize for its reporting of the Aurora movie theater shooting last July. In an article on its Web site announcing the prize, The Post cited the multiple components of its coverage, including digital and print reporting, videos, photographs and the use of social media. "The only thing worse than having to cover a story like this would be to not step up for your community," Kevin Dale, The Post's news director, was quoted as saying in the article."Finalists: The Denver Post staff (for coverage of a wildfire); The Hartford Courant staff.David Barstow and Alejandra Xanic von Bertrab, The New York TimesThe Pulitzer judges singled out Mr. Barstow, 50, and Ms. von Bertrab, 45, for an investigative project that, after a year and a half of reporting, exposed how Wal-Mart used widespread bribery to obtain permits and gain a competitive advantage in Mexico. The reporters also showed how officials for the retailer, the world's largest, sought to cover up corrupt tactics. The reporting led to an investigation by the Justice Department into whether Walmart had violated the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act. "It started with a tip that led to documents, which led to more documents," Mr. Barstow said.Finalists: Patricia Callahan, Sam Roe and Michael Hawthorne of The Chicago Tribune; Alexandra Zayas of The Tampa Bay Times.The Pulitzer board honored a series of 10 articles about the business practices of Apple and other technology companies by a group of reporters at The Times. The series, titled "The iEconomy," included articles on how American manufacturers lost out on iPhone work to cheaper factories in China as well as on the surprisingly meager pay of Apple's 30,000 retail workers in the United States. Keith Bradsher, 48, one of the reporters, said the series was not just about working conditions in China but also about "whether the U.S. could be a competitive place to make things."The team of reporters also included David Barboza, Charles Duhigg, David Kocieniewski, Steve Lohr, John Markoff, David Segal, David Streitfeld, Hiroko Tabuchi and Bill Vlasic.Finalists: Dan Egan of The Milwaukee Journal Sentinel; Tony Bartelme of The Post and Courier, Charleston, S.C.The Star Tribune's series "The Day-Care Threat" documented how the number of infant deaths at Minnesota child care facilities had risen sharply in the five previous years and identified several possible reasons. The reporters also looked at reforms that had happened elsewhere that might have helped in Minnesota.The Pulitzer board noted that the series resulted in "legislative action to strengthen rules."Finalists: Ames Alexander and Karen Garloch of The Charlotte Observer and Joseph Neff and David Raynor of The News and Observer of Raleigh, both in North Carolina, for a joint project; David Breen, Stephen Hudak, Jeff Kunerth and Denise-Marie Ordway of The Orlando Sentinel.Founded less than six years ago and financed by charitable foundations and readers, InsideClimate News says it tries to cover the climate- and energy-related news stories that bigger news organizations aren't paying enough attention to. The Pulitzer board praised its examination of the dangers from diluted bitumen, or dilbit, a substance that differs significantly from ordinary crude oil. InsideClimate News compiled its reports in an e-book last summer.Finalists: Liz Kowalczyk, Carolyn Johnson, Todd Wallack, Patricia Wen and Kay Lazar of The Boston Globe; Craig Whitlock, Greg Miller, Karen DeYoung and Julie Tate of The Washington Post.The prize committee praised a series of articles exposing the immense secret wealth amassed by the families of China's top leaders as "well-documented work published in the face of heavy pressure from Chinese officials." The core evidence for the articles — hundreds of names and a web of connections among more than 100 companies — was found in China's official financial records, said Mr. Barboza, 47, the Shanghai bureau chief for The Times. "It took a whole year," he added, "to sort out each name and how much they had."Finalists: The Associated Press Staff; Richard Marosi of The Los Angeles Times.
HONG KONG — China's newly installed leadership is facing a major challenge on the economic front, after data released Monday showed that the country's growth had unexpectedly lost momentum in the first quarter, complicating Beijing's efforts to promote higher-quality output that relies less on credit-fueled investment.China's economy expanded 7.7 percent during the first three months of this year, compared with a year earlier, falling well short of forecasts for an increase of 8 percent and slowing from 7.9 percent during the final quarter of 2012.Analysts described the data variously as "a big disappointment" and a "truckload of unpleasant surprises." Several banks — among them JPMorgan Chase, Royal Bank of Scotland and Société Générale — responded by markedly reducing their full-year growth forecasts for the Chinese economy.Stock markets, too, reacted negatively. The Shanghai composite index dropped 1.1 percent, the Hang Seng in Hong Kong fell 1.4 percent, and the Nikkei in Japan shed 1.5 percent. European markets also opened lower.The Chinese economy had been mired in a prolonged slowdown for much of 2011 and 2012 before it finally began to pick up some steam toward the end of last year. The data released Monday, however, suggest that the gradual recovery is proving more fragile than most analysts had expected."We have been expecting growth to slow down again, but not until the second half of the year," said Zhiwei Zhang, a China economist at the Japanese investment bank Nomura in Hong Kong. "The next couple of quarters will bring more headwinds, and growth will probably trend down even more."Investment data also disappointed, while industrial output figures for March, also released Monday, showed that factory output growth, compared with a year earlier, had sagged to the lowest level since August 2012, when fears of a "hard landing" in China were widespread.Mr. Zhang said the economy's lackluster first-quarter performance left policy makers in Beijing in the difficult position of having to strike a balance between maintaining solid growth and containing financial and property market risks. "I don't envy them," he said. "They have a very difficult job to do."Beijing is struggling to shift the economy gradually away from the exports and heavy investment that have been the main engines of growth in recent years, seeking instead to foster expansion that is driven more by domestic demand and that will bring higher living standards and greater productivity.The Chinese prime minister, Li Keqiang, who took office last month, summed up the challenges Friday."To come to grips with economic policy, we must both keep a steady footing and focus on upgrading," Mr. Li told a group of economists and business executives in Beijing, in comments reported Sunday by Xinhua, the state-run news agency."Since the start of the year, China's economic performance has, over all, made a steady start, and this will help to stabilize everyone's expectations," he said. "But at the same time, we must see that there are still quite a few unstable and uncertain factors in the domestic and international environment, and deep-seated problems are constantly arising."The flood of data Monday highlighted some of the uncertainties ahead.The pickup in growth in the past few months had been mainly the result of a rush of government-mandated infrastructure spending, as well as relatively firm exports. Liquidity also has been ample — so much so, in fact, that some analysts have warned that the resulting buildup of debt carried substantial risks, including asset price bubbles and potentially destabilizing defaults.Much of the new liquidity, however, appears to have been absorbed by borrowers seeking to service debts, rather than used for new investments or to take on new projects, according to Mr. Zhang of Nomura. He added that that might have been one reason that the first-quarter data had come in so much weaker than expected.
The proposed overhaul of immigration law contains much of what the technology industry wished for: An easier green card route for foreigners educated at American universities in math and science; a new visa category for entrepreneurs; and more guest workers to be deployed on short-term projects.Beyond the specific provisions, which are likely to be debated extensively once legislation is introduced on Capitol Hill, a summary released Tuesday by a bipartisan committee of eight senators is a clear nod to a prospering and more politically powerful technology industry.It shifts the emphasis in immigration policy from one that prioritized family ties to one that will prioritize professional degrees, making it easier for people with math and science skills to settle here. "That major reorganization tells me this Congress recognizes that the knowledge economy is going to drive the overall economy," said Robert Hoffman, a longtime Washington lobbyist and vice president of the Information Technology Industry Council, a group of some of the largest technology employers, including I.B.M. and Microsoft."The devil is in details," Mr. Hoffman said. "We've got to look under the legislative hood, which is what we'll do when we get the bill."The summary contains an important nod to critics of the temporary employment visas, known as H-1Bs. It makes it significantly more expensive for the mostly Indian outsourcing companies that supply engineers and other computer specialists to American companies for short-term projects and that are accused of depressing wages in the industry.The summary released by the so-called Gang of Eight would raise fees for those companies with United States work forces made up mostly of guest workers.In effect, a company like Tata Consultancy Services, of India, which brings computer workers from abroad to work temporarily at American companies, would pay a surcharge to import guest workers.By contrast, a company like Microsoft would not, because although it imports thousands of guest workers, a majority of its employees are United States citizens or residents. Eventually, companies with a preponderance of guest workers would be ineligible to bring in more, according to the summary.It also proposes to raise wages for all guest workers here on an H-1B visa and requires employers to advertise job openings to prospective American workers. It would raise the total number of H-1B visas to 110,000 a year, from the current 65,000, with a provision for as many as 180,000 during years of demonstrably high demand."From my read of it, it has Silicon Valley with protections for American workers, if indeed all of this is eventually passed," said Neil Ruiz, an associate fellow at the Brookings Institution.The summary also seeks to reduce the wait for math and science graduates who apply for green cards, regardless of their home country. Today, because every country is eligible for the same share of employment-based green cards, applicants from China and India wait far longer than virtually anywhere else.
HAIKOU, China — China published a national defense paper on Tuesday suggesting that the United States was creating tensions in the Asia-Pacific region by strengthening its military presence and reinforcing its alliances there. The paper, released by the Ministry of Defense, did not declare that the United States was responsible, but the message was clear.Strongly alluding to the Obama administration's policy to "pivot" toward a greater focus on the Asia-Pacific region, the paper said, "Some country has strengthened its Asia-Pacific military alliances, expanded its military presence in the region, and frequently makes the situation tenser." Thus, China has an "arduous task to safeguard its national unification, territorial integrity and development interests."Presented at a news briefing in Beijing on Tuesday, the paper has mostly a symbolic significance, defense analysts say. It is useful as a way of understanding the way the Communist Party thinks defense issues should be presented to the public, they say. But it is scarcely looked at by China's military officers.Over all, the paper suggested that China should be satisfied with its strategic position and offered a congratulatory note, saying that China "has seized and made the most of this important period of strategic opportunities for its development, and its modernization achievements have captured world attention." In particular, it singled out a better situation with Taiwan, saying, "Cross-straits relations are sustaining a momentum of peaceful development."In an indication that the defense paper reflects a softer tone than the more dominant and nationalistic strand in the Chinese military, the official People's Liberation Army Daily said in a commentary on Tuesday that the West was trying to contain China, and that this must be resisted."Currently, the world situation is undergoing its most profound and complex changes since the end of the cold war," said the commentary, one in a series that seized on a speech on military matters last month by President Xi Jinping. "Hostile Western forces have stepped up their strategy of imposing Westernization on our country and splitting it up, and they are doing their utmost to fence in and contain our country's development."This year's paper was released after Secretary of State John Kerry's visit to Beijing last weekend, his first to China in his new job as America's top diplomat. That visit was generally friendly but did not result in any changes in China's policies, most notably its support for North Korea.The chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, Gen. Martin E. Dempsey, arrives in Beijing early next week on a four-day visit that the Obama administration hopes will yield progress on its goal of better understanding, or at least more communication, between the American and Chinese militaries.The 40-page document, the first of its kind since 2011, gave some details of the size and makeup of China's armed forces, in what state media called a demonstration of greater transparency.The People's Liberation Army ground force, always known to be by far the biggest service, has 850,000 troops in its mobile operational units, the navy numbers 235,000 service members, and the air force 398,000, the paper said. But the paper appeared to omit some forces from its count, including other ground force units, and the Second Artillery Corps, which controls China's ballistic missiles.The Chinese defense white paper for 2006 said that at the end of 2005, the Chinese military had a total of 2.3 million members. It was not explained in the new white paper if the new count of 1.48 million reflected a real reduction in total members.Dennis J. Blasko, a former United States defense attaché at the American Embassy in Beijing, said the number of navy service members listed in the paper was lower than he and others had estimated. It was generally thought that the navy had 255,000 to 290,000 members, depending on the source, he said. And the number for the air force was higher than previous estimates of 300,000 to 330,000, he said. He also pointed out that the People's Armed Police was not included in the tallies; those officers belong to a different chain of command.The paper contained little information of importance to knowledgeable readers, said Mr. Blasko, the author of "The Chinese Army Today: Tradition and Transformation for the 21st Century."In outlining the number of members in each of the military services, the military hierarchy may be seeking to present the People's Liberation Army as a more open organization, said Scott W. Harold, an associate political scientist at the RAND Corporation who specializes in China's military affairs."Alternatively, it is possible that the decision to put out these figures is a part of a move by President Xi Jinping, who is chairman of the Central Military Commission, and his allies to stimulate pressures to restructure the P.L.A.'s asset allocation," Mr. Harold said. The release of the figures may be connected with Mr. Xi's call for the military to improve its capacity to fight and win wars, he said.
HONG KONG — Grief over a Chinese student who was killed in the Boston Marathon bombing rippled across her home country on Wednesday as Internet sites and news reports described and celebrated a young woman whose ambitions for a career in finance were cut harshly short.Boston University and the Chinese Consulate General in New York have said the victim was a graduate student at the college, but the consulate said her family asked that no personal details be disclosed. A classmate, a Chinese university official and a state-run newspaper in her home city have said she was Lu Lingzi, who accompanied a friend to watch the marathon near where the blasts shook the streets.Even without government confirmation that Ms. Lu was one of three people killed in the explosion on Monday, Chinese Internet sites filled with mournful messages about a woman whose aspirations took her from a rust-belt hometown, Shenyang, to Beijing and then the United States. Her account on Weibo, a Twitter-like microblogging service used by tens of millions of people in China, attracted more than 10,000 messages, mostly of condolence, in the hours after the Chinese news media reported her death."You are in heaven now, where there are no bombs," said one message.Ms. Lu, 23, had become interested in Christianity, said a fellow Chinese student at Boston University, Lu Meixu, who is not related but is also from Shenyang.Ms. Lu's own final message on Weibo was posted on Monday. It showed a picture of a bowl of Chinese fried bread and said, "My wonderful breakfast." Ms. Lu, shown on her Weibo page as a petite woman with thick shoulder-length hair, said there that she enjoyed food, music and finance. Other Facebook photos showed her at Toah Nipi, a Christian retreat center in southern New Hampshire.Although China's and the United States' perceptions of each other are often overshadowed by political rancor, Ms. Lu's death gave a melancholy face to the attraction that America and its colleges exert over many young Chinese. More than 194,000 Chinese students were enrolled in American colleges and universities in the 2011-12 academic year, far exceeding any other foreign country, according to the Institute of International Education. And Boston, with its many colleges and the cachet of Harvard and the Massachusetts Institute of Technology, has long been a magnet for them.News of the death of one Chinese student and the injury of another prompted comment from China's top leader, President Xi Jinping, whose own daughter has studied at Harvard.Mr. Xi said he was "extremely concerned" and he passed on messages of comfort to the two students' families, as well as the injured student, the official news agency Xinhua reported. The Chinese government has never publicly confirmed that Mr. Xi's daughter was studying at Harvard, and it is unclear whether she is still enrolled there.Ms. Lu, whose résumé lists a succession of academic achievements and internships with financial firms, appeared to be among the many hoping that an American degree would pave the way to a prestigious job in finance or business. She went to high school in Shenyang, a cradle of state-driven industrialization in northeast China that fell on hard times in the 1990s, and then studied international trade at the Beijing Institute of Technology, and statistics at Boston University, according to her résumé on LinkedIn, a social networking Web site.But Ms. Lu shared more prosaic pleasures and worries with other Chinese students studying in Boston."She said she wanted to have a boyfriend as soon as possible, because her family was worried that if she couldn't find a boyfriend they would have to help," said Lu Meixu, her friend also studying at Boston University. "She hoped she could meet 'the one' as soon as possible."Ming Chen, a 23-year-old graduate student in computer science, met Ms. Lu when they were still in China, preparing to come to Boston to study."She was optimistic, outgoing, and really hard-working," said Mr. Chen. The two shared a love of the rock band Nirvana, he said, adding that she used the group's line "smells like teen spirit" in her profile on QQ, a popular instant-messaging service in China.Ms. Lu's fellow students realized she was missing after the marathon, and members of a Chinese student group fanned out across the city, sending students to hospitals looking for her.By Tuesday night, many students had seen Chinese news media reports saying that Ms. Lu was dead."I still can't believe it. We just finished class, and no one is sitting at her desk," said one of Ms. Lu's classmates, who was clad in black as a symbol of mourning. She asked not to be identified because Boston University had not yet confirmed Ms. Lu's identity, which it later did."We're all statistics students," continued the classmate. "The probability of this happening is so low."
HONG KONG — For much of Thursday, a tale told by a Beijing taxi driver appeared to offer ideal political theater for the Chinese government: a humble cabby took the nation's top leader, Xi Jinping , for an incognito ride and revealed Mr. Xi's yearning to share the pain, and the congested streets, of a frustrated public.Taxis in China's capital are notoriously hard to flag down, but chauffeur-driven officials rarely need a ride, and the chief of the Communist Party even less often. So when Ta Kung Pao, a Hong Kong newspaper loyal to Beijing, published a detailed report about a $4.40 taxi ride that Mr. Xi and a colleague took in early March, chatting with the driver, Guo Lixin, about pollution and other woes, Chinese news Web sites celebrated the story as an example of Mr. Xi's refreshingly down-to-earth style.By the end of the day, however, the state-run news media, which had initially given credence to the story, abruptly reversed course, and the tale was in shreds. The newspaper withdrew the report as false, and it and the news agency Xinhua were pilloried online, leaving China to ask a bizarre question: What does it mean when feel-good propaganda cannot be trusted even on its own fanciful terms?"Real one moment, and bogus the next," a Chinese writer, Cao Junshu, wrote on Sina Weibo, the country's Twitter-like service. "Are you the authority for publishing real news, or fake news?"Xinhua, citing city transportation authorities and the Hong Kong newspaper, at first confirmed the story via a bulletin on Sina Weibo. But a later Xinhua bulletin said the story was false, and Ta Kung Pao removed the report from its Web site."Checking has established that this was a false report, and we feel deeply distressed and extremely regretful about this," the newspaper said in a statement on its Web site. "Such a major case of false news should absolutely never have happened."The taxi ride had appeared to be one in a succession of common-man gestures that Mr. Xi had made since November, when he succeeded Hu Jintao as party leader. In March, Mr. Xi took over as president from Mr. Hu, a stiffly austere politician. Seeking to win over Chinese disenchanted by a political elite that seems aloof, Mr. Xi has demanded an end to banquets paid for by the government, and he has told officials to stop having the police close off roads when the officials travel.Some Chinese at first praised Mr. Xi's reported adventure as a break from the security that swaddles him and other Communist Party leaders. His "incognito trip" quickly dominated many Chinese news Web sites, which cited the Ta Kung Pao report, and The New York Times was among the foreign news media outlets that reported on the story."It looks like Ta Kung Pao was fooled, but why then did Xinhua first say it was true?" said Chen Yongmiao, a rights advocate from Beijing who frequently comments on the Internet. "Fake or real, I think this episode will add to the arguments that Xi shouldn't violate the traditional bureaucratic ways. It will be used to tell him to toe that old line."Ta Kung Pao thought enough of Mr. Xi's purported ride to put up a special Web page, showing a map of the journey and pictures of Mr. Guo's modest brick-and-concrete home in the rural northeastern outskirts of Beijing. The newspaper reported that at first, Mr. Guo did not recognize Mr. Xi."I asked, 'When you take a cab has anyone ever said you look like a certain man?' " Mr. Guo was said to have told the newspaper. " 'Anyone ever said you look like General Secretary Xi?' He listened and laughed and said, 'You're the first taxi driver to recognize me.' "The special site was later taken down. Calls to the company said to operate the taxi driven by Mr. Guo were not answered during the day, and he could not be tracked down. It is possible that Mr. Guo does not exist.Even before the report was taken down, some were skeptical."I don't believe you," Wang Yue, a Beijing cabby, said in an interview after being told of the incognito ride. "There is no way President Xi was taking taxis with only another person."
HONG KONG — The private-equity tycoon Stephen A. Schwarzman, backed by an array of mostly Western blue-chip companies with interests in China, is creating a $300 million scholarship for study in China that he hopes will rival the Rhodes scholarship in prestige and influence.The program, whose endowment represents one of the largest single gifts to education in the world and one of the largest philanthropic gifts ever in China, was announced by Mr. Schwarzman in Beijing on Sunday.The Schwarzman Scholars program will pay all expenses for 200 students each year from around the world for a one-year master's program at Tsinghua University in Beijing.The program's creation underlines the tremendous importance of China and its market to Wall Street financiers and corporate leaders, who have become increasingly anxious as security and economic frictions grow between China and the West.Mr. Schwarzman said his goal was to reduce such tensions by educating the world's future leaders, but his role in the project will also raise his political profile in China, potentially giving him and his private equity firm, the Blackstone Group, increased access to Chinese leaders. Many of them, including Xi Jinping, who became president of China last month, attended Tsinghua, one of the country's top universities.Mr. Schwarzman said he was donating $100 million from his personal fortune, which Forbes estimated last month at $6.5 billion. He said he had raised $100 million from donors, and expected to raise the remaining $100 million by the end of this year.Many of the donors have sprawling business interests in China and frequently deal with government regulators and state-owned enterprises that have wide discretion over the activities of foreign companies.The donors include Boeing, which is aggressively marketing jets in China, the world's second-largest aircraft market, and Caterpillar, which sells earth-moving equipment in what has become the world's largest construction market. They also include JPMorgan Chase, Bank of America and Credit Suisse, which provide financial services to the Chinese government and state-owned banks.The biggest donor after Mr. Schwarzman is BP, which produces and imports natural gas in China and also has joint venture chemical plants and other operations in the country.The personal foundation of MayorMichael R. Bloombergof New York is also a donor. Mr. Bloomberg's media company is trying to lease more news and data terminals to state-owned banks, but it has been stymied by the government since the company's publication last year of an investigation into the financial dealings of Mr. Xi's family.The scholarship's advisory board is a who's who of investors, diplomats and other influential figures, some of whom also have political or financial ties to China. It includes three former secretaries of state, Condoleezza Rice, Colin L. Powelland Henry A. Kissinger; two former treasury secretaries, Robert E. Rubinand Henry M. Paulson Jr.; a number of university presidents and cultural figures, including the cellist Yo-Yo Ma; former President Nicolas Sarkozyof France; and the former prime ministers of three countries, Tony Blair of Britain, Kevin Rudd of Australia and Brian Mulroney of Canada.Many large Western companies have been pressing for closer ties with China even as security experts warn about China's military expansion and territorial claims, and many smaller businesses and labor groups warn that China seeks to dominate a wide range of industries.Mr. Schwarzman said his concern was that as long as the Chinese economy grows two to three times as quickly as the American economy, and with European economies barely growing at all, tensions are likely only to rise."The idea was to deal with this problem in a generational manner," he said in a video interview from New York, adding later in an e-mail, "I feel grateful to be able to have the resources to help change future leaders to impact their countries' and China's destinies."The program plans to take in 10,000 students over the next 50 years, forming an international network that can bridge differences between China and the West, he said. Forty-five percent will come from the United States, 20 percent from China, and 35 percent from Australia, Canada, Europe, Latin America and the rest of Asia. Africa may be added later.The scholarship program will not be Mr. Schwarzman's first major foray into China, where private equity firms like his have been trying to gain entry. In 2007, as he was preparing to take Blackstone public, he sold a $3 billion stake in the company to the China Investment Corporation, the country's giant sovereign wealth fund. The deal stirred controversy in China when the value of the stake plunged, along with most stocks, during the global financial crisis, drawing vehement criticism among some Chinese. Chinese leaders brushed off the concerns, and the stock has since nearly recovered when dividends are included.
YUXI, China — Many residents of this tiny village in the mountainous region of southwest China spent Saturday night in tents and makeshift shelters, too scared to sleep in their flimsy homes after an earthquake killed 188 people early that morning.Roofs buckled, walls tumbled and windows broke after the earthquake shook houses and sent boulders tumbling down mountain sides onto the narrow road that leads into this valley of Lushan County near the epicenter of the earthquake, which Chinese authorities said had a preliminary magnitude of 7.The aftermath was not nearly as serious as the 7.9-magnitude earthquake in 2008 that left more than 70,000 people dead in the Wenchuan area. But villagers who work in Chengdu, about 100 miles away, streamed back home Sunday morning, many on foot, the lucky ones on motorbikes, to check on their homes.Song Yuanqing, 43, a construction worker, arrived back after a 22-hour trip to find his roof and the walls unstable. "We would like to do something, but we can't do anything," Mr. Song said as he sat with neighbors around an outdoor fire built by the village leader in his backyard. Some people had slept under the machinery at a lumber yard. The village leader, Gao Zaimeng, said his house — a two-story concrete structure that is one of the best in town — shook violently. "More violent than in 2008," he said. Although his house was intact, he was too nervous to risk sleeping or cooking inside, he said.About 50 soldiers attached to the People's Liberation Army's regional headquarters in Chengdu marched in formation along the main village street, armed with shovels and picks to help shore up buildings. In all, the government deployed about 7,000 soldiers and People's Armed Police officers to the affected area. By Saturday evening, there were so many rescue workers in the area that the government asked volunteers to stop coming.China's prime minister, Li Keqiang, perhaps mindful of the criticism of the rescue efforts in 2008, flew to the area and slept in a tent on Saturday evening in Lushan County.The earthquake shook Sichuan Province at 8 a.m., when people were rising a little later than usual because schools and universities were closed."We were just getting up and getting dressed in our dormitory when the building shook, and I looked outside from our seventh-floor window and saw a row of houses collapsed," Xu Yan, 22, a student at the Agricultural University in Ya'an, said in a telephone interview. "I have never flown down the stairs so fast."The Chinese government said early Sunday that the known death toll was 174, with most of the victims in Ya'an. The ministry also said that about 5,700 people had been injured.The United States Geological Survey said that the earthquake occurred on the Longmenshan fault line, the same one responsible for the 2008 quake. But more than 12 hours after the initial tremor, the impact seemed to be far less severe.Chinese radio quoted an unnamed official who said, "We have a basic grasp of the overall disaster situation, and there won't be thousands or tens of thousands of fatalities."Rescue efforts were hampered by landslides, and officials expressed concern about two barrier lakes that had formed after debris blocked two waterways.The tremors were felt in Chengdu, one of China's biggest cities and the capital of Sichuan Province. Residents described water spilling out of home aquariums and objects like home water dispensers falling to the floor.Yang Yubing, an executive at a sculpture factory in Baoxing County, one of the hardest-hit areas, said he was visiting Chengdu when he felt the tremors. He immediately left on a seven-hour drive to his home in Baoxing. But emergency workers stopped him when he got close to his apartment, Mr. Yang said. "They said five or six kilometers of roads were collapsed," he said in a telephone interview. "We are all living in temporary tents in the school." Badly injured people were taken to hospitals by helicopter, he said.In the town of Longmen, another hard-hit area within Ya'an's jurisdiction, a resident, Zhang Yan, said 90 percent of the buildings had collapsed."About 100 people died around here," Ms. Zhang said in a telephone interview. "Rescue crews have not yet arrived. There is no water or electricity."Xinhua quoted a hospital official who said scores of injured people were sprawled in front of the county hospital on Saturday afternoon. Firefighters in Lushan County pulled 27 survivors from collapsed buildings, Xinhua said.The 2008 quake raised questions about poorly constructed schools that collapsed and killed thousands of students.That earthquake prompted an extensive official relief effort and a passionate outpouring of volunteer help. But some quake-stricken residents and observers criticized the government for sending rescue efforts to the wrong places, or for failing to muster the equipment needed to lift victims from under slabs of concrete and brick. Instead, many troops and rescuers clambered over the rubble with sticks and spades.This time, the government appears intent on avoiding any accusations of lagging behindIn 2008, officials restricted independent reporting on the disaster, but Ran Wang, a businessman, said he hoped officials would allow greater transparency. "No censorship, no cover-ups or control so the right of the people and society to be informed during natural disasters is respected," he wrote on his microblog account.The Longmenshan fault line, which runs between the Tibetan plateau and Sichuan Basin, is seismically active. Twelve earthquakes with a magnitude of 5 or greater have occurred along the fault line since 1900, said Jiang Haikun, an official with the China Earthquake Administration.Sichuan Province is also one of China's best-known habitats for pandas, and at the Bifengxia reserve, about six miles north of Ya'an, workers said that 20 pandas in the park were safe. "We inspected the panda area after the quake, and they were unaffected," said Chen Yong, the media relations officer of the reserve.
BEIJING — The Chinese authorities have detained six anticorruption activists in recent days, expanding their crackdown on a citizen-led campaign that, on the surface at least, would appear to dovetail with the new leadership's war on official graft.The detained activists, who include seasoned dissidents and a prominent rights lawyer, had been demanding that senior Communist Party officials publicly disclose their personal wealth, according to lawyers and rights advocates.The campaign, started late last year with a petition drive that garnered thousands of signatures, has tried to piggyback on a pledge by President Xi Jinping to clean up the endemic corruption he says poses an existential threat to the ruling Communist Party.In widely quoted comments published in January, Mr. Xi promised to take down "tigers and flies" — a reference to high-ranking officials and middling bureaucrats — but the public clamor for mandatory asset disclosure has so far received a tepid response from Chinese leaders.The campaign, called the New Citizens Movement by its organizers, has picked up steam in the five weeks since Mr. Xi consolidated power by adding the title of president to his other titles, Communist Party general secretary and chairman of the Central Military Commission.The change in leadership, the first in a decade, has given liberals hope, however faint, that Mr. Xi will shake up the status quo by increasing government transparency.On March 31, a small group of anticorruption activists unfurled banners at a plaza in central Beijing, a move that quickly drew the police. Three of those arrested are still in custody, and a fourth was released on bail for health reasons, his lawyer said Friday. All four are charged with illegal assembly, a crime that carries a potential five-year sentence.Of those arrested last week, four are still being held, according to their lawyers, who said the police had raided the homes of at least two detainees and confiscated laptops, video cameras and other items.The arrests have both infuriated and disappointed reformers and human rights advocates, who say the crackdown bodes ill for Mr. Xi's widely trumpeted war on graft. "The party promised to publish officials' assets 30 years ago, something it has yet to do," said Xu Zhiyong, a lawyer and founder of the New Citizens Movement who is being held under house arrest. "Clearly the government is afraid of this demand."The men arrested last week include Zhao Changqing, a democracy advocate who has been jailed several times in the past; Ding Jiaxi, a human rights lawyer; and two activists, Sun Hanhui and Wang Yonghong. All four are being held at Beijing No. 3 Detention Center, lawyers for the men said.According to Chinese Human Rights Defenders, a nongovernmental organization based in Washington, the whereabouts of two other activists, Qi Yueying and Li Wei, were unknown on Friday.Liang Xiaojun, a lawyer who represents several of those detained, said prison officials would allow him to see only one of the detainees, claiming that the others were still being interrogated by the police. "I doubt this case will go through normal procedures," he said. "Can you imagine a trial for a group of activists who demanded that government officials disclose their assets? I don't see that trial happening."Analysts say the crackdown on dissent, coupled with newly announced media restrictions and the absence of any new anticorruption initiatives, are gnawing away at any hopes that Mr. Xi will embrace the rule of law and clean government."These arrests do nothing to dispel the widely held opinion that public office is in essence a way to accumulate illegal wealth," said Nicholas Bequelin, a senior researcher at Human Rights Watch in Hong Kong. "If the party is serious about rooting out corruption, it needs to stop placing itself above the law."
BEIJING — The devastating earthquake that struck southwest China over the weekend has drawn a flood of donations from across the country.But in contrast to the pattern after a major quake in the same region five years ago, those eager to bolster relief efforts are looking to donate to private charity organizations, not to official groups that now have a reputation for corruption.The Red Cross Society of China, a state-run organization that is one of the country's largest charities, has yet to recover from a 2011 scandal that struck a serious blow to China's nascent notions of philanthropy, especially efforts guided by the government."Compared to the opaque system that most state-supported charity organizations have, nongovernmental organizations and the newly emerged so-called microcharities follow a more transparent system," said Deng Guosheng, the director of the NGO Research Center at Tsinghua University in Beijing.On its microblog, the Red Cross said that as of 5 p.m. Sunday, it had received more than $10 million. One private group, Sina Microcharities, reported collecting more than $13 million, according to Global Times, a state-run newspaper.On Monday, relief and rescue efforts continued in the broad area around Ya'an in Lushan County of Sichuan Province, the epicenter of an earthquake that struck Saturday morning with a magnitude that the United States measured at 6.6. The Ministry of Civil Affairs announced Monday that at least 188 people had been killed, while 25 were missing and nearly 12,000 had been injured. The quake had affected 1.72 million people, the ministry said. Rescuers on foot finally reached Baoxing County, the area hardest hit by the quake, at 1 p.m. Monday.The Civil Affairs Ministry also "asked charity groups to regulate donations intended for Sichuan, calling for transparency and social supervision," according to China Daily, an English-language newspaper. It said the ministry had issued a statement that said groups organizing donation drives for victims "should publicize information about their activities and donation incomes in accordance with existing regulations."China has a few flashy philanthropists, most notably the recycling magnate Chen Guangbiao, and a handful of prominent private charities, including One Foundation, founded by Jet Li, the kung fu film star. But the notion of giving to worthy causes is less widespread than in the West. In 2010, Warren Buffett and Bill Gates flew to Beijing to encourage philanthropy and invited a select group of tycoons to meet with them; some declined to attend.But in times of disaster, there are always individuals who rush to give aid. Such was the case with Li Chengpeng, a writer in Sichuan and frequent critic of Communist Party policies. On his microblog, Mr. Li, who was a volunteer relief worker after the 2008 quake, wrote about the experience of organizing donations to the stricken area around Ya'an over the weekend. He said his team delivered 498 tents and 1,250 quilts to the village of Wuxing on Sunday.The high point of recent Chinese philanthropy was touched off by the 2008 earthquake, which ravaged large sections of Sichuan and nearby provinces. About 90,000 people were killed or went missing, and many more were injured. Entire villages were wiped out.Many Chinese traveled to Sichuan to volunteer. Charities were inundated with donations. By February 2011, the Red Cross Society of China, a member of the International Federation of Red Cross and Red Crescent Societies, had received about $650 million in donations from within China and abroad for that quake, according to a report on the Web site of the official China News Service.But the Red Cross became a pariah in the eyes of many Chinese after a scandal two years ago that centered on Guo Meimei, a 20-year-old woman who had posted photographs of herself online posing next to Italian sports cars, hoarding Hermès handbags and flying in business-class cabins. She said on her microblog that she was the "commercial general manager" at the Red Cross. People speculated about whether she had gotten her title by being the mistress of a top Red Cross official. She became the most talked-about subject on the Chinese Internet during those months, and her name invariably comes up in discussions of philanthropy here.As a result, Chinese are saying on microblogs and other forums that people who want to give to current relief efforts in Sichuan should, without a doubt, avoid the Red Cross."It is so sad to see how much a state-run charity organization is struggling; the Red Cross in China evidently has a very low credibility," wrote Xu Shaolin, a frequent commentator on societal issues and politics, on his microblog.Global Times said in its report on Monday that distrust of the Red Cross had driven many people to make donations through microblog services started by private Internet companies. One of those services, Sina Microcharities, which began operations in February, had started 29 relief projects by Sunday for Ya'an with the help of individuals and institutions. For those efforts, Sina had collected $13 million from more than 60,000 Internet users, Global Times reported.Liao Dong, the founder of an online gaming company, donated about $147,000 to one of the projects. He told Global Times that he had chosen that charity because it was "more transparent."The Red Cross Society of China declined to comment for this article. Zhao Baige, an executive vice president at the organization, told a reporter from Southern Metropolis Daily that there were may online critics who had deep-rooted misunderstandings and prejudices toward the group.
HONG KONG — Growth in China's important factory sector slowed in April, a closely watched monthly index released Tuesday showed, adding to concerns that the pace of overall economic growth in China may be faltering.The index, which was based on a survey of purchasing managers in the manufacturing sector and was released by HSBC, was 50.5 points for April. That exceeded 50, the level that separates expansion from contraction, but fell below the 51.6 points recorded for March.The release is one of the earliest measures of business activity available for April and appears to indicate that an unexpected growth slowdown in the first quarter may be continuing into the second.China's first-quarter growth data, released by the authorities in Beijing last week, surprised analysts who said they had thought that the economy picked up speed in January, February and March. Instead, expansion slowed to 7.7 percent, down from 7.9 percent the previous quarter.The manufacturing survey released Tuesday reinforced the view that the pace of growth was unlikely to pick up again in the current quarter."The overall message" from the release "is that there was some improvement in the manufacturing sector" around the start of the fourth quarter of 2012, but that "the momentum then stalled" in the first quarter of this year, wrote Yao Wei, China economist at Société Générale in Hong Kong.Investors, unnerved by the disappointing reading, sent the mainland China stock market down 2.6 percent on Tuesday. In Hong Kong, the Hang Seng Index fell 1.1 percent.Weakening demand for exports bears part of the blame. Orders for new exports contracted in April after rebounding in March, suggesting that external demand for China's exporters remained weak, Qu Hongbin, an HSBC economist who specializes in China, said.Weaker overall demand has also started to weigh on employment in the manufacturing sector and is likely to prompt Beijing to respond with efforts to increase domestic investment and consumption, Mr. Qu added in a statement accompanying the index.
BEIJING — The new strain of avian influenza that has infected more than 100 people in China in the last two months has, for the first time, been reported outside mainland China.Officials in Taiwan reported one case in a 53-year-old Taiwanese citizen who traveled regularly to the Chinese city of Suzhou for work, where he probably contracted the virus. He fell ill on April 12, three days after returning to Taiwan. Tests revealed on Wednesday that he was infected with the H7N9 bird flu virus. As of Tuesday, Chinese officials had reported 108 cases and 22 deaths from the new flu.The case has set off alarms in Taiwan, where the Central Epidemic Command Center says that it has "continued to strengthen surveillance and fever screening of travelers arriving from China."The patient in Taiwan, described as severely ill, is being treated in a special isolation room, and 139 people who had contact with him — including 110 health workers — are being watched for symptoms. So far, there is no evidence that any have contracted the disease, which has not been found to spread from person to person.Officials elsewhere in the region are increasingly jittery about the spread of the virus from China. On Wednesday, Japan said it was racing to make changes that would essentially allow local governments to consign bird flu patients or suspected patients to hospitals, and order them to stay away from their workplaces. The Japanese government took similar precautions during epidemics of the H5N1 and severe acute respiratory syndrome, or SARS, viruses in the last decade.Hong Kong, scarred by an outbreak of SARS in 2003 that started with an infected visitor from mainland China and that killed 299 Hong Kong residents, has also been making preparations. Concerns have focused on the annual influx of vacationers from all over mainland China next week during the annual May Day holiday. But with nearly three dozen flights arriving on a typical day from Shanghai during the rest of the year, the possibility of the disease spreading has been a worry for health policy makers.The Hong Kong government has put on standby several hundred hospital beds specially designed after SARS for the isolation and treatment of highly infectious respiratory diseases. A system of infrared scanners operating at the territory's borders ever since the SARS outbreak checks arrivals for fever, and nurses take aside anyone who seems sick for further questioning and sometimes testing.In a news conference Wednesday in Beijing, a World Health Organization official described this type of bird flu as "unusually dangerous."The virus is "definitely one of the most lethal influenza viruses we've seen," said Dr. Keiji Fukuda, an assistant director general at the World Health Organization."The potential development of human-to-human spread cannot be ruled out," the health organization said in a statement.In the United States, scientists at the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention have received samples of the virus from China and have shared them with five other laboratories to study the virus and work on a vaccine.Health officials in the United States have not advised against travel to China.Scientists think people catch the virus from poultry, not from other humans. But if it could spread among people, a deadly pandemic could result. Researchers say it is worrisome that the new virus may be better than other types of bird flu at jumping from birds to humans.The H5N1 bird flu virus, which emerged about a decade ago, has killed 371 people, nearly 60 percent of the 622 known to be infected since 2003, according to the World Health Organization. Because of its apparently high death rate, that virus touched off global fears of a lethal pandemic and led to the slaughter of millions of birds. But it could not be stamped out.The patient in Taiwan said he had not been exposed to birds or eaten undercooked poultry or eggs. Cases like his have puzzled scientists and led some to suspect that an animal other than birds is harboring the virus and spreading it to humans. But so far no other animals have been found to be infected.
BEIJING — After three days of talks here, America's top military officer said Wednesday that he believed China wanted to limit the nuclear ambitions of North Korea but that it remained unclear how China would work toward that goal.Contrary to suggestions by some in the United States that China is not interested in solving the North Korean problem, Gen. Martin E. Dempsey, the chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, said the "Chinese leadership is as concerned as we are with North Korea's march toward nuclearization and ballistic missile technology.""And they have given us an assurance that they are working on it, as we are." He added, "But I didn't gain any insights into particularly how they would do that."General Dempsey met Tuesday with the Chinese leadership, including President Xi Jinping and Gen. Fan Changlong, the vice chairman of the Central Military Commission, which runs the Chinese Army, Navy and Air Force.They were the most senior-level talks between the American and Chinese militaries in nearly two years. Because of the long gap in direct communication, and the growing distrust between the two sides over China's fast military modernization and assertive behavior in the East China and South China Seas, General Dempsey arrived with a major set of issues concerning China's military behavior.As a symbol of how China's maritime power is growing, a senior Chinese military officer announced Tuesday in the middle of General Dempsey's visit that China would build a second aircraft carrier and that it would be more sophisticated than the first carrier launched last year. The officer, Song Xue, deputy chief of staff of the Chinese Navy, said the "next aircraft carrier we need will be larger and carry more fighters."At a news conference with reporters based in China, General Dempsey said he warned the Chinese military leaders that the United States would abide by its alliance with Japan in the dispute between China and Japan over who owns the islands known as the Senkaku by Japan and the Diaoyu by China.Chinese vessels have been challenging Japanese ships off the islands, which are administered by Japan, since the dispute erupted in September. Xi Jinping, who was vice president at the time, advised the United States to keep out of the argument.On Tuesday, eight Chinese patrol ships approached the islands, the largest contingent to appear at one time since September. The Chinese news agency, Xinhua, said the Chinese ships had forced Japanese fishing boats out of the waters around the islands.Western defense analysts have said the Chinese continue to send surveillance vessels close by the islands to test whether the United States will live up to its alliance obligations with Japan.General Dempsey said he left no doubt in his discussions with Chinese officials that "we do have certain treaty obligations with Japan that we would honor."On the contentious issue of cyberattacks, General Dempsey said he asked the Chinese "to put a team of their best and brightest" together to work with the Americans on seeking rules of conduct on computer security.In the past month, the Obama administration has criticized China for what it calls mounting evidence that the Chinese military was involved in the widespread theft of data from American computer networks, particularly those of American corporations.China's leadership appears to have heard the Obama administration's admonitions that it will not tolerate the practice of cyberattacks aimed at intellectual property and gaining commercial secrets from American businesses, American officials say.The Chinese agreed during a recent visit of Secretary of State John Kerry to join a "cyber working group" with the Americans. "There has to be some kind of code of conduct established," General Dempsey said.But the Chinese apparently did not give any answers to General Dempsey on whether they intended to stop these activities, as specifically requested by the Obama administration.At the start of General Dempsey's visit on Monday, a senior Chinese general, Fang Fenghui, said that breaches in cybersecurity could result in as much damage as a nuclear attack.
HONG KONG — Chinese prosecutors on Wednesday ordered two relatives of a prominent human rights advocate who lives in exile in the United States to face questioning over allegations that they harbored a criminal, in what one family member considered to be retaliation against the activist's stepped-up criticism of the government.The activist, Chen Guangcheng, won international fame in 2012 by escaping from house arrest after being held for a year and a half in Dongshigu, in Shandong Province in eastern China. Although blind, he evaded rings of guards and surveillance cameras and clambered over walls to reach supporters.After his escape, Mr. Chen took refuge in the American Embassy in Beijing. He left after the Chinese government agreed to let him study at a university and to investigate his complaints that officials and their hired guards had brutally abused him and his family. Worried about reprisals, however, Mr. Chen changed his mind and asked to go to the United States; he is now studying in New York, accompanied by his wife and two children.While Mr. Chen is safe abroad, he has said that Chinese officials and thugs have subjected his relatives in Shandong to retaliation and harassment, including recently throwing rocks and dead poultry at one brother's home. His nephew Chen Kegui was sentenced to three years and three months in jail in November for assaulting and injuring one of the officials who stormed into his home in April searching for the escaped Mr. Chen. Now, a year later, Chen Kegui's mother and an uncle face more interrogation over the episode.The mother, Ren Zongju, and the uncle, Chen Guangjun — a brother of Chen Guangcheng — were told by prosecutors in Yinan County, which includes Dongshigu, to answer questions about whether they "harbored a criminal" by helping Chen Kegui before his capture."I think that this is really about Guangcheng," said Ms. Ren's husband, Chen Guangfu. "I've heard that he spoke at the U.S. Congress and leveled accusations against officials. In my view, that infuriated them."On April 9, Chen Guangcheng testified before a House subcommittee. He said his relatives in China faced persecution, and he called on lawmakers to obtain and disclose details of the deal that the United States and Chinese governments reached about his treatment.Ms. Ren said prosecutors questioned her for more than an hour, focusing on 1,000 renminbi in cash, equal to $162, that she handed to her son before he left home. The family says that he was not trying to evade the police and that he was acting in self-defense."They were interested only in what suited them," Ms. Ren said. "I told them I'd done nothing wrong. I noticed that they didn't take any notes when I described how I was beaten by the guards."The uncle, Chen Guangjun, received a telephone call to attend a similar session, but he said that by the time he arrived at the police station, the officials had left for the day, and that he would go back on Thursday. Both he and Ms. Ren were questioned by the police about the case last year and were released.Ms. Ren and her husband said the prosecutors' latest step made it likely that she would soon face trial. But Ding Xikui, a Beijing lawyer who represents their jailed son, said being called in for questioning did not amount to a decision to prosecute.Calls to the Yinan County prosecutors' office were not answered after working hours, when word of the questioning of Chen Guangcheng's relatives spread among Chinese human rights advocates.Mr. Chen, 41, taught himself law and won nationwide attention through campaigns on behalf of farmers and disabled citizens. But officials turned on him after he took up the complaints of thousands of women forcibly sterilized by the family planning authorities. In 2006, he was sentenced to 51 months in jail on charges of wrecking property and assembling a crowd to disrupt traffic, charges that he said were concocted to silence him.Chen Guangfu and his wife, Ms. Ren, said they had also recently been upset by several threatening acts, including the throwing of dead chickens and ducks at their home — at a time when Chinese people are worried about avian flu — and the lobbing of rocks and bottles onto their roof late in the night. Mr. Chen said that he had reported the episodes to the police, but that no suspects had been caught.
BEIJING — One of France's wealthiest businessmen has agreed to return to China two bronze animal heads that were looted from the imperial Summer Palace near Beijing by invading French and British troops in the 19th century, according to a report on Friday by China Radio International, a state news organization. To China, the looting of the palace epitomizes the humiliation it suffered at the hands of imperial Western powers during the Second Opium War.The offer to return the heads came from François-Henri Pinault, one of 60 high-powered Frenchmen who are accompanying the French president,François Hollande, this week on his first visit to China. Mr. Hollande is seeking to strengthen diplomatic and trade relations with China, and also brought eight cabinet ministers.Mr. Hollande has received a warm welcome since landing in Beijing on Thursday. The previous French president, Nicolas Sarkozy, angered Chinese leaders after he met with the Dalai Lama, the exiled Tibetan spiritual leader, in 2008, months after a widespread Tibetan uprising in western China."It is easy to forget, watching China emerge as a great power, that the legacy of humiliation at the hands of modern imperialist aggressors back in the 19th century retains a palpable sense of immediacy even today," said John Delury, a historian at Yonsei University in Seoul who, with Orville Schell, is writing a book on China's quest for wealth and power. "So what might seem a rather obscure gesture of returning a pair of bronze animal heads takes on outsized significance as a kind of restitution of historical justice, a long-awaited righting of wrongs to the Chinese nation."The bronzes emerged as a point of contention between China and France in 2009, when Christie's auction house handled the sale of the French fashion designer Yves Saint Laurent's vast art collection after his death. Mr. Pinault is the chief executive officer of Kering, the company that owns Christie's.After China failed to block the sale legally, a Chinese businessman made successful bids totaling about $40 million for the heads, then refused to pay, citing national pride.According to Mr. Pinault's company, Mr. Pinault acquired them himself and decided to return them to China, which just this month decided to allow Christie's to become the first international auction house to operate independently on the mainland. Mr. Pinault told Chinese officials that the heads would be returned by the second half of this year.The State Administration of Cultural Heritage in China said Mr. Pinault's offer was "an expression of friendship toward the Chinese people," according to a state news report."The Chinese side offers its high praise for this action and considers that it conforms with the spirit of relevant international cultural heritage protection treaties," the government agency said.The two bronzes, a rat head and a rabbit head, were among 12 animal heads, replicating the Chinese zodiac, in a central fountain clock at the palace, spewing water to tell time. All disappeared after the palace, also known as Yuanmingyuan and used by rulers of the Qing dynasty, was destroyed by Western troops in 1860.So iconic are the animal heads that Ai Weiwei, the rebel artist, made a sculpture with versions of all 12. Typical of Mr. Ai, the sculpture was constructed with a sense of irony. It was first displayed in May 2011 at the Pulitzer Fountain in front of the Plaza Hotel in Manhattan while Mr. Ai was being illegally detained in Beijing by security forces, and it quickly came to symbolize the constant conflict in China over issues of free speech.The China Poly Group, a state-owned enterprise with ties to the People's Liberation Army that has a museum and theater in Beijing, has acquired several of the animal heads, but the owners and locations of the rest remain unknown.Mr. Pinault, 50, is the son of Kering's founder,François Pinault, an art collector. The gift was from the Pinault family. The company has significant stakes in China, where some of its fashion brands, like Gucci, are doing well.France has a significant trade deficit with China and wants more Chinese investment. But the French president is under some pressure to raise human rights issues with the new Communist Party leadership. Mr. Hollande doled out his criticisms more freely when he was simply the leader of the Socialist Party.Mr. Hollande wants to reassure the Chinese that his government will protect the security of Chinese tourists in France and intends to discuss making it easier for Chinese to obtain visas.Mr. Sarkozy had tendentious relations with Beijing after the meeting with the Dalai Lama in 2008. Relations deteriorated that year when Western and Tibetan protesters interrupted the Olympic torch relay when it passed through Paris on the way to Beijing.Tensions eased just before France took the presidency of the Group of 20 in 2010. Ties became strained again when France criticized China's reluctance to support the battle against Col.Muammar el-Qaddafi, the Libyan dictator.
HONG KONG — Deflation remains firmly entrenched in Japan, figures showed on Friday, despite optimistic forecasts from the country's central bank, highlighting that there are no quick fixes for one of the world's largest economies.Prime Minister Shinzo Abe, who took office last December, has made the fight against deflation — the damaging decline in prices, profits and wages that has dogged Japan for most of the last 15 years — a central tenet of his economic policy. At his urging, the central bank committed to a target of 2 percent annual inflation, considered by many economists a healthy level.On Friday, the central bank, the Bank of Japan, under the leadership of its new governor, Haruhiko Kuroda, put a date on that target: 2015 or early 2016."Various indicators are showing signs that inflation expectations are heightening as a trend," Mr. Kuroda said in a news conference on Friday, Reuters reported. "Business and household sentiment is improving.""Japan's economy has stopped weakening and has shown some signs of picking up," the Bank of Japan said in its economic report. "Looking ahead, it is expected to return to a moderate recovery path around mid-2013." The bank cited a likely improvement in domestic demand as the increased money supply and other economic measures announced took effect.The central bank also raised its growth forecasts for this year and the next. The bank said the economy would gradually accelerate to 1.6 percent growth in the fiscal year that ends in March 2016.The optimistic projections were made as worse-than-expected economic data for March was released by the statistics bureau. Core consumer prices, which exclude food, fell 0.5 percent compared with March 2012, the fifth consecutive month of year-on-year declines.The news added to the doubts of some economists that Japan's grinding deflationary era would end soon. The figure "offered another reminder that deflationary pressures remain strong," Izumi Devalier, Japan economist at HSBC, wrote in a research note. Although a gradual escape from deflation is expected, thanks in part to higher energy prices, she said the inflation rate was unlikely to match what she called the Bank of Japan's "optimistic projections."The hurdle for reaching the inflation target is "getting higher," Miwako Nakamura, an economist at J. P. Morgan, wrote in a research note.Shortly after Mr. Kuroda took the top job at the central bank this month, it announced unexpectedly bold steps aimed at reinvigorating economic and price growth. The bank committed to inflating the economy by aggressively doubling its holdings of government bonds in two years. Mr. Kuroda described the program as "monetary easing in an entirely new dimension." It was widely heralded as a marked change from incremental steps pursued by his predecessors.The financial markets have welcomed Mr. Abe's and Mr. Kuroda's joint efforts. The Nikkei 225-stock index has risen 30 percent since the start of the year, while the yen has fallen 14 percent against the dollar — much to the relief of Japanese exporters, for whom a weaker yen is welcome as it makes their goods relatively cheaper abroad.Several Japanese corporate giants, including Honda, Toyota and Canon, have cited the weaker yen as a reason for improved earnings and outlooks in recent days.Honda said its net profit for the financial year that ended in March was up 73.6 percent at 367.15 billion yen, or $3.75 billion, according to Reuters. Mazda recorded a yearly net profit of 34.3 billion yen, after a 107.7 billion yen loss in the previous year.Growth strategies aimed at stimulating private investment are the most important of the policy arrows in Mr. Abe's quiver, Kunihiko Sugio, chief investment officer at Invesco Japan, said in a recent research note.This "arrow," he added, "is still in Abe's hand waiting to be fired."
SHANGHAI — Lin Lu remembers the day last December when a Chinese businessman showed up at the car dealership he works for in north China and paid for a new BMW 5 Series Gran Turismo — entirely in cash."He drove here with two friends in a beat-up Honda," Mr. Lin recalled. "One of his friends carried about $60,000 in a big white bag, and the buyer had the rest in a heavy black backpack."Lugging nearly $130,000 in cash into a dealership might sound bizarre, but it's not exactly uncommon in China, where hotel bills, jewelry purchases and even the lecture fees for visiting scholars are routinely settled with thick wads of renminbi, China's currency.This is a country, after all, where home buyers make down payments with trunks filled with cash. And big-city law firms have been known to hire armored cars to deliver the cash needed to pay monthly salaries.For all China's modern trappings — the new superhighways, high-speed rail networks and soaring skyscrapers — analysts say this country still prefers to pay for things the old-fashioned way, with ledgers, bill-counting machines and cold, hard cash.Many experts say it is not a refusal to enter the 21st century as much as wariness, of the government toward its citizens and vice versa.Doing business in China takes a lot of cash because Chinese authorities refuse to print any bill larger than the 100-renminbi note. That's equivalent to $16. Since 1988, the 100-renminbi note, graced by Mao Zedong's visage, has been the largest note in circulation, even though the economy has grown fiftyfold. (The country's national icon, Chairman Mao, appears on nearly every note: the 1-, 5-, 10-, 20, 50- and 100- renminbi note.)Chinese economists and government officials often suggest that printing larger denomination notes might fuel inflation. But there is another reason."I'm convinced the government doesn't want a larger bill because of corruption," said Nicholas R. Lardy, a leading authority on the Chinese economy at the Peterson Institute for International Economics in Washington, noting that it would help facilitate corrupt payments to officials. "Instead of trunks filled with cash bribes you'd have people using envelopes. And there'd be more cash leaving the country."All the buying, bribing and hoarding forces China to print a lot of paper money. China, which a millennium ago was the first government to print paper money, accounts for about 40 percent of all global paper currency output, according to a report published by the China Banknote Printing and Minting Corporation. Adjusting for the size of its economy, China has about five times as much cash in circulation as the United States.In the United States, the highest denomination printed is $100; in Japan, it is the 10,000-yen note, worth about $100; the 500 is the highest-denomination euro note, worth about $650. No major economy has limited itself to such a low denominated bill as China.By making the 100-renminbi note the largest bill, the nation's citizens need more of it to buy a television or Swiss watch, never mind a car, home or a yacht, which China's state-run media said was bought a few years ago by men bearing two suitcases filled with cash.Following those paper bills as they course through this booming economy offers a fascinating glimpse into how China's financial system works, and how parts of the country remain stuck in yesteryear."In large parts of China, it still looks like the U.S. in the 1950s: most everything is in cash," said Jeffrey R. Williams, executive director of the Harvard Center Shanghai and a former bank executive who has worked in China for more than 30 years. "In the U.S., you might have one bill-counting machine at a bank, but here every teller has one."Although China's coastal cities have flourished during the 30 years of economic prosperity, economists say the country's interior remains poor and disconnected from the more modern aspects of the financial grid. As a result, the poor prefer to do business in cash.
HANGZHOU, China — A photograph in the official newspaper of the People's Liberation Army over the weekend showed a grinning military officer standing proudly in his green uniform, as if he had single-handedly repelled a foreign invasion.What he had accomplished was getting a new license plate, which he held aloft under a headline that said: "Holding a new license plate, sense of responsibility in heart."In their latest attempt at cracking down on corruption, Chinese leaders are taking aim at license plates, specifically those on military vehicles. The military is issuing new plates and generally excluding luxury cars from receiving them. As of Wednesday, all military vehicles were supposed to have the new plates.The campaign has ignited significant interest because many Chinese complain about regular abuses of privilege by people driving cars with military plates — speeding through traffic, taking the emergency lane and running red lights, for instance.Police officers generally do not stop cars with military plates. Drivers with the plates can also avoid paying road tolls and parking fees. Because of the privileges attached to them, military officers have been known to sell them or pass them on to friends and relatives. An entire industry has arisen devoted to the creation and sale of counterfeit military plates."It is hoped that the new license plate policy will help to reduce such irregularities and dispel public anger resulting from military license plate abuses and other forms of corruption," said an article by Xinhua, the state news agency.Cars that will not receive military plates unless they are officially purchased as military equipment include models made by Bentley, BMW, Mercedes-Benz, Jaguar, Porsche and Land Rover, Gen. Zhao Keshi, director of the army's General Logistics Department, said in an earlier Xinhua report. Private vehicles and those of local officials will be ineligible for the new plates, he said, and anyone caught leasing, lending or stealing the new plates will be punished.Southern Daily, an official newspaper in Guangdong Province, reported in 2011 that real military plates good for six years can sell for nearly $45,000, while fake ones can go for about $100.Chinese leaders have tried introducing new military plates before, but abuses have grown. Luxury sedans with military plates are spotted with frequency on city streets. Chinese take photos of the vehicles and post them online, which inspires vitriol against the army.The military plates campaign, announced this year, is being attributed to Xi Jinping, the new leader of China. Mr. Xi, who is also chairman of the Central Military Commission, has made fighting corruption a hallmark of the early months of his administration. Corruption is one of the main sources of animus directed by Chinese at the Communist Party. Mr. Xi has said corruption threatens the very existence of the party — and that he will pursue both "tigers and flies."Burnishing the military's image is part of that campaign. Under Mao Zedong, the army had a reputation for honorable conduct and ascetic living, in contrast to the reputed decadence of officers of the Kuomintang, which the Communists fought to take over China. But in recent years, military officers have become known for a high-flying lifestyle.Xinhua said replacing the military plates was only "a starting point for the military and government to curb corruption.""Those who use military vehicles must follow the government's call to improve their work style, reduce extravagance and cultivate a more frugal and hard-working image," Xinhua said.The military began issuing the new plates on Sunday. That day, the People's Liberation Army Daily ran an op-ed article by Xin Shihong that said: "In this age of the Internet, the moment a military car drives out of the barracks, its every move is under public scrutiny. Every word and action of the driver and passengers are carefully monitored."In Beijing, a resident of a complex of high-end apartments known as Central Park said military plates on luxury cars had once been common, but the plates had mostly disappeared after the policy was announced.China is a huge and growing market for luxury carmakers, and it is unclear how the new policy on military plates and the general crackdown on wasteful spending by officials will affect the market. Stephen Green, head of Greater China research for Standard Chartered Bank, said he had heard that government purchases accounted for roughly 10 to 15 percent of all car sales in China. He said he did not have a breakdown for luxury car sales.Alistair Thornton, a China economist for IHS Global Insight, said the crackdown on luxury living was already being felt across the consumer economy."The impact of the crackdown is not devastating, but there is certainly softness in the retail sales data," he said. "The impact can most clearly be seen in the restaurant business, but there has been visible weakness in the auto market — something that will inevitably deteriorate should the crackdown intensify."On Wednesday, People's Daily, the official party mouthpiece, published an editorial that said officials were finding ways to transgress and indulge in "low-key extravagance." It said they were enjoying "saunas in farmhouses" and hiding expensive Maotai liquor in water bottles.Some are questioning the new policy on military plates. Dong Zengshou, a party official at the Taiyuan University of Science and Technology, wrote on his microblog on Wednesday that there should be more scrutiny over who was driving the luxury cars."Who is using these extravagant military cars?" he wrote. "When will military vehicles stop being used for private matters? If we don't answer these two questions, changing the license plates of these vehicles is nothing but a waste of money."
As the Celtics ' locker room emptied of players and reporters late Wednesday night, Terrence Williams peered over the shoulder of a team employee who was studying the box score on the screen of a laptop propped on a table.Williams, a reserve guard, aimed an index finger, presumably at the assists column in his statistical line."I know I had more than two," he said of his total after the Celtics sidestepped the cemetery and turned the Knicks' all-black sartorial statement into the bluest of Madison Square Garden moods by winning Game 5, 92-86.Somewhere, Bob Cousy, Larry Bird and other pass-happy leaders of Boston's august N.B.A. history were exhaling Auerbachian puffs of pleasure. At least one side in this newly energized Eastern Conference playoff series was still emphasizing ball movement, the most basic of basketball tenets.An hour before the series began, the Celtics' Doc Rivers had commented that he had never coached a playoff series without a point guard — the position he played as a pro — and he would see how that would go.In Games 1 through 3, it went badly, especially when the chore of delivering the ball into the post was left to the flummoxed Avery Bradley. Floated passes begged to be picked off, as if Mark Sanchez had thrown them. Celtics turnovers (along with Knicks offensive rebounds) were limiting their possessions in games that were hardly freewheeling.In Game 5, Boston still had 15 turnovers, nearly doubling the Knicks' 8. But five were committed by Kevin Garnett and five by Paul Pierce, noble but aged warriors carrying the burden of Rajon Rondo's absence. What had Rivers smiling was the nearly 17 minutes that Williams played — including several as the Celtics built a late 15-point lead — in which he coughed up the ball not once.A Nets first-round draft pick in 2009, 11th over all, Williams handled full-court pressure, got his team into balanced sets, threw crisp passes, penetrated some, got to the rim for a dunk and registered those two assists — or as many as Carmelo Anthony generated in 45-plus minutes.We get it, Anthony is what he is, a coldblooded scorer, as is his understudy, the golf-loving J. R. Smith. But consider the aggregate assist totals for Games 4 and 5 to understand why the Knicks are flirting with what would be the most ignominious playoff disaster.Boston, a team with no true point guard: 42. New York, a team with three point guards playing double-digit minutes: 23.Factor in the many occasions Anthony and Smith have fired up quick jumpers on the way to shooting a combined — and brutal — 21 for 73, and it becomes clear that the Knicks have been making life easier for their old and shallow opponents by not making them work hard or long enough on the defensive side.At the other end in Game 5, the Celtics were patient and probing, on the way to having five players score 16 to 18 points."We let the ball find the open guy, and we were really good," Rivers said.This new dynamic could change in a Boston minute should Anthony or Smith, or both, resume finding the bottom of the net with many of the same looks they had Wednesday night. But if nothing else, these last two games must have the folks in Miami — where the Heat present a deeper, younger and faster defense than Boston — feeling much better about a potential showdown in the conference finals.Knicks-Heat, by the way, is the sexiest series left in this injury ravaged N.B.A. playoff season, assuming New York has the poise and leadership to get there under increasing duress.You have to wonder about that. With all of the Knicks' supposedly heady veterans, why didn't one of them surmise that Kenyon Martin's idea for them to dress in black Wednesday on the way to attending a presumed Celtics funeral was stupid and tasteless, post-marathon?After Smith missed Game 4 because of a suspension for elbowing Jason Terry in the face in Game 3, what in the world were Anthony and Raymond Felton doing getting into it with Jordan Crawford and D. J. White after Crawford, one of Boston's bench-warmers, directed profane commentary at Anthony following the game?Then again, dysfunction often starts at the top. Madison Square Garden security folks have long frowned upon the building's configuration, which forces teams to cross on the court on the way to their locker rooms.Rivers barked at his players for mouthing off, but do not think he would have objected to having his scrubs and the Knicks' stars tossed out for Game 6 had a fight broken out. Rivers used only seven players, anyway, counting Williams, who did not join the Celtics until mid-February.After playing in New Jersey, Houston and Sacramento — and endearing himself to none of those franchises — Williams left his team in China to attend the funeral of a relative. He was at home, sleeping in Seattle, when his agent texted him at 6 a.m. to get to Denver to join the Celtics.He had a 10-day contract, packed for no longer and happily "went shopping for drawers" when he was retained for the season.Williams grew up in modest Seattle public housing known to residents as 8 Block. His 20-year-old father was murdered when he was 6. His mother was jailed at the time. One of his best boyhood friends was Nate Robinson — they and other pals from the development have identical forearm tattoos: the No. 8 inside a spider web.While Williams, the well-traveled former Net, made his presence felt against the Knicks, Robinson, the former Knick, was largely responsible for lifting Chicago to within a victory of eliminating the Nets.Williams's teammates praised him and mouthed clichés about every game being Game 7, while Williams spoke of benefiting from having Rondo in his ear on the bench."He tells me what I should be doing when their defense is extending, what to look for when I get past it," he said. "It's all about leadership."That it is. For the Knicks, it's about urgently striking the proper balance between the shooting proclivities of Anthony and Smith to allow for the point guard direction of Felton, who has been a standout in this series, to flourish.Otherwise, by late Friday night, they also may be spouting clichés for a very real and scary Game 7.
BEIJING — Christopher Nixon Cox retraced his grandfather's historic 1972 trip to China on Friday, trailed through Tiananmen Square by an entourage of aging Nixon administration luminaries, state-news-media paparazzi and Chinese security agents.The trip, timed for the year of President Richard M. Nixon's 100th birthday, was carefully organized to lionize the accomplishments of both the Nixon administration and the Chinese Communist Party. Over the next 10 days, the delegation will dine with Chinese officials, hike the Great Wall, coo at pandas and ride a new bullet train to Shanghai.Mr. Cox, 34, a New York investment banker with political ambitions, was eager to bask in the celebratory glow of a Nixonian legacy uncomplicated by memories of Watergate and a resignation in disgrace."My grandfather's trip was about friendship, cooperation and building bridges," he said, deftly weaving through a knot of Chinese tourists posing for photos near Chairman Mao's mausoleum. "I hope my visit carries on that spirit for a new generation."Yet the cooperation born 41 years ago has grown into an awkward competition for geopolitical and economic power. Tensions are rising over a range of thorny issues, including cyberwarfare and territorial disputes between China and its neighbors, many of them longtime American allies.Although Mr. Cox stood out in the crowd as he toured the city in a tailored gray suit, his wife, Andrea Catsimatidis Cox, 23, attracted even more attention with her crimson dress and blond hair. She is the daughter of John A. Catsimatidis, owner of the Gristedes supermarket chain and a New York mayoral candidate.For the handful of former members of the Nixon administration who were part of Mr. Cox's delegation of more than 40 people, seeing Beijing clogged with luxury cars and modern skyscrapers reaffirmed the importance of President Nixon's historic handshake with Mao.Jack Brennan, 75, a retired Marine colonel who accompanied the president to China in 1972, recalled a vastly different city in which everyone wore monochromatic Mao suits. "It was like you were in the 14th century," he said.On Friday evening, the delegation dined at the Great Hall of the People, where in 1972 Mr. Nixon got tipsy from toasting shots of grain alcohol with Prime Minister Zhou Enlai. The host of Friday's banquet was Yang Jiechi, a former foreign minister who is now a member of the State Council, China's cabinet.
HONG KONG — Even for China 's scandal-numbed diners, inured to endless outrages about food hazards, news that the lamb simmering in the pot may actually be rat tested new depths of disgust.In an announcement intended to show that the government is serious about improving food safety, the Ministry of Public Security said on Thursday that the police had caught a gang of traders in eastern China who bought rat, fox and mink flesh and sold it as mutton. But that and other cases of meat smuggling, faking and adulteration featured in Chinese newspapers and Web sites on Friday were unlikely to instill confidence in consumers already queasy over many reports about meat, fruit and vegetables laden with disease, toxins, banned dyes and preservatives.Sixty-three people were arrested and accused of "buying fox, mink and rat and other meat products that had not undergone inspection," which they doused in gelatin, red pigment and nitrates, and sold as mutton in Shanghai and adjacent Jiangsu Province for about $1.6 million, according to the ministry's statement. The report, posted on the Internet, did not explain how exactly the traders acquired the rats and other creatures."How many rats does it take to put together a sheep?" said one typically baffled and angry user of Sina Weibo, China's Twitter-like microblog service that often acts as a forum for public venting. "Is it cheaper to raise rats than sheep?"Residents of Shanghai recently endured the sight of thousands of dead hogs floating down a nearby river, apparently the dumped victims of disease in piggeries upstream.The arrests were part of a nationwide operation since late January to "attack food safety crimes and defend the safety of the dining table," the ministry said. The police arrested 904 people suspected of selling fake, diseased, toxic or adulterated meat, and broke up 1,721 illicit factories, workshops and shops. Yet the ministry acknowledged that diners still had reason to worry.In food safety campaigns in past years, "some serious problems have been dealt with swiftly and vigorously, but for a variety of reasons, food safety crimes remain serious, and are displaying new circumstances and features," an unnamed senior official said in the statement."For example, there is selling of meat injected with water and meat from animals dead from disease, as well as passing off relatively cheap types of meat as relatively expensive beef and mutton."China's prime minister since March, Li Keqiang, has said that improving food safety is a priority — one of the main grievances of citizens that he has said his government will tackle.But similar vows by his predecessor, Wen Jiabao, ran up against inadequate resources, buck-passing and muddle among rival agencies, and protectionism by local officials, Mao Shoulong, a professor of public policy at Renmin University in Beijing, said in an interview."The United States and Europe can't eradicate these problems, either, but they are even more complicated in China," said Professor Mao, who has studied food and pharmaceutical safety regulation."Chinese food production has become larger scale and more technological, but the problems emerging also involve using more sophisticated technology to beat regulators and cheat consumers," he said. "The government's efforts need to catch up with the scale and complexity of the problems."This time, at least, the government gave consumers a stomach-churning glimpse into problems in the meat industry.The cases described included a company in Inner Mongolia, a northeast region of China, caught with 23 tons of fake beef jerky and unprocessed frozen meat adulterated with flavoring chemicals and swarming with bacteria. Six suspects in Guizhou Province, in southwest China, were caught with 8.8 tons of "toxic chicken feet" marinated in a hydrogen peroxide solution and adulterated with illegal additives. Chicken feet, steamed or boiled with spices, are a popular dish in parts of China.The fraud sometimes had deadly results. In February, the police in Shaanxi Province in northwest China arrested a suspect accused of selling a lamb carcass so heavily laced with pesticide that one person died after eating the barbecued meat.In another show of official efforts to stem public ire over menaces to food safety, China's Supreme People's Court, the country's highest court, on Friday issued guidelines for sternly punishing related offenses, like taking "ditch" cooking oil that has been used and dumped in drains and processing it to be resold for cooking. Such problems "seriously affect social harmony and stability, and seriously harm the image of the party and government," the court said in a statement issued by state-run media.Public discontent about food safety has brought growing pressure on the Chinese Communist Party leadership, especially since 2008, when officials acknowledged that tens of thousands of children were at risk from kidney stones and other organ damage caused by milk powder adulterated with melamine, a chemical used to bamboozle protein tests. At least six infants died from illnesses attributed to the toxin, which sickened more than 300,000 children.Many consumers have recently stopped buying chicken and duck out of worries about avian flu. Parents in many Chinese cities, including Beijing, have become increasingly alarmed by acrid pollution that doctors blame for increased respiratory illnesses."Food safety and environmental protection face the same problem that although regulatory capacity has expanded, there's been no fundamental change for the better," Professor Mao said. "The fact that the police have become involved shows how serious the problems still are."
THAT frightening word "pandemic" is back in the news. A strain of avian influenza has infected people in China, with a death toll of more than 25 as of late last week. The outbreak raises renewed questions about how to prepare for possible risks, should the strain become more easily communicable or should other deadly variations arise.Our current health care policies are not optimal for dealing with pandemics. The central problem is that these policies neglect what economists call "public goods": items and services that benefit many people and can't easily be withheld from those who don't pay for them directly.Protection against communicable diseases is a core example of a public good, as is basic scientific research, which can yield new ideas that may be spread at very low additional cost. (In contrast, Medicare, which is publicly financed, has some elements of a public good, but any particular expenditure tends to benefit an individual receiving treatment, rather than being spread over a number of beneficiaries.)One obvious step forward would be to exempt biomedical research from cuts of the current federal budget sequestration. Research and development grants are a way to pay potential innovators up front — an important move, as an innovator can't always charge high-enough prices for the value of its remedies when they're actually needed.If a pandemic became a major issue in the United States, demand for remedies would surge far beyond the level associated with a typical seasonal flu outbreak, and permitting high prices would be unpopular — and perhaps unfair. The threat of contagion also makes it crucial to spread the net of protection as widely as possible, which again suggests low prices.Yet it is crucial to have some reward system in place for medical innovators. Well in advance of a pandemic, research needs to be done, and vaccine capacity and drug distribution facilities need to be built up. In the H.I.V./AIDS crisis, for instance, the United States was caught flat-footed — and an appropriate response has taken decades, in part because we were not prepared. Without government financing for such public goods, the capacity wouldn't be there if a new pandemic produced a surge in demand. This would amount to an institutional failure.The government could also take another, more unusual step: it could promise to pay lucrative prices for the patents on drugs and vaccines that prove useful in dealing with pandemics. The point of buying the patent is to distribute the remedy, if needed, as widely and as cheaply as possible. If the pandemic never occurs, the reward wouldn't have to be paid. But the very promise of such a reward might induce suppliers to take the risk of increasing capacity in advance.Without such a government promise, private patents could easily lead to very high prices and limited distribution, as has already occurred for some cancer drugs, which are being sold to patients for more than $100,000 a year.If anyone doubted a government pledge to pay big money for the rights to remedies, the patent's value could be established by a competitive auction. Michael Kremer, a Harvard economics professor, outlined the procedure for such an auction in his research paper "Patent Buyouts."The government should resist the strong temptation to skimp on rewards. Many health care breakthroughs come through university research programs and government grants, but bringing an innovation to fruition and managing wide and rapid distribution usually requires the profit-seeking private sector. In any single instance, the government could save money by confiscating rights, but in the longer run this would discourage the search for additional remedies.If anything, the American government — or, better yet, a consortium of governments — should pay more for pandemic remedies than what market-based auctions would yield. That's because, if a major pandemic does arise, other countries may not respect intellectual property rights as they scramble to copy a drug or vaccine for domestic distribution. To encourage innovations, policy makers need to bolster the expectation of rewards.How many drugs should we cover with such prizes, and then distribute free or at minimal charge? It's an interesting but perhaps insoluble moral question. But in the meantime, economics can offer practical advice. If the remedy is a public good, as is the case in fighting a communicable disease, the value of widespread treatment will make cheap distribution a good idea.Unfortunately, the United States lacks strong political coalitions for many beneficial public health measures. The Democratic Party has focused on insurance coverage and Medicaid expansion as political issues, while often wishing to lower prices of drugs or to weaken patent protection. The Obama administration's new budget lowers spending on pharmaceuticals by an estimated $164 billion over 10 years, mostly through bargaining down Medicare drug prices. That makes it hard for the Democrats to embrace lucrative rewards for pharmaceutical companies or vaccine producers.Nor can we expect much on pandemic preparation from the current Republican Party, which has been focusing its fiscal conservatism on discretionary spending. That means disproportionate cuts for public health and research and development. This decision can be seen as at odds with a true conservative philosophy, which usually embraces the provision of public goods like a strong military and general national security. Such goods can also serve the purpose of protecting against bioterror.OVER all, the American government seems to be turning its back on its traditional role of producing and investing in national public goods. If there is any consistent tendency in recent government spending, it is that spending on entitlements like Social Security and Medicare — which provide mostly private benefits — is rising and that investment and spending on national public goods is falling.As a budget category, "government consumption and gross investment" is a proxy for many kinds of public goods spending. As a share of gross domestic product, it has fallen to less than 19 percent, from a peak of 24 percent in the 1980s, with no expected reversal in sight. Yet total government spending is expected to increase because of income transfers and entitlements. Neither political party seems able to halt that logic or even cares to make an issue of it.Focusing government on the production of public goods may sound like a trivial issue, too obvious to be worth a mention. But, in fact, we have been failing at it, and the consequences could be serious indeed.
HONG KONG — The president of the Palestinian Authority , Mahmoud Abbas , arrived in Beijing on Sunday seeking support from Chinese leaders, days before Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu of Israel is to make a visit of his own, although Israeli officials have said there are no plans for a meeting between them.China has tried to maintain firm ties with both Israel and the Palestinian Authority while supporting Palestinian demands for statehood and occasionally chiding the Israeli government for its policies toward the Palestinians. But it has shown little appetite for taking on a role as a broker in that and other conflicts in the Middle East.Still, Hua Chunying, a spokeswoman for the Foreign Ministry, told reporters in Beijing last week that "if the Palestinian and Israeli leaders want to meet each other in China, we will happily provide the necessary assistance."China "supports the Palestinian and Israeli sides in resolving their differences and disputes through peace talks," Ms. Hua said on Thursday. "China's reception of the Palestinian and Israeli leaders for visits is also a part of these efforts."Mr. Netanyahu will arrive in Beijing on Wednesday, and Mr. Abbas is to leave on Tuesday night, according to Israeli government officials, who said there would be no encounter between the two in China.Mr. Netanyahu will first visit Shanghai, where he arrives on Monday, though his departure from Israel was delayed Sunday so that he could attend a security meeting to discuss the increased tensions in the Middle East after the Syrian government accused Israel of airstrikes near Damascus on Saturday, calling them an "act of war." Ehud Olmert, in 2007, was the last Israeli prime minister to visit China.Mr. Abbas told Xinhua, China's state-run news agency, before his trip that he would ask China "to use its relationship with Israel to remove the obstacles that obstruct the Palestinian economy."The Palestinian Authority, which has limited control over the West Bank, has been in financial distress, in part because of shrinking donations from foreign supporters and Israel's withholding of tax revenue transfers in response to Mr. Abbas's bid for enhanced status for the Palestinians at the United Nations.Israel's diplomatic dealings with China are dominated by broader Middle Eastern security concerns, especially Iran's disputed nuclear program and the worsening violence in Syria. Those two issues are likely to feature in Mr. Netanyahu's talks with the Chinese president, Xi Jinping; the prime minister, Li Keqiang; and other officials.As a permanent member of the United Nations Security Council, China has backed resolutions aimed at pressing Iran to curtail nuclear activities that Israel, the United States and other Western governments say are aimed at giving Tehran the means to make nuclear weapons. But China is a major buyer of Iranian oil and has criticized Western governments' unilateral sanctions aimed at curtailing that trade.China has also stood alongside Russia in resisting Western calls for stronger intervention in the Syrian conflict, instead arguing that there is still hope of a negotiated solution.
TOKYO — In a story May 8 about the use of sex slaves during World War II, The Associated Press reported erroneously that then-Prime Minister Yohei Kono issued a 1993 statement expressing remorse for suffering caused to sexual slaves of Japanese troops. Kono was Chief Cabinet Secretary at the time, not prime minister.A corrected version of the story is below:Japan acknowledges past denial of proof of forced sex slavery was based on limited studyTOKYO (AP) — Japan has acknowledged that it conducted only a limited investigation before claiming there was no official evidence that its imperial troops coerced Asian women into sexual slavery before and during World War II.A parliamentary statement signed Tuesday by Prime Minister Shinzo Abe acknowledged the government had a set of documents produced by a postwar international military tribunal containing testimony by Japanese soldiers about abducting Chinese women as military sex slaves. That evidence apparently was not included in Japan's only investigation of the issue, in 1991-1993.Tuesday's parliamentary statement also said documents showing forcible sex slavery may still exist. The statement did not say whether the government plans to consider the documents as evidence showing that troops had coerced women into sexual slavery.Over the past two days, top officials of Abe's conservative government have appeared to soften their stance on Japan's past apologies to neighboring countries for wartime atrocities committed by the Imperial Army, saying Japan does not plan to revise them.The backtracking appears intended to allay criticisms of Abe's earlier vows to revise the apologies, including an acknowledgment of sexual slavery during the war, and calm tensions with neighbors South Korea and China. The U.S. government also has raised concerns about Abe's nationalist agenda.Abe has acknowledged so-called "comfort women" existed but denied they were coerced into prostitution, citing a lack of official evidence. He also has repeatedly vowed to reassess apologies by past Japanese administrations.The parliamentary statement, released Tuesday and seen by the Associated Press on Wednesday, was in response to an official inquiry last month to the upper house of Parliament by opposition lawmaker Tomoko Kami, who said the government's investigation into sex slavery was "insufficient" and documents it claimed to have collected were incomplete.Kami, of the Japan Communist Party, also asked whether the government had ever updated its archives to reflect more recent findings than the earlier investigation. The answer was no.The statement acknowledged documents produced by the 1946-1948 International Military Tribunal for the Far East, held in Tokyo, but said they were not in the Cabinet Secretariat's archives. It did not say when the documents were found or whether they are reflected in any official statements about sexual slavery.Abe also has criticized the tribunal's decisions as "condemnation by the allied victors' judgment," but has said he's in no position to object to the rulings Japan had already accepted.The parliamentary statement described the 1993 findings as "the result of an all-out and sincere investigation" that brought "closure." But it said the government is open to updates if new findings are valid."Due to the nature of the issue, there is a possibility that previously unavailable documents may be discovered. In such a case, we are asking related ministries and offices to report to the Cabinet," it said.The documents quote testimony from Japanese soldiers saying they recruited women by posting advertisements for factory workers and "threatened them and used them as prostitutes for the bestial lust of the troops."One army lieutenant testified that he helped set up a brothel for soldiers including himself, forcing five women in the city of Guilin in southern China to work as prostitutes for eight months.Meanwhile, Chief Cabinet Secretary Yoshihide Suga said Wednesday that Japan recognizes the harm it caused during its invasion and occupation of much of Asia, and that it has repeatedly and clearly stated that position."The Abe government has expressed sincere condolences to all victims of the war, in and out of the country, and there is no change in that," Suga said in response to a question about a comment by South Korean President Park Geun-hye, published in The Washington Post this week, asserting that Japan should correct its view of its wartime history."The Japanese government has accepted the facts of history in a spirit of humility, expressed once again our feelings of deep remorse and our heartfelt apology, and expressed our feelings of profound mourning for all victims, both at home and abroad," he told reporters. "And Prime Minister Abe shares the same view."China and South Korea have reacted harshly to recent nationalistic events and remarks, including visits by several Japanese government ministers and nearly 170 lawmakers to Tokyo's Yasukuni Shrine, which memorializes 2.3 million war dead, including 14 wartime leaders convicted of war crimes. Rancor over territorial disputes has further strained relations between Japan and its neighbors.Only in the past two decades has Japan acknowledged some of its past brutalities, including medical atrocities and use of poison gas, as well as sexual slavery — a legacy that still haunts Tokyo's relations with its neighbors.Before he took office in December, Abe had advocated revising a 1993 statement by then-Chief Cabinet Secretary Yohei Kono expressing remorse for the suffering caused to the sexual slaves of Japanese troops.Associated Press writer Elaine Kurtenbach contributed to this report.
HONG KONG — Trade figures for April released by the Chinese government on Wednesday morning were slightly better than economists expected, but still indicated that demand was fairly weak in foreign markets and in China itself.Exports and imports both increased last month compared with a year earlier, but the figures were harder than usual to interpret because April of last year was so weak. Imports and exports all but stopped growing in April of last year as a wide range of industries, perceiving a short, sharp domestic economic slowdown that would last until early autumn, stopped buying industrial commodities, even as foreign buyers cut orders as well.Compared with that weak base, China's trade figures for last month looked somewhat better. Exports rose 14.7 percent from a year ago, while imports increased 16.8 percent.But the trade figures were far from strong enough to suggest that foreign demand could pull China out of what seems to be a deepening economic malaise. Although official figures still show the economy steaming along at a growth rate of nearly 8 percent, a range of purchasing manager surveys last month showed growing worry among business executives across China."China is in a very difficult position now," as American and European consumers seem wary of further increases in the coming months in their purchases of Chinese goods, said Diana Choyleva, an economist in the Hong Kong office of Lombard Street Research, an economic analysis firm.The discouraging shift in sentiment, after a fairly weak economic performance in March as well, comes despite enormous lending through the autumn, winter and early spring. China's leaders were able to turn the sharp economic slowdown a year around by flooding the economy with bank and trust loans, and other credit.But the heavy lending has brought about considerably less economic growth than earlier rounds of monetary easing, raising worries that China's investment-dominated economy is running out of economically viable projects to pursue and may not be able to shift quickly enough to consumer-led growth.China has scheduled the release of April inflation data on Thursday, and a wide range of April economic statistics next Monday, including including industrial production, fixed asset investment and retail sales.Another uncertainty about Wednesday's trade data lies in whether the export figures are even accurate, or whether they have been artificially inflated. A gradual rise in the value of the renminbi against the dollar over the last year, together with expectations that this rise will continue, has created an incentive for exporters to overstate the value of the goods they ship out of the country, as a way to bypass China's currency controls and bring more dollars into the country to convert into renminbi.The Chinese government has opened an investigation into whether exporters are overinvoicing clients, after export data in the first quarter showed unusual patterns, including a surge in reported Chinese exports to Hong Kong that did not match Hong Kong data.Louis Kuijs, an economist in the Hong Kong office of the Royal Bank of Scotland, estimated that overinvoicing of exports accounted for more than half of the year-on-year growth in China's exports last month. By adjusting for this, he said that the true growth in China's exports last month appeared to be more like 5.7 percent than 14.7 percent.There has been little sign of manipulation of import figures, which appear to show that domestic demand is holding up a little better than overseas demand.
Strength in all of the Walt Disney Company's primary businesses — theme parks, cable television, movies, consumer products — helped the entertainment conglomerate increase its quarterly profit by 32 percent from a year earlier, to $1.51 billion. Revenue climbed 10 percent, to $10.55 billion.The financial results, reported on Tuesday, revealed a couple of smaller weak spots, namely the ABC broadcast network and Disney's video game division. But the company's performance as a whole beat rivals like Comcast, Time Warner and Viacom.Disney shares, which closed at $66.07 on Tuesday, have risen 51 percent over the last year. "The company is obviously hitting on almost all cylinders," Jessica Reif Cohen, a senior analyst at Bank of America Merrill Lynch, said on a conference call on Tuesday.Reasons for growth included the improving economy; expanded theme parks in Florida, California and Hong Kong; a stabilizing moviemaking operation; the acquisition of Marvel Entertainment; and climbing merchandise sales, particularly for Disney Channel-related products. The company also benefited from a calendar quirk that moved part of the New Year's and Easter holidays into the quarter.Operating income at Media Networks, a division that includes ESPN, totaled $1.86 billion in the quarter, an 8 percent improvement from the year-earlier period. During the quarter, which ended on March 30, ESPN benefited from increased ad sales and a reduction in revenue deferrals as required by certain affiliate contracts.Walt Disney Parks and Resorts reported operating income of $383 million, a 73 percent increase. New attractions — a "Cars"-themed area in California, a Fantasyland expansion in Florida — helped Disney's North American parks deliver an 8 percent increase in attendance and a 10 percent increase in per-capita spending on items like food. A new cruise ship, the Fantasy, also lifted the division's results.In the year-ago quarter, Disney's movie studio lost money as it struggled with runaway costs tied to the science-fiction debacle "John Carter." On Tuesday Walt Disney Studios, citing the successful release of "Oz the Great and Powerful," reported operating income of $118 million. Disney said that prerelease marketing expenses for the July arrival of "The Lone Ranger" may affect coming results, however.Iron Man and other Marvel-related merchandise contributed to operating income of $200 million at Disney's consumer products unit, a 35 percent increase.Over all, Disney reported earnings of 79 cents a share for the quarter, an increase of 36 percent from 58 cents a year earlier. Analysts had expected earnings of 76 cents a share. Including one-time gains from tax benefits and the sale of a business, Disney had earnings in the current quarter of 83 cents a share.With so much going right for the company, Disney's two troubled areas — broadcast television and video games — stood out like sore thumbs. But each of those businesses has a relatively small impact on Disney's performance.Broadcast operating income fell 40 percent, to $138 million, as lower ratings (and thus ad revenue) and higher programming costs at the struggling ABC network offset sturdier financial results at Disney's local TV stations. "We could use a few more new hits, and hits that we own," Robert A. Iger, Disney's chairman and chief executive, said of ABC on a conference call.Mr. Iger added that he is "more than reasonably encouraged" by ABC's planned shows for the fall and called ABC's managers "a great team."Disney's interactive division, which includes Disney.com and video games, lost $54 million in the quarter, an improvement from a loss of $70 million. Disney continues to hope that a turnaround is on the horizon for its video game business. On Monday the company announced an exclusive multiyear deal with Electronic Arts to produce Star Wars games.Disney is also preparing to introduce Infinity, an ambitious video game and toy initiative that it hopes will be its version of Skylanders, an Activision Blizzard product that has generated more than $1 billion in global sales since its 2011 arrival. Infinity was initially supposed to arrive in June but was delayed and is now scheduled for release in August.
HONG KONG — The Australian central bank dropped its key interest rate to a record-low 2.75 percent Tuesday, becoming the latest central bank in recent weeks to try to stimulate growth.Few analysts had expected the central bank, the Reserve Bank of Australia, to deliver a rate cut at its policy meeting, and the reduction, by a quarter of a percentage point, prompted the Australian dollar to decline about half a cent against the U.S. dollar, to $1.019.In a statement accompanying the rate decision, Glenn Stevens, the central bank's governor, struck a sanguine note about the global economy, saying it was "likely to record growth a little below trend this year before picking up next year," with the United States currently on a path of moderate expansion and China's growth running at a robust pace. And although commodity prices — which are important to resource-rich Australia — have moderated in recent months, they "remain high by historical standards," he added.Still, unemployment has edged up despite a string of rate cuts in recent years, and investment in mining, a major source of economic activity, is projected to peak this year.A persistently strong Australian dollar has weighed on the economy. The currency has climbed against the U.S. dollar for much of the past 12 years, with only a brief slump after the Lehman Brothers collapse in late 2008, and reached parity with the U.S. dollar for the first time since 1982 in late 2010. It has been worth more than $1 for much of the time since then.The exchange rate's strength over the past 18 months, Mr. Stevens said, "is unusual, given the decline in export prices and interest rates during that time." The central bank thus decided that "a further decline in the cash rate was appropriate to encourage sustainable growth in the economy," he continued.The fact that inflation in Australia, at 2.5 percent during the first quarter of this year, remains within the central bank's comfort level also provided the leeway for a reduction in interest rates, analysts said. The rate cut Tuesday was the seventh by the Australian central bank since November 2011 and took the total reduction in borrowing costs to 2 percentage points."Further easing looks unlikely at the moment," analysts at Standard Chartered said in a research note, adding that the central bank was likely to wait for more data before making further moves. "However, continued sluggishness in both the domestic and global economies will increase the risk of a rate cut, inflation permitting," they said.The Australian move follows recent efforts in several other regions and countries to prop up growth. Both the European Central Bank and the Reserve Bank of India lowered borrowing costs last week in a bid to bolster growth, which has been flagging. And in Japan, the central bank and the government have announced spending plans and asset purchases and have promised measures to attract investment in an effort to combat deflation and reignite growth.
HONG KONG — The Australian central bank dropped its key interest rate to a record-low 2.75 percent Tuesday, becoming the latest central bank in recent weeks to try to stimulate growth.Few analysts had expected the central bank, the Reserve Bank of Australia, to deliver a rate cut at its policy meeting, and the reduction, by a quarter of a percentage point, prompted the Australian dollar to decline about half a cent against the U.S. dollar, to $1.019.In a statement accompanying the rate decision, Glenn Stevens, the central bank's governor, struck a sanguine note about the global economy, saying it was "likely to record growth a little below trend this year before picking up next year," with the United States currently on a path of moderate expansion and China's growth running at a robust pace. And although commodity prices — which are important to resource-rich Australia — have moderated in recent months, they "remain high by historical standards," he added.Still, unemployment has edged up despite a string of rate cuts in recent years, and investment in mining, a major source of economic activity, is projected to peak this year.A persistently strong Australian dollar has weighed on the economy. The currency has climbed against the U.S. dollar for much of the past 12 years, with only a brief slump after the Lehman Brothers collapse in late 2008, and reached parity with the U.S. dollar for the first time since 1982 in late 2010. It has been worth more than $1 for much of the time since then.The exchange rate's strength over the past 18 months, Mr. Stevens said, "is unusual, given the decline in export prices and interest rates during that time." The central bank thus decided that "a further decline in the cash rate was appropriate to encourage sustainable growth in the economy," he continued.The fact that inflation in Australia, at 2.5 percent during the first quarter of this year, remains within the central bank's comfort level also provided the leeway for a reduction in interest rates, analysts said. The rate cut Tuesday was the seventh by the Australian central bank since November 2011 and took the total reduction in borrowing costs to 2 percentage points."Further easing looks unlikely at the moment," analysts at Standard Chartered said in a research note, adding that the central bank was likely to wait for more data before making further moves. "However, continued sluggishness in both the domestic and global economies will increase the risk of a rate cut, inflation permitting," they said.The Australian move follows recent efforts in several other regions and countries to prop up growth. Both the European Central Bank and the Reserve Bank of India lowered borrowing costs last week in a bid to bolster growth, which has been flagging. And in Japan, the central bank and the government have announced spending plans and asset purchases and have promised measures to attract investment in an effort to combat deflation and reignite growth.
HONG KONG — Chinese state-run newspapers began carrying commentaries on Wednesday and Thursday questioning Japan 's sovereignty over the island of Okinawa, the latest sign of growing nationalism and territorial ambitions among a significant sector of China 's elite.People's Daily, the official newspaper of the Chinese Communist Party, published an opinion column on Wednesday by two academics who noted that the Ryukyu Islands, of which Okinawa is the most important, for many years had been an independent kingdom that paid tribute to China. Japan took control of the islands in a series of moves through the 1870s, formally annexing them in 1879 and abolishing the local monarchy.Global Times, a sometimes stridently nationalistic newspaper affiliated with People's Daily, published a news article on Thursday asserting that questions about Okinawa's sovereignty could help China in its long-running territorial dispute with Japan over seven uninhabited islands northeast of Taiwan, known as the Senkaku in Japan and the Diaoyu in China and Taiwan.The Chinese government has not endorsed the idea that Okinawa, the site of extensive American military bases, should be independent of Japan. At a regularly scheduled news conference on Wednesday, a Ministry of Foreign Affairs spokeswoman answered three questions about Okinawa with almost identical language, but did not take a clear position on sovereignty."The history of the Ryukyu Islands and Okinawa has long been an academic problem," the spokeswoman, Hua Chunying, said. "I'm willing to reiterate here that the Diaoyu Islands are China's inherent territory, and have never been part of the Ryukyu or Okinawa."The Japanese government quickly dismissed the People's Daily column. "It is beyond doubt that it belongs to Japan, and that is the fact historically and internationally, so such an argument is absolutely undignified," Yoshihide Suga, the chief cabinet secretary, said in a regularly scheduled news conference on Wednesday.
HONG KONG — Brightly hued men's underwear in a rainbow of colors is no longer selling well in Europe for the Zhongtian Garments Company in Xiamen, China. Exports are down 30 percent in the last year.Children's guitars with bodies resembling cats and cartoon characters are losing their charm for Yuesen Musical Instrument Factory in Huainan, China. And at the Yuzhongniao Outdoor Products Company in Jinjiang, domestic sales and exports alike are declining this year. The Canton Fair, China's biggest export event, ended on Sunday with few new orders. "We are not even getting many people browsing this time," said Alice Hong, Yuzhongniao's sales manager.After a powerful recovery through the autumn and winter from a V-shaped downturn last summer, China's economy is unexpectedly faltering once again. Exports are weak. The country's domestic economy is still growing mostly because of huge increases in lending by state-controlled banks and a surge in off-balance sheet lending. Consumer spending is rising, but not fast enough to offset weakness in other sectors.That combination has prompted growing concerns among economists and business executives about the sustainability of even 7.5 percent growth in China in the coming years, the government's current goal after three decades of double-digit growth with only a few interruptions.The latest sign of trouble came on Wednesday, when China's General Administration of Customs announced export and import figures for April. On the surface, they looked fairly respectable: exports were up 14.7 percent from a year earlier, and imports were up 16.8 percent.But April 2012 was an exceptionally bad month for Chinese exports and imports — indeed, dismal trade statistics for that month were the first sign that economic weakness during the preceding winter was turning into a precipitous decline.This April's trade figures appeared even weaker when economists looked closer and found that the export growth had been largely propelled by growth in exports to Hong Kong, up 57 percent, and to special customs zones in China for export later, up even faster.Since Hong Kong's own data has not been showing large increases in imports from China so far this year, the Chinese government has already opened an investigation into whether exporters are overinvoicing for shipments. Overstating exports can allow companies to evade currency controls and move money into China to profit from the gradual appreciation of the renminbi against the dollar.Louis Kuijs, an economist in the Hong Kong office of the Royal Bank of Scotland, estimated that with the exclusion of overinvoicing, export growth came to only 5.7 percent.Over the last few years, economists have tended to pay less attention to China's exports because they were declining as a share of the country's total economic output, because of weak overseas demand. But newer research suggests that China may still be dependent on exports.The reason is that multinationals have been rapidly localizing their purchases of various items like computer chips and auto parts in China instead of importing them from other Asian neighbors. So while total exports may not have been rising quickly in recent years in China, the Chinese content in each dollar of exports has been increasing.Mr. Kuijs estimated that 20.7 percent of China's economic output came from exports last year, a figure that had bottomed out in 2009 at 19.7 percent.In a bad sign for exports in the months ahead, the Canton Fair announced this week that export orders placed at this year's spring session had fallen 1.4 percent from a year ago. It was the latest sign that steeply rising blue-collar wages in China and a gradually appreciating currency are starting to erode the country's international competitiveness; foreign investment in China has also begun to level off, while surging in lower-wage countries in the region, like Cambodia and Vietnam.Li Yong, the general manager at Yuesen Musical, said that many Japanese, Taiwanese and Korean companies in his industry had recently moved to Indonesia as costs climbed in China.
BEIJING — China's most celebrated film director, Zhang Yimou, is being investigated for a potential violation of family planning laws, an official said Thursday, confirming reports in the state news media.Family planning officials are examining discussions on the Internet that say Mr. Zhang has fathered up to seven children with four women. If he is found to have violated the laws, he could be fined nearly $27 million because the fines are based on the offender's income, according to a report in the online edition of People's Daily, the official mouthpiece of the Communist Party.An official in a propaganda office attached to the family planning committee of Jiangsu Province, near Shanghai on the east coast, confirmed the substance of the People's Daily report, which was published Wednesday. Calls to the family planning committee of Wuxi, the city where Chen Ting, Mr. Zhang's second wife, is registered as a resident, went unanswered on Thursday.Family planning laws generally restrict families to one child, and fines are levied for additional children. There are numerous exceptions, though: Many rural families and ethnic minorities are allowed to have more than one child without penalty. Xinhua, the state news agency, said Thursday that the local family planning committee would release the results of its investigation into Mr. Zhang soon.Mr. Zhang's most recent feature film is "The Flowers of War," starring Christian Bale; China entered it in the Oscar contest for best foreign film of 2011. Early in his career, Mr. Zhang made a string of films that became popular on the international film festival circuit and in foreign art theaters, including "Red Sorghum," "Raise the Red Lantern" and "To Live," adaptations of well-known literary works. He achieved commercial success with "Hero," a martial arts film, and was commissioned by Communist Party leaders to direct the opening and closing ceremonies of the 2008 Olympics in Beijing.Mr. Zhang, 61, is a member of the Chinese People's Political Consultative Conference, a sort of honorary legislature whose seats are often distributed by the party as political rewards. His critics say he has changed over the years from a director with an uncompromising vision to one who bows to the whims of party officials.In an interview with The New York Times published last year, Mr. Zhang said censorship "can't be changed, and it will be there in the future." He added: "Foreigners think that because I did the opening ceremony of the Olympics, I have certain privileges, but in fact it's not like that at all. In front of censorship, everyone is equal."Mr. Zhang could not be reached for comment on Thursday.Scholars have been pushing to end the one-child policy, which critics say has led to forced abortions and sterilizations. Some economists say that China will face a dwindling pool of young workers in the coming years, and that it no longer makes sense to continue the policy. Furthermore, for economic reasons, the birthrate is falling across China, especially in urban areas.There is no reliable public report that gives the exact number of children Mr. Zhang has with Ms. Chen, an actress.The recent surge of interest among Chinese Internet users in Mr. Zhang's children appeared to have begun on Monday, when Southern Entertainment Weekly published an article that said the couple had two sons and a daughter. That assertion has not been independently confirmed, and the article did not name the sources of the information.The reporter and a photographer camped outside Mr. Zhang's many homes in Beijing, and the photographer followed a car of his to the airport and witnessed what appeared to be family members emerging from the car, the article said.Mr. Zhang has a daughter with his first wife, Xiao Hua, whom he divorced around the time he was in a relationship with Gong Li, who starred in Mr. Zhang's early films and became China's best-known actress. The daughter, Zhang Mo, is about 30 and studied filmmaking at New York University. She has worked as a film editor for her father and was an interpreter for Mr. Bale on the set of "The Flowers of War."The People's Daily report indicated there was speculation that Mr. Zhang may have three other children with two other women, but it did not give their identities.
BEIJING — The mysterious illness began with crippling stomach pain, followed by blurry vision and sudden hair loss. By the time Zhu Ling, a talented musician and chemistry student at one of China's top universities, emerged from a coma weeks later, she was partially paralyzed and nearly blind, her faculties reduced to those of a child.The 19-year-old sophomore, doctors later determined, had been intentionally poisoned with thallium, a highly toxic heavy metal sometimes used in Chinese rat poison. A culprit was never found, though suspicions fell on a roommate from a well-connected family who was questioned by the police but then released.Now, nearly two decades after Ms. Zhu was poisoned, with her name forgotten by all but a determined band of supporters, her case has ricocheted back into public consciousness, electrifying the nation with allegations of a bungled investigation and uncomfortable questions about the power of China's political elite in a society where justice remains elusive.In recent days, Chinese social media has been consumed by the case despite an earlier effort to quash the conversation through aggressive censorship, a move that only fueled wider interest — and greater fury. "Nineteen years ago, the young Zhu Ling was poisoned," Yao Chen, a film star with 45 million followers, wrote on China's equivalent of Twitter. "Nineteen years later, this name has again been poisoned."On Monday, an online petition was submitted to the White House's "We the People" platform imploring the American government to intervene in the case. The petition, which had drawn more than 143,000 signatures by Friday, calls on the Obama administration to deport to China the primary suspect, despite a lack of evidence that she even lives in the United States."There was always anger and frustration over this case but it's exploding right now," said John Aldis, who has followed Ms. Zhu's plight since his years as a doctor at the American Embassy in Beijing during the 1990s. "A new generation of Chinese young people are realizing that a terrible injustice was done, and they want their voices to be heard."The renewed interest was inspired by a lurid murder last month in Shanghai, where a medical student at the prestigious Fudan University was accused of spiking the water of his roommate with a toxic chemical. The police said the student, who has been charged with intentional homicide, was driven by a grudge described as "trivial."What began as an online conversation about the pressures of China's cutthroat education system and the dearth of mental health services gave way to discussion of other cases of poisoning in China, many of them committed by students consumed with jealousy.But it was the attempted murder of Zhu Ling — and the notion that the perpetrator was given a free pass because of her political pedigree — that dominated the discussion. Those suspicions tapped into the widely held belief that well-placed Communist Party officials and their relatives are above the law."We want what we've always wanted — truth and justice," Wu Chengzhi, Ms. Zhu's father, said in a phone interview.Although the narrative of the case is riddled with unanswered questions and unsubstantiated allegations, Ms. Zhu's family and supporters have latched onto the one known fact: that Ms. Zhu's roommate at Tsinghua University, Sun Wei, had access to thallium and was questioned by the police, but was quickly released, according to accounts in the state media.The police say they lacked evidence for an arrest. Critics have speculated without any proof that Ms. Sun's grandfather, a senior official in the decades after the Communists came to power, and another relative, a former vice mayor of Beijing, had made the problem go away. As for a possible motive, they suggest that Ms. Sun was envious of the victim's beauty, and of her musical and academic achievements.Ms. Zhu's friends say crucial evidence from her dorm room disappeared before the police began their investigation. According to Mr. Wu, the father, investigators closed the case in 1998 but did not tell the family for nearly a decade.
LUSHAN, China — Wang Xiaochang sprang into action minutes after a deadly earthquake jolted this lush region of Sichuan Province last month. Logging on to China's most popular social media sites, he posted requests for people to join him in aiding the survivors. By that evening, he had fielded 480 calls.Never mind that the government had declared that the narrow mountain roads to Lushan were open only to authorized rescue vehicles. Two days after the April 20 earthquake, Mr. Wang was hitchhiking with 19 gear-laden strangers to this rubble-strewn town. While the military cleared roads and repaired electrical lines, the volunteers carried food, water and tents to ruined villages and comforted survivors of the temblor, which killed nearly 200 people and injured more than 13,000."The government is in charge of the big picture stuff, but we're doing the work they can't do," Mr. Wang, 24, a former soldier, said recently, standing outside the group's tent, which was cluttered with sleeping bags, work gloves and smartphones.The rapid grass-roots response to the disaster reveals just how far China's nascent civil society movement has come since 2008, when a 7.9-magnitude earthquake in Wenchuan, not far from Lushan, prompted a wave of volunteerism and philanthropy. That quake, which claimed about 90,000 lives, provoked criticism of the government for its ham-handed relief efforts. Outrage mounted in the months that followed over allegations of corruption and reports that the parents of dead children had been detained after protesting what many saw as a cover-up of shoddy school construction. Thousands of students died in school collapses during the quake.Like the government, which honed its rescue and relief efforts after the Wenchuan earthquake, the volunteers and civil society groups that first appeared in 2008 gained valuable skills for working in disaster zones. Their ability to coordinate — and, in some instances, outsmart a government intent on keeping them away — were enhanced by Sina Weibo, the Twitter-like microblog that did not exist in 2008 but now has more than 500 million users."Civil society is much more capable today compared to 2008," said Ran Yunfei, a prominent democracy activist and blogger, who describes Weibo as a revolutionary tool for social change. "It's far easier now for volunteers to share information on what kind of help is needed."One of those transformed by the Wenchuan earthquake was Li Chengpeng, a sports commentator from Sichuan turned civic activist. When the Lushan earthquake hit, Mr. Li turned to his seven million Weibo followers and quickly organized a team of volunteers. They traveled to the disaster zone on motorcycles, by pedicab and on foot so as not to clog roads, soliciting donations via microblog along the way. What he found was a government-directed relief effort sometimes hampered by bureaucracy and geographic isolation.Two days after the quake, Mr. Li's team delivered 498 tents, 1,250 blankets and 100 tarps — all donated — to Wuxing, where government supplies had yet to arrive. The next day, they hiked to four other villages, handing out water, cooking oil and tents.Although he acknowledges the government's importance during such disasters, Mr. Li contends that grass-roots activism is just as vital. "You can't ask an NGO to blow up half a mountain to clear roads and you can't ask an army platoon to ask a middle-aged woman whether she needs sanitary napkins," he wrote in a recent post.The government, however, prefers to rely on state-backed aid groups to deliver supplies and raise money, largely through the Red Cross Society of China. But that organization is still reeling from a corruption scandal in 2011 that severely damaged its reputation and spurred greater support for nongovernmental charities, which are generally thought to be more transparent.Faced with a groundswell of social activism it feared could turn into government opposition, the Communist Party has sought to turn the Lushan disaster into a rallying cry for political solidarity. "The more difficult the circumstance, the more we should unite under the banner of the party," the state-run newspaper People's Daily declared last month, praising the leadership's response to the earthquake.Still, the rise in online activism has forced the government to adapt. Recently, People's Daily announced that three volunteers had been picked to supervise the Red Cross spending in the earthquake zone and to publish their findings on Weibo.Yet on the ground, the government is hewing to the old playbook. According to local residents, red propaganda banners began appearing on highway overpasses and on town fences even before water and food arrived. "Disasters have no heart, but people do," some read. Others proclaimed: "Learn from the heroes who came here to help the ones struck by disaster."Liao Wenbing, an official with the Sichuan Provincial Transportation Bureau, described the slogans as a natural response from the people. "They feel the need to express gratitude to the government and the party," he said, in an emergency tent filled with maps and cooled by electric fans.Critics, however, consider the ubiquitous propaganda part of a well-honed crisis script used by the government to guide public opinion. According to a directive issued by the Central Propaganda Department last month, Chinese newspapers and Web sites were "forbidden to carry negative news, analysis or commentary" about the earthquake. The directive was obtained by the Web site China Digital Times, based in Berkeley, Calif.Analysts say the legions of volunteers and aid workers that descended on Sichuan threatened the government's carefully constructed narrative about the earthquake. Indeed, some Chinese suspect such fears were at least partly behind official efforts to discourage altruistic citizens from coming to the region.Despite warnings to stay away, so as not to obstruct roads and become a burden to rescuers, plenty of people found a way into the disaster zone. "I was really surprised at how many volunteers showed up despite the government's announcement saying they weren't needed," said Li Huaping, 47, a well-known political dissident from Shanghai, who was helping to set up 50 tents for use as temporary classrooms.Mr. Li acknowledged that the government had done a good job but noted instances in which volunteers were indispensable to the relief effort, including a group that set up a water filtration system in a sports center swimming pool just hours after the quake.Each volunteer brings something unique to the effort. After seeing the posting by Mr. Wang soliciting help, Li Yong, a 24-year-old hairdresser, used his allotted vacation days to deliver supplies. It was the least he could do, he said, to repay those who saved him during the 2008 earthquake, which killed nine of his relatives."I was too young then to make a difference," he said. "Now I can."
HONG KONG — China 's top anticorruption agency said Sunday that it was investigating Liu Tienan, a senior economic policy maker, in an abrupt turn in a case that openly pitted him against a campaigning investigative journalist.The agency, the Central Commission for Discipline Inspection of the Communist Party, which runs corruption inquiries involving senior officials, said Mr. Liu was "suspected of grave violations of discipline, and is now under investigation by the organization," according to a report from Xinhua, the state news agency.The report came more than five months after the journalist, Luo Changping, boldly challenged Mr. Liu and investigators by publicly accusing Mr. Liu of shady business deals and other wrongdoing like threatening to kill his mistress and overstating his academic qualifications. Mr. Luo laid out the charges on the Internet in early December. They lingered there, despite a denial by a spokesman for Mr. Liu and the power of censors to erase the postings, which fanned a public uproar.Yet for months it appeared that Mr. Liu might survive the scandal. Since 2008, he has been a deputy chairman of the National Development and Reform Commission, an agency that oversees many areas of economy policy. Until March, he was also head of the National Energy Administration, and he made several public appearances after Mr. Luo made the accusations, according to Chinese news reports.The Xinhua report did not detail the official allegations against Mr. Liu. But Mr. Luo, a deputy editor of Caijing Magazine in Beijing, said he was sure they were related to his accusations."I know there's a direct connection, but I can't say any more," Mr. Luo said in a telephone interview."I had felt panicky before because nothing was happening, but I've breathed a sigh of relief now that this has happened," he said, referring to the inquiry.Mr. Liu, 58, could become a trophy in the effort by China's new leader, Xi Jinping, to persuade disenchanted citizens that he is serious about ending abuses by officials. Since becoming party chief in November, Mr. Xi has vowed to clamp down on corruption, extravagance and self-enrichment; he has said both "flies" and "tigers" — junior and senior officials — would come under scrutiny.Other officials under investigation for corruption and other crimes include Bo Xilai, a former Politburo member whose wife, Gu Kailai, was convicted and in August given a death sentence, which was then suspended, on charges of murdering a British businessman. In April, the former railway minister, Liu Zhijun, was charged with corruption and abuse of power.The Central Commission for Discipline Inspection wields broad powers to detain officials and pursue secretive inquiries. In serious cases, the commission can hand officials over to the police and prosecutors to be investigated on criminal charges, which almost always end in convictions and sentences by party-run courts.Despite Mr. Luo's apparent vindication, Chinese leaders are wary of letting the public seize the initiative in fighting corruption. "What I really hope to see is more change at the institutional level to fight corruption, not just focusing on individual cases," Mr. Luo said.
HONG KONG — The Chinese Communist Party has warned officials to combat "dangerous" Western values and other perceived ideological threats, in a directive that analysts said on Monday reflected the determination of China's leader to preserve top-down political control even as he considers economic liberalization.The warning emerged on Chinese news Web sites that carried accounts from local party committees describing a directive from the Central Committee General Office, the administrative engine of the party leadership under Xi Jinping.The central document, "Concerning the Situation in the Ideological Sphere," has not been openly published, and most references to it disappeared from Chinese news and government Web sites by Monday afternoon, apparently reflecting censors' skittishness about publicizing such warnings. But what did come to light in the local summaries exuded anxiety about the party's grip on opinion.Mr. Xi has been credited with strengthening national cohesiveness since he became general secretary in November, said a summary of a party organization meeting last week of the Commission of Urban-Rural Development of Chongqing, a municipality in southwest China."At the same time, the central leadership has made a thorough analysis of and shown a staunch stance toward seven serious problems in the ideological sphere that merit attention, giving a clearer understanding of the sharpness and complexity of struggle in the ideological sphere," said the account, which later disappeared from the commission's Web site.The Chinese government has confronted demands for democratic changes from activists emboldened by Mr. Xi's vows to respect the law. In recent days, some activists have cited rumors that the party issued a warning against seven ideas that are considered anathema, including media freedom and judicial independence. But the official summaries did not include such language.Officials must "fully understand the dangers posed by views and theories advocated by the West," said the account from Chongqing, which said officials must "cut off at the source channels for disseminating erroneous currents of thought.""Strengthen management of the Internet, enhance guidance of opinion, purify the environment on the Internet, give no opportunities that lawless elements can seize on," it said.Reports on other local party committee Web sites in northeast and southwest China also described the directive, although in less detail.The demands for ideological conformity show that Mr. Xi and other leaders want to inoculate the public from expectations of major political liberalization, even as they explore loosening some state controls over the economy, several analysts said."If anything, there seems to be some regression in the ideological sphere," said Chen Ziming, a prominent political commentator in Beijing who supports democratic change. "I think that there will be some steps forward in economic reform, but there are no notions of political reform. Such warnings reflect that mentality."Calls for orthodoxy from Chinese leaders are by no means new. But Mr. Xi is caught in a sharpening conundrum, trying to satisfy widespread public expectations for cleaner, more accountable government and a fairer share of prosperity while also defending centralized control, said Minxin Pei, a professor at Claremont McKenna College in California who specializes in Chinese politics."I think in his mind he has two conflicting priorities," Professor Pei said."The top priority is to maintain the party's rule," he said. "But he also has this immediate political priority; that is, he wants to show he will end this period of stagnation. But clearly the two priorities are in conflict with each other."Mr. Xi has commissioned officials and researchers to study seven areas of potential economic change, including loosening state controls on bank interest rates and on resource prices, said a Chinese businessman with close links to senior leaders, confirming a report in The Sydney Morning Herald on Monday.Some of the proposals are likely to be endorsed by a meeting of the party's Central Committee late this year, said the businessman, who spoke on the condition of anonymity, citing concern about harming his ties to leaders.On Monday, the prime minister, Li Keqiang, reinforced the theme of change, urging officials to cut red tape stifling market competition, according to Xinhua, the state news agency. "The market is the creator of social wealth," Mr. Li said. "Let go of the powers that should be let go."Yet Mr. Xi has accompanied such signals of change with the messages defending party tradition and control. In December, he said China must absorb the lessons of the collapse of the Soviet Union, for which he blamed political ill-discipline and ideological laxity under Mikhail S. Gorbachev.More recently, Mr. Xi told officials that the Chinese Communist Party might not have survived if it had disowned Mao Zedong in the same way that the Soviet Union condemned Stalin, a party newspaper, The Guangming Daily, reported last week.If Mr. Xi is to advance some economic liberalization, he must first convince potential opponents that he will not jeopardize one-party control, said Robert Lawrence Kuhn, an American businessman who wrote an authorized biography of the former party leader Jiang Zemin and has met Mr. Xi and other senior officials."It's not an irrational combination in the Chinese system," Mr. Kuhn said in an interview. "My guess is that some of the talk is designed to consolidate a position so that he's not attacked by the extreme left. People can read into Xi what they like, because he gives each side the opportunity to see what they like."
HONG KONG — Chinese factory activity and retail sales picked up a notch in April, according to data released on Monday. But expansion remained underwhelming, analysts said, reinforcing the conclusion that the once surging Chinese economy is making a long-term transition toward slower growth.Industrial output, the National Bureau of Statistics said, expanded 9.3 percent from April of last year, compared with the 8.9 percent reading in March, while retail sales grew 12.8 percent, compared with 12.6 percent in March. Analysts cautioned that the improvements did not represent a substantive pickup in growth and that the momentum in the Chinese economy remained muted.Fixed-asset investment, an important engine of economic growth, grew 20.6 percent in the first four months of the year, but the figure was lower than analysts had forecast."This is not the start of a rally. It is a sputtering whimper as momentum continues to fade," Xianfang Ren and Alistair Thornton, economists at IHS Global Insight in Beijing, said in a research note.Although they emphasized that "fading momentum is not the same as collapsing growth" and that the government would probably be able to engineer full-year gross domestic product growth of more than 7.5 percent this year, they added, "we feel the risks remain firmly on the downside."The data suggest that the Chinese economy is stabilizing, Helen Qiao, chief economist for Greater China at Morgan Stanley, said at a news briefing. But "the question remains whether the growth recovery is sustainable or not" and how long the current softness will last, she said.The figures released on Monday were the latest in a series of disappointing indicators from the Chinese economy in recent weeks. Data released last month showed that the economy had expanded 7.7 percent in the January-to-March quarter, compared with the same period last year. Analysts expected 8 percent. Two surveys of purchasing managers in the manufacturing sector showed that April activity was disappointing, thanks in large part to weakness in new orders for exports. And last week, the Canton Fair, China's biggest export event, announced that export orders placed at the spring session had fallen 1.4 percent from a year ago.In part, the weakness stems from the euro zone's festering debt crisis and austerity measures, which have eroded the ability and desire of European customers to spend, hurting exports from China. Rising wages in China and a gradually appreciating currency have also started to erode the country's international competitiveness.China is putting its own brakes on the economy with reforms that are likely to ensure that the double-digit expansion rates of much of the last three decades are over. Aware that the economy cannot continue to grow on the strength of exports and heavy industry alone, Beijing has begun to steer China toward growth focused on domestic demand and urbanization. While that should help raise living standards and productivity, it will also mean slower growth, analysts say.At the same time, Beijing is trying to keep a lid on risk like the expansion in local government debt, which some analysts worry could turn sour, and lending activity outside the regulated banking system. Such so-called shadow banking has been growing rapidly in the last few years and has become an important source of financing for companies and local governments. But shadow banking is relatively opaque and loosely regulated, and it carries greater credit risk, analysts warn.Moody's underlined the concerns about shadow banking in a report released on Monday. The credit ratings agency welcomed recent regulatory steps to tighten controls and restrict the growth of shadow banking, but, it said, "The opacity associated with shadow banking products and the threat of loss and contagion outweigh their potential benefits in terms of diverting riskier borrowers from the formal banking system."
BEIJING (AP) — Police in southern China detained a man early Thursday who is suspected of calling in fake bomb threats that grounded five domestic flights the previous day.The man was detained at a rental home in the city of Dongguan, police in the southern hub of Shenzhen said in an online statement.Police gave no word on a possible motive. They identified the suspect by his surname, Wang, and said he is 26, unemployed and from the autonomous northern territory of Inner Mongolia.He is accused of making threats Wednesday against five flights headed to Shenzhen and Xi'an from other cities, including Beijing, Nanjing and Shanghai. The flights were operated by Shenzhen Airlines, China Eastern Airlines, and Juneyao Airlines.The crime is punishable by up to 15 years in prison. Last year, a man in Dongguan who made a fake bomb threat to delay the arrival of his creditor received a four-year sentence.China has undergone a massive expansion in air travel in recent years. Delays, poor airline service and unruly passengers lead to frequent disruptions at airports or aboard flights.
BEIJING — Chinese authorities say rainstorms that battered southern China this week have killed 33 people and left 12 people missing.The Chinese Ministry of Civil Affairs website says at least nine provinces have had storms and some flooding and landslides since Tuesday. It says Guangdong province has been hit the hardest with 19 deaths and 11 missing people.Guangdong's weather service said some areas received more than 8 inches (21 centimeters) of rain in nine hours on Thursday. It forecasts more rain in the coming days and warns of mudslides.
BEIJING — "They call me at home and leave abusive messages," said Mao Yushi, a prominent advocate of economic and political freedoms who inspires a passionate following among many Chinese, at a private event in Beijing this week."They" are hard-core Maoists who have recently renewed their attacks on Mr. Mao, a magnet for their dissatisfaction, with small but aggressive demonstrations around the country, most recently in Changsha, in the central province of Hunan, in early May. "When a traitor crosses the street, shout and beat!" they chanted, holding up banners declaring the 2012 recipient of the Milton Friedman Prize for Advancing Liberty a "Chinese traitor" who had "sold out to America."We had come to hear Mr. Mao talk about his new book, "Where Does Chinese People's Anxiety Come From?" But the conversation moved to how the 84-year-old engineer-turned-economist, first branded a political "rightist" by the Communist Party in the 1950s, was coping."Of course, we're being harassed at home, so my wife cannot sleep peacefully, and I've also been affected," said Mr. Mao."But I feel that is a small issue," he said. "What's a truly big issue is how we as a society should view this bifurcation of opinion, how we can resolve this difference of positions."The differences speak of a society increasingly fractured into rich and poor, pro-state and pro-individual, a skewed left and right — all the issues that Mr. Mao addressed at the gathering, kept deliberately small to maintain security.There was only one way, he said. The Maoist legacy of identifying and destroying political enemies, the continued lying about history, had infected people's minds and language. China must undergo major cultural change to learn tolerance, to handle differences of opinion, to address growing challenges, including international ones, with calm and reason.It was probably not lost on the audience, which included academics, lawyers and students, that last week, Guangming Daily, a Communist Party newspaper, reported that President Xi Jinping had apparently ruled out rejecting Mao's legacy, citing the risk that China could descend into chaos.Mr. Mao has long been a figurehead for the pro-freedom, pro-market movement in China. In 2011, he wrote an essay criticizing Mao (the two men are not related), titled "Returning Mao Zedong to Human Form." For many of Mao's supporters it crossed a line, provoking vicious verbal attacks.The recent attacks have been more of the same, he said, describing them with his customary equanimity."They go to my house and to Tianze," the Chinese name of the Unirule Institute of Economics, of which he is a founder and the honorary president, he said. "They harass me on the telephone and at home. They made up rumors that I took 50 million renminbi," the equivalent of about $8 million, "from America and ran to them for asylum," he said."The rumors are just completely ridiculous," he said. "They lack any common sense. Rumors, harassment, phone calls, visits, demonstrations. Yet I have never once cursed them."He recounted a recent visit to his home by a reporter from Global Times, a party-run newspaper, who asked him to produce evidence of the harassment, apparently not entirely believing it. Mr. Mao played him a recording of words that cannot be printed here. The reporter's skepticism disturbed him, he said. "I feel that officialdom should have a fair standpoint."As for his attackers, he said, "I tell them, 'Why do you do it?' That's how I treat them. I tell them, 'Don't make up rumors.' Things like that."His response is in keeping with his political philosophy. "In a society with free speech, they all have the right to speak," he said. "They support Mao Zedong. I don't support him.""We need to look for common ground. Is there common ground? I think so. Our goal is the same, we all want China to do well. They think that Mao Zedong is good for China. I think freedom will be good for China," he said."But we have to use logic, truth, to get the right answers. The Maoists use their methods, which include a lack of logic, putting labels on people. We need tolerance and calm."Then it was back to the main point of the event — his book.Yes, Chinese people are deeply anxious about the future, despite growing prosperity — a puzzle, he said, asking, "Why are we still so dissatisfied?"He offered a concise answer. "The government isn't reasonable," using a very Chinese phrase: "bu jiang daoli." The legacy of authoritarianism sits too deep. The protests in Changsha and other cities, the harassing telephone calls, seemed to demonstrate that."What happened in Changsha is a danger to our country. Using Mao Zedong methods, without law or heaven, lacking any rules," he said. "This is our poison. If everyone behaves like that, how can society improve?"Positioned uncomfortably in the center of a war, so far only of words, Mr. Mao's lack of angry rhetoric is a trademark of the man.Repeatedly, he used a Chinese idiom to express his hopes for the future: "Wen liang gong jian rang" — "kindness and moderation" — qualities he said were missing in social and political discourse. Echoed by other speakers, they became a catchphrase of the morning, words that lingered.
BEIJING — China downplayed border tensions with India on Thursday, days before the new Chinese premier visits the neighboring country on his first foreign visit since taking office in March.Disagreements over the Himalayan frontier can be handled under existing mechanisms and should not affect overall relations, Vice Foreign Minister Song Tao told reporters at a briefing."China and India have historical border issues, but these are outweighed by our mutual interests and cooperation," Song said.Song made no direct mention of a recent three-week standoff between border troops that had threatened to overshadow Li Keqiang's visit that begins Sunday.The sides negotiated a peaceful end to the standoff, although India's foreign minister last week said the two needed to work harder to avoid border flare-ups and resolve those that do happen more quickly.New Delhi claimed Chinese troops crossed the de facto border April 15 and pitched camp in the Depsang valley in the Ladakh region of eastern Kashmir. India responded with diplomatic protests, then moved its soldiers just 300 meters (yards) from the Chinese position. A series of meetings were held, and troops from both sides withdrew last week to their original positions.The nations often accuse each other of crossing the frontier high in the western Himalayas or of violating agreements with new construction or boosted deployments. Throughout the incident, China said its troops stayed on their side of the line of actual control that Beijing and New Delhi recognize as lying in different places.Asian giants with more than 1 billion people each, India and China have had chilly relations since they fought a brief but bloody border war in 1962.India says China is occupying 38,000 square kilometers (15,000 square miles) of territory in the Aksai Chin plateau in the western Himalayas, while China claims around 90,000 square kilometers (35,000 square miles) in India's northeastern state of Arunachal Pradesh. Fifteen rounds of talks have failed to resolve the dispute.Song said Li's choice of India for his first overseas visit as premier was a sign of the importance Beijing attaches to improving relations with New Delhi. He said Li would meet with top leaders and attend a business summit among other activities.China has become India's biggest trading partner, with two-way trade jumping from $5 billion in 2002 to nearly $75 billion in 2011, although that figure declined to $61.5 billion last year.Most of that trade is skewed in China's favor, stirring complaints and suspicions over major Chinese investments in Indian infrastructure.Li will follow his Indian trip with a visit to close Chinese ally Pakistan before traveling to Switzerland and Germany on visits tightly focused on economic ties.
KUNMING, China — More than 2,000 people in southern China unfurled banners and shouted "Protest! Protest!" on Thursday to oppose plans for a petroleum refinery, in a large environmental rally that local authorities allowed to go forward in order to let the public vent frustration.The gathering in downtown Kunming — the second one in the city this month — was largely peaceful, though there were minor scuffles with police. Witnesses said at least two people were briefly detained, though it was noteworthy that authorities — apparently eager to appear open and inclusive — made no effort to shut down the rally.A city vice mayor, He Bo, even tried to meet with the demonstrators, but his attempts to explain the refinery project to the crowd were cut short by the cries of a protester.Kunming officials said this week that the refinery planned by powerful state company PetroChina Co. will meet environment standards and is crucial for the local economy, but residents are worried about the air and water pollution that will result."We don't need speedy development. What we need is a healthy and peaceful country," Kunming resident Liu Yuncheng said. "I still haven't given birth to a baby. I want to be pregnant and I want a healthy baby."But while police allowed the protest to proceed, censors scrubbed posts in China's social media that were critical of the project planned by the powerful state Petro China Co., and employees of state companies were asked to promise not to participate in any rally or talk about the project in public venues or online.The scene in Kunming was in contrast to a planned protest against a petrochemical plant earlier this month in the city of Chengdu , where authorities thwarted the gathering by flooding the streets with police in a supposed earthquake drill, reflecting the balancing act of Chinese officials as they seek to promote economic growth while maintaining social stability.Members of China's public, especially among the rising middle class, have become increasingly outspoken against environmentally risky factories, in reaction to a decade of development-at-all-costs policies that have polluted the country's air and waterways.However, they have virtually no say on industrial projects, and have instead turned to organizing protests. Several of those turned violent last year, in some cases prompting local governments to scrap plans for factories.In response to a May 4 protest by Kunming residents, local government officials and PetroChina held a series of public meetings and promised that operations at the 20 billion yuan ($3 billion) refinery would be environmentally clean. The facility is expected to produce up to 10 million tons of refined oil annually.But officials also said the project's environmental evaluation report remains confidential, aggravating a public already upset with a lack of information about the project. Residents remain skeptical about any government claim that the project will be safe."We cherish blue skies and white clouds, as well as good air. If you want to build a refinery with 10 million tons of capacity here in the place where we live, we resolutely oppose it," said a Kunming resident who identified herself only by her surname, Liu. "We want a good life. We women want to be beautiful."Kunming Mayor Li Wenrong was quoted in state media last week as saying the public's opinion would be taken into account in a democratic way in the approval process for another upcoming project — plans to build factory that would produce p-xylene, a toxic chemical used in the production of polyester and other materials.The refinery is connected to operations of the upcoming Myanmar-China pipeline, which originally was due to start pumping oil and gas at the end of this month after eight years of planning and construction.China has invested heavily for access to resources from neighboring Myanmar and to establish a new, shorter route for the procurement of oil and gas, as an alternative to shipping routes.Opposition to the pipeline has been strong on both sides of the border. Myanmar officials recently said its operations would be delayed.
Imagine a wolf catching a Frisbee a dozen times in a row, or leading police officers to a stash of cocaine, or just sleeping peacefully next to you on your couch. It's a stretch, to say the least. Dogs may have evolved from wolves, but the minds of the two canines are profoundly different.Dog brains, as I wrote last month in The New York Times, have become exquisitely tuned to our own. Scientists are now zeroing in on some of the genes that were crucial to the rewiring of dog brains.Their results are fascinating, and not only because they can help us understand how dogs turned into man's best friend. They may also teach us something about the evolution of our own brains: Some of the genes that evolved in dogs are the same ones that evolved in us.To trace the change in dog brains, scientists have first had to work out how dog breeds are related to one another, and how they're all related to wolves. Ya-Ping Zhang, a geneticist at the Chinese Academy of Sciences, has led an international network of scientists who have compared pieces of DNA from different canines. They've come to the conclusion that wolves started their transformation into dogs in East Asia.Those early dogs then spread to other parts of the world. Many of the breeds we're most familiar with, like German shepherds and golden retrievers, emerged only in the past few centuries.Meanwhile, back in China, those early dogs lingered on for thousands of years. Today, they're known as Chinese native dogs. "The Chinese native dogs live in rural villages, helping humans to guard homes," Dr. Zhang explained in an e-mail.Dr. Zhang and his colleagues see Chinese native dogs as the key to better understanding how dogs evolved. Recently, they sequenced the entire genome of Chinese native dogs and compared them with the genomes of Asian wolves and modern breeds like German shepherds. By comparing the mutations in the genomes, they've been able to estimate when wolves and dogs diverged.As they reported on Tuesday in the journal Nature Communications, they found that the split started 32,000 years ago. Those early dogs would have encountered small bands of hunter-gatherers. People didn't settle in villages to farm in East Asia until about 10,000 years ago.After dogs split from wolves, their genes began to evolve in a new direction. Dr. Zhang and his colleagues were able to identify some of these evolving genes. A number of them, it turned out, are active in dog brains. (Dr. Zhang and some of his colleagues published some of these results last week in the journal Molecular Biology and Evolution.)Some of the genes that evolved early in dog evolution are involved in smell or hearing. Others are active in a region called the prefrontal cortex, where mammals make decisions about how to behave. Some genes are involved in growing connections between neurons. One gene, called SLC6A4, transports a neurotransmitter called serotonin into neurons.The results offer some tantalizing hints about how wolves first turned doglike. "The conventional view is that the hunter-gatherers go out and get a puppy," said Chung-I Wu of the University of Chicago, an author of the Nature Communications study. If humans actually did breed early dogs this way, then dogs would have descended from a very small population.That's not what Dr. Wu and his colleagues have found, though. Instead, it appears that a large population of wolves started lingering around humans — perhaps scavenging the carcasses that hunters left behind.In this situation, aggressive wolves would have fared badly, because humans would kill them off. Mellower wolves, by contrast, would thrive. If this notion turns out to be true, it means that we didn't domesticate wolves — they domesticated themselves. SLC6A4 may have played a crucial part in this change, because serotonin influences aggression.To test these ideas, Dr. Zhang and his colleagues are gathering DNA from more dogs and wolves. They also hope to collaborate with cognitive scientists to see how variants of genes like SLC6A4 affect the behavior of dogs today. Their results may also help explain human evolution, because Dr. Zhang and his colleagues found that some of the same genes that evolved in dog brains, such as SLC6A4, also experienced natural selection in human brains."Humans have had to tame themselves," said Adam Boyko of Cornell University, one of Dr. Zhang's collaborators on the Molecular Biology and Evolution study. "The process is probably similar to dogs — you have to tolerate the presence of others."
HONG KONG — A ceiling at a small factory making shoes on the outskirts of the capital of Cambodia collapsed on Thursday morning, killing at least two workers and underlining global worries about factory safety in poor countries.Ken Loo, the secretary general of the Garment Manufacturers Association in Cambodia, said that steel beams holding up a concrete-floored storage area at mezzanine height between two building had given way. In addition to the two dead, nine workers were injured, three of them severely, by falling pieces of concrete, Mr. Loo said.The collapse outside the capital, Phnom Penh, came 22 days after the collapse of a garment factory complex in Bangladesh killed at least 1,127 people and prompted an international outcry for multinational retailers to assume more responsibility for the safety of workers at their suppliers.Multinationals have been looking to Cambodia as one of several countries that could be alternatives to Bangladesh. Cambodia has some of the lowest pay in Asia, with workers earning $120 a month in salary and benefits before overtime. That compares with just $37 in Bangladesh.Bruce Rockowitz, the group president and chief executive at Hong Kong-based Li & Fung, one of the world's largest sourcing companies, said in a telephone interview on Wednesday, before the Cambodian factory collapse, that the collapse of the factory in Dhaka had already taught multinationals that visual inspections of factories' structural stability was not enough."We visually always inspected them, but you need true engineers," he said.
BEIJING — Chinese President Xi Jinping has taken charge of drawing up ambitious reform plans to revitalize the economy, sources close to the government said, shunning policy stimulus for fear it could worsen local government debt and inflate property prices.A consensus had been reached among top leaders that reforms would be the only way to put the world's second-largest economy on a more sustainable footing, said the sources, who are familiar with the plans and Xi's involvement.China's economic growth is at its weakest in 13 years, although still the envy of any major economy.Xi will present the reforms at a key meeting of the ruling Communist Party later this year that will set the agenda for the next decade, signaling his seriousness to see breakthroughs, the sources told Reuters.Some of the sources cautioned that the reforms could face resistance from vested interests, especially state firms.Broadly, the measures would liberalize interest rates and overhaul the fiscal system for local governments to ensure they had a steady stream of tax revenues rather than relying on volatile land sales to raise funds.The reforms would also free up China's rigid residence registration, or hukou, system that precludes people from access to basic welfare services outside their official residence area, the sources said."A top-level team has been set up to draft reform plans for the party meeting, with Xi taking personal charge," said a senior economist at a top government think-tank in Beijing."Xi is keen to see some real changes," said the economist, who requested anonymity due to the sensitivity of the issue.Big injections of policy stimulus appear to be off the table after Premier Li Keqiang was quoted by state media as saying on Wednesday there was limited room to use government spending to boost the economy."China's economic model has reached a point where it must be overhauled, although reforms are probably easier said than done," said Shi Xiaomin, vice head of the China Society of Economic Reform, a government think-tank in Beijing."The sense of crisis of Xi and Li is significantly higher than their predecessors."Xi and Li assumed their government posts in March during a once-in-a-decade leadership transition.Some critics said the previous administration of President Hu Jintao and Premier Wen Jiabao had delayed economic reforms and failed to deal with the fallout from China's 4 trillion yuan ($650 billion) stimulus package in 2008. The package insulated China from the global financial crisis but left a mountain of local government debt and record house prices.Xi and Li, by contrast, have been leaning toward reforms rather than short-term policy stimulus to bolster the economy."They are more eager to tackle long-term issues through reform measures. China's economic slowdown is mainly caused by structural factors," said Wang Jun, senior economist at the China Centre for International Economic Exchanges (CCIEE), a well-connected government think-tank in Beijing.Such structural drags have become more obvious this year as annual economic growth slowed to 7.7 percent in the first quarter from 7.9 percent in the fourth quarter of 2012. Full-year GDP growth of 7.8 percent in 2012 was the slowest since 1999. Weakness has persisted in April despite a credit boom.Freer interest rates would help curb China's sprawling shadow banking sector - lending by businesses other than banks - because state controlled bank deposit rates are fanning a boom in risky alternative investments. At the same time, state firms with preferential access to credit are profiting at the expense of cash-starved private companies.The most pressing reform is to overhaul the fiscal system for local governments since Beijing is counting on a new urbanization program to drive economic growth by unleashing the spending power of rural workers.China plans to spend 40 trillion yuan to bring 400 million people into its cities over the next decade. But local governments don't have steady tax revenues to back the issuance of bonds that would finance spending on roads, apartments and other infrastructure. The central bank has turned down the option of using bank loans.Under China's current tax structure that has been in place since 1994, the central government gets the lion's share of receipts while local governments do most of the spending, forcing them to rely on land sales for survival.Linked to the urbanization drive is reforming the hukou system, which economists say would turn millions of migrant workers into consumers if they had access to welfare services outside their home region.Ratings agency Fitch has estimated local government debt was 12.85 trillion yuan at the end of 2012, or about 25 percent of GDP. The latest official data put the figure at 10.7 trillion yuan by the end of 2010.The reforms will be presented at the third plenum of the 18th Central Committee of the Communist Party of China, expected in October.Many economists see this as a critical period for China if it wants to avoid the so-called middle income trap, where wealth creation stagnates as market share is lost to lower-cost competitors and the attainment of high-income country status stays out of reach.Third plenums have been the springboard for key changes in China in the past. Former leader Deng Xiaoping launched historic reforms at the third plenum of the 11th party committee in 1978 to rescue the economy from the verge of collapse after Mao Zedong's disastrous Cultural Revolution.The third plenum of the 14th committee in 1993 endorsed the "socialist" market economy, paving the way for sweeping reforms spearheaded by former Premier Zhu Rongji.China's new leaders have installed several Zhu lieutenants in top government posts, including Vice Premier Ma Kai and Finance Minister Lou Jiwei, while central bank governor Zhou Xiaochuan was kept on after the leadership transition.Still, pushing reforms looks harder than in the 1990s as the economy has become more sophisticated and questions remain over whether economic reforms could run into political roadblocks.Xi recently launched a frugality campaign to target official extravagance, but there has been little apparent progress to get officials to publicly disclose their assets."It won't be smooth sailing," said Lian Ping, chief economist at Bank of Communications, the country's fifth biggest lender, in Shanghai.
BEIJING — The State Department's senior envoy on North Korea said Wednesday that he had discussed "all aspects of the North Korea issue" with Chinese officials, including sanctions on the North, during a one-day visit to Beijing."I think this is all a work in progress," the diplomat, Glyn T. Davies, said at a briefing for reporters in Beijing. "The Chinese have said to us that they will faithfully implement U.N. Security Council sanctions and are doing so. And, as I've said before, we take them at their word."Mr. Davies arrived in Beijing on Wednesday morning after holding talks with South Korean officials in Seoul. He will depart for Tokyo on Thursday for the final leg of his visit to the region.His trip to China appeared to be part of an effort by the United States to work closely with Beijing to ease tensions on the Korean Peninsula after North Korea's third nuclear test in February.China is North Korea's most important economic supporter, providing essential food and energy supplies that keep the North Korean government afloat. China voted for Security Council sanctions after the nuclear test, and the United States has been watching to see how carefully Beijing is enforcing them.Mr. Davies met on Wednesday with Chinese officials, including China's special representative on Korean affairs, Wu Dawei, who visited Washington several weeks ago. He also met with Zhang Yesui, China's executive vice foreign minister and a former ambassador to the United States, and Liu Jieyi, vice minister of the international department of the Chinese Central Committee.Mr. Davies played down the idea that a decision by the Bank of China to halt transfers to North Korea's Foreign Trade Bank last week was a strong diplomatic signal by Beijing."I think it's a significant step that has been taken by the bank," Mr. Davies said. "I don't believe this was at the direction necessarily of the Chinese government. I think this was a decision made by the bankers at the Bank of China."On Tuesday, one of Japan's most experienced diplomats on North Korea, Isao Iijima, visited Pyongyang, North Korea's capital. North Korean state television broadcast images of Mr. Iijima's arrival in the country. The Japanese government refused to confirm Mr. Iijima's visit.Mr. Davies said he discussed the visit with a senior Japanese official on Wednesday but declined to comment "given the deficit of information."
BRUSSELS — The European Commission said on Wednesday it was ready to start an investigation into anticompetitive behavior by Chinese producers of mobile telecommunications equipment, opening a new front in Europe's trade offensive against China.The European Union trade commissioner, Karel De Gucht, said in a statement that he and fellow commissioners had agreed in principle to open an antidumping and antisubsidy case, although they would first seek to negotiate a solution with Chinese authorities.''The clock is ticking. We have had an open-door policy for negotiations with our Chinese partners for approximately one year now and we hope that the Chinese authorities step forward and engage with us in a serious manner,'' Mr. De Gucht's spokesman said during a news briefing.The European Union has 31 ongoing trade-related investigations, 18 of them involving China. The largest to date involves imports from China of solar panels, cells and wafers, worth 21 billion euros ($27.25 billion), for which the Union is proposing punitive duties.China exports more than 1 billion euros worth of telecommunications network equipment per year to the European Union. The equipment is used by telecom providers to transmit voice and data messages.The proposed investigation into telecommunications equipment would be a new twist in the European Union's trade defense against China because it would be initiated by the European Commission itself and not in response to a complaint by industry.By initiating a case, known as an ex officio case, the commission said it would provide a degree of protection for companies.''This possibility is particularly important as it offers a 'shield' when the risk of retaliation against European companies asking for trade defense instruments is high,'' the commission said.The commission did not name any of the Chinese producers or the European manufacturers it believes are threatened. But European officials have indicated that while European manufacturers like Ericsson, Nokia Siemens Networks and Alcatel-Lucent have suffered as a result of cheap imports by Chinese companies like Huawei and ZTE, they are not prepared to make a formal complaint for fear of reprisals.
HONG KONG — Japan's Nikkei 225 stock index, which has been on a tear for months amid optimism over government efforts to breathe life into Japan's listless economy, rose another 2.3 percent on Wednesday and closed above 15,000 points for the first time in five and a half years.Japanese stocks have soared since November, when Shinzo Abe, who took over as prime minister in December, vowed to pursue aggressive steps to combat persistent deflation and lift the economy out of years of feeble growth.Adding to the momentum on Wednesday was a 10.6 percent surge in the shares of Sony; the company on Tuesday came under pressure from the investor and billionaire hedge fund manager Daniel S. Loeb to spin off part of its entertainment arm.Mr. Loeb argued that the move would allow to sharpen its focus and lead to higher profit margins, while helping revive the core electronics business.Sony shares, which have rallied strongly this year, in part because a weaker yen has improved its earnings prospects, were worth ¥2,072, or $20.28, apiece by the close of trading in Tokyo on Wednesday, more than twice where they began the year. That is the highest since July 2011.The yen's fall on the currencies markets — the Japanese currency has dropped about 17 percent against the U.S. dollar so far this year — has been a major boon to Japanese exporters, whose goods and services have become cheaper for customers abroad as a result.Numerous companies have in recent weeks cited the weaker yen as a reason for improved earnings, helping to lift the overall stock market.Since the start of the year, the Nikkei 225 has risen more than 40 percent, and on Wednesday the index closed at 15,096 points.The yen was trading at 102.37 to the dollar, compared with ¥86.67 per dollar at the start of the year.Meanwhile, gross domestic product data for the first three months of 2013, due out Thursday, also are likely to illustrate Japan's improved prospects.The figures are expected to show that the Japanese economy grew 0.7 percent from the previous quarter, according to analysts polled by Reuters.Mr. Abe "wasted no time launching the first two 'arrows' of his three-pronged economic agenda, delivering bold fiscal and monetary stimulus that has weakened the JPY and lifted equities to five year highs," Izumi Devalier, Japan economist at HSBC, wrote in a research note on Wednesday, referring to the Japanese currency.But Ms. Devalier also struck a note of skepticism, saying the long-term success of what has been dubbed "Abenomics" hinged on "the third and most important arrow — structural reforms.""Deep reforms," she wrote, "are in danger of being shelved due to push back from bureaucrats, unions, and even pockets of Abe's own party."
BEIJING — Taiwan announced the withdrawal of its representative in Manila on Wednesday and said it had stopped accepting applications for Filipino workers, a retaliatory step for the killing of a Taiwanese fisherman by the Philippine Coast Guard last week.The office of President Ma Ying-jeou of Taiwan said the country regarded an informal apology offered earlier by the Philippines as inadequate.The diplomatic squabble is the latest sign of high tensions over competing claims in and around the South China Sea among Brunei, China, Malaysia, the Philippines and Taiwan.The Philippines said the Taiwanese fishing vessel had entered waters in its exclusive economic zone on Thursday and that it had tried to ram a Philippine Coast Guard ship. The Taiwanese fisherman, Hung Shih-cheng, 65, died from a bullet wound in the neck, and his boat was hit with dozens of rounds, Taiwanese officials said.Taiwan has said that the shooting occurred at a location that is within exclusive economic zones claimed by both countries.Mr. Ma's office said Wednesday that Taiwan's Navy and Coast Guard would stage an exercise as a show of strength in disputed waters near where the episode occurred. But Taiwanese officials seemed to be resisting some calls for military action.The Central Daily News in Taiwan urged the government to take tough action against the Philippines, saying that "suffering in silence" for fear of antagonizing the United States, an ally of the Philippines, would only mean further international marginalization of the island.In an effort to defuse the diplomatic standoff, a spokesman for President Benigno S. Aquino III of the Philippines said later Wednesday that a presidential representative would convey "deep regret and apology" to the family of the dead fisherman and to the people of Taiwan.The spokesman, Edwin Lacierda, said in a statement that Amadeo R. Perez, chairman of the Manila Economic and Cultural Office, which operates as the Philippines' de facto embassy in Taipei, would personally deliver the message. Taiwan and the Philippines do not maintain official diplomatic relations.Mr. Lacierda's statement also said that the Philippines' National Bureau of Investigation had begun an inquiry into the shooting, and that it would be "thorough, exhaustive, impartial and expeditious." In a further note of apology, the statement said, "We understand the grief and hurt of the family and of the people of Taiwan over this unfortunate loss and we empathize with them."Mr. Lacierda also asked that the Taiwan government not bar Filipino workers from Taiwan. "We appeal to Taiwan not to involve our Filipino compatriots there," he said.In 2011, the latest year for which data is available, 41,896 Filipinos went to Taiwan to work, according to the Philippine Overseas Employment Administration. Taiwan is the seventh most popular destination for Filipino workers overseas; the Philippines sends more than a million workers each year to countries around the world, and the money they send home is a mainstay of the country's economy.China, which has frosty relations with the Philippines over territorial disputes in the South China Sea, has come down on the side of Taiwan, which it regards as a breakaway province. At a briefing Wednesday in Beijing, a spokesman for the State Council Taiwan Affairs Office repeated China's demand that the Philippines investigate."We have already emphasized many times that we request the Philippines investigate thoroughly, punish those responsible and give the fishermen a satisfactory response," said the spokesman, Yang Yi.The Philippines is challenging China's territorial claims in the South China Sea through an arbitration case filed with the tribunal of the United Nations Convention on the Law of the Sea.
BEIJING — Chinese authorities say rainstorms that battered southern China this week have killed 55 people and left 14 others missing.The Chinese Ministry of Civil Affairs website says at least nine provinces have had storms and some flooding and landslides since Tuesday. It says Guangdong province has been hit the hardest, with 36 deaths and 10 missing people, followed by Jiangxi province, where six people are reported dead and four more missing.Guangdong's weather service forecasts more heavy rain along with thunder, strong wind gusts and hail in the coming days and warns of flooding and mudslides.
HONG KONG — A light rail train has derailed in Hong Kong's northern suburbs, injuring dozens of passengers.Police say 62 people were hurt, four seriously, in Friday's accident. They were all sent to hospitals. There was no word on the cause.Passengers told local media that the train was moving quite fast and going around a bend at the time of the accident.The incident occurred on a public holiday, when there were likely more passengers than usual.After the accident, one carriage leaned off the tracks and a set of wheels appeared to be torn off.Hong Kong's light rail system covers 68 stops over 36 kilometers (22 miles) in the city's northern New Territories.Accidents are rare on the Asian financial center's modern and extensive transportation network.
BEIJING — China is phasing out its reliance on executed prisoners for donated organs, but an architect of the country's transplant system said Friday that ingrained cultural attitudes are impeding the rise of donations among the general population.Almost all donated organs in China used to come from executed prisoners. A growing proportion now come from ordinary people, but the government is seeking to eliminate prisoner donations altogether.However, former vice health minister Huang Jiefu said Friday that there was little hope of changing a requirement that family members give consent before organs are donated, even if a person had expressed a desire to donate."China is a Confucian society. It's strongly hierarchical and the family's concerns usually trump those of the individual," said Huang, presently a leader of the national legislature's top advisory body. An objection from even one family member can block a donation, he said.Chinese have traditionally held that a person's body should be interred intact, and while such attitudes are gradually changing, they remain strong among older Chinese. At the same time, China is cutting down on its reliance on executed prisoners for organs — a practice that Huang called "profit-driven, unethical and violating human rights." Critics have long claimed that standard safeguards were often ignored in the case of obtaining organs from prisoners who may have been pressured to donate.The use of prisoners' organs was also seen as causing an artificial shortfall in the number of organs available by impeding the promotion of donating among the public as a whole. China suffers from an acute shortage of available organs and Huang said only about 10,000 of the 300,000 Chinese suffering from liver disease will be able to receive transplants. He hopes to raise that number to 100,000 over time. Another 1 million people suffer from kidney ailments, but many can be sustained for lengthy periods on dialysis machines.China considers the number of annual executions a secret, but most observers estimate the number at 6,000-8,000. It isn't known what proportion of those executed agree to donate their organs.However, 5,009 liver and kidney transplants performed last year used organs from executed prisoners, out of a total of 7,882 such operations, according to the Health Ministry. By contrast, 2,960 of 2,997 liver transplants performed in 2005 used organs from executed prisoners.Huang reiterated a projection that reliance on prisoners will be eliminated within about two years of the launch of the nationwide donor network in February.
LONDON — Four more people in China have died from a new strain of bird flu, bringing the death toll from the H7N9 virus to 36 from 131 confirmed cases, the World Health Organisation (WHO) said on Friday.The United Nations health agency said the four deaths were from cases that had already been identified in laboratories. Since May 8, there have been no new cases of infection with H7N9, it added.The WHO reiterated that there is no evidence that the new strain of bird flu, which was first detected in patients in China in March, is passing easily from human to human - a feature that, if it emerged, could spark a pandemic.It cautioned, however, that until the source of infection has been identified and controlled, there are likely to be further cases of human infection with H7N9.The WHO said Chinese health authorities were continuing with enhanced surveillance, epidemiological investigations, close contact tracing, clinical management, laboratory testing and sharing of samples as well as prevention and control measures.It added that in past week as the number of new cases has dwindled, some provinces have begun to scale back emergency operations.
BEIJING — A man has been arrested for allegedly making fake bomb threats against several domestic flights bound for Shanghai, Chinese officials said Saturday.It was the second time in a week that Chinese flights were grounded because of fake bomb threats. Another man was arrested Thursday for allegedly making such calls the previous day.The Civil Aviation Administration of China, or CAAC, said a 43-year-old man surnamed Ji and from the eastern city of Yancheng was arrested on suspicion of making prank calls Friday afternoon and spreading fake terror information relating to several Shanghai-bound flights departing from the cities of Beijing, Guangzhou, Chongqing and Shenzhen. It did not say what might have motivated the man to act.The official Xinhua News Agency said a bomb threat delayed all outbound flights at the Chongqing airport and forced inbound flights to return Friday evening.Yancheng police confirmed the arrest but declined to provide further details.CAAC said the crime of spreading fake terror information is punishable by up to 15 years in prison.Last year, a man in the southern city of Dongguan who made a fake bomb threat to delay the arrival of his creditor received a four-year jail sentence.
BEIJING — China is urging North Korea to release a Chinese fishing boat whose owner says it was seized by gun-toting North Koreans earlier this month and held for ransom, in the latest irritant in relations between the neighboring allies.The seizure of the Liaoning-based boat adds to China's frustration with North Korea over its recent tests of nuclear and rocket technologies in defiance of international efforts to curb the country's nuclear ambitions.At the same time, the Chinese government is under intense pressure domestically to ensure the safety of citizens who venture abroad or out to sea to seek their livelihoods. Another abduction by North Koreans of Chinese fishermen about a year ago — along with allegations they were beaten — sparked furious criticism among citizens in China's blogosphere."Whatever you call North Korea — rogue state or whatever — these kind of cases just keep happening," said a Liaoning Maritime and Fishery Administration official who identified himself only by his surname, Liu. "We had such cases last year and the year before. There's very little we can do to prevent them."Yu Xuejun, who wasn't aboard the boat, first publicized the seizure on his microblog late Saturday saying that North Koreans seized his boat on May 5 in Chinese waters and that they demanded a 600,000 yuan ($100,000) ransom. Yu, posting on a verified Tencent Weibo account, said he was asking for help from Internet users and China's Foreign Ministry. His post was reposted and commented on more than 12,000 times.In another plea for help on Monday, Yu wrote on his blog that he received another call from "the North Korean side" on Sunday night, still demanding money."My captain gave me the phone, his voice was trembling, could feel he was very afraid, told me no later than 5 p.m. today," Yu wrote. He said he suspected his crew had been mistreated.The official Xinhua News Agency, in its first report of the incident late Sunday, said diplomats in the North Korean capital had received a request for help from Yu as early as May 10, and that they had demanded at the time that North Korea release the boat.In May of last year, a North Korean boat hijacked three Chinese boats with 29 fishermen on board, reportedly for a ransom of $190,000. Two weeks later, they were freed — some of them stripped of everything but their long johns — and were widely quoted in Chinese media on their return as saying they had been beaten and starved.China is North Korea's economic lifeline, providing nearly all of its fuel and most of its trade. North Korea's economic dependence on China is rising, following a standoff with South Korea that effectively shut an industrial park that was an important source of hard currency. Still, Beijing has had difficulty controlling its neighbor, and early this year began joining Western nations in moves to punish Pyongyang with economic sanctions.Xinhua, citing Chinese Embassy official Jiang Yaxian, said the embassy had contacted the North Korean Foreign Ministry's Bureau of Consular Affairs, "asking (North Korea) to release the boat and the fishermen as soon as possible."Jiang said the embassy would "continue efforts to ensure that the issue will be properly addressed at an early date."The respected Southern Metropolis Daily reported earlier Sunday that Yu received a call from North Korea saying his boat had entered North Korean waters — although he maintains it was in Chinese waters.Liu, the fishery official, said he was not sure where the boat was at the time of the seizure."It is not clear. The owner of the boat says it was in Chinese waters," Liu said.Yu was quoted the Southern Metropolis as saying the North Korean side had first asked for the ransom to be paid by noon Sunday to a company in Dandong, a city in northeastern China on the North Korean border, or that they would confiscate the boat and repatriate the crew. The newspaper didn't mention whether Yu had paid any money.
The People's Recreation Community bookstore and several others on Hong Kong's teeming shopping streets specialize in selling books and magazines banned by the Chinese government, mostly for their luridly damning accounts of party leaders, past and present. And at a time when many Chinese citizens smolder with distrust of their leaders, business is thriving."We come here to buy books that we can't read in China," said Huang Tao, a salesman of nutritional supplements from southeast China, who picked out a muckraking volume recently about corruption among senior party leaders. "There are so many things that we've been deceived over," he said, waving toward books on the devastating famine of the late 1950s and early 1960s, an episode that official histories have muffled in euphemisms. "We can't learn the truth, so black becomes white and white becomes black."Such publications smuggle corrosive facts and rumors into the bloodstream of Chinese political life. The contraband flow is reinforced by a flow of online publications and downloadable pirate copies. The trade shows the thirst for information in a society gripped by censorship, and the difficulties that party authorities face in trying to stifle that thirst, especially when, people in the business say, officials are among the avid readers of banned books."These books are playing a big role in raising the consciousness of the Chinese people," said a Beijing journalist who visits Hong Kong several times a year and buys armloads of exposés. He asked that his name not be used, fearing punishment. "It's impossible to stop everything getting through."They contain accounts of every conceivable scandal of the past. Then there are the gloomy prophecies about China's future. One book foretells a war with Japan in 2014, another a toppling of the current leadership that same year. The strongest seller among these feverish jeremiads, "2014: The Great Collapse," says the fall of the Communist Party is assured, citing what it says are secret party documents. "This is not gossip or soothsaying," the preface declares."Some people take these books very seriously. I had a phone call just yesterday for 20 copies of this book. He seemed to be a Chinese businessman," said Paul Tang, the proprietor of the store, which in Chinese goes by the more ironic name of the People's Commune bookstore."Right now, more than 90 percent of our sales come from mainland visitors," said Mr. Tang, 38, who formerly worked for fast food chains. He and three partners opened the store in 2002 and two years later shifted its focus to banned books for visitors from mainland China. "The most frequently asked question is not about the content of books," Mr. Tang said. "It's how they can get the books back to China."That game of hide and seek takes place daily, as Chinese travelers return from Hong Kong and other destinations, sometimes with contraband. Customs officers are sometimes instructed to stop particular titles, people in the trade say, but often anything with a political edge that is discovered is scrutinized, and decisions on what to confiscate are made on the fly.Zhou Qicai, a businessman from northeast China, was lugging a suitcase stuffed with 400 copies of a Chinese-language magazine from Hong Kong into China in March when a customs officer inspected his luggage. The magazine, Boxun, had a report about court officials in his hometown who are suspected of being corrupt that he wanted to share with friends."He took one look at the magazines and said, 'These are reactionary publications, they're illegal,' " Mr. Zhou said. The officer seized the magazines, took down his personal details and warned him not to smuggle again. "That didn't matter," Mr. Zhou said. "I came back and tried again a couple of days later and brought in 93 copies without a problem."
BEIJING — Police in central China have detained the 18-year-old organizer of a gay pride march in a sign of the government's nervousness over a growing civil society movement and demands for stronger individual rights.The man, identified only by his surname Xiang, was detained following the Friday event in the city of Changsha and ordered to serve 12 days in a detention center for organizing an illegal march, according to a notice on the local police's microblog account.Changsha newspaper Xiaoxiang Morning News quoted Xiang as saying before the march that he hoped it would make people question discrimination against gays, lesbians, bisexuals and transgender people, and "let more people have a correct understanding of us."China requires prior police approval for all marches and street demonstrations and permission is rarely granted. Reports said about 80 people took part in the march along a riverfront park, carrying anti-discrimination banners and a giant rainbow flag, and there was no mention of problems with police at the time.Xiang's detention underscores the limits the conservative Communist government continues to impose on campaigners as it seeks to contain demands for more free expression and civil rights. Police enjoy broad powers to monitor, harass and detain activists for causes ranging from religious rights to the environment. Those caught in the system have little legal recourse, although some whose cases have raised a public outcry have been released.Activists find greater room for expression on the Internet, despite heavy censorship, and organizers of the Changsha march maintained a website, rt1069.com. They stated their hope that the march would "write a new chapter in the struggle for equal rights for comrades," using the Chinese slang term for homosexual.The march was the second held in Changsha on May 17, International Day Against Homophobia, and was joined by similar events in several other Chinese cities.Chinese society is increasingly accepting of gays and lesbians, although same-sex partnerships are not recognized and no laws outlaw discrimination against sexual minorities. A law against "hooliganism" used to target gays was eliminated in 1997 and homosexuality removed from the list of mental disorders in 2001.
BEIJING — Gunmen wearing North Korean military uniforms released a Chinese fishing boat after holding its crew for two weeks, beating up the captain and stealing the vessel's fuel, the boat's owner said. He added that the hijackers did not get the 600,000 yuan ($100,000) ransom they had demanded.The seizure May 5 in what boat owner Yu Xuejun said were Chinese waters was the latest irritant in relations between North Korea and a Chinese government increasingly frustrated with its neighboring ally over tests of its nuclear and rocket technologies in defiance of U.N. bans. One of China's North Korea watchers said rogue border guards were probably responsible, rather than the Pyongyang government itself.Yu said in an interview that the men released Tuesday were allowed to move around the boat while they were held captive, but were locked in a room at night. He said the captain suffered an arm injury when he was beaten, but he has since recovered, and that no other crew member was harmed. They now planned to stay out at sea for another 10 days."The North Koreans only left the crew with one sack of rice and one sack of flour. But this shouldn't be a problem as there are a lot of boats in that region now, all from Dalian," he said, referring to the northeast China port where his boat is based. "With their help, the crews will do OK for the next 8 or 10 days."Yu publicized the boat's capture over the weekend on his Tencent Weibo microblog as a ransom deadline neared. China then publicly demanded that North Korea release the men, though Chinese officials have not said whether they believe the armed captors were operating on their own or under North Korean government authority.No ransom was paid, Chinese Foreign Ministry spokesman Hong Lei said at a news briefing Tuesday."We demand North Korea investigate this case fully and furnish China with details, and take measures to stop such cases repeating themselves," Hong said.Yu also said he hadn't paid any ransom. "We were working in our country's waters — why should I pay them?" he said. He had earlier written online that he couldn't afford it.He said the captors "looked like soldiers, and the captain said they had guns and used force to take over the boat."Yu posted coordinates on his microblog indicating the seizure took place about 100 kilometers (60 miles) from the westernmost point of North Korea and about 190 kilometers (120 miles) from Dalian.That area is outside both countries' territorial waters — defined as 12 nautical miles from their shores — but within their overlapping Exclusive Economic Zones, which give them rights to resources including fishing. Jurisdictions in overlapping zones are not always clear.Yu said the North Koreans took fuel and food, but navigation and communication equipment that was initially taken was returned, Yu said.Yu's pleas for help and his frets that his crew might be mistreated were forwarded thousands of times on the Internet, and a high-ranking Chinese military officer, Maj. Gen. Luo Yuan, wrote on Sina Weibo of his fury over the detention."North Korea has gone too far! Even if you are short of money, you can't grab people across the border and blackmail," wrote Luo, who has more than 300,000 followers.A similar abduction a year ago of Chinese fishermen by armed North Koreans caused an uproar in China. After their release, those fishermen said they had been starved and beaten, and some had been stripped of everything but their underwear.Hong, the Foreign Ministry spokesman, had declined to answer a question Monday about who exactly China believed was behind the boat seizure, but he made clear that Beijing was looking for the North Korean government to secure the release of the boat and crew.An expert on North Korea at the Liaoning Academy of Social Sciences in northeast China said he doubted the North Korean government would have had any knowledge of the incident when it happened."This incident is purely about a lawless act by the North Korean border police to blackmail our fishermen," said Lu Chao, adding that such things frequently happen to Chinese fishermen working near border waters."Sometimes, if the amount they are asking for isn't too high, the boat owner would just pay it," he said. This time, it might be related to spring food shortages, "so they are asking for a huge ransom."
BEIJING — A massive blast ripped through an explosives factory on Monday in eastern China, killing at least 12 people and leaving others buried in the debris, state media reported.Rescuers were taking care to avoid setting off additional explosions as they searched the site of the explosion in Shandong province's Caofan township, the China News Service said. The company website said the factory, run by the Baoli group, manufactures 10,000 tons of industrial explosives annually.The force of the blast flung broken glass, smashed concrete, and other debris as far as 200 meters (660 feet), reports said. Walls in outlying buildings were flattened and glass shattered.A total of 34 people were inside the factory at the time of the blast, and survivors were rushed to a hospital. The cause of the blast and condition of those injured were not immediately known.A government spokesman for the surrounding city of Zhangqiu said a full accounting of the dead and injured was being compiled and would be released. Like many Chinese bureaucrats, he would only give his surname, Cao.China has sought to tighten access to explosives used for quarrying following a series of attacks by people using homemade bombs. However, safety rules are often ignored and industrial accidents remain common.
NEW DELHI — Chinese Premier Li Keqiang told Indian business leaders Tuesday that developing stronger economic ties between their two nations would have huge benefits for both sides.Li spoke a day after holding meetings with Indian Prime Minister Manmohan Singh during which the two leaders played down a recent border dispute and stressed the aim of forging deeper cooperation.Li told the Federation of Indian Chambers of Commerce and Industry on Tuesday that India and China were both enormous markets with incredible potential for growth."If every one of our combined 2.5 billion population would buy a new mobile phone, it would blow up the order lists of IT manufacturers and operators in the world," Li said.He said the two nations' strengths complement each other, with India having an edge in information technology and software, while China is undergoing a rapid expansion in manufacturing and textiles.China can also help India's drive to improve its infrastructure, he said."At present, we both face the heavy tasks of developing the economy, improving people's lives and reinvigorating the country. In seeking great neighborly relations and common development, we will not just benefit our own peoples but also create new opportunities for other Asian countries," he said.Li and Singh had expressed hope they could increase their trade from $61.5 billion last year to $100 billion by 2015. But the current trade is heavily skewed in China's favor, and Li said he was willing to allow Indian products greater access to Chinese markets."I'm confident that we have the ability to mitigate the trade imbalance between our two countries. China never has the intention of pursuing a trade surplus," he said.Li's trip to India, his first visit abroad since becoming premier, was part of an outreach mission by the new Chinese leadership to large emerging economies aimed at balancing Beijing's fraught ties with the United States.He and Singh pledged Monday to work together for regional stability and economic growth and said they would try to resolve a lingering border dispute, which flared last month when India accused Chinese troops of crossing deep into Indian territory and setting up camp.Both leaders said they agreed that preserving peace along the border was crucial to maintaining growth and asked mediators from both countries to work toward a framework for reaching a settlement. The two sides have held 15 rounds of fruitless border talks over the past decade.Li stressed Tuesday that maintaining peace would help his nation focus on development at home.
(Reuters) - China will host the seventh edition of the Royal Trophy when holders Asia take on Europe in the annual team golf contest in December, organisers said on Tuesday.The continental fight will be held from December 20-22 at the Dragon Lake Golf Club in Guangzhou, the capital of the Guangdong province.Asia bagged their second title in a sudden-death playoff when the sixth edition of the annual contest, loosely based on the Ryder Cup model, was held in Brunei last year."The first hosting of the Royal Trophy in China is a historic event," Royal Trophy players' committee member and six-time major winner Nick Faldo said in a statement."The Royal Trophy players' committee is looking forward to a magnificent competition between Europe and Asia and a great showcase of continental team matchplay golf."
HONG KONG — The Obama administration and the European Union have each decided to negotiate settlements with China in the world's largest antidumping and antisubsidy trade cases involving China's roughly $30 billion a year in solar panel shipments to the West, officials and trade advisers in Beijing, Brussels and Washington said.The plan that is starting to take shape would essentially carve up the global solar panel market into a series of regional markets. It would sharply raise the price of solar panels exported from China, the world's dominant producer, by requiring Chinese companies to charge more while limiting the total number of solar panels they could ship.In exchange, Chinese companies would no longer be charged steep taxes on their exports of solar panels. The United States is already collecting tariffs totaling about 30 percent while the European Union is expected to impose similar tariffs of about 50 percent on June 5, and may backdate them to March 5.Parallel decisions by the Obama administration and the European Union to separately negotiate high prices for imported solar panels may prove unpopular among environmentalists. Some environmental groups are already upset that the tariffs have made solar energy less affordable, making it less competitive with more polluting fossil fuels.Huge shipments from China have driven solar panel prices down by three-quarters in the last four years. American and European producers contend that much of that decline represents the effect of Chinese government subsidies and Chinese dumping of solar panels below the cost of producing them, which means that a negotiated settlement could need to push prices up significantly.The goal of the current tariffs, and of the price and quantity regulations that could replace them, is to protect American and European manufacturers from what they and the Obama administration describe as unfair competition. Western manufacturers and the administration say that Chinese solar panels are heavily subsidized by the Chinese government and then dumped in foreign markets at prices far below the cost of production.Two dozen American and European solar panel manufacturers have already cut back production or gone bankrupt in the last three years, moves widely attributed to Chinese imports.Francisco Sanchez, the under secretary of commerce for international trade, has just flown to Beijing for a visit to discuss civilian nuclear power trade issues, people with a detailed knowledge of his visit said. Mr. Sanchez has a long agenda of bilateral trade issues to discuss that includes mentioning an American interest in negotiations, a person with detailed knowledge of his visit said.The Commerce Department deferred on Monday to the United States trade representative's office about what Mr. Sanchez would say in Beijing about solar panels.The Obama administration is in the earliest stages of sounding out Congress about the shift toward replacing tariffs with a negotiated settlement. Senator Ron Wyden, the Oregon Democrat whose state is a center of solar panel production, said that he supported a negotiated deal."We are really at a fork in the road with respect to producing renewable energy technology in the United States," he said. "This is the moment for the administration to obtain a global agreement that levels the playing field for American producers and provides the certainty needed for America's renewable energy, and solar sector in particular, to survive."Chinese producers have partly bypassed the American tariffs by performing one stage in the solar panel manufacturing process outside mainland China: turning solar wafers into solar cells in nearby Taiwan.A negotiated deal would close the loophole in the American tariffs; the European trade case does not have the same loophole.China has retaliated for American and European tariffs on solar panels by moving to impose steep tariffs on imports of the main raw material for solar panels, polysilicon. A negotiated settlement would also involve China's removal of these retaliatory tariffs.
HONG KONG — China's top anticorruption agency said on Monday that a former state bank executive faced accusations of pocketing huge bribes, making him the latest senior official to face charges during the new leadership's drive to show that it is attacking corruption.The Central Commission for Discipline Inspection, which oversees Communist Party inquiries into official misconduct, said Yang Kun, a former vice president of the state-controlled Agricultural Bank of China, had been expelled from the party and handed over to criminal investigators, the official Xinhua news agency reported.Mr. Yang, who has been under investigation by the commission since last year, "exploited his position to provide private gain for others and took massive bribes," the Xinhua report said.In China, senior officials accused of wrongdoing usually first face the party discipline commission, which decides whether to authorize a legal inquiry that can bring a criminal indictment. With that inquiry now under way, Mr. Yang is likely to face trial and conviction; China's party-run courts rarely find defendants innocent.The brief Xinhua report did not detail the specific charges against Mr. Yang. But since last year, Chinese business newspapers and magazines have described a swirl of accusations, including handing out bank loans to help pay off a property developer's gambling debts and being associated with Gu Junshan, a former deputy commander of the People's Liberation Army's General Logistics Department who is under investigation for rampant corruption.Since coming to power in November, China's top party leader, Xi Jinping, has repeatedly vowed to end official corruption and extravagance, a major source of public disenchantment with the government. Last week, Wang Qishan, the party leader in charge of investigating official misconduct, said teams of inspectors would be sent across the country to help "stanch the spread of corruption."This month, the Central Commission for Discipline Inspection said it was investigating Liu Tienan, a senior economic policy maker, whom a Chinese journalist last year accused of engaging in tainted business dealings and threatening to kill a mistress who exposed those dealings.
BEIJING — A businesswoman in southern China has been sentenced to death on charges of defrauding investors as the government tightens controls on informal financing that is widely used by entrepreneurs.The woman, Lin Haiyan, was convicted of "illegal fundraising" for collecting 640 million renminbi, or $100 million, from investors by promising high returns and low risk, according to a statement by the Intermediate People's Court of Wenzhou. It said that the plan had collapsed in October 2011 and that 428 million renminbi could not be recovered.The case highlighted potential abuses in the largely unregulated informal lending that supports entrepreneurs who generate China's new jobs and wealth but often cannot get loans from the state-owned banking industry. The government is tightening controls after a surge of defaults following the global financial crisis set off protests by lenders.Another businesswoman from Wenzhou was also sentenced to death last year on charges of illegal fund-raising. That penalty was overturned following an outcry on the Internet and she was sentenced to prison.Communist leaders have promised more bank lending for entrepreneurs and announced a pilot project in 2012 in Wenzhou to allow closely supervised private sector lending. But business leaders in Wenzhou say it is harder for entrepreneurs to get loans because worsening economic conditions have made banks and private sources reluctant to lend.The underground credit market is estimated by China's central bank and private sector analysts at 2 trillion to 4 trillion renminbi, or as much as 7 percent of total lending. In some areas, informal lending exceeds that of official banks.Many households provide money for private lending in an effort to get a better return than the low deposit rates paid by Chinese banks, which effectively force depositors to subsidize low-interest loans to state industry.The authorities have sentenced 1,449 people to prison terms of at least five years for involvement in underground lending since 2011, a police official, Du Jinfu, said last month.Legal experts say loans between individuals are legal and that the government has failed to make clear what lenders and borrowers are allowed to do."The distinction between illegal fund-raising and private lending still remains unclear," the Dui Hua Foundation, a group based in San Francisco that researches China's justice system, said in a report in February.Ms. Lin started raising money from friends, relatives and co-workers in 2007, according to a statement on the court's Web site. It said Ms. Lin had told investors the money was going into stock offerings and bank deposits but used it to speculate in stocks.Even as losses mounted, Ms. Lin continued to raise money until the scheme collapsed, the court said.The statement said the penalty still must be confirmed. All death sentences in China are automatically appealed to the country's highest court for review.The court took the unusual step of issuing a second statement to support sentencing Ms. Lin to death after a Chinese blogger questioned the penalty in a comment that included the phrase "killing the witness.""Lin Haiyan's actions constituted financial fraud that caused huge losses and seriously damaged the people and the state," said the statement, which was several times the length of the original announcement. It criticized the blogger for challenging the court's decision.Protests erupted in 2011 and early 2012 in cities and towns throughout central China and along the southeast coast, areas with large concentrations of small private businesses, after the slowdown in global trade set off a wave of defaults. Schoolteachers, retirees and others who had lent to entrepreneurs demanded the authorities get back their money.Regulators also worried that banks and state companies had gotten involved in underground lending, exposing the official financial system to unreported risks.In the earlier case in Wenzhou, an entrepreneur, Wu Ying, was sentenced to death for improperly raising 770 million renminbi from investors in 2005-7. Ms. Wu, who started with a hair salon and built a business empire, had earlier been praised by the state news media as a role model for female entrepreneurs.The Chinese Supreme Court overturned Ms. Wu's death sentence following an outcry on the Internet over the severity of the penalty. She was resentenced to death with a two-year reprieve, which usually is commuted to a long prison term.A statement on the Web site of China's highest court, dated in 2011, says charges of "illegal fundraising" can be applied to an individual who receives more than 200,000 renminbi of informal loans or causes losses to lenders of 100,000 renminbi. Enterprises can face charges if they receive 1 million renminbi or cause losses of 2.5 million renminbi.
ZHUHAI, China — In an underground mall just a stone's throw from the Chinese border with Macau, a row of 30 small shops with identical golden plaques does a brisk, though shadowy, trade with mainland Chinese visitors, many of them bound for the gambling hub."Good rates. Better than the banks," shout salesmen jostling to usher clients into the shops, where thick wads of bank notes — usually 100 renminbi, or about $16 — change hands and shuffle noisily through electronic cash-counting machines. Licensed as liquor and dry-goods stores, with shelves stacked with rice wine and cigarettes, many serve as underground bankers with remittance agents in back rooms."It's very simple," said one agent, Choi, who like others interviewed for this article would give only his surname because of the illicit nature of his business. "You give me renminbi here. Then we deliver Hong Kong dollars to you in Macau. We can move tens of millions each day."As the Chinese economy and financial markets mature and gain in sophistication, so, too, does a vast underground banking industry offering swift, cheap and low-risk cross-border fund transfers that moves hundreds of millions of dollars' worth of money each day. Much of that activity is conducted openly on the streets of Guangdong Province, where businesses and individuals depend on underground networks to get around strict currency controls, both for legitimate commercial purposes and to safeguard assets beyond the reach of the authorities.Beijing is finding it increasingly difficult to stem the tide of speculative and illegal cash. In the decade since China began cracking down on money laundering, the government has amended its criminal laws and strengthened commercial banking rules, but looser restrictions on capital transfers have made it easier for hot money to be channeled across the border."China's financial markets are not that mature," said Yu Yongding, an economist at the Chinese Academy of Social Sciences and former adviser to the central bank. "There are lots of capital controls that certainly have contributed to these kind of activities, while corruption and money laundering also play an important role."In Guangdong, Pearl River Delta cities like Zhuhai, Shenzhen, Guangzhou and Dongguan are major underground conduits for Chinese hot money. The province, where imports and exports amounted to $984 billion last year — a quarter of Chinese foreign trade — has served as a portal for capital flows since China's economic opening three decades ago. Collectively, the cities are a hotbed of underground banking that also extends to Macau and Hong Kong. Macau, a gambling center, and Hong Kong, a global financial hub, are special administrative territories of China, with financial systems separate from the mainland's.In Zhuhai alone, more than 1 billion renminbi is transferred daily through underground networks, according to six agents who spoke to Reuters — part of a tight-knit group of some 100 agents operating in the border area. "Our business has gone up some 30 percent in the past three years," said one agent, who gave his name as Li.Besides retail-level agents clustered around the borders at Zhuhai, which is adjacent to Macau, and Shenzhen, which is adjacent to Hong Kong, there is another echelon of shadow bankers existing across Guangdong Province, out of public view, often working from secret offices, with deals conducted between trusted, well-connected parties, often with just a phone call."I went to see a friend in this business once," said a Hong Kong businessman, Chan, who has run a factory in Guangdong for more than 20 years. "It was just a tiny room filled with bank notes. Can you imagine how much money there was? They're everywhere. In every village, town and city."Global Financial Integrity, a Washington group that works to stop the cross-border flow of illegal money, estimated that $2.83 trillion flowed illicitly out of mainland China from 2005 to 2011, with Hong Kong the largest recipient.
HONG KONG — North Korea has released a Chinese fishing boat and its crew, ending a dispute that threatened to exacerbate strains with China, according to Chinese news reports on Tuesday.The Chinese Foreign Affairs Ministry revealed the incident on Sunday and urged North Korea to free the 16 fishermen and their vessel, which the North seized in waters between the countries on May 5. People's Daily, the Communist Party's main newspaper, reported that the Chinese Embassy in North Korea said the boat and crew had been released and were heading home. The report did not say whether North Korea received a payment, as it had demanded.The Foreign Ministry said on Sunday that the vessel's owner, Yu Xuejun, had called the Chinese Embassy in Pyongyang on May 10 to seek help after North Korea captured the fishing boat, which operates from Dalian, a northeastern Chinese port city.The ministry did not explain why it had waited so long to reveal the seizure, which has come at a time of brittle tensions with North Korea, an isolated country that depends on Beijing for diplomatic and economic support.China has long supported North Korea, despite disagreement over the North's nuclear activities, and many Chinese experts see the North as a strategic shield against potential regional domination by the United States and its allies, South Korea and Japan. But in recent months, signs of irritation have surfaced in the two countries' relations.The announcement about the captured boat promptly drew an outcry from Chinese media and citizens online, some of whom have already expressed increasing impatience with North Korea over its nuclear weapons ambitions and threats to the region. Since Saturday, the North has launched several short-range projectiles into waters off its east coast.The Chinese media reports said that the boat was seized with 16 men aboard, and that the North Korean authorities demanded payment of 600,000 renminbi, or about $98,000, to release them and the vessel, apparently on the grounds that it was fishing in waters claimed by North Korea. The deadline for payment was Sunday, the Beijing Times newspaper said.The owner of the boat, Mr. Yu, drew public attention to its capture through messages on Tencent Weibo, a Chinese microblog service. And on Monday he issued a message saying that he feared his crew had been beaten."The captain of the seized boat communicated using a satellite phone, and when I asked questions, it was clear that he didn't dare speak," Mr. Yu wrote. "We're afraid that the crew have been beaten."Earlier this month, the state-controlled Bank of China said that it had ceased dealing with the North Korean Foreign Trade Bank, in what appeared to be a move supported by the Chinese government to show impatience with the North. Since then, other Chinese banks have taken similar steps.In May of last year, Beijing disclosed that three Chinese vessels had been seized by North Korea, which demanded payment of a fine before it released them and the crew. They were freed several days after Beijing made the incident public.
HONG KONG — The Japanese government struck a more confident note on the economy's prospects Monday, and a survey showed that manufacturing sentiment had turned positive for the first time in a year — the latest sign that Prime Minister Shinzo Abe's policies were taking hold.In its latest monthly assessment of economic activity, the cabinet said the economy was "picking up slowly." The wording represented an upgrade from the report of the previous month, when the government spoke of recent signs of a pickup but also commented that weaknesses remained in some areas.At the same time, a monthly poll measuring sentiment in the manufacturing sector, published by Reuters, jumped 11 points to plus-7 in May — the highest reading since September 2011 and the first reading above zero in a year. Readings above zero show that optimistic responses outnumber pessimistic responses.Since taking office in December, Mr. Abe has pursued a three-pronged strategy for resuscitating growth in the Japanese economy, the world's third-largest economy, after those of the United States and China.The first two of the so-called "arrows" with which he is fighting economic malaise — major spending programs and monetary policy that has effectively flooded the economy with cheap money — have already helped weaken the yen and set off a remarkable rally in the Japanese stock market. The Nikkei 225 index climbed another 1.5 percent Monday, increasing its gains since the start of 2013 to nearly 48 percent. The weaker yen, meanwhile, has meant a windfall for exporters.The policies helped bring about "a V-shaped recovery," Akira Amari, the minister in charge of economic revitalization, said in a televised news briefing Monday.Data released last week, showing that the economy had grown at an annualized pace of 3.5 percent in the first quarter of this year, more than analysts had expected, provided one of the first indications that Mr. Abe's policies were bearing fruit.Solid earnings outlooks from Japanese companies in recent weeks also have underlined the positive effects of the weaker yen. The yen has dropped about 30 percent against the U.S. dollar since November 2012, helping to improve the international competitiveness of Japanese corporations.At the same time, however, many analysts have cautioned that the "third arrow" — structural overhauls to make the economy more competitive — will be needed if the turnaround is to be sustainable over the long term.Mr. Amari, speaking Monday morning, acknowledged that more work needed to be done. Corporate capital expenditure, for example, remained in negative territory, he said. He added that the government would focus on creating a pro-business environment that would swiftly increase spending.Meanwhile, the Japanese central bank, whose announcement April 4 that it would aggressively buy longer-term bonds as part of a major bid to combat crippling deflation, is expected to hold off on any more stimulus action at its next policy meeting this week.
SHANGHAI — The rolling green hills and gurgling blonde toddlers in the ads for Yashili International Holdings Ltd underscore how keen China's biggest milk powder producers are to appear global to emerge from the shadow of a fatal baby formula scandal.The 2008 incident, which involved melamine-tainted milk powder, soured China's $12.5 billion infant formula market for local firms and helped multinationals with established safety records to nearly double their market share in the past five years. Foreign brands now account for about half of total sales.Armed with global partners and slick marketing, Chinese firms such as Yashili, Biostime International Holdings and Zhejiang Beingmate Scientific Technology Industry and Trade Co Ltd now want to challenge the dominance of international brands with "100 percent imported" brand labels and competitive prices."We're an international Chinese firm in exactly the same way that Coca-Cola or McDonald's are international U.S. companies," said a Yashili spokesman, adding that the company sources all its raw products from New Zealand.China's infant formula market is expected to grow to $25 billion by 2017, Euromonitor data shows, as more mothers join the workforce and spend less time breastfeeding. Food safety concerns have so far played in favor of global firms like Nestle SA, Danone SA, Abbott Laboratories and Mead Johnson Nutrition Co..Local companies are now fighting back by espousing foreign safety standards - Bright Dairy and Food Ltd, for example, sources the raw materials for its Pure Canterbury brand from New Zealand, while China Mengniu Dairy Co Ltd this week struck a deal with Danone."I wouldn't underestimate the power of Chinese brands to go upmarket and gain the trust of Chinese consumers, but forging these international ties is key," said Shaun Rein, managing director of China Market Research Group."They can have the best of both worlds - the safety and quality of the product, but also the local know-how, marketing, sales and distribution."Domestic milk powder brands want to appeal to the rapidly growing number of middle-class working mothers who can afford the pricier baby formulas made by their international rivals.China's middle class currently stands at around 300 million people or over one-fifth of the 1.3 billion population, a proportion which could rise to over a half by 2030, consultants KPMG said in a recent report.At supermarkets in big cities like Shanghai, a 900 gram tin of infant formula made by an international firm costs between 175 yuan ($29) and 275 yuan ($45), compared to about 100 yuan ($16) for domestic milk powder in lower-tier cities in China.To distinguish themselves from the local crowd, milk producers boasting foreign ingredients have hiked prices to the same range as global brands.Beingmate also plays up ties with Swiss foodstuff group Hochdorf Holding AG while Biostime's website lists Arla Foods as a partner. Then there are the Yashili TV adverts, featuring lush green fields studded with contented dairy cows and a blonde-haired mother playing with her child.These marketing strategies are winning over consumers.Yashili's turnover last year was more than 40 percent higher than 2009, the year immediately after the tainted milk scandal, while Beingmate's revenue was up 65 percent over the same period. Biostime saw its revenue grow six-fold to 3.4 billion yuan in 2012 from 559 million yuan in 2009.Li Chuan, a teacher who buys Yashili milk powder for her 4-year-old son, said more friends now recommend Chinese brands."There are still some problems with some Chinese milk powder brands, but I think established brands like Yashili will undertake strict checks before they enter the market," she said.Foreign partners may help Chinese milk powder producers improve their reputation, but few parents will ever forget the six infants who died and the more than 300,000 who fell ill from local formulas that were tainted with melamine, a toxic chemical used to boost milk protein scores in tests.More than 20 Chinese companies were implicated in the scandal, resulting in a spike in demand for imported brands.Some Chinese still risk prison by smuggling in formula from Hong Kong, where prices are lower. Others travel as far as Europe and Australia to buy milk powder in bulk.Dissident artist Ai Weiwei highlighted public concerns over milk safety at his latest exhibition, a collection of formula tins arranged in the shape of China."A country like this can put a satellite into space but it can't put a safe bottle teat into a child's mouth. I think it's extremely absurd," Ai told Reuters at his studio in Beijing.Some experts say China's milk powder companies can eventually soak up market share from international companies if they avoid further scandal and maintain safety standards."In the premium sector it will be a long time before foreign firms are seriously challenged," said David Mahon, Beijing-based managing director of Mahon China Investment Management Ltd."But in the middle of the market we'll see considerable change in the years to come."
PARIS — France will invest about 20 million euros to increase security for diplomats and embassies in the Middle East and Africa after its mission in Libya was targeted by a car bomb in April, the Foreign Ministry said on Wednesday.Spokesman Philippe Lalliot confirmed an email sent by Foreign Minister Laurent Fabius to staff on Tuesday saying the measure had to be taken following the rising number of serious international crises and threats emanating from them."This plan takes into consideration the change in threats," Lalliot told a daily news briefing."As the minister indicated, a general programme to improve security of our missions has now been established, which will concern primarily Africa and the Middle East."France sent troops into Mali in January after Bamako asked for help in driving back Islamist rebels who controlled parts of the north and were moving south.The military operation in the former French colony cranked up tensions in North Africa, with Islamist radicals threatening to strike back at French and Western interests.Although nobody claimed last month's bombing at France's embassy in Tripoli, it was the first attack to directly target France since the Mali intervention.Lalliot said the funds would be used to buy security equipment, vehicles as well as increasing the budget for guards and reinforcement missions.It will be financed in part by the sale of overseas real estate assets owned by France, he said.France spends more than 500 million euros a year on managing almost 2 million square metres of property and land outside the country. The Foreign Ministry has increasingly been selling property in an effort to beef up its budget as the government looks to slash ministerial spending to meet deficit targets.It raised more than 120 million euros through sales in 2011, including its consular building in Hong Kong for about 50 million euros. ($1 = 0.7769 euros)
BEIJING — A mentally ill man attacked six primary school students and a woman with a cleaver in the latest of a string of attacks on Chinese schoolchildren, authorities said Wednesday.All seven victims were in stable condition and a suspect was apprehended, according to a spokeswoman from the Maoming city government in the southern province of Guangdong who, like many Chinese bureaucrats, declined to give her name.The attack took place as students were returning home Tuesday afternoon in a village on the city's outskirts.Police recovered the cleaver used in the attack and detained a suspect about 10 hours later, identified in a statement from the Maoming police as a 32-year-old mentally ill man surnamed Liao.China has suffered a series of sometimes deadly attacks on schoolchildren in recent years, many of them blamed on the mentally ill. That has highlighted what critics say is a chronic lack of screening and treatment for mental illness in China, as well as the growing pressures of an increasingly urbanizing society and rapid economic changes.In the worst recent attack, a man hacked and injured 23 schoolchildren in December in the central province of Henan.Kitchen knives are almost always used in such attacks because China bans almost all private citizens from owning firearms.
BEIJING — A court in the city of Chongqing has charged six people with working together to blackmail government officials by recording videos of them having sex, the official Xinhua news agency reported on Wednesday.The six were charged with extortion on Monday, Xinhua said, citing a statement from judicial authorities in Chongqing, where they are slated to be tried.Investigators said the group "lured officials into having sex with women and secretly recorded their encounters to blackmail them from 2008 to 2009", Xinhua said.The charges come after a high profile case in which footage of a district party chief having sex with his mistress went viral on the microblog service Sina Weibo, creating an uproar. State media said the official, Lei Zhengfu, has been removed from his post and will face corruption charges.Party officials are banned from keeping mistresses and the video came to symbolize in many people's eyes the excesses and corruption of the ruling elite.President Xi Jinping has called for a crackdown on graft and has warned that the problem could threaten the party's survival, though only a small number of senior officials have been fired or investigated for corruption since Xi came to power last year.A total of 10 government officials and heads of state-owned enterprises were fired in January for their involvement in sex videos, Xinhua said.They include county- and district-level officials and the heads of state-owned firms in Chongqing, the power-base of now-disgraced former top leader Bo Xilai, who was sacked last year amid allegations of corruption and murder.
BEIJING — Two emotionless prison guards watch Ai Weiwei as he eats, sleeps, paces, showers — and even sits on the toilet — in the Chinese artist's new obscenity-filled, metaphor-rich music video mocking state power.The video accompanying the visual artist's single "Dumbass" — released Wednesday but blocked online in mainland China — is meant to reconstruct his 81-day detention in 2011, which was part of an overall crackdown on dissent. Ai's subsequent conviction for tax evasion has been seen as punishment for his activism."People who are detained suffer traumas, and those who detain us know this very well," Ai said at a video premiere ceremony in Beijing. "This is why we are secretly detained, blindfolded, cuffed, not allowed to meet with lawyers and relatives."I had been thinking about how to recover from the trauma. And I came up with the idea of using music to convey a sentiment that is tremendously secret, and private, to the public," Ai said.After his release, Ai's design firm was slapped with a $2.4 million tax bill, which he fought unsuccessfully in the Chinese courts.Ai has irked Beijing by using his art and online profile to draw attention to injustices in China and the need for greater transparency and rule of law.His music video, screeching with heavily distorted guitars, depicts an insensitive, overbearing state power that tramples on individual rights. The Chinese-language lyrics are full of obscene insults, and the video images include animals that have become euphemisms for defiantly circumventing strict censorship."This video was not shot for me, and this song, I am not singing for myself," Ai said. "This is dedicated to all those people who do not have the opportunity to raise their voice, who will never be able to raise their voices. This is not just one generation. In the past 60 years there have been innumerable amounts of people who have been killed or sent away from their homes, even tortured to death."However, web surfers in China are unlikely to see it.During the premiere, Ai and his assistants posted links to the video on social media and file-sharing sites that are blocked in China, including Twitter and YouTube. They also tried — in front of reporters — to post to Chinese sites including tudou.com, but those attempts weren't successful, apparently because censors who review the content before it becomes public rejected the video.The music video has Ai himself singing the song's explicit lyrics."Dumbass" is the first single from Ai's forthcoming music album "The Divine Comedy."
BEIJING — When the rebel artist Ai Weiwei was illegally detained in 2011 , he recounts, his young paramilitary guards asked him to sing for them. He belted out decades-old Communist revolutionary tunes, and they were stunned that he knew them, he said.Now Mr. Ai is answering the guards' request in a different key. He is presenting them, and the world, with his first heavy-metal music video, one with detailed re-creations of scenes from his 81 days of detention. He also portrays fantasies he imagines flitting through the guards' minds. Mr. Ai posted the video on a Web site, aiweiwei.com, on Wednesday morning, Beijing time."It's about the whole condition," he said in an interview at his studio last week after showing final cuts of the video to a reporter and a photographer. "It's not really about me. I think it's about how the power of the state tries to manage and maintain this kind of control."Mr. Ai wrote the lyrics in one morning. He asked a friend, the rocker and contemporary artist Zuoxiao Zuzhou, to handle the music. Six songs are expected to be released together in an album called "The Divine Comedy" on June 22, the second anniversary of Mr. Ai's exit from detention. The video was shot by the cinematographer Christopher Doyle, an Australian resident of Hong Kong who is best known for his work with Wong Kar-wai, a director of highly stylized films, and Zhang Yimou, who has in recent years been a favorite of the Communist Party.Near his studio Mr. Ai has created a full-scale model of the austere room in which he was kept for much of his time in detention. He said the actual prison was in western Beijing and was used to house prominent detainees.The title of the first song, sung by Mr. Ai, is a rather vulgar Chinese word. Most of the lyrics cannot be published in The New York Times. A loose translation of one of the tamer lines goes: "Stand on the front line like a" — the line then invokes the title word — "in a country that puts out like a hooker."In the initial scenes of the five-minute video, the music plays as guards pull a black hood off Mr. Ai's head. He is also seen walking between two guards in a blue T-shirt and flip-flops — like everything else in the video, an exact re-creation, in this case of what he wore in detention. There are scenes of him in the cell slurping noodles, sleeping and sitting in a chair facing interrogators. Then the video abruptly shifts to the fantasy scenes playing out in the heads of the two guards: crabs crawling in the toilet bowl after Mr. Ai uses it, for example, and nubile women in black lingerie prancing next to the artist."Those soldiers secretly asked me about sex and about different things," Mr. Ai said."They are like prisoners in there," he added. "They never can leave the building. And they don't know what's going on."In another scene Mr. Ai whips the two guards as they stand in nothing but white underwear. The guards appear to be enjoying it. There is also a scene of Mr. Ai dancing in drag, with heavy mascara and lipstick and a shaved, Buddha-like head.The video is certain to bring further scrutiny of Mr. Ai from the authorities. Although the police do not contact him as frequently as they did in the first year after his release, he said, his passport is still being held, and he cannot travel outside China.Mr. Ai said he made the video and the album because he "wanted to do something impossible.""I want to show young people here we all can sing," he said. "It's our voice."
HONG KONG — Government officials in southern China sought on Wednesday to calm public ire about toxic substances menacing the region's main food staple, rice, after the city of Guangzhou said that nearly half the rice tested at restaurants this year held excessive cadmium, a heavy metal that can cause cancer and other illnesses.Chinese citizens have become increasingly irate about food and beverages tainted with pesticides, illegal preservatives and additives, as well as industrial waste and heavy metals from polluted land and air. The news that this mainstay of the kitchen may also be toxic drew a vehement outcry."Now before every meal must we all first wonder: Does this rice have too much cadmium? Are the vegetables laced with pesticide?" one Chinese Internet user wrote on the popular Tencent microblog service. Another wondered whether he was expected to quit rice the same way he quit smoking.The alarm was set off by the Food and Drug Administration of Guangzhou, the capital of Guangdong Province. The agency revealed last week that 8 out of 18 samples of rice tested from canteens and restaurants in the first three months of this year had cadmium levels surpassing national limits.The administration tried to explain on its Web site two days later that the finding used a small, skewed sample and was not representative. By then, however, news reports and apparently many residents had concluded that half the rice in the city could be tainted with too much cadmium.On the Internet, many citizens accused the government of concealing the risks from unsafe food to avoid political damage. The Southern Metropolitan Daily, a popular and sometimes outspoken newspaper based in Guangzhou, said on Tuesday that the uproar was a lesson in candor for officials. "There is not enough transparency in information concerning the public's own interests," it said in an editorial.Officials said the tainted rice came from the adjacent Hunan Province, an area where expanding factories, smelters and mines jostle with paddy fields. Cadmium is often found in zinc ores, and it is used in coatings and batteries for cellphones, cameras and computers — products that China makes in abundance. If too much accumulates in the body, cadmium harms the liver, the kidneys and the respiratory tract, and can dangerously weaken bones. It has also been linked to a variety of cancers.Cadmium is the latest culprit in a succession of food safety scandals in China.In 2008, public anger erupted after the government reported that tens of thousands of children were at risk of kidney stones and other organ damage from milk powder mixed with melamine, a chemical used to deceive protein tests. At least six infants died from illnesses linked to the tainted powder, which sickened more than 300,000 children.This month, Chinese police officials said they caught traders in eastern China who had made fake mutton using rat, fox and mink flesh adulterated with chemicals.Guangdong Province officials have sought to convince residents that they are stopping the trade in any toxic rice. After the public outcry, the Guangzhou Food and Drug Administration disclosed the names of the restaurants and canteens found to have rice with excessive cadmium. One seafood restaurant served rice with an average 0.4 milligrams of cadmium per kilogram, double the maximum permitted by government standards.The administration said that tests at Guangzhou's major shopping chains, where most residents buy their food, did not find any cases of rice with cadmium exceeding the official limit, a city newspaper, the Yangcheng Evening News, reported on Wednesday.Inspectors in Shunde, a city near Guangzhou, also told local news outlets that they had uncovered nine cases of "cadmium rice." Police in You County, in Hunan Province, also led inspections to track down errant suppliers and mills and to recall any suspect batches.Nervousness among officials about the anger over tainted food extends to the top of the Chinese government. Prime Minister Li Keqiang has vowed to strengthen government scrutiny to stamp out food safety hazards, and he told officials this month that the problem was a source of widespread dissatisfaction."We can never allow another crisis of confidence like the milk powder problem," Mr. Li said, according to the state-run news agency, Xinhua. "People eat meals three times a day. Food is fate for them."
CHENGDU, China — It was, at first glance, a rather modest initial public offering by a small Chinese company seeking to expand production of the key ingredient used in traditional remedies said to shrink gallstones, reduce fevers and sooth the aftereffects of excessive drinking.But Guizhentang Pharmaceutical, the country's largest producer of bear bile extract, apparently overlooked one important factor before submitting its application to the Shenzhen Stock Exchange: China's increasingly audacious animal rights movement.Guizhentang's proposal to triple the company's stock of captive bears, to 1,200 from 400, provoked a firestorm from those opposed to bear bile farming, a process that involves inserting tubes into the abdomens of bears and "milking" them, sometimes for years.Protesters in bear suits picketed drugstores, hackers briefly brought down Guizhentang's Web site and more than 70 Chinese celebrities, including the basketball star Yao Ming and the pop diva Han Hong, circulated a petition calling on the stock exchange to reject the I.P.O.After some of China's biggest news media outlets posted harrowing undercover footage revealing cages so tight the bears could barely move, Guizhentang last month withdrew its application, saying it needed more time to put together its filing.For China's animal welfare advocates, the victory signaled the growing clout of a movement that is frequently derided as bourgeois, frivolous or worse. Its most vociferous opponents paint animal advocates as foreign-financed traitors who would do away with such hallowed Chinese traditions as dog meat hot pot, ivory carving and dried deer penis, consumed to increase virility.Deborah Cao, a lawyer who frequently writes about animal rights in China, said campaigns like the one that defeated Guizhentang showed how social media brought together the generation of educated Chinese urbanites who grew up with household pets and anthropomorphic Disney characters. "It's a bottom-up, grass-roots movement, one that is contributing to an emerging civil society increasingly aware of individual rights and obligations, be it to humans or animals," she said.Such activism is even more notable given the constraints the Communist Party typically imposes on public lobbying, street protests or any unsanctioned organizing.Advocates have not yet persuaded the government to enact animal welfare legislation. But optimists say they have started to chip away at the long-held notion that animals exist to satisfy the medicinal and gastronomical needs of humans.Activists point to the growing visibility of public awareness campaigns targeting the consumption of shark fins as well as a recent spate of vigilante rescue efforts that have blocked trucks laden with cats and dogs from reaching the slaughterhouse. In December, the state-run broadcaster CCTV ran a series of exposés highlighting the illegal consumption of monitor lizards, rhesus monkeys, barking deer and other wildlife, and the police crackdown on black market dealers that followed."Animal rights activists are walking an incredibly sensitive tightrope, but I think they're reaching a tipping point right now," said Jill Robinson, the director of Animals Asia, an organization based in Hong Kong that has been campaigning for two decades to end bear bile farming.Still, despite what appears to be growing public opposition to the practice, the Chinese government is not prepared to end the lucrative trade in ursodeoxycholic acid, the active ingredient found in bear gallbladders. Although scientists have engineered a synthetic alternative, traditionalists claim it lacks the therapeutic punch of raw bile, which can sell for as much as $24,000 a kilogram, roughly half the price of gold.Scientists have scrutinized the health effects of bear bile but have come to no definitive conclusions. But sold in powdered form as capsules, or as a tonic, bile is considered by many to be an elixir of sorts. Bile marketers say it fortifies the liver, reduces flu symptoms and improves eyesight.Yang Tingying, a vendor at the wholesale Chinese medicine market here in Chengdu, the provincial capital of Sichuan, insisted that bear bile cures all manner of liver ailments, including hepatitis. "It's the best because it's from nature," she said, pulling out a pair of desiccated gall bladders, which are illegal to sell.
LONDON — The British luxury group Burberry said Tuesday that its full-year pretax profit rose 14 percent on strong retail growth in Asian markets, where the company is expanding its numbers of branded stores.Burberry, known for its camel, red and black plaid-lined raincoats, posted adjusted pretax profit of £428 million, or $651 million, in the year to March 31. Analysts polled by Reuters had expected £415 million.Revenue in the Asia-Pacific region, the company's largest with around 35 percent of sales, rose 13 percent, led by demand for more expensive products in China and Hong Kong.Burberry said profit for the first half of the current financial year, which ends next March, would be below that of last year as its focus shifts to high-growth Latin American and Asian retail sales from Burberry-branded stores from wholesale markets, or sales through non-Burberry stores. Retail sales now account for 71 percent of Burberry's revenue.Burberry affirmed earlier guidance that it expected first-half wholesale underlying revenue to decrease by around 10 percent as the company reduces its activity in Europe and in North America. The company is focused instead on tapping appetite for Western luxury in faster-growing, higher-end Asian and Latin American retail markets.The company expects to open 10 Burberry-branded stores in the new year, with three larger-format stores opening in Shanghai to serve local customers and Chinese domestic tourists.The forecast for strong growth in China contrasts with more cautious recent comments on the region from fashion rivals like PPR, which owns Gucci, and LVMH Moët Hennessy Louis Vuitton, both of which have reported slower growth in China.Revenue in Europe and the Americas each rose by 6 percent last year, Burberry said.
BEIJING — A North Korean envoy, on the second day of his fence-mending visit to ally China, heeded Beijing's wishes by offering to renew nuclear disarmament talks, Chinese state media said.The accounts depicted Thursday's meeting between North Korean Vice Marshal Choe Ryong Hae and Chinese Communist Party leader Liu Yunshan as paying Beijing the deference it sought after months of rising friction between the long-estranged allies.Choe praised China's work on behalf of peace and stability and its "great efforts to return (Korean) peninsular issues to the channel of dialogue and negotiation," China Central Television reported. It quoted Choe as saying North Korea "is willing to accept the suggestion of the Chinese side and launch dialogue with all relevant parties."The North's official Korean Central News Agency did not mention the concession and instead quoted Choe as saying Pyongyang is committed to maintaining generations of friendly ties with Beijing.Choe's mission is the first high-level, face-to-face contacts between the two governments in a half-year, an unusual gap during which Pyongyang conducted rocket launches and nuclear tests and other saber-rattling. The moves angered Beijing, which felt its interests in regional stability were not being heeded. It showed its displeasure by joining with the U.S. to back U.N. sanctions and cut off dealings with North Korea's Foreign Trade Bank.China's North Korea watchers said Chinese leaders would unlikely have accepted Choe's visit without a promise from Pyongyang that it was prepared to return to diplomacy as Beijing has sought."The relationship is rocky, so they will try to mend the relationship," said Cui Yingjiu, a retired professor of Korean at Peking University. "Second, they also want to improve relations with the U.S. and need China to be their intermediary."CCTV said Liu, the Communist Party's fifth-ranked leader, called at the meeting for "practical steps to alleviate the tense situation" and an early return to six-nation Korean denuclearization talks involving the U.S., South Korea, Japan and Russia as well as North Korea and China.Pyongyang sent Choe to Beijing as a special envoy for North Korean leader Kim Jong Un. As such, North Korea watchers said he is expected to hold talks with Chinese President Xi Jinping. His comments Thursday will likely be seen by Beijing as setting the correct atmosphere of deference for such a meeting.Xi was in southwest China's Sichuan province on Thursday inspecting recovery efforts from last month's earthquake.Awaiting Xi's return, Choe spent part of Thursday touring an industrial park in southern Beijing, accompanied by a Communist Party functionary. The Chinese government has in the past used such tours to try to persuade North Korea to adopt China's model of economic reform accompanied by rigid one-party rule.
BEIJING — Name a target anywhere in China, an official at a state-owned company boasted recently, and his crack staff will break into that person's computer, download the contents of the hard drive, record the keystrokes and monitor cellphone communications, too.Pitches like that, from a salesman for Nanjing Xhunter Software, were not uncommon at a crowded trade show this month that brought together Chinese law enforcement officials and entrepreneurs eager to win government contracts for police equipment and services."We can physically locate anyone who spreads a rumor on the Internet," said the salesman, whose company's services include monitoring online postings and pinpointing who has been saying what about whom.The culture of hacking in China is not confined to top-secret military compounds where hackers carry out orders to pilfer data from foreign governments and corporations. Hacking thrives across official, corporate and criminal worlds. Whether it is used to break into private networks, track online dissent back to its source or steal trade secrets, hacking is openly discussed and even promoted at trade shows, inside university classrooms and on Internet forums.The Ministry of Education and Chinese universities, for instance, join companies in sponsoring hacking competitions that army talent scouts attend, though "the standards can be mediocre," said a cybersecurity expert who works for a government institute and handed out awards at a 2010 competition.Corporations employ freelance hackers to spy on competitors. In an interview, a former hacker confirmed recent official news reports that one of China's largest makers of construction equipment had committed cyberespionage against a rival.One force behind the spread of hacking is the government's insistence on maintaining surveillance over anyone deemed suspicious. So local police departments contract with companies like Xhunter to monitor and suppress dissent, industry insiders say.Ai Weiwei, the dissident artist, said he had received three messages from Google around 2009 saying his e-mail account had been compromised, an increasingly common occurrence in China among people deemed subversive. When the police detained him in 2011, he said, they seized 200 pieces of computer equipment and other electronic hardware."They're so interested in computers," Mr. Ai said. "Every time anyone is arrested or checked, the first thing they grab is the computer."There is criminal hacking, too. Keyboard jockeys break into online gaming programs and credit card databases to collect personal information. As in other countries, the police here have expressed growing concern.Some hackers see crime as more lucrative than legitimate work, but opportunities for skilled hackers to earn generous salaries abound, given the growing number of cybersecurity companies providing network defense services to the government, state-owned enterprises and private companies."I have personally provided services to the People's Liberation Army, the Ministry of Public Security and the Ministry of State Security," said a prominent former hacker who used the alias V8 Brother for this interview because he feared scrutiny by foreign governments. He said he had done the work as a contractor and described it as defensive, but declined to give details.And "if you are a government employee, there could be secret projects or secret missions," the hacker said.But government jobs are usually not well paying or prestigious, and most skilled hackers prefer working for security companies that have cyberdefense contracts, as V8 Brother does, he and others in the industry say.Self-trained, the hacker teamed up with China's patriotic "red hackers" more than a decade ago. Then he began working for cybersecurity companies and was recently making $100,000 a year, he said.
HONG KONG — There were no art fairs to speak of in this metropolis before 2008. But this year, Hong Kong, once derided as a cultural desert, nabbed a prize coveted by cities across the region — serving as Art Basel's only Asian outpost.The inaugural Art Basel Hong Kong, which opens to the public Thursday, has drawn planeloads of collectors and gallery bigwigs from the West, lured here in part by the growing, glittery market. It's billed as a mutually beneficial arrangement: Art Basel capitalizes on the moneyed collectors heading to Hong Kong, while giving international credibility and exposure to local artists, galleries and the city itself.But as Hong Kong welcomes its new guest for four days of openings, parties and lunches, there are also some backstage jitters about finally being on the world stage, as well as trepidation that an event that started as ART HK will lose its distinctively Asian flavor. Art Basel has taken over ART HK, which began as a local fair in 2008 with about 100 galleries and quickly doubled in size, reflecting the city's growing art market. (Hong Kong is planning to pour billions of dollars into developing a cultural district in West Kowloon.)"You can feel the difference in the air — there's a lot of anticipation," said Nicole Schoeni, a local gallery owner. "Art Basel is a very well-established professional art fair with immense knowledge. We can benefit and learn from it."But, she added, "Who knows how it will go this week?"To try to ease concerns, Art Basel retained Magnus Renfrew, Art HK's director since its inception, and he has taken pains to maintain its roughly 50-50 division of Western and Asian participating galleries. Art Basel, in a nod to the local culture, also abandoned its original plan to hold the event in February, when it would have run up against Lunar New Year.Still, Art Basel's influence is easy to spot.The week started with the first art gala to be held at the Asia Society Hong Kong headquarters, which opened last year. On Monday night, as a tropical storm lashed the $50 million complex, a renovated 19th-century British Army compound, about 200 invitees rubbed shoulders with major dealers and artists like Takashi Murakami. At one table, exquisitely bejeweled Korean women plotted which dealers to meet, while lamenting how hard it was now to hit both Frieze New York, which ended last week, and this newly ascendant fair (which was at least closer to home).The fair has an iPhone app and a catalog "like a telephone directory," Mr. Renfrew said. "The quality is really a step up. The architecture is much improved. We have a huge V.I.P. lounge with views of the harbor. The expectations of the visitors are higher, and there is increased interest from collectors, both from the U.S. and around Asia."Local galleries planned their best shows, installations and openings for this week. But of the fair's 245 galleries — chosen from more than 600 applicants — only 26 have a permanent presence in Hong Kong, and many of those are relatively recent imports like White Cube, Gagosian, Ben Brown and Lehmann Maupin.Even a few local boosters will admit that the paucity of Hong Kong galleries is largely a reflection of the weakness of the local art scene. In past ART HK events, pride of place went to Western galleries, mostly from London, showing celebrity artists like Damien Hirst."They made an effort to include Asian galleries, but, of course, they have to choose the right galleries," said Pearl Lam, an eccentric violet-haired dealer who made a splash last year when she timed the opening of her new Hong Kong space with the 2012 ART HK fair. "What we need is to increase standards so that our own galleries can compete with Western galleries. It's not good enough to just have Art Basel here."To that end, Ms. Lam hosted a lunch for collectors on Tuesday with Paul Moorhouse of the National Portrait Gallery in London, who is curating the abstract painter Zhu Jinshi's first solo show in Hong Kong, opening at Ms. Lam's space this week.Another problem is a lack of plain old experience. While there are now almost 100 galleries in Hong Kong, only a few were around when the Chinese art scene first boomed in the 1980s.Ms. Schoeni, who took over her gallery from her father, Manfred Schoeni, is one of those who have seen the changes. "When dad started 20 years ago, there were only a handful of galleries in Hong Kong," she said. "It wasn't until 2004 that auction houses started paying attention to contemporary Chinese art, and that's when the big market boom — the big gallery boom — came."But even now, exposure to the West remains limited. Ms. Schoeni points to the Hong Kong artist Hung Keung, whom she chose for an interactive solo show during Basel."He's garnered international attention among critics and has been collected by the Hong Kong Museum of Art, but he hasn't had much exposure on the commercial level," she said. "He will be teaching participants about Chinese characters and inviting people to create their own characters, which will then be animated and digitized for his next work."Many gallery owners are not worried. Henry Au-yeung of Grotto Fine Art, which represents local artists, said of Art Basel, "They did the right thing in being more inclusive, in presenting Hong Kong art, and not just using Hong Kong as a platform for selling.""If you go to a fair in New York," he added, "there will be a lot of New York galleries. Same for London. And, hopefully, it will be the same for Hong Kong."
HONG KONG — Julia Przetakiewicz has an enviable résumé: She has a master's degree from a prestigious British university, has more than a decade of work experience, has lived in five countries and speaks four languages.Unfortunately, her Mandarin is limited — and because of that, she has struggled to find a new job in Hong Kong, a city that once welcomed her with open arms.Cities like Hong Kong and Singapore — trading and financial hubs within one of the fastest-growing regions of the world — have long attracted Europeans and Americans in search of adventure and jobs. Their modern infrastructures, good education and health systems, and a general openness to English-speaking workers have long made them special favorites with expatriates.The global financial crisis only intensified that magnetism as Westerners, disenchanted with the turmoil in their home countries and lured by rapid economic growth, moved east in ever greater numbers.Ten, or even five, years ago, experienced expatriates who were prepared to take the plunge stood a pretty good chance of finding a white-collar job in Hong Kong, Singapore or even Shanghai. But many are now finding it much tougher to find work, thanks to cost pressures, a larger pool of qualified local hires and a shift in the role that Asia plays within the global economy."When I came to Hong Kong in 2009, it still seemed pretty easy," said Ms. Przetakiewicz, who at the time found a role as a manager for a business leaders forum that promotes corporate social responsibility. "Now, even an understanding of the local context and issues does not seem to be enough. Practically everyone wants Mandarin."Early this year, she decided to look for a new job. But after several job interviews, Ms. Przetakiewicz, who holds Polish and Canadian citizenship, recently decided to leave Hong Kong and take her skills elsewhere.Ms. Przetakiewicz is not alone in finding that despite low unemployment and solid hiring across many sectors, the job market in Asia is gradually becoming less welcoming for Westerners.Even before the global financial crisis, newcomers to Asia could not expect to walk into a job in the region unless they had particularly sought-after skills.About 60 percent of job specs processed by the recruitment firm Hudson in Singapore, for example, now require Mandarin, said Andrew Tomich, the company's executive general manager in Singapore. Five years ago, he said, the percentage was half that."Even in the last 12 months, there's been a steady increase in Singapore for Mandarin-speaking candidates," he said. "We can feel it with every breath we take."In Hong Kong, which is a stepping stone to mainland China, the percentage of jobs requiring Mandarin or Cantonese has climbed to more than 80 percent, according to Aruna Alimchandani, director of the commerce and industrial unit at Hudson in Hong Kong. That is up from about 70 percent just a few years ago.In mainland China in the 12 months through October 2012, expatriates ended up in just 5 percent of the jobs filled by Hays, a recruitment agency that specializes in white-collar jobs. One year earlier, the number was 11 percent, said Christine Wright, who heads Hays's operations in Asia.It is not that companies do not want to add employees. A recent survey by Hudson showed that the vast majority of companies in mainland China, Hong Kong and Singapore planned to increase their numbers of employees or keep staffing levels steady this quarter. Many, in fact, have to work hard to attract and retain workers.But, job market experts say, employers are more eager than ever to ensure that the employees they do hire match their expectations.On the cost front, that means avoiding the extra expenses that can come with hiring foreigners — relocation costs, for example, or school fees for children. Many have also become more eager to fill positions with people who are unlikely to leave again soon."Companies want people who commit to the region long-term — who don't just come on a two-year contract," said Ms. Wright of Hays.
BEIJING — A senior North Korean military official's visit here Wednesday appears to have been organized on short notice, and was probably prompted by North Korea's concerns about a planned meeting between President Xi Jinping of China and President Obama, analysts said.Vice Marshal Choe Ryong-hae, a member of the inner circle of the North Korean leader, Kim Jong-un, arrived in Beijing two days after the United States and China announced that Mr. Obama and Mr. Xi would meet in California early next month.Vice Marshal Choe, 63, who is the political overseer of the North Korean military, met with Wang Jiarui, the head of the international department of the Central Committee of the Communist Party. The vice marshal, sent by Mr. Kim as a special envoy, received only modest coverage in the Chinese state news media.The Chinese government has shown irritation with Mr. Kim, who is regarded as a far less reliable ally than his father, Kim Jong-il, particularly after he defied Beijing to order a nuclear test in February and the launching of a three-stage rocket in December.Since then, North Korea has repeatedly requested invitations for a high-level visit to Beijing but has been rebuffed, Chinese experts on North Korea said Wednesday. That Mr. Xi and Mr. Obama are to hold talks June 7-8, in which North Korea is certain to be a topic, must have increased the demands from officials in Pyongyang, the North's capital, for an audience in Beijing, the experts said."The North's provocations backfired and have pushed China and the U.S. closer together, resulting in more frequent high-level exchanges between the two countries," Zhang Liangui, an analyst at the Communist Party School, was quoted as saying in The Global Times newspaper. "So it is trying a new way to sabotage Sino-U.S. ties."In sending Vice Marshal Choe, Kim Jong-un was hoping to get "China's understanding and support" but was unlikely to achieve it, said Cai Jian, deputy director of the Center for Korean Studies at Fudan University in Shanghai."Following the nuclear test, North Korea repeatedly asked to send a special envoy to China to explain, but the Chinese government always turned it down," Mr. Cai said.It was not clear whether Vice Marshal Choe would meet with President Xi, but Mr. Cai said he believed that the chances "are not very great."At the Chinese Foreign Ministry's daily briefing, a spokesman, Hong Lei, repeated the standard line that China seeks "peace and stability" on the Korean Peninsula and a return to talks aimed at denuclearizing the peninsula.The North Korean envoy was probably looking for an invitation for Mr. Kim to visit China, the experts said. But given the young leader's erratic behavior — including firing six short-range projectiles into the waters off North Korea's east coast since Saturday — the Chinese may choose not to reward him.China voted for sanctions at the United Nations after the nuclear test in February, and this month the state-run Bank of China went along with a request from the United States to suspend all transactions with North Korea's Foreign Trade Bank, a financier of the country's nuclear program.Adding extra pressure on Pyongyang was the visit to Washington this month by the South Korean president, Park Geun-hye, who pledged to remain firm against North Korea's provocations.President Park, who speaks Chinese and spoke warmly of President Xi in Washington, is expected to visit China next month.Vice Marshal Choe is the most senior North Korean official to visit China since Mr. Kim came to power in December 2011.The vice marshal is an important figure in the firmament around the new leader, in part because he is close to the new leader's aunt, Kim Kyong-hui, and his uncle, Jang Song-taek, said Evans J. R. Revere, a former specialist on North Korea at the State Department.Vice Marshal Choe also holds three senior positions: a member of the National Defense Commission, member of the Politburo Presidium of the Korean Workers' Party and vice chairman of the Central Military Commission of the party.The Chinese have been unnerved by a series of changes at the top of the North Korean military as Mr. Kim tries to consolidate his power."I do think the Chinese are uncomfortable with all the musical chairs of defense personnel under Kim Jong-un and their lack of knowledge about them," said Victor D. Cha, who ran North Korea policy at the National Security Council during the presidency of George W. Bush.Mr. Kim made yet another military change on the eve of Vice Marshal Choe's departure.Hyon Yong-chol, who was in charge of the military's field operations as chief of its general staff, was replaced by Gen. Kim Kyok-sik, North Korea's state-run news media reported Wednesday. General Kim was dismissed as minister of the People's Armed Forces this month, and his unexpected return to a more powerful position is bound to rattle nerves in the region.South Korean officials suggested that General Kim, 74, a hard-liner, commanded units responsible for attacks in 2010 that killed 50 South Koreans.
BEIJING — A top North Korean envoy has delivered a letter from leader Kim Jong Un to Chinese President Xi Jinping and told him Pyongyang would take steps to rejoin stalled nuclear disarmament talks, in an apparent victory for Beijing's efforts to coax its unruly ally into lowering tensions.North Korean Vice Marshal Choe Ryong Hae's three-day visit was seen as a fence-mending mission after Pyongyang angered Beijing with recent snubs and moves to develop its nuclear program. Choe returned to North Korea late Friday.The official China News Service said Choe delivered the handwritten letter from Kim to Xi at an afternoon meeting at the Great Hall of the People in central Beijing. It gave no details about the letter's contents.North Korea is willing to work with all sides to "appropriately resolve the relevant questions through the six-party talks and other forms," Choe was quoted as saying by Chinese state broadcaster CCTV. He said Pyongyang was "willing to take active measures in this regard."In a report released early Saturday, North Korea's official Korean Central News Agency quoted Choe as telling Xi that the alliance with China "cannot be exchanged for anything," but didn't make any reference to his remarks on the stalled talks or Pyongyang's nuclear arms development.Choe offered no details on how North Korea planned to resume the talks, according to CCTV. North Korea walked away from the six-party nuclear disarmament talks in 2009 over disagreements on how to verify steps the North was meant to take to end its nuclear programs. Foreign observers often claim that North Korea has a history of raising tensions in an attempt to push its adversaries to negotiations meant to win aid.Since its third nuclear test, in February, North Korea has repeatedly said that any future diplomatic talks would have to recognize it as a nuclear power. That's at odds with the basis of the six-party talks and puts Pyongyang at loggerheads with Washington, which says it won't accept North Korea as an atomic power and demands that talks be based on past commitments by the North to abandon its nuclear programs.Still, Choe's remarks seem to indicate an easing of tensions between North Korea and its communist neighbor.John Delury, a professor at Yonsei University in Seoul who specializes in China and North Korea, said the fact that Kim's envoy "is being quoted as saying that North Korea is open to China's suggestions already is a strong signal of kiss and make up.""This trip is moving things back to a regular strategic dialogue," he said.China has been under intense pressure from Washington to push North Korea into lowering tensions and resuming dialogue.Xi reaffirmed longstanding ties between the communist neighbors, and urged all sides to "keep cool and exercise restraint."The six-party talks, which include the Koreas, the U.S., Japan, China and Russia, should aim to end North Korea's nuclear programs and "maintain lasting peace and stability on the peninsula and in northeast Asia," Xi was quoted as saying.The meeting followed an unusual half-year gap in high-level contacts during which Pyongyang angered Beijing by conducting rocket launches, a nuclear test and other saber-rattling — spiking tensions with South Korea and the U.S.Beijing considered the moves an affront to its interests in regional stability and showed its displeasure by joining with the U.S. to back U.N. sanctions and cut off dealings with North Korea's Foreign Trade Bank.North Korea also frustrated Beijing by refusing to agree to high-level meetings and incensed the Chinese public this month with the detention of a Chinese fishing crew."The relationship is rocky, so they will try to mend the relationship," Cui Yingjiu, a retired professor of Korean at Peking University, said of North Korea. "Second, they also want to improve relations with the U.S. and need China to be their intermediary."North Korea has figured prominently in recent visits by Secretary of State John Kerry and other U.S. officials, and Choe's visit to Beijing came ahead of a meeting in California early next month between Xi and President Barack Obama, as well as a planned trip to Beijing by South Korean President Park Geun-hye in late June.China is North Korea's last significant diplomatic ally and main source of trade and economic assistance. Ties between their insular communist governments have always been wrapped in secrecy and the contents of Kim's letter to Xi may never be revealed.China is believed to have agreed to Choe's visit only after Pyongyang committed to returning to the process of negotiation, and required him to state that publicly twice before his meeting with Xi.Pyongyang is thought to have a handful of nuclear bombs. It is unclear how far it has advanced in efforts to shrink a warhead down to fit on a missile, but many analysts believe that it hasn't yet mastered that miniaturization technology for a missile capable of hitting the United States.Earlier Friday, a top Chinese general told Choe that Beijing wanted a peaceful, denuclearized Korean Peninsula, in a reiteration of China's established position that could also be seen as a rebuke to the North.China's official Xinhua News Agency quoted Fan Changlong as telling Choe that tensions surrounding the nuclear issue have "intensified strategic conflicts among involved parties and jeopardized the peace and stability of the peninsula."Xinhua quoted Choe as telling Fan that there is "no guarantee of peace," but that his country was "willing to work with all sides to search for a method of solving the problems through dialogue."On Thursday, Choe told the ruling party's fifth-ranked official that North Korea "is willing to accept the suggestion of the Chinese side and launch dialogue with all relevant parties."
BEIJING — A North Korean envoy told China's president on Friday that his reclusive country was willing to take "positive actions" to ensure peace and stability on the Korean peninsula, as China steps up diplomatic efforts to bring Pyongyang back to talks.But Choe Ryong-hae, a special envoy of North Korean leader Kim Jong-un, made no offer to abandon North Korea's nuclear program. The United States insists North Korea takes meaningful steps on denuclearization before there can be dialogue.Choe met Chinese officials, including President Xi Jinping, in the highest-ranking visit by an official from Pyongyang in about six months.Chinese state media said Choe presented a hand-written letter from Kim to Xi at Beijing's Great Hall of the People. Media provided no details of its contents."North Korea is willing to make joint efforts with all parties to appropriately resolve related issues through multilateral dialogue and consultations like the six-party talks, and maintain peace and stability on the peninsula," the official Xinhua news service cited Choe as telling Xi."To this end, North Korea is willing to take positive actions," Choe added.Xi told Choe that the denuclearization of the peninsula was an aspiration of all peoples and an inevitable trend, saying problems should be resolved through talks."China hopes all sides exercise calm and restraint, push for a lessening of tensions, restart the six-party talks process and make unremitting efforts ... for long-lasting peace and stability," Xi said.China has repeatedly urged North Korea to return to the so-called six party talks process, aimed at denuclearization.The United States and its allies believe the North violated a 2005 aid-for-denuclearization deal by conducting a nuclear test in 2006 and pursuing a uranium enrichment program that would give it a second path to a nuclear weapon in addition to its plutonium-based program.The six-party aid-for-disarmament talks, involving the two Koreas, the United States, Japan, Russia and host China, collapsed in 2008 when the North walked away from the deal.China, North Korea's only real ally, has been pushing for a return to talks after weeks of bellicose words from Pyongyang following new United Nations sanctions after the North's third nuclear test in February.Russia welcomed North Korea's declaration of readiness to return to talks and said it deserved a "a positive assessment", the Interfax news agency quoted Russian Foreign Ministry special envoy Grigory Logvinov as saying.China has looked on nervously at the ratcheting up of tension, fearful a misstep could plunge the peninsula into war which could envelop northeastern China.Fan Chonglong, vice chairman of China's Central Military Commission, expressed that worry in a meeting with Choe."In recent years, the state of affairs around the Korean peninsula nuclear issue frequently turns into one escalation of tensions after another," China's Xinhua state news agency quoted Fan as saying."The conflicting strategies of all parties have intensified, jeopardizing peace," Fan said.China has increasingly expressed its impatience with North Korea, signing up for the new U.N. sanctions and curtailing Chinese banks' contacts with their North Korean counterparts.Choe told Fan that peace could not be assured although North Korea wanted it in order to build the country, and it was willing to work with all sides in solving problems, Xinhua said."The situation on the Korean peninsula and in Northeast Asia is complex and extraordinary, and there is no guarantee of peace," Choe was quoted as saying.Cai Jian, a North Korean expert at Shanghai's Fudan University, said that while such high-level contact between the two countries was important, especially following the chilling of ties, he did not see a quick resumption of six-party talks."The U.S. says if North Korea doesn't clearly renounce its nuclear program, it won't return to the six-party talks. But if the international community doesn't hold peace talks with North Korea, then North Korea will use that time to develop its nuclear weapons and missiles," Cai said.Choe and his entourage spent three days in Beijing in full military regalia, in contrast to the mostly civilian leaders he met, though he changed out of his uniform to meet Xi."Sending Choe in military uniforms as an envoy to China means North Korea still wants to stick to their right to have a nuclear arsenal," said Chang Yong-seok, a senior researcher at the Institute for Peace Affairs at Seoul National University.Choe was dispatched at this time because North Korea is mindful of Xi's talks with U.S. President Barack Obama in early June, Chang said.Xi is due to hold his first meeting with Obama in the United States and North Korea is expected to be high on the agenda.South Korean President Park Geun-hye plans to make a state visit to China at the end of June, presidential spokeswoman Kim Haing said on Friday."Though China says it can't do everything alone, China still is a country that can exercise considerable influence" over North Korea, Park said during a meeting with U.S. security experts on Thursday.
HONG KONG — A 7 percent stock market sell-off in Tokyo led to moderate declines in equity markets across Europe and Asia on Thursday, and Wall Street opened weakly, amid concerns about global growth and uneasiness about central bank actions.Shares came under pressure in Asian trading after news that the manufacturing sector in China, one of the main engines of global growth in recent years, was faltering. That, along with concerns about daring shock therapy Japan is employing to restart its economy after two decades of stagnation, further combined with leftover confusion in financial markets about the U.S. Federal Reserve's intentions following testimony Wednesday by its chairman, helped to further rattle investors.The result was a 7.3 percent rout in the Japanese market benchmark, the Nikkei 225-stock average, and other Asian markets followed. The Hang Seng Index in Hong Kong sagged 2.5 percent, and the Sydney benchmark index fell almost 2 percent.In European afternoon trading, the Euro Stoxx 50 index of euro zone blue chips fell 2.5 percent, while the FTSE 100 in London was down 2 percent. On Wall Street, the Standard & Poor's 500-stock index was down more than 1 percent in morning trading, while the Dow Jones industrial average lost 0.6 percent. The Nasdaq was off 0.8 percent.The euro ticked up 0.2 percent against the dollar, to $1.2887. The dollar fell 1.4 percent against the Japanese currency, to 101.74 yen.China's slowing momentum has been long in the making and is, to some extent, deliberately engineered by the authorities in Beijing, who are trying to bring about a more gradual but more balanced pace of growth. Still, disappointments over the performance of China's economy – the second-largest in the world after that of the United States – remain liable to unsettle markets not just in Asia but around the globe.High hopes that the bold economic policies of Prime Minister Shinzo Abe of Japan will succeed have prompted a huge rally in stocks since November. The Japanese market is still up nearly 40 percent since the start of the year.Akira Amari, Japan's economy minister, sought to calm nerves after the market closed Thursday. "The Japanese economy is staging a sound recovery, and there is no need for panic," he said, according to the Nikkei business daily. The plunge "is not exceedingly large, and stock prices in China, where the shock originated, have not fallen so much either," he added."The stock market's rise has so far been largely driven by expectations of an economic turnaround, but we've yet to see Mr. Abe's policies really gain traction," said Kiyoshi Yoshimoto, chief senior economist at the Japan Research Institute in Tokyo. "That means even small shocks, like lower-than-expected numbers out of China or some volatility in bond markets, can trigger a big but temporary response."The sell-off Thursday came in spite of economic news from Europe that was, if not good, at least better than many expected. The Markit Economics euro zone purchasing managers' index for the manufacturing sector rose to 47.8 from 46.7, while the services index rose to 47.5 from 47.0. While a number below 50 indicates continued contraction, the improvement suggests the economy may be getting nearer to its nadir, setting up conditions for a rebound in the second half.In Hong Kong, Stephen Corry, chief investment strategist at LGT, agreed that a combination of negative news helped spur the sell-off, including the disappointing data from China and signs that the Fed may begin to scale back its stimulus efforts. But the Japanese market had rallied more than 14 percent this month alone, he added, and "was probably due a breather."Analysts have broadly welcomed Mr. Abe's efforts to breathe life into the Japanese economy through a three-pronged approach of major fiscal spending, a promise to pursue structural reforms and a monetary policy that has effectively flooded the economy with cheap money through purchases of government bonds, commercial debt and other assets.One result has been a weakening of the yen, whose 17 percent drop against the dollar since the start of this year has helped lift the earnings prospects of many Japanese exporters. Data released in the past few weeks have shown that the economy has begun to pick up speed.Taking many market observers by surprise, however, bond yields have risen in recent days, fanning worries about a rising interest rate burden for the government. The yield on the 10-year Japanese government bond briefly spiked above 1 percent Thursday before dropping back to 0.9 percent. The move spooked investors, helping produce the fall in the stock markets, said Stephen Davies, chief executive of Javelin Wealth Management in Singapore.Japan is vulnerable to rising borrowing costs because of its high public debt, which is twice the size of its economy. Bonds are also the main financial assets held by banks, pension funds and insurance companies, making a surge in debt yields perilous. Given the indebtedness of the Japanese government, there are worries about the impact that this could have if sustained," Mr. Davies said. "It is too early to say whether it will be sustained, so we should not read too much into one day's extreme move in the markets."Mr. Yoshimoto of the Japan Research Institute also said the sharp market moves Thursday had not changed the overall longer-term picture for recovery in Japan. That could change if Mr. Abe fails to follow through on his promises of economic reforms, he said, "but for now, there's no need to become overly pessimistic about Japanese shares."
BEIJING — The Chinese leader, Xi Jinping, bluntly told a North Korean envoy on Friday that his country should return to diplomatic talks intended to rid it of its nuclear weapons, according to a state-run Chinese news agency."The denuclearization of the Korean Peninsula and lasting peace on the peninsula is what the people want and also the trend of the times," Mr. Xi said in a meeting at the Great Hall of the People with Vice Marshal Choe Ryong-hae, a personal envoy of the North Korean leader, Kim Jong-un, the China News Service reported.In telling the North that it should return to negotiations with the United States and others, Mr. Xi struck a stern tone, saying, "The Chinese position is very clear: no matter how the situation changes, relevant parties should all adhere to the goal of denuclearization of the peninsula, persist in safeguarding its peace and stability, and stick to solving problems through dialogue and consultation."Vice Marshal Choe had already suggested Thursday that the North was open to at least some type of dialogue. But Mr. Xi's warning made clear that he was insisting on international talks, and appeared to signal China's frustration with its troublesome ward. Although China is North Korea's economic benefactor, Mr. Kim has been dismissive of Chinese entreaties that it not upend the status quo in the region by provoking the West with missile and nuclear tests.In calling for a resumption of the so-called six-party talks — the diplomatic effort among countries including China and the United States that collapsed in 2008 when North Korea walked out — Mr. Xi might also have been posing a challenge to the Obama administration.The United States and South Korea have insisted on preconditions for the talks, including a pledge from North Korea that it would abandon its nuclear program. The North has rebuffed that condition in the past, and American experts say Mr. Kim is unlikely to back down.China would most likely agree to new six-party talks without preconditions, according to Cai Jian, deputy director of the Center for Korean Studies at Fudan University in Shanghai."China believes that the parties sitting down for talks is progress in itself," Mr. Cai said.Analysts have depicted Vice Marshal Choe's three-day visit to Beijing as a mission to repair the prickly relationship between his country and China. The vice marshal handed Mr. Xi a letter from Mr. Kim, but the contents were not disclosed.Mr. Xi's statement Friday followed another clear message delivered in April, when he said that "no one should be allowed to throw a region and even the whole world into chaos for selfish gain."As the vice marshal proceeded through the standard meetings in Beijing with two senior Communist Party leaders, the usual conduit for relations between the two countries, and then a meeting with a senior Chinese military commander, it had been unclear whether he would even be accorded an audience with Mr. Xi, the Chinese president. The meeting with Mr. Xi at the Great Hall of the People was announced only after it had occurred.In an earlier encounter Friday with the vice marshal, a senior Chinese military commander delivered a message similar to Mr. Xi's, and suggested that North Korea's nuclear program was responsible for the rising tensions on the Korean Peninsula.By the standards of China's carefully worded statements, the remarks by the commander, Gen. Fan Changlong, a vice chairman of the powerful Central Military Commission, were unusually strong. They were devoid of any ritualistic references to the friendship between the allies."In recent years, the Korean Peninsula has frequently seen rapidly escalating tensions due to the Korean nuclear issue," General Fan was quoted as saying by the China News Service. "Strategic differences between parties have been exacerbated, endangering the peace and stability of the Korean Peninsula."General Fan appealed for "dialogue and consultation" and "unremitting efforts" toward peace.In reply to General Fan, the vice marshal was quoted as saying that North Korea was willing to "search for a way to solve problems with dialogue."An American expert on North Korea, Jonathan D. Pollack, said there was "no realistic prospect for any near-term resumption of diplomacy with Pyongyang." But Mr. Pollack, director of the John L. Thornton China Center at the Brookings Institution, added that "North Korean actions in recent months have enabled the most candid and realistic discussions between Washington and Beijing that have ever taken place."The meeting with the vice marshal comes a little more than two weeks before a planned summit in California between President Obama and the Chinese leader.North Korea had requested meetings in Beijing for the last several months but had been turned down by the Chinese leadership, Chinese analysts said. It appeared that the Chinese relented after the announcement of the meeting between Mr. Xi and Mr. Obama, and the vice marshal then rushed to Beijing.North Korea will almost certainly be one of the top issues on the agenda at the meeting between Mr. Obama and Mr. Xi.The North's recent belligerence poses a conundrum for China, which has long seen the poor police state as a buffer against the alliance between the United States and South Korea. But the Obama administration has made clear in recent months that China's inability — or unwillingness — to rein in Mr. Kim was actually contributing to the American decision to enhance its military presence in the region, which is anathema to the Chinese.The relationship between Pyongyang and Beijing has been testy not only because of Mr. Kim's apparent willingness to thumb his nose at a major power. Analysts say the North has also bristled at China's demands, including for North Korea to sell natural resources cheaply to Chinese companies.
HONG KONG — Five climbers, including a noted Hungarian mountaineer, are missing and feared dead after apparently trying to descend from the world's third-highest mountain, Nepalese officials said Friday.The climbers — two Hungarians, a South Korean and two Nepalese Sherpas — may have fallen while at an altitude of 25,900 feet on Mount Kanchenjunga in the Himalayas, Dipendra Poudel, a Nepalese tourism official, told The Associated Press.One of the climbers, Zsolt Eross, 45, was the first Hungarian to ascend Mount Everest, and had climbed 12 of the world's 14 highest peaks. After a serious climbing accident in 2010, his right leg was amputated below the knee; a year later, he climbed Lhotse, the world's fourth-highest peak, using a prosthetic.The other climbers were identified as Peter Kiss, 27, a Hungarian; Namsoo Park, 47, of South Korea; Phu Dorjee, 24; and Bibash Gurung, 25.Kanchenjunga, at 28,169 feet, lies to the east of Mount Everest. Until the mid-19th century it was assumed to be the highest mountain in the world, and it was first scaled in 1955 by the English climbers Joe Brown and George Band.May is typically prime time for scaling the Himalayan peaks, as weather conditions are considered most hospitable then. On Thursday, an 80-year-old Japanese man, Yuichiro Miura, became the oldest person to reach the peak of Mount Everest.The five climbers disappeared on Monday and 10 Sherpas were enlisted to search for them. But poor weather was apparently hampering the efforts, with helicopters unable to reach the base camp.Vincze Szabolcs, a spokesman for the expedition, told the Web site Hungarian Ambiance that there was little hope for the climbers."The search and rescue operation is over, the Sherpas did their best and they returned to a safe altitude once again without finding any traces of the climbers," he said. "If Peter and Zsolt stuck at that altitude and spent the night outdoors, they had virtually no chance to survive."Mr. Eross had climbed 12 of the 14 peaks above 8,000 meters, or 26,247 feet, with his ascent of Kanchenjunga, with only Annapurna and K2 remaining. His wife, Hilda Sterczer, is also a noted climber.
BEIJING — A section of a cross-country gas pipeline in China exploded on Sunday, injuring at least two people and halting gas supplies, local media said.The second west-east natural gas pipeline, which transports gas from central Asia to south China, exploded in an industrial zone in China's southeastern province of Jiangxi, state news agency Xinhua said.The pipeline has a capacity to transport 30 billion cubic meters of gas a year.Energy released from the explosion knocked over people hundreds of meters away, Xinhua said, without detailing the length of the exploded pipeline. The government is investigating the cause of the explosion, the agency said.China, the world's largest energy consumer, has two cross-country gas pipelines that carry gas imports across the nation. It is building a third.The government wants to secure around 30 percent of China's natural gas consumption from imports, up from just 6 percent in 2007.
BEIJING — North Korea put a positive spin Saturday on the visit of its special envoy to China, but made no mention of China's push for the North to resume negotiations aimed at ridding the country of its nuclear weapons program.An account by the official Korean Central News Agency in Pyongyang, its first report on last week's visit by Vice Marshal Choe Ryong-hae, was at odds with portrayals in China's state-run news media, which emphasized President Xi Jinping's strongly worded appeal that North Korea rejoin the so-called international six-party talks that were abandoned in 2008 when North Korea walked out.The North's news agency said that the country's leader, Kim Jong-un, whose belligerent behavior has annoyed China, sent a personal letter to Mr. Xi that referred to the deep friendship between the two allies that "cannot be exchanged for anything."While he was in Beijing, Vice Marshal Choe made general references to being open to dialogue but never specifically mentioned the six-party talks, which China sees as a way to cool tensions in the region that have contributed to the United States stepping up its presence.Chinese and American analysts said Saturday that the visit by Vice Marshal Choe, a member of Mr. Kim's inner circle, showed that North Korea was rattled by the prospect of China's moving toward North Korea's prime adversaries in the coming month — the United States and South Korea.President Obama and Mr. Xi are due to meet in California in early June, their first encounter since Mr. Xi assumed the presidency. How to deter North Korea's recent behavior, including its recent nuclear test and firing of missiles, is certain to be one of the top topics.Park Geun-hye, the new South Korean leader, will later visit Beijing.The three-day trip by Vice Marshal Choe, possibly to try to set up a visit by Mr. Kim, seemed to do little to repair the troubled relations between China and North Korea, said Zhu Feng, a professor of international relations at Peking University.In the wake of the visit, China — the North's economic benefactor — might make some humanitarian gestures, like increasing food aid after it had been curtailed, Mr. Zhu said. But the fundamental split on the question of halting the nuclear program was striking, he said, especially when Vice Marshal Choe failed to take Mr. Xi's lead on the six-party talks during their meeting."Obviously without denuclearization on the agenda, Beijing will not welcome Kim Jong-un's visit," Mr. Zhu said.Still, faced with Beijing's demands, he said it was possible that Mr. Kim might come around.Even if Mr. Kim were to agree, analysts say the likelihood of a resumption of the six-party talks — which involved China, the United States, North Korea, South Korea, Japan and Russia — is remote. The Obama administration and South Korea have indicated that they would insist on a pledge from North Korea that it renounce nuclear weapons as a condition for resuming the talks, a demand the North has so far rejected.Ms. Park of South Korea, who speaks Chinese and has spoken warmly of Mr. Xi, said that she and Mr. Xi can do business together on North Korea, an attitude that no doubt displeases Mr. Kim in the North.Moreover, with a state visit to Beijing, Ms. Park will be given the kind of pomp that Mr. Kim would almost certainly be denied, possibly increasing pressure on him to cooperate more fully with China."Kim Jong-un isn't about to receive treatment that is even remotely equivalent" to Ms. Park's, said Jonathan D. Pollack, a Korea expert at the Brookings Institution. "But does that mean that Pyongyang is about to make any meaningful concessions that reduce the growing pressures directed against them? I detect no signs of this at all."
BEIJING — A northeastern Chinese court has sentenced to death a man who strangled a baby boy after realizing the infant was in the back seat of a car he had just stolen, in a case that triggered public anger.The official Xinhua News Agency said the Changchun Intermediate People's Court found Zhou Xijun guilty of murder and sentenced him to death on Monday.State media reports say Zhou stole an SUV parked outside a supermarket, its engine still running, in Changchun city in March. He drove it onto a highway before finding the 2-month-old baby sleeping in the backseat.The court found that Zhou strangled the child and buried him in the snow. He turned himself in after the case triggered public fury and a manhunt was launched.
BEIJING — For a year and a half the artist Ai Weiwei and a sculptor friend oversaw a team of 20 to 30 people toiling away here in secret on one of his most political and personal projects.Their task was to reconstruct scenes from Mr. Ai's illegal detention in 2011, when he was held for 81 days in a secret prison guarded by a paramilitary unit. What took shape this spring at an industrial space in the Chinese capital were six fiberglass dioramas that depict, at half-scale, his often banal daily existence as a captive of the vast government security apparatus.The dioramas were quietly transported out of China — Mr. Ai declined to say exactly how — to Venice, where they will be publicly exhibited starting on Tuesday in a church being used as an art gallery by the Zuecca Project Space, in parallel with the 2013 Venice Biennale, though not officially part of it.Each diorama is enclosed in a 2 ½-ton iron box. There are sculptures of Mr. Ai sleeping, eating, showering, undergoing interrogation and sitting on the toilet, all under the watch of two young guards in green uniforms. Mr. Ai said the details were meticulously recreated from memory, down to his blue flip-flops and the white padding taped to the walls of the room.Along with an obscenity-laced music video posted online last week, the dioramas are the first of Mr. Ai's pieces to address his detention, which was the most difficult period of his life, he said.On a recent morning at his studio and home in northern Beijing, he explained in an interview that his goal was simple: "To give people a clear understanding of the conditions." An assistant used an iPad to show visitors photographs of the dioramas while a shaved cat padded around, looking forlorn.Mr. Ai, 56, has another work being shown by Zuecca, one that comments on the 2008 Sichuan earthquake. He also has a more conceptual piece at Venice that uses 800 small wooden stools and is an attempt, Mr. Ai said, to build a "monsterlike lively structure" that is "completely dysfunctional." That work is part of a group exhibition put together by the curator for the German Pavilion in the Biennale, though the exhibition will be displayed in the French Pavilion as a gesture symbolizing ties between the two nations. Mr. Ai's artwork is making its first appearance in the Biennale since his debut there in 1999."China is still in constant warfare, with destroying individuals' nature, including people's imaginations, curiosity, motivations, dreams," Mr. Ai said. "This state's best minds have been wasted by this high ideological control, which is fake. Even the people who are trying to use it as a tool to maintain power or stability know that this is a completely fake condition."Mr. Ai's vitriol against the Communist Party has made him a polarizing figure in the Chinese art world. Many artists quietly resent the attention Mr. Ai has received from the West, as well as his occasional denunciations of other Chinese, including former friends, who are unwilling to take the same uncompromising stand against the party.Critical reception in the West to his recent art varies — a 2010 exhibition of sunflower seeds at the Tate Modern in London was widely praised, while a 2012 retrospective at the Hirshhorn in Washington had mixed reviews."Can political art still be good art?" Mr. Ai said. "Those questions have been around for too long. People are not used to connecting art to daily struggle, but rather use high aesthetics, or so-called high aesthetics, to try to separate or purify humans' emotions from the real world."The earthquake-related artwork in Venice literally builds on Mr. Ai's previous political criticism. For the Hirshhorn show, Mr. Ai's work "Straight" consisted of a pile of long reinforced steel bars from the Sichuan earthquake sites, which he collected and then had straightened. At Venice Mr. Ai is again exhibiting a pile of the bars, but double in terms of weight, for a total of 90 tons.As earlier, the piece is meant to criticize how corruption in China has led to shoddy construction across the country and thus to loss of lives in the quake. Nearly 90,000 people were killed or missing, including more than 5,000 children who died when schools collapsed."It will remain for a long time to remind people what happened," Mr. Ai said. "Until today they have never answered our questions."Philip Tinari, director of the Ullens Center for Contemporary Art in Beijing, said in general, "Weiwei has been looking, in the years since his detention, for a way to use art to talk about social issues in a way that still codes and functions as art." The metal rods from Sichuan, he said, are "a good example of his search for this middle road between overtly political and purely formal."
HONG KONG — The biggest briolette-style diamond ever to appear at auction set an $11 million record when it sold to an anonymous Asian buyer in Hong Kong on Tuesday, auctioneer Christie's said.The 75.36-carat briolette - a gem cut into a three-dimensional waterdrop shape - is suspended on a chain of diamonds. Although it fell short of a top pre-sale estimate of $12.5 million, it beat the $10.8 million record set by a 10.48-carat fancy deep blue briolette sold by Sotheby's last year.The Type IIa diamond - similar to the Koh-i-Noor diamond set into British Queen Elizabeth's crown - is exceptionally rare, according to Christie's jewelry specialist Chiang Shiu-Fung."Briolette is so special because we have to find a piece of rough that is big enough to cut (into) a briolette style," Chiang said.The diamond arrived at American diamond dealership, William Goldberg, as a 160.5-carat rough and was shaped into a 75.51 carat briolette diamond.This was certified by the Gemological Institute of America (GIA) as the largest briolette-shaped, flawless diamond graded at the time, according to William Goldberg's database.Earlier this month Christie's set a $26.7 million record in Geneva for a pear-shaped colorless diamond that was the largest ever offered at auction.The 101.73 carat "Winston Legacy" diamond was the centerpiece of the Magnificent Jewels auction and was bought by jewelry and watch firm Harry Winston.
BEIJING — A Chinese teenager who defaced an ancient temple in Egypt with graffiti has come under fire at home where his vandalism prompted public fretting about how to cultivate a good image overseas as more newly affluent Chinese travel abroad.The teen scratched "Ding Jinhao visited here" in Chinese on a temple wall in the ancient city Luxor, and the incident came to light when another Chinese tourist posted a photo of it on a popular microblog with the comment: "My saddest moment in Egypt. Ashamed and unable to show my face."The photo quickly caught the attention of the Chinese public, attracting thousands of comments, and someone was able to identify the person responsible for the graffiti as 15-year-old Ding Jinhao from the eastern city of Nanjing. Many criticized Ding's act as an embarrassment to the country."Why there are so many citizens who go abroad and humiliate us? How many generations will it take to change this kind of behavior?" Xuan Kejiong, a prominent journalist with Shanghai Television, wrote on his microblog.The sentiment was echoed by the mouthpiece of the ruling Communist Party, the People's Daily newspaper."Nowadays, people in China no longer want for food and clothing, and even in the luxury shops abroad, there are advertisement posters in Chinese," the paper wrote in a commentary. "But many people also feel as though their 'hands are full but hearts are empty.' In the process of modernization, how have the people come to lack modern manners and consciousness?"The outcry prompted Ding's parents to publicly apologize. In an interview with a Nanjing newspaper, Ding's father said "the child has committed a mistake and the main responsibility falls on the adults. It was because we did not supervise him well, and have not taught him well."The soul searching comes as Chinese tourism overseas has seen an explosion in growth over the past decade, fueled by rising incomes and the relaxation of government restrictions on citizens' ability to travel abroad.China has been the fastest-growing source of international tourists in the world for the past 10 years, the World Tourism Organization, a U.N. agency, said in April. The organization said the volume of international trips by Chinese tourists has grown from 10 million in 2000 to 83 million in 2012 — accompanied by a nearly eightfold increase in spending.Last year, China surpassed Germany to become the largest spender in international tourism, with tourists' expenditure amounting to a record $102 billion, the organization said.But Chinese travelers, many of whom join tour groups, are frequently criticized for rude behavior. Deputy Premier Wang Yang earlier this month during the passage of a tourism law urged Chinese travelers to mind their manners."They make a racket in public places, carve words at scenic spots, cross the road when the light is red, spit, and do other uncivilized things," Wang was quoted as saying. "This is detrimental to the image of the country's people and leaves a bad impression."Associated Press researcher Fu Ting contributed to this report from Shanghai.
BEIJING — A 22-year-old woman who raised the initial alarm about a newborn trapped in a sewer pipe in China kept quiet about being his mother even as she watched the sensational two-hour rescue unfold, reports said Wednesday.The woman, whose name was not revealed in state media reports, confessed to police a couple of days later when they asked her to undergo a medical checkup after searching her rented room and finding toys and blood-stained toilet paper, the state-run Zhejiang News website said.Firefighters were called Saturday to the residential building in the Pujiang area of the eastern Zhejiang province city of Jinhua to rescue a baby trapped in the L-joint of a sewage pipe just below a squat toilet in one of the building's public restrooms.Video of the rescue of Baby No. 59 — so named because of his incubator number in the hospital — was shown on Chinese news programs and websites starting late Monday and picked up worldwide, prompting both horror and an outpouring of charity on behalf of the newborn.The single woman, a tenant in the building, told police she could not afford an abortion and secretly delivered the child Saturday afternoon in the toilet. She said the newborn slipped into the sewer line and that she alerted her landlord of the trapped baby after she could not pull the child out, Zhejiang News said.In China, unwanted pregnancies have been on the rise because of a lack of sex education and an increasingly lax attitude toward sex. Young men and women often are engaged in unprotected sex, and abortions have become increasingly common with abortion services widely available.The baby, who weighed 2.8 kilograms (6 pounds, 2.8 ounces), had a low heart rate and some minor abrasions on his head and limbs, but was mostly unhurt, according to Zhejiang Online, the province's official news site. The placenta was still attached.Police initially said they were treating the case of as possible attempted homicide, but it was not immediately clear whether the mother would face any criminal charges.In the video, officials were shown removing the pipe from a ceiling that apparently was just below the restroom and then, at the hospital, using pliers and saws to gently pull apart the pipe, which was about 10 centimeters (about 3 inches) in diameter.Zhejiang News said the mother was present throughout the entire rescue and expressed her concern for the child, thought that didn't initially rouse suspicion of the police.News of the baby's ordeal was met with horror and pity by bloggers on Chinese sites. Most speculated that the child had been dumped by his parents down the toilet. The rescue prompted an outpouring from strangers who came to the hospital with diapers, baby clothes, powdered milk and offers to adopt him.The landlord of the building told Zhejiang News earlier in the week that there were no signs that the birth took place in the restroom and she had not been aware of any recent pregnancies among her tenants.The mother told police she cleaned up the scene in the toilet after the delivery and that she managed to hide her pregnancy by wearing loose clothes and tightly wrapping her abdomen, Zhejiang News said.
HONG KONG — Trade negotiations between the European Union and China ended on Monday with mutual recriminations. China called on the European Union to refrain from imposing tariffs on solar panels, and the European trade commissioner complained that China was pressuring individual countries to prevent Europe from reaching a consensus.The European Union accuses Chinese firms of selling solar panels below cost in Europe, a practice known as dumping, and has already proposed antidumping tariffs of nearly 50 percent on Chinese solar panel shipments. That is one of the largest categories of Chinese exports to Europe and worth about $27 billion a year.But Germany's economy minister said that his country had informed the European Commission, which is the executive branch of the European Union, that it opposed proceeding with the solar panel tariffs. If a majority of the European Union's 27-member states oppose tariffs during the current consultation period, then the commission could be forced to abandon the tariffs. But that could risk undermining the commission's long-term ability to negotiate trade deals on behalf of the bloc.Zhong Shao, China's vice minister of commerce and chief international trade representative, denounced the European Commission for not reaching a deal at the talks, which were held in Brussels.The commission's plan to impose tariffs on Chinese solar panels starting on June 6, together with the commission's preparations to begin a similar trade case against Chinese exports of wireless communications gear, "would seriously hurt the Chinese industries and workers concerned and seriously sour the climate on bilateral trade and economic engagement," he said in a statement.He added, "Such practices of trade protectionism are not acceptable to China," and asked that the European Union delay the tariffs.European officials have said repeatedly that they face statutory deadlines for actions in trade cases and have little or no discretion to delay action.The commission has been discussing the tariffs with member governments; Germany, with large exports to China that could be vulnerable to retaliation by Beijing in any broader trade conflict, has been particularly vocal in calling for a negotiated deal.Karel De Gucht, the European Union's trade commissioner, issued an unusually blunt complaint late Monday that China was bypassing the European Union's leaders by going to member governments. Mr. De Gucht "also made it very clear to the vice minister that he was aware of the pressure being exerted by China on a number of E.U. member states," said John Clancy, Mr. De Gucht's spokesman.Mr. Clancy added, "It is the role of the European Commission to remain independent, to resist any external pressure and to see the 'big picture' for the benefit of Europe, its companies and workers based upon the evidence alone."The United States has already imposed antidumping and antisubsidy tariffs totaling about 30 percent on Chinese solar panels. The Obama administration has recently decided to seek its own negotiated settlement with China to replace the tariffs. Such a settlement could take the form of setting high minimum prices for Chinese exports to the United States, a ceiling on the volume of exports, or both.While Washington, Brussels and Beijing are all saying now they want a negotiated settlement, Chinese solar companies and their many local government patrons are divided on what a settlement should look like.
HONG KONG — Angelika Lisek, a Polish finance student at the University of Glasgow , is no stranger to working during the holidays: waiting tables, selling books door to door or helping her mother at her architecture company. But she knows that her two-month internship in Shanghai last year is what will give her a competitive edge."We are ambitious — we don't want to relax," said Ms. Lisek, describing students like her who seek internships abroad. She was in her second year at the university when she saw a work opportunity in China."I had never been to Asia, and it was a new challenge," said Ms. Lisek, who is 23 and is now attending a one-year exchange program at the University of Hong Kong.Students are keenly aware of the importance of work experience in a competitive job market. And China, whose economy has had robust growth, increasingly looks like an attractive option.Third-party internship organizers that match students with Chinese companies report a rising number of applicants and interns.Absolute Internship, which placed Ms. Lisek at a U.S. wealth management firm, will send around 700 interns to Beijing, Shanghai and Hong Kong this year, up from 250 last year."Business is booming, and we can hardly keep up with the demands," Fredrik van Huynh, director of Absolute Internship, which he co-founded in 2009, said from London. "We received five times more applicants for internships this year compared with last year."CRCC Asia, a similar company, has seen its business grow as well. Founded in 2006, it started a pilot program in 2007 with about 20 interns, said Edward Holroyd Pearce, a co-director of CRCC Asia, based in London.The company is expecting to send 2,000 students to Beijing and Shanghai this year, up from 1,200 last year."The time of spending three months on the beach is pretty much over," Mr. Holroyd Pearce said. "Now every experience counts."While both companies offer internships in a wide range of industries, from law to design, they say that students studying business, finance and marketing are the majority of the participants.The internships are unpaid, partly because of China's visa rules. The participants enter the country on the type of visa usually used for business trips, and not on work or student visas. On top of that, students should be prepared to pay a few thousand dollars to take part, not including airfare.CRCC Asia and Absolute Internship charge almost identical fees, about $2,900 to $4,900 for their Beijing and Shanghai programs, which run one to three months. Absolute Internship also has a two-month Hong Kong internship program that costs $5,999. Both companies say they give some scholarships, and the CRCC Web site also gives suggestions for other financing options.The fees include visas, orientation, housing in a serviced apartment, local transportation and social events, like networking activities and weekend sightseeing trips. CRCC also provides Chinese-language lessons.Both companies say that they do not receive fees from the companies in China.Absolute Internship and CRCC Asia screen and interview candidates, and about 20 percent to 40 percent of them are accepted and matched with "host companies."Both work with University College London and the University of Technology, Sydney. CRCC also collaborates with the Sam M. Walton College of Business at the University of Arkansas and the University of Texas at Austin. Absolute Internship, meanwhile, works with the University of Westminster and some universities in the United States.Alex Williams, 23, a recent graduate from the University of West England, Bristol, who obtained an internship in Beijing in 2010 through CRCC Asia, said his experience was worth it."It was amazing, and it blew my expectations away," Mr. Williams said about his two-month-long stint at a Chinese investment banking firm. "They took me quite seriously, and they thought I was quite an asset. I was working in the company for just a few weeks, and they were throwing stuff at me. It would have taken me one year to get a similar experience in London."Ms. Lisek, the Polish finance student, said that there was a stereotype that interns just made photocopies or coffee but that she "had big responsibilities" during her internship in Shanghai, developing financial models for the company's clients.Unpaid internships have generated controversy, particularly in the West, where critics say that they favor wealthier students who can afford to work without being paid or, in this case, essentially pay thousands of dollars to work for no salary. Countries like the United States and Britain have moved to crack down on the practice, saying it violates labor laws.
HONG KONG — Asian universities are beginning to do what has long been practiced in the West: offer short courses specifically for women who are leaders in business and politics.While the business schools at Harvard, Oxford, Stanford and others have established courses for female executives, such offerings are just starting to make their mark in Asia.Last month, the University of Hong Kong held the first part of a course meant to prepare Asian women for the boardroom: The Women's Directorship Program.Offering a certificate upon completion, the program is sponsored in part by the executive search firm Harvey Nash and had the first of two three-day sessions in April. Another is planned for June. Participation costs $10,000, and the course covers strategic leadership, stock exchange regulations, conflict resolution and ethics.Amy Lau, director of both the university's business school and its executive education program, said there would be several short courses focused on potential board directors in Asia. "We have decided that this first one should focus on women because there is currently a shortage of women on the boards," she said. "This program aims to address the imbalance in boardrooms."Dr. Lau said that women have often felt tied down by family commitments. "Even now," she said, "some are not sure if they are suitable for directorships, even though they have served in senior executive positions. Often, they are less inclined to put themselves forward."Fifteen senior executives from various sectors, including finance, logistics and telecommunications, attended the course as students. Ruth Rowan, the marketing director for Asia, the Middle East and Africa for BT Group, described it as an eye-opener."There was a huge amount to learn from each other, as well as the speakers," she said. "I have always worked in industries where men are definitely in the majority, so I was intrigued to see how a course solely for female executives would work," she added."There is clearly still an issue in most organizations that women are not represented proportionally, particularly in more senior roles," Ms. Rowan said.The curriculum, which includes case studies, is taught by lecturers from the university's faculty of business and economics, plus industry leaders like Rick Haythornthwaite, the chairman of MasterCard, and Umran Beba, the Asia-Pacific regional president of Pepsi.But of the 21 professors and speakers listed on the Web site of the Women's Directorship Program, only five are women, meaning that three-quarters of the instructors are male."Most of the directors invited are men but we would like to show that there are a few women serving in leadership positions in top corporations and that these positions are achievable for our students," Dr. Lau said. "It is also a reflection of the situation now. There are not many women leaders in the boardrooms," she added.She is hopeful that "in the next few years," the university can invite more women to speak.Anne Parkin, a director at Credit Suisse in Hong Kong and a student in the program, said, "It is attractive to join a group of women executives from diverse backgrounds and exchange with them the various challenges facing executives of both genders."She added: "The community will certainly benefit from having access to a pool of female leaders who can easily move proactively into leadership roles."The University of Hong Kong is planning for the second installment of the corporate directorship program, which is expected to run early next year.Women represent less than 6 percent of all boardrooms across Asia, according to a 2012 study by McKinsey, the management consulting firm. The proportion of seats on corporate boards occupied by women is 17 percent in Europe and 15 percent in the United States.Other Asian universities have also started offering short courses for female leaders.Madeleine K. Albright, the first woman to serve as U.S. secretary of state, will be the keynote speaker at a two-week program in Beijing from June 5 to June 15. She will also teach a master class for the "Empowering Women for Leadership: Challenges of an Urban Future" program, an initiative of the Albright Institute for Global Affairs at Wellesley College, a women's liberal arts college in Massachusetts. Participants will include undergraduates from both Yuanpei College at Peking University in Beijing and Wellesley.
HONG KONG — The Japanese central bank on Monday released minutes of a recent meeting that showed some board members skeptical of the bank's own strategy of lifting Japan from deflation, while another big fall in the country's stock market stoked fears of further volatility in the weeks and months ahead.But European stocks shrugged off the slide on the Japanese stock market Monday and traded higher as a member of the European Central Bank repeated the bank's commitment to low interest rates. Stock markets in Britain and the United States were closed for public holidays.In Tokyo, the minutes of the Bank of Japan's policy meeting on April 26 revealed a degree of doubt about the bank's ability to inject a healthy dose of inflation into an economy that has suffered from crippling deflation for years.According to the minutes, "a few members" pointed out that the goal of 2 percent inflation appeared "difficult to achieve" in the planned time frame of about two years, "since it was highly uncertain whether changes in inflation expectations would lead to a rise in the actual rate of inflation."Some board members also noted that the bank's aggressive easing policies appeared to have been perceived by the markets as "contradictory" — comments that highlighted the challenges that the bank and policy makers are wrestling with.The bank, on one hand, has committed to ending deflationary expectations and starting an economic recovery by flooding the economy with money, which would cause long-term interest rates to rise. But the bank has also committed to keeping those interest rates in check, partly by buying large amounts of government bonds. That has sowed confusion among market players over whether they should welcome or worry about the recent rise in long-term rates.On Monday, the Nikkei 225 share average in Tokyo fell 3.2 percent. The decline came after a 7.3 percent slump last Thursday, when a rally that started in mid-November of 2012, with stocks rising nearly 80 percent, came to an abrupt end."While it's still difficult to clearly pinpoint a reason, the big market falls themselves have started to stoke fear among investors," Koichi Fujishiro, an economist at the Dai-ichi Life Research Institute, said in a report. He said that high-frequency trading by investors looking for short-term gains helped magnify those market swings."Japan's fundamentals have not changed," Mr. Fujishiro said. But, he added, "turmoil in financial markets won't settle down overnight, and we are likely to see nervousness remain for some time."An article carried by the Nikkei business daily on Monday urged calm."Investors need a bird's-eye perspective of market movements, not a bug's-eye perspective," wrote Ryo Suzuki, a columnist who is a member of Nikkei's editorial board. "Things look different from a larger perspective," he said. "For people who sat out on the market surge, this might be a good time to get in on the action."Japanese stocks have been on a tear since last November, swept by a wave of optimism that bold plans outlined by Prime Minister Shinzo Abe, who took over in December, would succeed in breathing life back into the Japanese economy.Volatility in the Japanese bond markets, a renewed strengthening of the yen and concern about the dynamism of China's economy all have combined in recent days to underline the challenges facing Mr. Abe and the Japanese central bank as they seek to renew growth.Analysts have struggled to explain the exact cause of the recent reversal, saying that a range of factors were probably at play and continue to fan nervousness in the market."There have been times when the market jumped over 1,000 points in a week. We were bound to see a correction," Yoshihide Suga, the chief cabinet secretary, told reporters in Tokyo. "But Japan's economy is recovering steadily. So it is extremely important that we react in a calm manner."Investors are also concerned that the United States Federal Reserve might reduce its own stimulus measures before too long.The realization that Mr. Abe's stimulus efforts — in particular, the structural overhauls that are needed to bolster Japan's long-term competitiveness — face a struggle also have played a part, analysts said, as did profit-taking after the long rally this year."Investors have realized that the Japanese market does not just rise and rise," said Jun Yunoki, an analyst at Nomura in Tokyo.
CHENGDU, China — Chinese baijiu, a flammable, pungent white liquor averaging a 110-proof wallop, is the world's most consumed form of liquor thanks to its popularity in China, but for the first time distillers are looking to develop export markets.According to data from International Wine & Spirit Research, Chinese people drank over 11 billion liters of baijiu in 2012; the spirit, distilled from sorghum, wheat or rice, accounted for more than one-third of all spirits consumed in the world.But as a new generation of Chinese drinkers discovers the imported spirits that were unavailable to their parents, baijiu risks losing that market share unless it creates new markets overseas."Baijiu hasn't been marketed to the West yet but I think it can be," said James Rice, managing director of Sichuan Swellfun Co Ltd, a baijiu maker in Chengdu, western China, in which London-based beverage multinational Diageo has taken a sizeable stake."People are interested in China and here's a piece of Chinese culture that can go right to your dinner table."The opportunity has also attracted small entrepreneurs like David Zhou, who founded Washington-based Everest Distillery to import a Chinese baijiu and rebrand it for sale locally."We really want to go for mainstream U.S. consumers and we do believe they can accept it."But Rice, and other distillers, have to deal with a major challenge: baijiu tends to make a terrible first impression."I thought it tasted like paint-thinner and felt like a liquid lobotomy," said Michael Pareles, manager at the U.S. Meat Export Federation in Beijing. "However, like many other things in China, I eventually grew to like it."Torsten Stocker, head of Greater China consumer practice at Monitor Group in Hong Kong, was skeptical about prospects for overseas expansion.But he suggested the liquor could be better distributed to the swelling overseas Chinese community, which now depends on duty-free stores in airports to stay stocked.Baijiu's punch makes it a tough sell in Western bar culture where people drink on an empty stomach. So does its fuel-like odor and its aftertaste. But the history of alcoholic beverages shows that nearly any taste can be acquired."Tequila has a very unusual flavor compared to more popular spirits," said Derek Sandhaus, industry consultant and author of a forthcoming book on baijiu appreciation."But through clever marketing, good cocktails, and good management, it's earned a place on the bar shelf. I see no reason why the world's most popular spirit can't do the same."But an adjustment is still probably necessary.Matt Trusch, a former China resident, founded a distillery called Byejoe USA that imports baijiu base from China, then re-filters it to make it more drinkable."We've made it much more palatable to American tastes."Vinn Distilleries in Portland, Oregon, founded by a family of ethnic Chinese immigrants from Vietnam, is reproducing a generation-old baijiu recipe, and Vinn president Michelle Ly has marketed it - in very small volumes - to non-Chinese consumers.Curiously enough, she said a group of investors had approached her with an idea to export her U.S.-made baijiu back to China, advertising it as a product of high quality control - an issue domestic baijiu brands have struggled with.Baijiu expert Sandhaus thinks the best avenue for developing drinkers overseas is to follow the model of Japanese sake and market baijiu as the alcohol to drink with Chinese food. But he added that there is no need for distillers to rush."It will still be a very long time before baijiu stops being a very lucrative business in China."
BEIJING — China's Supreme People's Court vowed Wednesday to crack down on crimes against children, publicizing punishments meted out in three recent cases, including the execution of a grade school teacher who repeatedly raped seven students.The announcement, carried on the website of the party-run People's Daily, appeared to be in response to public outrage over a recent series of reports of sexual assaults against schoolgirls. At least four primary school teachers have been detained this month for allegedly sexually molesting young students — some as young as 8 years old.Chen Zaipeng, a former primary school principal in southern China's Hainan province, was charged with rape after he spent one night with four school girls— all under the age 14 — in a hotel and allegedly sexually molested them, the official Xinhua News Agency said Wednesday.Elsewhere, three primary school teachers — in central Henan province, southern Hunan province and southern city of Shenzhen respectively — have been detained for allegedly sexually assaulting their students, state media reported this week.The allegations have infuriated the Chinese public, who are demanding stronger, more effective protection of the children and harsher punishment against the culprits.As reported by People's Daily, the supreme court said it will step up efforts to guide courts at all levels to crack down crimes against children to ensure a safe and healthy environment in which they can grow up.In the two other cases announced by the top court, a woman was sentenced to death for fatally abusing her 5-year-old step-daughter and a man was sentenced to four years' imprisonment for instigating teenagers to commit crimes.The court's report said the man convicted of raping seven school children was recently executed. It identified the man by his family name of Bao but did not give details such as the name of the village school where he worked or the location. It said the man used his teaching job to lure the girls to different school rooms, where he sexually molested them, forced them to watch pornographic photos and video, and took naked photos of the girls.
BEIJING — China says it opposes computer hacking and wants to work with Washington to counter such activities, following new claims that the country used cyberattacks to access data from nearly 40 U.S. weapons programs and almost 30 other defense technologies.Assistant Foreign Minister Zheng Zeguang did not directly address the allegations on Wednesday, which were included in a U.S. Defense Science Board report released earlier this year but are only now being discussed publicly.He said, however, that China opposes all hacking and referred to an agreement with the U.S. to form a cybercrime working group.Chinese hacking has long been seen as a threat to U.S. national security, and the latest claims allege a wide range of systems were compromised, from air defense missiles to the F-35 Joint Strike Fighter.
BEIJING — China must not rely on whistle-blowing mistresses to expose corrupt officials, China's top newspaper said on Wednesday, after a string of such incidents has led to some people hailing the girlfriends as graft-busters.President Xi Jinping has singled out corruption as a threat to the Communist Party's survival, and the keeping of mistresses in lavish apartments, which breaks party rules, has come to represent to many people the excesses of power in China.In a recent high-profile case, Liu Tienan, once the deputy chief of China's top planning agency, was sacked after his mistress told a journalist that Liu had helped defraud banks of $200 million, state media reported.But the People's Daily, the ruling Communist Party's official newspaper, questioned the woman's motives and said China could not rely on such people to fight corruption."Even though at times, for many reasons, mistresses are led by fallings out with corrupt officials to denounce them, at the root of the issue, both their motives are the same - to satisfy each other's greed," the newspaper said in an editorial."Some directly solicit bribes or seek huge illegal profits. To pin anti-corruption hopes on them is to go in for evil attacking evil," it said. "It is not the right path for the will of the people."The paper noted another case in which a tape that showed a district party chief having sex with his mistress went viral on Weibo, China's version of Twitter. The official, Lei Zhengfu, was sacked, along with several others in the city of Chongqing.His mistress, 24-year-old Zhao Hongxia, was charged with extortion this month for her alleged part in a criminal ring that blackmailed officials by secretly filming sex sessions.Zhao has become something of a national anti-hero, eliciting condemnation from those who called her behaviour immoral even as others commended her for her hand in bringing down Lei.The People's Daily editorial was met with skepticism by some Weibo users who joked that mistresses were the real heroes in the fight against graft."In this very special country, mistresses make a bigger contribution to anti-corruption than so-called public security authorities," said one user, who used the moniker "Xie Peng is Xie Peng.""Without them, who can we depend on?" a user called LastDay1981 asked."Quit griping," the poster said, referring to those responsible for the newspaper editorial.
BEIJING — Zhang Yimou, China's most famous filmmaker, on Tuesday announced a partnership to make movies with a Beijing-based production company, Le Vision Pictures, best known for distributing its content online.Under the arrangement, Le Vision Pictures will have what executives called a "long-term, exclusive deal" with Mr. Zhang to create movies for theaters and the Internet. Mr. Zhang, who directed the opening and closing ceremonies of the 2008 Olympics in Beijing, is known for creating critical favorites like "Red Sorghum" and "Raise the Red Lantern" as well as spectacles like the martial arts film "Hero."The announcement puts to rest widespread speculation within the Chinese film industry about where Mr. Zhang would land after being courted by numerous companies. He has been seeking a new production and financing partner for almost a year after a bitter falling-out with his longtime friend and producer, Zhang Weiping, and Beijing New Picture Film Company, in the aftermath of lackluster profits from their most recent collaboration, the World War II-era epic "The Flowers of War," starring Christian Bale.However, the announcement came at a delicate time for both parties.On Tuesday, LeTV, the online TV and film portal that owns Le Vision Pictures, temporarily suspended trading of its shares on the Shenzhen Stock Exchange in response to a statement from Sharp, the Japanese television manufacturer, denying LeTV's assertion that the two companies were collaborating on a smart-TV product. Late Tuesday, LeTV said shares of the portal would resume trading on Wednesday.And Mr. Zhang recently has been subjected to public scrutiny surrounding allegations that he fathered up to seven children with three or four women, in potential violation of family planning laws.Further details of the agreement were not made public. Zhang Zhao, the chief executive of Le Vision Pictures (and no relation to the director), said only that the deal came together "within the span of a few weeks" and that Zhang Yimou's financial compensation was in recognition of the reality that "he, like anyone else, has to buy a house and get married."Earlier this year, when Mr. Zhang had not announced a partner, people in the industry said he was in talks with Dalian Wanda Group for a $30 million, three-year overhead deal. Last year, Dalian Wanda bought the AMC theater chain in the United States for $2.6 billion.With a fast-growing audience for online videos in China, the collaboration represents an opportunity for Mr. Zhang and Le Vision Pictures to broaden their audiences.LeTV, which has been referred to as China's Hulu, was one of the first video Web sites in China to buy the copyrights to a large number of films and television shows. At a news conference, Mr. Zhang underscored his need to "keep up with the times and keep up with the pace of the young audience on the Internet."Robert Cain, who runs Chinafilmbiz.com and is an expert on the Chinese film industry, said the partnership was "probably a good move for both parties," adding that "for Le Vision, the online films and distribution are their strength, and they've been a pretty fair theatrical distributor as well."As for the quality of Mr. Zhang's future works, Mr. Cain was more circumspect. "It'll be interesting to see what kind of films he is going to make from here, and whether they are going to be the blockbusters or the original and distinctive films," he said. He added that Le Vision was "not in the business of supporting art" but rather intent on "making money to appeal to their investors."
HONG KONG — While developed economies have worried whether international investors will keep showing up at their bond auctions if their central banks keep printing money, China has had a different worry.So many speculators want to move money into China that its biggest problem has been how to keep them out.In the United States, the European Union and Japan, central banks have struggled with hangovers from past housing bubbles, anemic or no economic growth and even deflation, in the case of Japan. In China, a possible housing bubble is still going strong.The central bank is keeping interest rates low partly to discourage speculators from pushing even more money into China. But low mortgage interest rates — as little as 5.2 percent, in an economy with consumer price inflation running at 2 to 4 percent a year — have set off further surges in home prices.After a sharp slowdown last summer, economic growth rebounded vigorously last winter in China. But an unexpected weakening of growth in recent weeks has created a problem that the People's Bank of China, the central bank, is just starting to acknowledge.Further monetary stimulus — which might seem to be the answer for a slowing economy — could drive housing prices even higher. Rising home prices are a source of tremendous anxiety across China, because very few young people can afford to buy an apartment when even an 800-square-foot unit can cost 35 times a young college graduate's first-year salary.China's banking system has been awash with credit for years, with one result being that financing has been provided for even seemingly uneconomical projects like skyscrapers in third-tier cities or high-speed train lines to economically depressed areas. But the government's response to economic weakness in recent weeks has been to encourage the state-controlled banking system to engage in another round of heavy lending at low rates."It's very disappointing; this splurge in credit creation has taken off again," said George Magnus, a senior economic adviser to UBS. "What you need to put this genie back in the bottle is quite a stern application of oversight and supervision."In its recent quarterly report on monetary policy, the People's Bank of China warned against being "blindly optimistic" that inflation was under control, given continued brisk growth in lending and the money supply. The central bank has allowed lending to race ahead while pursuing an unexpected approach to trying to limit inflation: letting the renminbi appreciate gradually against the dollar, which makes imports less expensive and helps them compete on price with domestic goods.The renminbi has climbed 1.3 percent against the dollar, mostly since the start of April.Chinese central bankers face another puzzle that their Western and Japanese counterparts have not had to worry about: mysterious mass deaths of pigs and their effect on inflation.Video of thousands of dead pigs floating in a river near Shanghai in March temporarily made pork much less appetizing for tens of millions of Chinese. The occurrence of a new form of bird flu in the same area several weeks later turned many people away from chicken.Because meat makes up one of the largest slices of household spending, the abrupt national experiment in something approaching vegetarianism — beef and lamb are much less popular in China — has sharply slowed consumer price inflation, to 2.4 percent in April.That has made it hard for the central bank to argue that inflation is a problem. But no one knows — not veterinarians, not the World Health Organization and certainly not the central bank — how long livestock will continue to be infected, much less how much longer Chinese families will be put off chicken or pork.
BEIJING — China's new president, Xi Jinping, took a hands-on approach on Monday while meeting with President Obama's national security adviser to prepare the agenda for the California summit meeting between the two leaders next week.He dispensed with the big upholstered chairs that have for decades been the signature of the Great Hall of the People and, seated opposite the American adviser, Tom Donilon, at a long, polished wooden table, got immediately to the point.The relationship between the United States and China stands at a "critical juncture," he said, adding that it is time to explore "a new type of great power relationship."Mr. Xi and Mr. Obama will meet over two days at Sunnylands, an estate east of Los Angeles, in what is being billed as a get-to-know-you retreat for the two leaders as they define their countries' relationship.Their wives, Michelle Obama and Peng Liyuan, will also be there, and a person familiar with the planning said the leaders would have plenty of time to talk informally, undistracted by the constant motion and public scrutiny of meetings in Washington.Mr. Donilon wound up his two-day visit to Beijing on Tuesday night after meeting the vice chairman of the powerful Central Military Commission, Gen. Fan Changlong, an indication that the mounting distrust between the American and Chinese militaries will be discussed in California.In a public statement before the closed-door session with General Fan, Mr. Donilon repeated the Obama administration's desire for stronger strategic communications between the two militaries and for joint, rather than competitive, efforts to deal with regional problems in Asia.Mr. Xi's blunt focus on a new relationship with the United States puts that notion at the center of the summit meeting, Chinese and American analysts said, although few were sure what specifically Mr. Xi, who is regarded as a man of big ambitions and a friend of the military, had in mind.Even before assuming the presidency in March, Mr. Xi mentioned the desire for a new relationship, alluding to it on his visit to Washington as vice president in February 2012.Earlier this year, officials from the Foreign Ministry met with professors of international relations in Beijing to discuss how best to define the "great power relationship," but no one knew how to flesh it out, several professors said.Nicholas Lardy, a senior fellow at the Peterson Institute for International Economics in Washington, said both sides were "struggling to conceptualize what a new type of great power relationship might be."It is a given, Chinese and American analysts say, that Mr. Xi and his advisers are referring to the historical problem of what happens when an established power and a rising power confront each other. The analysts said the Chinese were well aware of the example of the Peloponnesian War, which was caused, according to the ancient Greek historian Thucydides, by the fear that a powerful Athens instilled in Sparta.Shi Yinhong, a professor of international relations at Renmin University and an occasional adviser to the Chinese government, offered some ideas of what Mr. Xi has in mind."He wants the American president to recognize that China is dramatically rising in military and economic ways, and he wants the president to know that he is active in world diplomacy," Mr. Shi said. "If the American president recognizes all of these things, then Xi can be nicer, nicer in his definition, in a very tense situation."Mr. Xi has already been more strategic, confident and successful in foreign policy than his immediate predecessors, Hu Jintao and Jiang Zemin, Mr. Shi said."Under Xi, we can have some big gives and big takes," some of which could be unveiled by the Chinese leader in California, Mr. Shi said.Mr. Xi has offered a "big gift" to the United States, Mr. Shi said, by pressuring the new leader of North Korea, Kim Jong-un, to resume talks over his country's growing nuclear weapons program.The Global Times, a newspaper that often defends the Chinese Communist Party, reported Tuesday on the changes in China's policy toward North Korea that it said were in the United States' interest.
HONG KONG — Adroitly alternating the threat of a trade war with the lure of its huge import market, China appears to have driven a deep wedge between Germany and the rest of the European Union . And it may even have caused a rift within the German business world.As Chinese and European trade officials stare each other down over next week's scheduled imposition of big tariffs on the $27 billion worth of solar panels China sells to Europe each year, Germany has come down on China's side.Notably, Berlin is backing Beijing, even though Europe's biggest producer of solar equipment, SolarWorld, is a German company that desperately wants the European Union to impose tariffs on the Chinese equipment. Unless the bloc backs off under German pressure, tariffs averaging nearly 50 percent would go into effect June 6, to punish China for the ostensible "dumping" of solar panels at below cost in Europe."Europe cannot succumb to blackmail — dumping is illegal, and the E.U. is obliged to defend itself by applying the international trade law," said Milan Nitzschke, a spokesman for SolarWorld and the president of ProSun, a lobbying group for the European solar energy industry.But many other German companies, which rely more heavily than other European manufacturers on China as a significant market for their exports — whether Volkswagen cars or Siemens factory equipment or various other goods — fear that the dispute over solar panels could lead to an all-out trade war with China, which would be disastrous for their businesses. So far, the German government appears to agree.And little wonder. Germany is China's most important trading partner in Europe and China is Germany's leading partner in Asia. The Federation of German Industry estimates that one million German jobs are dependent on exports to China. Of those, the German solar industry has about 99,000.For half a century, Germany has been one of the most loyal and enthusiastic supporters of European unity. And since the advent of the European Union two decades ago, Berlin has advocated giving Brussels greater scope in the range of issues it handles. But the solar tariff showdown illustrates the way domestic priorities can sometimes trump pan-European loyalties.Chancellor Angela Merkel of Germany played host last weekend to Prime Minister Li Keqiang of China. More than a dozen trade agreements were signed, including between VW, Siemens, BASF and their Chinese partners, all supporting further expansion for German industry in the Chinese market and further investment by the Chinese in Germany. Special privileges that China offered German companies in its agricultural and recycling industries were clearly aimed at trying to win Berlin's support.After her meeting with Mr. Li, Ms. Merkel told reporters on Sunday that her government would lobby against the solar tariffs, saying the situation was "rather complicated.""Germany will do everything possible to resolve the conflicts that we have in trade," Ms. Merkel said, "through as many discussions as possible to prevent it from falling into a sort of conflict that ends in the raising of tariffs from both sides."Germany's economics minister, Philipp Rösler, said Monday that Germany had told the European Commission in Brussels that it was voting against the imposition of preliminary tariffs on Chinese solar panels. While the commission routinely consults member countries on preliminary tariffs, in the past that has tended to be more of a formality, and opposition has been infrequent.But on Tuesday, a trade official in Europe with direct knowledge of the matter said it appeared that a majority of the governments were officially opposed to preliminary tariffs on Chinese solar imports. And yet, the European commissioner for trade, Karel De Gucht, could still go ahead on June 5 and impose the preliminary duties the next day without any further approvals. That deadline was established at the opening of the commission's investigation in September.Whether Mr. De Gucht proceeds with the preliminary duties remains to be seen. But he "will not be intimidated in any way" and "will not bend to external pressure," Mr. De Gucht's spokesman, John Clancy, said at the commission's daily news conference Tuesday.Preliminary tariffs, which would last six months, in the past have tended to be imposed as a negotiating ploy before the European Commission decides whether to impose so-called final tariffs that last for five years. A voting majority of member nations could overturn the preliminary tariffs, although such a move would be unprecedented.
BEIJING — A group of families demanding justice for the victims of China's 1989 Tiananmen Square crackdown have denounced new Chinese President Xi Jinping for failing to launch political reforms, saying he was taking China "backwards towards Maoist orthodoxy".The Tiananmen Mothers activist group has long urged the Chinese leadership to open a dialogue and provide a reassessment of the June 4, 1989 pro-democracy movement, bloodily suppressed by the government which labelled it a "counter-revolutionary" event.In an open letter released on Friday through New York-based Human Rights in China, the group said Xi "has mixed together the things that were most unpopular and most in need of repudiation" during the time of former paramount leaders Mao Zedong and Deng Xiaoping, the latter who oversaw the putting down of the protests."This has caused those individuals who originally harboured hopes in him in carrying out political reform to fall into sudden disappointment and despair," the group said.Xi became Communist Party chief in November and president in March at a time of growing public pressure to launch long-stalled political reforms.Some intellectuals had predicted that Xi would follow in the footsteps of his father, Xi Zhongxun, a reformist former vice premier and parliament vice chairman. Xi has also tried to project a softer and more open image than his predecessor, Hu Jintao.But Xi's government has clamped down on free expression on the Internet and detained anti-corruption activists, giving no sign the party will ever brook dissent to its rule.The Tiananmen Mothers said it has not seen Xi "reflect upon or show remorse in the slightest for the sins committed during the three decades of Maoist communism"."What we see, precisely, are giant steps backwards towards Maoist orthodoxy," the group said.After initially tolerating the student-led demonstrations in the spring of 1989, the Communist Party sent troops to crush the protests on the night of June 3-4, killing hundreds.The topic remains taboo in China and the leadership has rejected all calls to overturn its verdict.A handful of people remain in prison, 24 years on, according to the Dui Hua Foundation, a U.S. group that works for the release of Chinese political prisoners.While China grapples with thousands of protests a year, over everything from pollution to corruption and illegal land grabs, none of these demonstrations have even come close to becoming a national movement that could threaten the party's rule.
BEIJING — China's Defense Ministry says a navy seaplane has crashed into waters near the eastern port city of Qingdao.A notice posted on the ministry's website said the plane went down in Jiaozhou Bay on Thursday morning while conducting a training mission. It said a search and rescue mission was launched by the navy, but gave no word on casualties.Reports of crashes and other military mishaps had been relatively rare in the past but the traditionally secretive People's Liberation Army has been making greater efforts at transparency as it seeks to transition into a modern military.The North Sea Fleet operates four Shuihong 5 seaplanes dating from the 1980s and used primarily for low-altitude maritime patrol and surveillance missions. Each carries five crew members.
BEIJING — President Barack Obama and Chinese President Xi Jinping face weighty issues when they meet at a private estate in California next week, but their most important task may simply be establishing a strong rapport.Tucked away at a mansion with a private golf course on the edge of the Mojave Desert, Obama and Xi will search for the kind of personal chemistry that has eluded their predecessors for the past several decades. With the bilateral relationship growing ever more critical and complex, how well the leaders click matters even more now.Distrust has grown between the world's sole superpower and the rising Asian giant. Beijing sees Washington as trying to thwart China's ascendancy. The U.S. accuses China of widespread computer hacking and unfair trade. Meanwhile, there's worry their militaries might be drawn into conflict as China tries to elbow aside U.S. allies Japan and the Philippines over disputed, remote islands."There are a lot of problems between China and the U.S. that aren't going to be easy to solve. The hope, therefore, is that a way can be established so that at the times of crisis, dialogue will prevail based on trust and the personal relationship between the two leaders," said Zhu Feng, deputy director of the Center for International and Strategic Studies at Peking University.The June 7-8 get-together at the private Sunnylands estate of late publishing tycoon Walter Annenberg is the first face-to-face meeting between the presidents since Obama's re-election and Xi's promotion to Communist Party chief last November. Under China's dual party-government system, Xi didn't officially assume the title of president until March.The summit comes months before the two leaders had been originally scheduled to meet, highlighting a perception on both sides that the leaders need to refocus on the U.S.-China relationship following their political transitions and amid myriad distractions at home and abroad.The accelerated timing constitutes "a clear message that China wants to emphasize the importance of U.S.-China relations for the future," said Cheng Li, a Chinese politics expert at the Brookings Institution in Washington, D.C.It's not clear yet how big the two delegations will be or whether Xi and Obama will meet one-on-one. Li said that's something Xi's stiff and formal predecessor, Hu Jintao, was unwilling to do.But there are hopeful signs that the two men will gel. Xi already has a warm relationship with Vice President Joe Biden, whom he accompanied to western China on a visit in 2011. Xi also boasts a greater familiarity with the U.S. than any of his predecessors, having visited frequently and maintained his ties to families he stayed with in Muscatine, Iowa, while a visiting provincial official in 1985. He also sent his daughter to Harvard.The two men share a love of sports: swimming and football on Xi's side, basketball and golf on Obama's. Both are married to glamorous, high-profile wives who have played a strong role in shaping their images.Xi's wife, People's Liberation Army songstress Peng Liyuan, was for many years better known to the public than her husband. Chinese media and Internet users closely followed her activities during the couple's first formal state visits to Russia and three African countries earlier this year."It will be interesting to see how the chemistry will develop. It's important, because particularly in China, personal relationships always carry a lot of weight in state-to-state relations," said the Brookings Institution's Li.Xi has already proved himself a different leader by his pragmatism. With relations edgy, he was willing to forgo the pomp of an official White House visit for the lower-key meeting in California.Trust between the countries has dwindled over the decades. After U.S. planes bombed the Chinese Embassy in Yugoslavia in what Washington says was an accident during the Kosovo war in 1999, angry Chinese protesters nearly breached the U.S. Embassy in Beijing. In the discord, Chinese President Jiang Zemin refused a call from the White House. Two years later, when a Chinese fighter jet collided with a U.S. surveillance plane off southern China, Beijing held the American crew and waited for an acceptable apology from the U.S.In 2009, the U.S. Navy accused Chinese sailors of harassing one of its ocean floor mapping vessels in a game of high-seas chicken.The trust gap was further underscored by newly publicized claims Tuesday that China employed cyberattacks to access data from nearly 40 Pentagon weapons programs and almost 30 other defense technologies ranging from missile defense systems to the F-35 joint strike fighter.The disclosure was included in a Defense Science Board report released earlier this year, meaning U.S. officials knew of it before planning for the summit began. The disclosure's public release allows U.S. officials to highlight an issue of concern without necessarily overshadowing the summit.China's Defense Ministry on Thursday called the accusations faulty and said they underestimated both the Pentagon's ability to protect its secrets, and the capabilities of China's domestic defense industry."China is entirely capable of producing the weaponry needed for national defense," spokesman Geng Yansheng told reporters at a monthly briefing, pointing to recent domestic technological breakthroughs such as the country's first aircraft carrier, new generation fighter jets, large transport planes and the Beidou satellite system.China has consistently denied claims its military is engaged in hacking, including those in a report by U.S. cybersecurity firm Mandiant that traced the hacking back to a People's Liberation Army unit based in Shanghai.Other likely agenda items include the North Korean and Iranian nuclear programs, conflict in Syria, climate change and expanding bilateral military ties. China will likely press its claims of business discrimination in the U.S. market, along with its deep discomfort over Washington's shifting of military assets to Asia and renewed emphasis on its regional alliances, moves seen by China as part of an effort to contain its rise.The perception of U.S. decline and Chinese ascendancy forms much of the subtext to the current relationship, with Beijing seeking greater international influence commensurate with its status as the world's second-largest economy. Many in China see the U.S. as a waning power weakened by the economic crisis, partisan feuding and the conflicts in Iraq and Afghanistan.In their latest contribution to diplomatic argot, Chinese leaders now say they are seeking a "new model of major country relations" in their dealings with Washington. Assistant Foreign Minister Zheng Zeguang defined that Wednesday as "different from the old model featuring confrontation and conflict.""We believe a new model of major country relations between China and the United States should be based on mutual trust, equality, inclusiveness, mutual learning and win-win cooperation," Zheng said at a Wednesday briefing.Xi and Obama first met early last year when Xi, then China's vice president, visited the White House on a trip to meet key American political players and introduce himself to the American public. The visit afforded Xi a chance to show his human side, reconnecting with his old Iowa friends, chatting with students at a school in Los Angeles and even catching part of a Lakers basketball game.Known primarily for his pedigree as the son of a communist elder, Xi is seen by many observers as a strong nationalist willing to press territorial claims and what Beijing broadly proclaims as the "great rejuvenation of the Chinese nation."Unlike former President Hu, who often seemed uncomfortable outside official settings and stuck closely to his official talking points, Xi appears at ease around foreign visitors and is known for speaking without notes and allowing sessions to run well over their scheduled time limits."On a personal level, he's confident, he's on top of his brief and you get a very distinct sense that he has a roadmap in his head in terms of where China needs to go. He's not only a very adroit political operator, but he's also a realist," said former U.S. Ambassador to China Jon Huntsman.
HONG KONG — Legendary Entertainment, the Hollywood studio behind "The Hangover" franchise, is teaming with state-owned China Film Group to make more global blockbusters as it advances a delayed expansion in the rapidly growing Chinese movie market.Their deal is the latest example of growing collaboration between entertainment companies in the world's two biggest movie markets.Legendary, which also made "Inception" and "The Dark Knight," said its Chinese venture, Legendary East, signed an agreement with the Chinese company's unit, China Film Co., on Thursday in Beijing. The deal calls for the companies to fund development and production of multiple films over three years.Their first collaborations will be announced in the coming months. Legendary said each is planned as a US-China co-production. That means they can get around China's import restrictions that limit the number of foreign movies shown on the country's 12,000 screens to 34 each year.The companies said they plan to produce movies for global audiences that will be "tentpole-scale" — in other words, the big-budget, highly promoted productions that earn enough box-office revenue to support the whole studio, in the same way that a tentpole holds up a tent.In a statement, China Film Co. Chairman Han Sanping said the partnership will allow the companies to "make films that are more appealing to filmgoers, creating new genres that, through the magic of film, bring greater variety to audiences around the world."Faced with stagnant box-office growth at home, Hollywood studios are keen to break into China, now the world's second-biggest film market. Box-office receipts in China totaled $2.7 billion last year and pushed the country's movie market past previous second-biggest, Japan, according to the Motion Picture Association of America.Legendary East was set up in 2011 with the aim of making one or two "major, event-style films" starting in 2013. But the company had remained quiet since then and a plan to raise $220.5 through a deal with a Hong Kong construction company was scuppered by rocky financial markets.
HONG KONG — The Japanese stock market fell again on Thursday, extending a sell-off that began a week earlier as a feverish six-month rally came to an abrupt end.A 5.2 percent slide sent the Nikkei 225-share index to 13,589.03, its lowest level since late April. It took the total decline since the market peaked at nearly 16,000 last week to more than 13 percent, making the decline a correction, which is characterized by a fall of at least 10 percent.European and Wall Street shares, however, were higher in Thursday trading.Japanese officials were at pains on Thursday to play down the latest drop, saying it represented a natural development after the huge rally set off by optimism over Prime Minister Shinzo Abe's efforts to haul the economy out of years of listless growth."Over the past month, we have seen an extraordinarily fast rise in share prices," Yoshihide Suga, the chief cabinet secretary, said at a news conference. "In that regard, it would be unnatural if adjustments did not occur." He added, "It is normal for share prices to undergo corrections even as they rise."The Nikkei soared more than 80 percent between mid-November and mid-May but staged a sudden about-face last week, when it slumped 7.3 percent. Trading has been volatile ever since, as investors have taken stock of the challenges that face Mr. Abe's program, known as Abenomics, and weighed taking profits after the previous rally.Signs that the Federal Reserve might begin to scale back its stimulus efforts have also buffeted investor sentiment, as have higher bond yields in Japan and the recent end of a slide in the yen, which had provided an advantage to Japanese exporters.The nervousness in Japan rubbed off on markets elsewhere in Asia on Thursday, though the declines were not as pronounced. The main indexes in Singapore and Taiwan dropped just over 1 percent. In Australia, the S.& P./ASX 200 fell 0.9 percent, and in Hong Kong, the Hang Seng Index slipped 0.3 percent. Stocks in Europe were slightly higher in afternoon trading, and Wall Street opened with little change.Whatever the reasons for the recent slide in Japan, the speed and extent of it has started to stir apprehension over Mr. Abe's bold economic policies. With markets sputtering and a nervousness over a spike in long-term interest rates, skeptics of Mr. Abe's monetary and fiscal push are gaining more attention."The falling share prices point to the dangers that are inherent in Abenomics," Ryutaro Kono, chief economist for Japan at BNP Paribas and an outspoken critic of Mr. Abe's economic policies, said in a note.The program "at first triggered an asset bubble and brought about an economic euphoria," Mr. Kono said. "But the endgame is a higher risk of financial ruin, as current policies are pushed to the limit by a surge in long-term interest rates."A batch of data to be released on Friday is likely to be closely watched for evidence of how far Mr. Abe's policies have succeeded in reinvigorating economic activity and combating the deflationary pressures that have weighed on Japan for years.The data, for the month of April, is expected to show that industrial output has improved and that deflation has abated somewhat. Analysts surveyed by Reuters estimate that core consumer prices have fallen 0.4 percent from a year earlier, an improvement on the 0.5 percent decline recorded in March."We think data will show that the Japanese economy has maintained a modest recovery trend" in the second quarter of this year, analysts at DBS Bank said in a research note.However, the probability that prices continued to fall in April also highlights how tough it has been to combat deflation, and underlines the concerns of some analysts that the central bank's aim of reaching 2 percent inflation in about two years will be difficult.Analysts and investors are also eager for progress on promised structural overhauls, which many see as crucial to the overall economy-lifting efforts of Mr. Abe's government.The challenges are whether the government's long-term plan will be "able to bolster investor confidence about Japan's growth prospects and address their concerns about Japan's fiscal health," the DBS analysts wrote.
BEIJING — China accused the United States of "political prejudice" and "ignoring facts" for calling on it to fully account for those killed, detained or missing in the 1989 bloody military crackdown on protesters in Tiananmen Square.State Department spokeswoman Jen Psaki said Friday that the U.S. was remembering the "tragic loss of innocent lives" ahead of the 24th anniversary on June 4 of the violent crushing of student-led pro-democracy protests.In response, Foreign Ministry spokesman Hong Lei said that China urges the U.S. "to discard political prejudice and correctly treat China's development," according to the Xinhua News Agency's English service late Saturday."A clear conclusion has already been made concerning the political turmoil that happened in the late 1980s," Xinhua said, citing Hong. The U.S. releases "similar statements year after year, ignoring facts and making groundless accusations against the Chinese government," which is a "rude interference in China's internal affairs," it said.The Chinese government has never fully disclosed what happened when the military crushed the protests, which it branded a "counterrevolutionary riot." Hundreds, possibly more, were killed.The topic remains taboo in China, and Hong's statement was not available on Xinhua's Chinese service or the Foreign Ministry's website."We renew our call for China to protect the universal human rights of all its citizens; release those who have been wrongfully detained, prosecuted, incarcerated, forcibly disappeared, or placed under house arrest; and end the ongoing harassment of human rights activists and their families," Psaki said in her statement.
BEIJING — A swift-moving fire trapped panicked workers inside a poultry slaughterhouse in northeastern China that had only a single open exit, killing at least 119 people in one of the country's worst industrial disasters in years.Survivors described workers, mostly women, struggling through smoke and flames to reach doors that turned out to be locked or blocked.One worker, 39-year-old Guo Yan, said the emergency exit at her workstation could not be opened and she was knocked to the ground in the crush of workers searching for a way to escape the fire Monday."I could only crawl desperately forward," Guo was quoted as saying by the official Xinhua News Agency. "I worked alongside an old lady and a young girl, but I don't know if they survived or not."The accident highlights the high human costs of China's lax industrial safety standards, which continue to endanger workers despite recent improvements in the country's work safety record. It also comes amid growing international concern over factory safety across Asia following the collapse in April of a garment factory building in Bangladesh where more than 1,100 people died.Besides the dead, dozens were injured in the blaze in Jilin province's Mishazi township, which appeared to have been sparked by three early morning explosions, Xinhua said. The provincial fire department attributed the blasts to an ammonia leak. The chemical is kept pressurized as part of the cooling system in meat processing plants.It was one of China's worst recent industrial disasters, with the death toll the highest since a September 2008 mining cave-in that claimed 281 lives.State broadcaster CCTV quoted workers as saying the fire broke out during a shift change when about 350 workers were at the plant, owned by Jilin Baoyuanfeng Poultry Co.Some employees raised the alarm shortly after the shift began at 6 a.m., and then the lights went out, causing panic as workers scrambled to find an exit, 44-year-old Wang Fengya told Xinhua."When I finally ran out and looked back at the plant, I saw high flames," she said.The fire broke out in a factory building where chickens were being dismembered, and spread rapidly, with industrial boilers exploding, the Southern Metropolis Daily reported on its microblog. Only a side door to the building was open with the rest of the exits locked, the newspaper said.It quoted an unidentified worker as saying the fire engulfed the building in three minutes, leaving too little time for many to flee.The disaster killed 119 people and injured a further 70, Xinhua said Tuesday. Most of the injured were being treated for inhalation of toxic gases, such as ammonia, while others had burns. It wasn't immediately clear if the workers were local residents or migrants from other areas.A provincial government media official, who refused to give his name, said he expected the death toll to rise as more bodies were recovered from the charred building.The fire was extinguished by some 500 firefighters and bodies were being recovered from the charred buildings. CCTV footage showed dark smoke billowing from the prefabricated cement structures topped with corrugated iron roofs.Chinese President Xi Jinping and other top leaders ordered that no effort be spared to rescue and treat survivors, as well as to investigate the cause of the disaster.It was the third major industrial blaze to be reported in China in the past four days. The two earlier fires were an oil tank explosion in Liaoning province that caused another oil tank to catch fire, killing two, and a blaze in a large granary in Heilongjiang province that wiped out 1,000 tons of grain.Many of China's factories were built in recent decades to drive the country's rapid economic growth, and accidents and chemical spills are common, often blamed on lax enforcement of safety rules and poor worker training.The government has tightened checks on factories and mines to improve compliance with safety requirements, and deaths from workplace accidents fell nearly 5 percent last year from the previous year, according to Yang Dongliang, head of the State Administration of Work Safety.Even in China's notoriously deadly coal mines, the death toll fell by more than 30 percent last year because of stricter management.Jason Yan, technical director in Beijing of the U.S. Grains Council, said safety considerations usually take a back seat in China to features designed to maximize production and energy efficiency."I'm sure they consider some aspects of safety design. However, I think safety ... is not the first priority in their design plan," Yan said.The poultry plant is one of several in the area where chickens are slaughtered and then quickly cut up into pieces and shipped to market. The process takes place in near-freezing conditions and plants are usually built with large amounts of flammable foam insulation to keep temperatures constant.Established in 2009, Jilin Baoyuanfeng produces 67,000 tons of processed chicken per year and employs about 1,200 people. It serves markets in 20 cities nationwide and has won numerous awards for its contribution to the local economy, according to online postings. The plant is located outside the city of Dehui, about 500 miles (800 kilometers) northeast of China's capital, Beijing.The area is an agribusiness center, especially for poultry. Nearby is one of the biggest producers of broiler chickens in China, Jilin Deda Co., which is partly owned by Thailand-based conglomerate Charoen Pokphand Group.Monday's fire hit a company that is much smaller than Jilin Deda. Though it's unlikely to have an impact on China's chicken supply, the accident came as chicken producers were seeing sales recover after an outbreak of a deadly new strain of bird flu, H7N9, briefly scared the public in April and early May.Associated Press writer Gillian Wong contributed to this report.
TAIPEI — A magnitude 6.5 earthquake struck the island of Taiwan on Sunday and caused some damage, Taiwan media reported.The quake struck 24 miles southeast of the city of T'ai-chung at a depth of nine miles, the U.S. Geological Survey said. The agency initially said it was 6.6 magnitude but later downgraded it slightly.Taiwan television said the quake triggered a gas explosion in the centre of the island but it gave no details. There were no reports of any casualties.The quake also rattled the island's capital of Taipei."The house was shaking but nothing fell," said one resident of the city.An earthquake of such a magnitude can cause severe damage.The island sits near the so-called ring of fire region of seismic activity around the Pacific Ocean.
HONG KONG — Hong Kong leader Leung Chun-ying is facing fresh uncertainty over the political support he has from China after his campaign manager and close ally quit the cabinet last month because of a police investigation into his commodities trading business.It was the latest in a series of scandals to hit Leung since he took office last July in a move orchestrated by Beijing. In other embarrassments, his development minister has been arrested, there have been mass public protests against the government and opponents have attempted to impeach him.Local media said the police investigation of Barry Cheung, the latest scandal, could be the last straw. But the senior mainland Chinese official in charge of Hong Kong affairs made the unusual move last week of denying reports that Beijing was preparing to replace Leung."It is certainly damaging to his (Leung's) political credibility," said Joseph Wong, a former head of Hong Kong's civil service, of the scandal. "The isolation is there ... and people will question whether he really has the ability and confidence of the people to lead."How Beijing reacts to the scandal will reflect how far Beijing will go in maintaining the "one country, two systems" formula that underpins Hong Kong's ties with a Communist Party-ruled mainland.Some analysts say with Leung weakened, and Hong Kong preparing for an annual round of anti-China protests to mark the 1989 Tiananmen Square crackdown, Beijing could move to stamp more authority in the financial hub, which is part of China but has limited autonomy until 2047.Cheung, Leung's close ally and friend, resigned from the cabinet and other official posts 10 days ago. He is now helping police with their inquiries into the failure of the Hong Kong Mercantile Exchange (HKMEx) that he founded and chaired until it closed last month.Despite prominent shareholders that included the En+ Group of Russian billionaire Oleg Deripaska and the Hong Kong arm of China's biggest lender, the Industrial and Commercial Bank of China (ICBC), HKMEx's volume of gold and silver future trades had been thin.The city's market regulator, the Securities and Futures Commission, last month warned of "serious irregularities" in the exchange's operations - sparking police investigations that have led to the arrests of six people.Three of them, all men, have been charged with possessing false bank documents, including a cheque worth $460 million. Cheung, who was not among those arrested, denied any illegality and pledged full co-operation with authorities.Cheung however resigned from Leung's core policy-making body, the Executive Council, and as chief of Hong Kong's powerful Urban Renewal Authority, which can take over private buildings to guide urban regeneration. He also stepped down from the boards of Deripaska's locally-listed Russian aluminum miner United Company RUSAL Co., and the insurer, AIA Group Ltd.Known locally as a consummate networker and the "king of public office", Cheung had also headed a civilian committee that reviewed the pay and conditions of Hong Kong's police and other services. At one point he also headed an advisory panel on corruption prevention.Mounting opposition to China in Hong Kong is also a headache for Leung.Tens of thousands of people are expected on the streets this week to mark the Tiananmen Square crackdown and, later, the 16th anniversary of Hong Kong's handover from British rule on July 1.The protests loom just as a wider campaign of choreographed civil disobedience gathers steam. The Occupy Central movement is demanding firm government proposals toward the planned universal suffrage target of 2017, and its threat to shut down Hong Kong's financial district with a mass rally on July 1 next year is already causing disquiet in Beijing.One Chinese official has warned that Hong Kong must not attempt to undermine mainland politics while the Communist Party mouthpiece Global Times newspaper wrote that Hong Kong could not survive by confronting the mainland."China has adequate power to stop Hong Kong (from) ... becoming an adversary," it said in an editorial in March.Zhang Baohui, a mainland academic based in Hong Kong, said he did not believe the Cheung saga would be enough to deliver a "fatal blow" to Leung, but warned the Occupy campaign would be viewed far more seriously in Beijing.It could also lead to Beijing taking a more hands-on role over the top of Leung, he said.Local pro-Beijing political heavyweight Rita Fan said it was unlikely Beijing was considering replacing Leung."It is rather early in the day to consider the possibility of changing the chief executive," she told reporters, without elaborating.Even if Occupy is the ultimate challenge, the Cheung issue threatens to rumble on. Leung and his government are facing calls from opposition legislators to reveal when they first knew about the exchange's troubles.A long-time confidant of Leung, Cheung acted as his campaign chairman in the Hong Kong leadership race last year. It was a bruising election that saw Cheung reach out to various business factions to ensure the victory.In a commentary in the South China Morning Post newspaper written the day after Leung was sworn into office by then-Chinese President Hu Jintao last July, Cheung acknowledged a "serious sense of discontent" in Hong Kong."What we desperately need is a political ceasefire," Cheung wrote in the piece headlined "Let the government govern" that is still publicized on the website of the Urban Renewal Authority."I would like to urge members of our opposition to please give the new government the chance it deserves to respond to the mandate of the people by doing the right things."
This week we offer our annual Summer Reading issue, which got me thinking about the etymology of "beach read." I searched The Times's archive for its first appearance. The recentness — May 2, 1993 — was a surprise. In her review of "Fearless," Susan Isaacs wrote, "Rafael Yglesias's novel deserves better praise than 'Great page turner!' or 'Super beach read!' "Tao Lin, who has a cult following and writes novels with Urban Outfitters-ready titles like "Eeeee Eee Eeee" and "Shoplifting From American Apparel," publishes his new novel, "Taipei," on Tuesday. In 2010, Lin wrote a profile of himself for The Stranger, which parodied Time's "Great American Novelist" cover of Jonathan Franzen. Lin described himself as "unnaturally socially anxious, with permanently self-cut hair." His self-analysis may be coolly deadpan, but Lin inspires more heated feelings in others. Many younger readers see themselves in his distracted, drug-addled, affectless prose. The other side is represented by an online commenter on Lin's Stranger profile: "All I am able to see is an empty void. And not in a good way.""Taipei" is more autobiographical than Lin's earlier work, following a writer through Brooklyn's literary scene. Lin turns 30 in July, old for a so-called voice of a generation. He has spoken about how the $50,000 advance for "Taipei" — far larger than his previous sums — provided more freedom to write.In a recent interview in Vice, Lin was asked what he read while writing his latest novel. He answered, in part: "I remember reading Elizabeth Wurtzel's memoir, 'More, Now, Again,' about her trying to write a book while using a lot of Ritalin and feeling interested because it was like what I was doing. Except she was writing a nonfiction book and rich enough to move to Florida to focus on her book. I was writing an autobiographical novel and borrowing from strangers on Twitter."Tuesday also marks the publication of Lauren Weisberger's "Revenge Wears Prada," the sequel to 2003's "The Devil Wears Prada," about her time working at Vogue with the legendary editor Anna Wintour. The sequel has Andrea Sachs back and running a bridal magazine. Reviewing Weisberger's first novel, Kate Betts found it hard to value the novel "for anything more than the cheap frisson of the context."
TAIPEI, Taiwan — Taiwan's National Fire Agency on Monday raised the death toll in Taiwan's 6.3 magnitude earthquake from two to four.The quake struck Sunday afternoon in the central Taiwanese county of Nantou, which is mountainous and sparsely populated. The tremor was felt all over the island, but most severely in the central and southern regions.The NFA said the third victim died after he was hit by a falling rock in Nantou, and the fourth was buried under a landslide in the same location.The NFA said 19 people sustained serious injuries in the quake.Previously acknowledged fatalities were registered in Alishan, in southern Taiwan, where a man was killed by a rockslide while driving a car on a mountain road, and in Chushan, near the quake's epicenter, where a man working at a farm was killed by a falling rock.
BEIJING — Suddenly all kinds of people in China are offering to sleep with the headmaster.The unusual outpouring is in response to a recent spate of sex abuse cases, including that of a school principal who spent the night in a hotel room with four underage girls. Artists, activists, university students and police officers are photographing themselves — some nude and provocatively posed, some angry and menacing — with the message:"Principal, get a room with me. Leave the young students alone."The online campaign — mixing performance art, satire and outrage — has tapped into public anger over sexual abuse against children. It's a problem in China partly because of a lack of sex education and partly because Chinese society has become unmoored from traditional strictures after decades of rapid economic change and social change.Attitudes toward sex have become more lax, especially noticeable among powerful officials, often found to be cavorting with very young mistresses and prostitutes. Children are prone to the abuse because they have not been adequately prepared, and can be easily intimidated by teachers and other authority figures."Schools and parents have failed to instill in our children the sense of rights and to teach them how to protect themselves," Xiong Bingqi, a deputy director of the Beijing-based education think tank 21st Century Education Research Institute. "If the children know about their rights, know they can call police if they are sexually assaulted and have the assaulters punished, it will sure deter the criminals."Recent sex abuse cases against children that have become public should be a wake-up call for Chinese families and schools, Xiong said, noting they may only be a tip of the iceberg."The students may not know they have been sexually abused," Xiong said. "Or if they know, they don't tell their parents. Sometimes, schools settle those cases without telling the police."In a recent survey by Beijing News, 37.4 percent of the respondents said they do not know how to teach their children to protect themselves from sexual abuse.The national debate on the problem began in early May, when a primary school principal was caught spending a night with four schoolgirls — all under the age of 14 — in a hotel room in southern China's Hainan province. Chen Zaipeng, the principal, has been fired and charged with rape.Members of the public reacted with astonishment to the high-profile case, and have been reading with fury as at least seven more cases of sexual abuse by school teachers or employees against young girls have come to light over the past three weeks from different parts of China. Some victims were as young as 8.In the past several years, there have been occasional reports of government officials hiring young girls as prostitutes. The cases are typically handled as prostitution, even when the girls are underage. Critics have demanded such culprits be prosecuted with the crime of raping children, which can carry harsher punishments.China's Supreme People's Court this week vowed to crack down on crimes against children. The Education Ministry has demanded that sex criminals must be "firmly" cleaned out from the teaching staff and that those who help with cover-ups must be prosecuted. And the All-China Women's Federation has called for severe punishment in all crimes against girls.The public, however, has found an unconventional way of speaking up.Late last month, Ye Haiyan, a feminist and advocate for the rights of sex workers, went to Chen's former elementary school to lend support to his alleged victims. There, she held up a large piece of paper offering to "get a room" with Chen and telling him to leave the students alone, and gave a contact number, which was for China's rights hotline for women and children.Her offer prompted many others to follow suit. One is Beijing-based poet Wang Zang, who last Wednesday uploaded naked photos of himself with his back scribbled with the offer. In one photo, Wang holds a children's toy in one hand and a liquor bottle in the other."I am protesting the frequent criminal acts of school sex abuse against young students," Wang said. "And I also want to raise the public awareness in protecting the girls."Wang said he believes the recent cases are only a small part of the problem because many cases have been covered up by powerful people. Corruption in the education system has put unfit teachers in classrooms, and China's laws have failed to adequately prosecute sexual crimes against children, Wang said.Sociologist Li Yinhe sees the offers as a public statement. "I think it's a way for people to express their anger," she said. "It is also a kind of black humor."An editorial in Beijing News said the ridicule has a serious message: "In each and every 'get a room with me' call, you should hear the public anxiety of saving our children."
BEIJING — The government of the southwestern Chinese city of Kunming will publish an environmental impact assessment for a refinery which has been subject to mass protests, state media said on Monday, as it hopes to head off further unrest ahead of a trade fair.An increasingly affluent urban population has begun to object to China's policy of growth at all costs, which has fuelled the economy for three decades, with the environment emerging as a focus of concern and protests.There have already been two large protests in Kunming against the production of paraxylene (PX), a chemical used in making fabrics and plastic bottles, at the planned plant.Organizers have taken to the internet to call for the next protest on June 6, the same date for the first China-South Asia Expo, which senior Chinese leaders are expected to attend.Kunming mayor Li Wenrong said the government will listen to comments and communicate with residents about their concerns over the project and repeated a pledge to cancel it if people do not want it, the official People's Daily said."We will soon, in accordance with procedure, release the environmental impact assessment report to the public," the paper quoted Li as saying. "There is nothing which needs to be covered up."The government last week issued an order banning any protests during the period of the trade fair, due to run from June 6-10.Li urged people not to take to the streets."While a small number of people have (strong) opinions about the PX project and different points of view, everyone must ... maintain the harmonious and stable environment and nothing should happen to interfere with this," he said.Last November, the eastern city of Ningbo suspended a petrochemical project after days of street protests. Big protests also forced the suspension of a PX plant in the northeastern city of Dalian the year before.More recently, heavy pollution that has blanketed cities including the capital Beijing and scandals over food have added to the sense of unease.China National Petroleum Corp, the country's largest oil and gas producer and supplier, announced in February that the National Development and Reform Commission (NDRC) had approved the refinery project at Anning, just outside Kunming.The refinery would produce gasoline, diesel, and other chemicals and fertilizers as well as PX, the company said in its submission to the NDRC.It is being built to handle oil coming in from a strategically important pipeline being built across Myanmar that is due to open this year. State media however have quoted company officials as saying the refinery would not produce PX.
BEIJING — When he was 14, Li Yangyang's prospects were grim. A middle school graduate who moved to Beijing with his parents from the countryside in 2009, he worked long hours in a restaurant for less than 700 renminbi a month.Then a fellow rural migrant, who had also moved to Beijing, introduced him to BN Vocational School, China's first tuition-free, nonprofit vocational secondary school.Now 17, Mr. Li is studying hotel management and hoping to enter an industry in which the starting salary is more than triple his old wage of about $100 a month. "I feel lucky to be at B.N.V.S.," he said, as he prepared to apply for internships at the capital's luxury hotels. "My future is much brighter, and I have more opportunities because of it."For those like Mr. Li, the children of China's 200 million migrant laborers, vocational schools offer the promise of better-paying, more stable work than their parents had.Courses cover a wide range of subjects, often depending on the needs of the region. In Liaoning Province, an industrial area in the north, automobile repair and construction are popular. In cities, students opt for tourism and customer service; the niche skill of air-conditioning installation and upkeep is in particular demand.While China has long had state-run vocational schools, critics say that they are bogged down by bureaucracy and overwhelmed by the huge number of youths who need training.Private enterprises like BN Vocational School can fill that gap, but only with the outside funding needed to be able to train poor students for free. Founded in 2005, it is supported by charities (the China Youth Development Foundation and Ford Foundation), corporations (Citigroup, Wal-Mart, Caterpillar and Bank of America) and both the Chinese and foreign governments. It also runs schools in seven other Chinese cities.While newly minted university graduates face a tight job market, skilled vocational school graduates are in high demand, with employment rates above 95 percent between 2007 and 2011, according to a 2013 report by the Chinese Society of Vocational and Technical Education.China's labor force is huge, with more than 75 percent of the country's population between the ages of 20 and 49, but the average worker's education level is relatively low. According to the Ministry of Human Resources and Social Security, only half of China's 140 million urban employees can be classified as "skilled."About one-third of domestically produced products cannot pass quality-control tests because workers are not qualified enough to operate the machinery, resulting in a loss of 200 billion renminbi a year, according to a 2012 report by Yan Hao, a recently retired senior research fellow at the National Development and Reform Commission.Most of the Chinese population is at the prime of their working lives; but this so-called "demographic dividend" is set to end, according to economists. China's labor force is predicted to peak at 751 million in 2015 — and age and decline from there. There will not be as many young workers to replace those retiring out of the market."The government will need to get greater productivity gains out of a smaller work force to continue to grow the economy," according to Xiaoyan Liang, a senior education specialist at the World Bank. As China transitions to a more skill-based economy, investing in technical and vocational education training can help bridge this gap.One of the biggest challenges to vocational education is the traditional Chinese bias in favor of a university degree, Dr. Yan said."Parents would prefer to send their children to university because there is higher social status associated with attending college," Dr. Yan said. "But because so many college graduates end up at a job that is no different in wage level from the vocational school grads, this attitude is gradually changing.""There is a lot of pressure on the government to help new graduates find jobs, and so they are trying to persuade young people, particularly those who failed the college entry examination or cannot afford college tuition fees, to attend vocational school and graduate with a guaranteed job," Dr. Yan added.According to Dr. Yan, the government began overhauling curriculums to provide targeted employment-oriented training to meet local market demands. But the reality is that many state-run vocational schools do not work closely enough with local industry, generating mismatches in the labor market.
BEIJING — Chen Xitong, who as Beijing's mayor backed the military crackdown on the Tiananmen Square democratic movement but later expressed regret for the loss of life, died days before its 24th anniversary, according to media reports and a family friend.At the height of his career, Chen was one of China's most powerful men, but a corruption scandal brought about his spectacular downfall.The Hong Kong China News Agency, an offshoot of the official China News Service, said Chen died Sunday in Beijing. Chengdu-based writer He Sanwei also said he had been informed of Chen's death by the former mayor's relatives, with whom he has been friends for years. He said Chen died of cancer. He was 82.Initial reports of Chen's death began to circulate on Tuesday's anniversary of the Tiananmen crackdown, but there was no confirmation by mainland state media. Chen's death so close to the politically sensitive date posed additional difficulties for the government, which makes intense efforts to erase mention of the 1989 events.Chen was long portrayed as having supported the military assault that crushed the weekslong student-led protests, killing hundreds, possibly thousands, of people. But he apparently had a change of heart late in his life, and was quoted in a book published last year as saying that the crackdown was avoidable and he regretted the loss of life.A native of Sichuan province, Chen studied Chinese at prestigious Peking University and joined the Communist Party in 1949, months after the People's Republic of China was founded.He rose through the ranks in Beijing and in 1983 was appointed mayor, a position he held until 1993, shortly after he was promoted to Beijing Communist Party boss and given a seat on the party's elite Politburo, the apex of Chinese political power. Then a massive graft scandal that may have cost the city more than $2 billion resulted in his downfall in 1995.Chen was deposed and given a 16-year prison term, effectively silencing him. In sentencing him in 1998, a Beijing court ruled that Chen pursued a "corrupt and decadent life" that featured lavish partying at two villas built with public funds.By 2006, Chen had reportedly been released on medical parole for cancer treatment. He looked set to fade into the annals of Chinese political history but for the publication of the book in Hong Kong last year based on comments he made in interviews with a retired scholar, Yao Jianfu.Yao said Chen denied being directly responsible for the Tiananmen crackdown and thought it should never have happened. He urged a reinvestigation of the crackdown to determine how many people were killed and other facts.
HONG KONG/BEIJING — Tens of thousands of people held a candlelit vigil in a rain-soaked Hong Kong park on Tuesday to urge China to respect human rights on the 24th anniversary of the bloody crackdown on pro-democracy protesters in Beijing's Tiananmen Square.In China, most mention of the anniversary was censored from the Internet. Security was tight in Beijing, where on June 3 and June 4 1989, China's leaders ordered troops to open fire on demonstrators and sent in tanks to crush a student-led campaign movement, killing hundreds.In Hong Kong, members of the crowd wore black and held candles under umbrellas. Protesters demanded Beijing overturn its denunciation of the pro-democracy movement as a "counter-revolutionary event"."Vindicate June 4th!" many shouted. "Never give up!"Hong Kong, a former British colony that returned to Chinese rule in 1997, is the only place on Chinese soil where large, open commemorations of the Tiananmen massacre take place. The vigil is held up as a symbol of Hong Kong's relative freedoms and civil liberties compared with mainland China."I feel very sad. It's been 24 years and nothing has changed. The changes that the students of 1989 demanded have not come yet. Instead, things are getting worse and worse. You can see the officials are still very corrupt," said Doris Poon, a clerk in her late 40s.Organizers estimated 150,000 people showed up to send a "united message" to China's new president, Xi Jinping, whose government has clamped down on Internet freedoms and detained anti-corruption activists. Police put the figure at 54,000 at the peak of the assembly.Xi became Communist Party chief in November and president in March at a time of mounting public pressure for long-stalled political reforms, though there has been no sign of that so far.While China grapples with thousands of protests a year, over everything from pollution to corruption and illegal land grabs, none of these demonstrations has even come close to becoming a national movement that could threaten the party's rule."Everybody can see that China today continues to tighten and this suppression of human rights will cause more Hong Kong people to come out," said pro-democracy lawmaker Lee Cheuk-yan.In Beijing, Tiananmen Square was packed with tourists on a cool, smoggy day. Plain clothes security and police were out in force, checking identity cards of Chinese tourists."It's June 4, a day the Communist Party and the Chinese government don't like," said a young woman from the southern city of Shenzhen, who declined to give her name."Older people who remember told us about it. We know June 4. It's called the day students shed blood."The government last week began detaining some dissidents and cutting off telephone and Internet access for others."If the government is sensible, next year is the 25th anniversary and they could designate a spot where we could march," said Zhang Xianling, 76.Zhang is one of a group of "Tiananmen Mothers" who seek justice for children killed in the crackdown and were closely watched by police as they paid respects to victims in Beijing's Wan'an cemetery.Last week, the group denounced Xi for failing to launch political reforms and accused him of taking china "backwards to Maoist orthodoxy"."If you want to commemorate it, you should be able to commemorate it," Zhang said. "That would be an enlightened government."Authorities boosted censorship of social media sites, blocking searches not only for terms like "Tiananmen" but even the words "today" and "tonight", and removing the candle symbol from the list of emoticons on the Twitter-like service Sina Weibo.A satirical, doctored image of the famous photograph depicting a man confronting a tank - replacing the line of tanks with giant yellow rubber ducks - was circulated online before it was blocked by censors.Some skirted the restrictions through cryptic allusions."The events of that day in that year I will never forget. I will always keep a candle lit in remembrance in my heart," wrote one Weibo user.
(Reuters) - China's new president, Xi Jinping, is scheduled to meet with U.S. President Barack Obama this week at a private estate in Rancho Mirage, California.Here are some key facts about the Chinese leader.Position: President of the People's Republic of China- As leader of the most populous country on earth, Xi took up his post as president in 2013 in the second planned, orderly transition since the Communist revolution in 1949. As the chosen heir to his predecessor Hu Jintao, Xi assumed the title of Communist Party chief - where real power lies - in November 2012.- In contrast to the stiff and formal Hu, Xi has crafted a more relaxed, sometimes bluff political style. He has complained of officials' speeches and writings being clogged with party jargon and demanded more plain speaking.- Xi is the son of reformist former vice premier and parliament vice-chairman Xi Zhongxun, making him a "princeling" - one of the privileged sons and daughters of China's incumbent, retired or late leaders. He grew up among the party elite and then watched his father purged from power before the 1966-76 Cultural Revolution, when Xi himself spent years in the poverty-stricken countryside before going to university. He studied chemical engineering at Tsinghua University in Beijing, an elite school where Hu also studied. Xi later gained a degree in Marxist theory from Tsinghua and a doctorate in law.- Xi shot to fame in the early 1980s as party boss of a rural county in Hebei province, which surrounds Beijing. He had rare access to then national party chief Hu Yaobang in the leadership compound, Zhongnanhai, west of the Forbidden City. A native of the remote, inland province of Shaanxi, home of the terracotta warriors, Xi was promoted to governor of the southeastern province of Fujian in August 1999 after a string of provincial officials were caught up in a graft dragnet. In March 2007, the tall and portly Xi secured the top job in China's commercial capital, Shanghai, when his predecessor, Chen Liangyu, was caught up in another huge corruption case. Seven months later, Xi was promoted to the party's Standing Committee - the ruling inner-circle.- Married to famous singer Peng Liyuan, Xi has waged a campaign against corruption and excess since assuming office, responding to widespread public anger that party members are both above the law and wasteful. He has warned the party's very existence is under threat from pervasive graft.(For more information, see Reuters' Connected China site,
HONG KONG — Every year, Hong Kong residents gather in droves for the annual vigil to commemorate the Tiananmen democracy protests. More than marking the brutal crackdown in Beijing 24 years ago, the event here increasingly symbolizes disaffection with rule by China.Tens of thousands of people gathered Tuesday evening at a large park in the former British colony. They turned the park into a sea of flickering light as they held candles aloft to remember those killed when their protests in central Beijing were crushed by the Chinese military on June 4, 1989. Commemorations of the crackdown are suppressed everywhere else in China.The vigil was cut short by a brief but heavy tropical downpour that sent some scurrying for the exits. But many remained, huddling with their candles under umbrellas. Organizers estimated a crowd of 150,000 while police put the number at 54,000, local media reported."We need to let everyone know" about what happened, said Alex Lai, a 26-year-old accountant who has been attending the vigil for 10 years. "Because if you don't hold this event then the memory will quickly be forgotten."Organizers and crowd members called for Beijing to reverse its verdict on the protests, which Communist Party leaders have condemned as a counterrevolutionary riot.In Beijing, there was no sign of large-scale protest, but some people answered a call by activists to wear black to work in remembrance. As in previous years, many pro-democracy activists themselves were not allowed to leave their homes to mark the anniversary. On the country's lively social media, searches for words including "commemorate" and "6_4" were banned, and the candle emoticon was removed.In Hong Kong, the event has taken on a life of its own, with residents of the now-semiautonomous Chinese region expressing unhappiness that their administrators are still hand-picked by Beijing despite promises of more democracy."There are more people who want to use this vigil regarding June 4 as a way to protest against Beijing's heavy-handed intervention in Hong Kong affairs," said Willy Lam, a professor at Chinese University of Hong Kong.When Hong Kongers poured into the streets in 1989, their sympathy with the protesters in Beijing had more to do with fears about impending Chinese rule — then eight years away. Now it's about current problems that include corruption, a leader viewed by many as inept and tin-eared, and a yawning wealth gap that has stifled the aspirations of the city's large middle-class.And "of course it also expresses the anger of people over the Chinese government messing with our democratic reform," said pro-democracy legislator Lee Cheuk-yan.Mike Yip, a sales consultant attending the vigil, said people were dissatisfied with the lack of reform."Everybody understands we can't change anything in the short term but we hope that slowly there will be changes," he said.When Hong Kong was handed back to China in 1997, it was allowed to keep its own political system and Western-style civil liberties such as freedom of speech until 2047.Residents can vote for some of their legislators, while others are chosen by business and other special interest groups. They've never been able to choose their leader, who during British colonial rule was dispatched from London. Since China retook control, the leader, now known as chief executive, has been chosen by a committee of mostly pro-Beijing elites.Beijing has pledged to allow Hong Kongers to elect their leader by 2017 and elect all legislators in 2020 but no roadmap has been laid out.The lack of progress has led Hong Kong University Professor Benny Tai to propose a protest movement in which supporters would occupy the city's financial district in 2014 in a last-ditch attempt to press their demands for a genuine chief executive election.Hong Kongers' yearning for democracy is illustrated by their frustrations with current Chief Executive Leung Chun-ying, who has been hit by a series of controversies since taking office less than a year ago.Leung's already poor approval rating plummeted further over the past few months, according to opinion polls by Hong Kong University researchers. Last week, a senior mainland official took the unusual step of denying there was a plan to replace him."One huge problem with C.Y. Leung is that he's a yes-man; he's regarded as a stooge of Beijing," Lam said.Last year, protests forced Leung to back down from plans to require Chinese patriotism classes in schools, which some parents feared was a form of brainwashing. In January, he survived an impeachment attempt.Leung took office with promises to provide more affordable housing but residents haven't had much relief from high rents and home prices in Hong Kong, where tens of thousands live in cubicles, metal cages or other substandard housing even though it's one of Asia's richest cities.His latest troubles revolve around a scandal involving a member of his Cabinet, Barry Cheung, a businessman and key supporter of his bid for Hong Kong's top job. Cheung was forced to resign from all his public positions after police launched an investigation into him and his Hong Kong Mercantile Exchange, which had to return its trading license last month, two years after it opened. Six people have also been arrested in connection with the investigation.A spate of corruption scandals has raised worries about the integrity of public officials in Hong Kong, an Asian financial center that likes to boast of clean government and strong rule of law. In May, the city's corruption watchdog launched a criminal investigation of its former chief over complaints of excessive spending on gifts and meals on visits with mainland Chinese officials.Last year, the Independent Commission Against Corruption also investigated Leung's predecessor over allegations he received favors from wealthy friends. Separately, a former chief secretary, the second highest ranking official, has been charged in a corruption case along with a pair of billionaire developers.Tensions have also been growing over the unwelcome side-effects of increasing numbers of mainland visitors. Last year about 35 million visited Hong Kong, a cramped city of 7.1 million. Locals have taken to deriding their mainland cousins as "locusts" for their reputation for buying up luxury goods, apartments and even baby formula.To calm rising anger over shortages of formula — coveted by mainland parents after China's tainted milk scandal — the government in March prohibited visitors from leaving the city with more than two cans. Some 1,525 people have since been arrested for smuggling.Following Tuesday's vigil, some plan to march to the Chinese central government's liaison office where, radical lawmaker Leung Kwok-hung said, they will demand the Communist Party end one-party rule, pay homage to the Tiananmen victims and release all political prisoners.
BEIJING — The corruption watchdog inside China's Communist Party is investigating a former provincial vice governor, making him the latest senior official to come under scrutiny in the new leadership's campaign against corruption, state media said Tuesday.The official Xinhua News Agency said that Ni Fake (pronounced NEE Fah-Kuh) was being investigated for "suspected serious disciplinary offenses." No further details were given, but such announcements typically indicate that the party official has been taken into custody.The investigation was announced as official Chinese media have intensified coverage of the Communist Party's latest efforts to stem corruption, a major source of public anger that threatens the party's legitimacy."Corruption is a malignant tumor on society, if the graft problem is allowed to become ever more critical, it will certainly lead to the death of the party and of the nation," said the official China Discipline and Inspection Daily newspaper in a commentary Tuesday hailing new party leader Xi Jinping's resolve to fight graft.According to his official resume, Ni was promoted in 2008 to the position of vice governor of Anhui province and was in charge of land, housing, environmental protection and other areas. Such sectors are often plagued by corruption, with officials in powerful positions wielding large influence over land sales, housing developments and factory licenses.Anhui has made headlines in recent years because of problems in such areas. During a nationwide drive to build subsidized apartments, numerous complaints were filed by Anhui residents over units that had huge holes in the walls and floors. In 2011, a battery factory in Anhui sickened more than 200 children with lead poisoning.Ni is the latest high-level official to be investigated since Xi came to power in November. A couple of weeks ago, authorities said an investigation had been launched into Liu Tienan, a powerful economic planning official who had been accused by a prominent journalist of corruption. In December, a deputy party secretary of Sichuan province was removed from his post following state media reports that he was suspected in influence-peddling and questionable real estate deals.Reports of the investigation into Ni come as state media have been plastered with headlines about the ongoing crackdown on corruption, which include the deployment of 10 inspection teams to various provinces and organizations.The teams vowing to scrutinize high-level officials have been sent to check on five provinces and five government or state-linked organizations, including the Ministry of Water Resources, the China Grain Reserves Corp., and the Export-Import Bank of China.Anti-corruption experts and political observers have said, however, that as long as the party does not undertake reforms that serve to check its power, such as requiring officials to publicly declare their assets, the campaign will appear to address only the symptoms of corruption.The prominent editor of Caixin magazine, Hu Shuli, wrote in a commentary Monday that the spread of corruption in recent years shows that the authorities' measures have limited effect."Actually, the answer is not a profound mystery, and that is to carry forward holistic reforms that include political reforms and create the conditions for 'sunshine legislation,'" Hu wrote.
It was April 1989, and after a decade of economic transformation, China faced a clamor for political liberalization. Days later, protests erupted in Tiananmen Square, and the lives of those at the meeting took radically different turns. Several are now national leaders, including Li Keqiang, China's prime minister. Others ended up in prison or exile, accused of supporting the demonstrations that shook the Communist Party and ended with soldiers sweeping through the city on June 4, shooting dead hundreds of unarmed protesters and bystanders."The atmosphere at the meeting was to let a hundred flowers bloom and a hundred schools of thought contend," said Chen Yizi, who helped organize the conference. "Afterwards, it was impossible to hold a meeting like that where everyone was willing to debate different points of view."This year is the 24th anniversary of the bloodshed, and the first under a party leadership dominated by officials with such intimate and ambivalent ties to the events of 1989. Many top leaders served their political apprenticeship in the 1980s, when the boundaries between the permissible and the forbidden were not as stark and heavily policed as they are now. Their careers and friendships, and sometimes their viewpoints, overlapped with intellectuals, officials and policy advisers who were jailed or dismissed after the June 4 crackdown.Few expect China's new leaders, installed in November, to overturn the official verdict that the protests were a counterrevolutionary rebellion that had to be crushed. But the immersion of today's leaders in the political experimentation of the 1980s raises the question of whether they will be more open to new ideas and discussion than their immediate predecessors in high office.Chinese leaders openly debate competing approaches to the economy, but their calls for political liberalization have become increasingly rare. For now, at least, any potential embrace of the more freewheeling spirit of the 1980s appears to be hindered by the conformism demanded of those who have ascended in the hierarchy — and their dread of being accused of ideological heresy.Yet the lessons of June 4 and its repressive aftermath may weigh on the new leaders, especially if they are confronted by another political uprising, said Wu Wei, a former aide to Zhao Ziyang, the reform-minded party leader ousted shortly before the crackdown."For those in power now, it's still a heavy political burden, even if it's one that they can never openly discuss," Mr. Wu said. "Now the people who took part in that time are middle-aged or older, and it's still a knot in their hearts."Prime Minister Li, now 57, was one of six current members of the elite 25-member Politburo who attended the meeting, according to Zhong Dajun, an editor for the official Xinhua news agency at the time. Others included Li Yuanchao, the vice president; Wang Qishan, the chief of anti-corruption investigations; and Yu Zhengsheng, who deals with policy toward religious groups, ethnic minorities and nonparty groups.Many of these future Chinese leaders were among the hundreds of thousands of students who crowded into universities beginning in the late 1970s, eager for knowledge after years of rote-learning Mao Zedong Thought during the Cultural Revolution, when colleges were mostly shut or paralyzed by ideological campaigns. Photographs showed them dressed in the blue or green cotton coats of the Mao era, a reminder of the drab conformity they yearned to escape.Throughout the Tiananmen upheaval, Xi Jinping, the nation's current president, was a local official in Fujian Province in China's southeast, far from the protests in Beijing. But his father, Xi Zhongxun, a veteran Communist turned supporter of economic reform, had been a friend of Hu Yaobang, the Communist Party leader demoted in 1987 for his liberal tendencies and whose death in 1989 sent thousands swarming into Tiananmen Square to voice their grief and demand steps toward democracy.
HONG KONG — China's next space mission begins this month when a capsule carrying three astronauts will dock with an orbiting module, a spokesman for the space program said Monday.The astronauts will be on board a Shenzhou 10 capsule, which will be launched on a rocket from the Jiuquan Satellite Launch Center in northwest China, the Xinhua news agency reported, citing the spokesman, whom the agency did not name.It will be China's fifth space mission with astronauts, and the latest step in the country's efforts to master the technology needed to establish a long-term human presence in space. China's first spaceflight with astronauts on board was in 2003; the most recent one was a year ago, which involved a docking with the Tiangong 1, a small module.The spokesman told Xinhua that the astronauts this time will again dock with the module and perform experiments while there.Chinese government scientists have also said they may eventually attempt to send an astronaut to the moon.
HONG KONG — Two surveys that take the temperature of China's manufacturing sector showed an economy that appears to have stabilized for now, but that is struggling to recover some of the momentum it lost at the start of the year.The two purchasing managers' indexes — one released by the British bank HSBC on Monday, the other published by the Chinese statistics bureau on Saturday — painted somewhat divergent pictures for May, though both underlined the fact that the factory sector was still struggling with lackluster demand.The official survey, which is focused more on large and midsize state-owned companies of the kind that benefit from state-led investment, provided a positive surprise by edging up slightly, to 50.8 in May, from 50.6 in April. Economists polled by Reuters had expected the index to slip toward 50, with figures above indicating expansion and those below showing contraction.On the other hand, the final version of the HSBC index for May, compiled by the research firm Markit and released Monday, was 49.2 points. The reading was a downward revision from the preliminary number of 49.6, which was published on May 23, and showed conditions at their weakest in eight months. The HSBC gauge is more focused on smaller companies, which have benefited less than their larger counterparts from the recent credit expansion, HSBC said in a research note."Overall conditions for China's manufacturing sector were at best stabilizing at a relatively low level in May," HSBC economists said, adding that a batch of official economic data for May, to be released this coming weekend, could provide more clarity on China's growth outlook.After years of double-digit expansion, China's pace of growth has cooled in recent years — a slowdown that has in part been engineered by the authorities in Beijing as they try to ease a potentially worrisome flood of lending, forestall asset price bubbles and direct the economy toward higher-quality expansion.Beijing is expecting 7.5 percent growth this year, a rapid clip compared with the rates of expansion of other leading economies but a significantly slower pace than the 9.3 percent growth in 2011 and the 10.4 percent in 2010."While the data may ease some concerns of rapid deteriorating of the Chinese economy, the impact may be short-lived," economists at the Australia and New Zealand Banking Group in Hong Kong said in a research note on the official purchasing managers' index. They added that structural reforms were needed to help sustain growth prospects.
HONG KONG — Explosions and fire tore through parts of a poultry processing plant in northeast China on Monday, killing at least 120 people in one of the country's worst factory disasters in years.Chinese news reports said many of the workers who had died had been hindered from leaving the factory, the Baoyuanfeng Poultry Plant, because the exits had been blocked or inadequate. The plant began operations four years ago and was considered a major domestic poultry supplier.Survivors described panic inside the burning plant, as employees unfamiliar with the fire escapes jostled and trampled one another through smoke and flames to reach exits that turned out to be locked."Inside and outside the workshop was glowing red, and the lighting and escape indicators were all out," one worker, Wang Xiaoyun, told the China News Service.International concern over factory safety in Asia has been growning after accidents that have taken more than a thousand lives. The worst was a collapse of a garment factory complex in Bangladesh on April 24 that killed more than 1,120 people.Residents near the poultry factory, in the Jilin Province town of Mishazi, heard explosions about 6 a.m. Parts of the plant were engulfed in flames, but it was unclear whether the fire had broken out before or after the blasts, according to television reports. The Chinese State Administration of Work Safety said 120 people were confirmed to have died, state television said.The provincial government's microblog news site said that 120 people were confirmed to have died.By late in the day, Xinhua, the official news agency, said "people responsible" in the company that operates the plant had been arrested, but it did not identify them. The precise cause of the fire and explosions remained unclear."When I woke up, there was smoke rising in the air and sirens, and you knew straight away that it was bad news," Dong Wenjun, a metal trader in Mishazi, said in a telephone interview. "But I didn't expect it to be this bad. They were all local people, I think."Television news showed rescuers picking their way through the blackened debris.The police, fearing more explosions from gas stored at the plant, evacuated nearby residents, the China News Service reported. More than 50 people were taken to a hospital, mostly for breathing difficulties from inhaling toxic gases, reports said.Guo Yan, a plant employee, said she had heard a boom and then people shouting that there was a fire, Xinhua reported. One fire exit was blocked, and she had to escape through another, she told the news agency. "People were all rushing, pressing and crushing each other," she said. "I fell over and had to crawl forward using all my might."Another report, from The Southern Metropolitan Daily, a newspaper in southern China, said only one exit had been open in the area where the fire started.China's food-processing industry has grown rapidly to feed an increasingly prosperous population in the nation's cities, and the poultry plant appeared to be one beneficiary of that growth. Dehui City, which administers the area that includes the plant, has promoted itself as a base for commercial agriculture, animal feed production and food processing. By 2011, Dehui's poultry industry had the capacity to produce 250 million broiler chickens a year and slaughter 150 million of them, according to the Jilin Province Web site.Jilin Baoyuanfeng Poultry, which owns the Mishazi plant, has more than 1,200 employees, the China News Service said. The company can produce 67,000 tons of chicken products every year, the Agriculture Ministry said on its Web site in 2010.Chinese factories and mines have been troubled by work hazards during the country's rapid economic expansion. The frequent industrial accidents have drawn criticism that officials are putting economic growth before safety.In what appeared to be a reflection of the problems, Prime Minister Li Keqiang and President Xi Jinping, who is traveling abroad, both promptly issued orders about the latest disaster. Mr. Xi told officials to "get to the bottom of the causes of this accident, pursue culpability according to the law, sum up the profound lessons and adopt effective measures to resolutely prevent major accidents from occurring," Xinhua reported.The government does not issue detailed figures for industrial accidents but has said safety is improving.Official data shows that the rate of deaths per 100,000 workers in industry, mining and business fell by 13 percent in 2012 from a year earlier. It did not release accident and death totals.China's coal mines are notoriously unsafe. But Geoffrey Crothall, the communications director for China Labor Bulletin, an advocacy group in Hong Kong, said he could not recall a disaster of such magnitude at a factory or production plant. In 1993, a fire in a toy factory in far southern China killed 87 workers, he said. In late 2000, a fire at a shopping center in Luoyang in Henan Province killed 309 people. Mr. Li was the Henan governor at the time.Mr. Crothall said it was too early to draw definitive conclusions about whether inadequate fire escapes, a longstanding problem in Chinese workplaces, had contributed to the number of deaths at the poultry plant."But many factories are locked for what the owners or managers consider to be security reasons, and fire exits are not properly maintained or given the priority they should be," Mr. Crothall said.
BEIJING — A former Beijing mayor, instrumental in the government crackdown on student demonstrations in Tiananmen Square in 1989 and later jailed for corruption, has died of cancer, state media reported on Wednesday. He was 83.Chen Xitong died on Sunday, the official Xinhua news agency said in a brief report, two days ahead of the 24th anniversary of the June 4, 1989, suppression of the pro-democracy protests.Xinhua said he had been released on medical parole in 2006.Chen was a leading hardliner who strongly backed the bloody crackdown on the protests and later presented the official version of events in a speech to parliament.Hundreds, perhaps thousands, died when the military swept into the center of Beijing to deal with what the government later called a "counter-revolutionary" event.Chen was then promoted to the Politburo, an elite decision-making Communist Party body, in recognition of his hardline stand.However Chen was detained in 1995 after the suicide of his protege, vice mayor Wang Baosen, who was being investigated in a $37 million embezzlement case.Chen was found guilty of accepting bribes and blowing millions of dollars in public funds with Wang on luxury villas around Beijing and jailed for 16 years in 1998.Chen was the highest Communist Party official to be jailed for graft since the revolution in 1949.Bo Xilai, also a former Politburo member and one time contender for top leadership, was expelled from the party and placed under investigation for corruption last year, though his case has yet to come to trial.An official paean issued when Chen was appointed to the Politburo in 1992 described him as among the busiest and most hardworking of China's senior officials, rising at dawn to jog and working late into the night.The official Xinhua news agency said the verse showed Chen to be a dedicated public servant.Xinhua's assessment in 1995 when he was expelled from the Politburo was less kind."He himself led a dissolute, extravagant life, abused his power to seek illegal interests for his relatives and accepted valuable gifts for his own use by taking the advantage of his position and while performing his public duties," it said."His mistakes are serious."Tens of thousands of people held a candlelit vigil in Hong Kong on Tuesday to urge China to respect human rights on the 24th anniversary of the crackdown.Hong Kong, a former British colony that returned to Chinese rule in 1997, is the only place on Chinese soil where large, open commemorations of the Tiananmen massacre take place. The vigil is held up as a symbol of Hong Kong's relative freedoms and civil liberties compared with mainland China.
BEIJING — Authorities raised the death toll Wednesday by one to 120 in this week's disastrous fire at a northeast China poultry processing plant, with another 17 people unaccounted for.The State Administration of Work Safety said a total of 395 people were at work during Monday's tragedy, the country's worst industrial accident in almost five years.State media reports said about 90 percent of the victims were women recruited from nearby farming villages to work part time at the sprawling Jilin Baoyuanfeng Poultry Co. plant.Workers said all but one of the plant's exits were locked at the time of the fire, in a clear violation of Chinese laws and safety regulations.Authorities have detained the plant's owner and managers, and a special commission appointed by China's Cabinet is investigating the fire. Initial reports said it appeared to have been sparked by an explosion caused by leaking ammonia, a chemical kept pressurized as part of the cooling system in meat processing plants.The disaster highlighted continuing worker safety problems in China, where about 70,000 people are killed on the job each year, due partly to corruption, poor training and lax enforcement by regulators.It came almost 20 years after a similar fire in a toy factory in the southern city of Shenzhen where 87 young workers were killed because exits also were locked, allegedly to prevent theft.
BEIJING — Police in the Chinese captial have warned women not to wear miniskirts, hot pants or other skimpy clothing on buses and subways during the hot summer in order to avoid sexual harassment, Chinese media reported on Wednesday.Women should also shield themselves with bags or newspapers, and sit or stand in lower areas rather than in raised seats to avoid being surreptitiously photographed, according to guidelines issued by the traffic department of the Beijing Public Security Bureau and cited by the official China Daily.Women often complain of groping and other harassment in Beijing's crowded buses and subways.Most buses in the capital do not have security cameras so it is difficult for authorities to collect evidence of harassment, police officer Xing Wei was quoted as saying.The heaviest penalty for sexual harassment is 15 days in detention, according to Xing.Women have been guaranteed broad equal treatment under Chinese law since Mao Zedong, the founder of communist China, declared that women "hold up half the sky".But despite that, women in China still face old-fashioned attitudes among many men and few women hold op jobs in government or business.
BEIJING — China is notorious for its knockoffs. But now comes a knockoff of one of the gods of American ingenuity: Steven P. Jobs .In a country where products like iPhones are made but rarely invented, Lei Jun — entrepreneur, billionaire and professed Jobs acolyte — is positioning himself and his company as figurative heirs of Mr. Jobs. The Chinese media have nicknamed his company, Xiaomi, the "Apple of the East."The title is a stretch, by almost any measure. But Mr. Lei nonetheless is carefully cultivating a Jobsian image here, right down to his jeans and dark shirts. He is also selling millions of mobile phones that look a lot like iPhones. Chinese consumers — and deep-pocketed investors overseas — seem to be believers.And yet Mr. Lei's biggest believer may be himself. He bounds onto podiums to introduce new cellphones. He proclaims things that may, to many, sound outlandish. For instance:"We're making the mobile phone like the PC, and this is a totally new idea," Mr. Lei, Xiaomi's chief executive, said during an interview at the company's spacious, high-rise headquarters here. "We're doing things other companies haven't done before."That might come as a surprise to Apple and Samsung Electronics, the twin giants of smartphones. But Xiaomi (pronounced SHAO-mee) did sell $2 billion in handsets in China last year. It is emerging as a force in China, the world's largest mobile phone market, and it expects its revenue to double this year.Mr. Lei, for his part, hardly discourages comparisons to Apple and Mr. Jobs. And why would he? Founded by a group of Chinese engineers three years ago, his company sold seven million mobile phones last year by using designs that mimic the look and feel of the iPhone and using marketing that seems right out of Apple's playbook.It's no surprise that entrepreneurs aspire to create a Chinese Apple. Many talk about moving China beyond the dead end of assembling devices for other companies.So far, however, true innovators have been scarce. At best, they have adapted others' technology to the Chinese market.Mr. Lei has attracted believers because no company's annual revenue has reached the $1 billion mark in China faster than Xiaomi, not even Amazon, which took five years to get there. Xiaomi did it while earning a profit.Its backers include Qiming Venture Partners, the venture capital arm of Qualcomm and Digital Sky Technologies, an investment firm run by Yuri Milner, an early backer of Facebook, Groupon and Zynga.Xiaomi, which is privately held, says an initial public offering is years away. But the company is worth $4 billion, according to its latest round of financing last June.If that valuation holds up, it would make Xiaomi one of China's most valuable technology companies, behind Alibaba, Baidu, Tencent and Netease.The company caters to young, college-educated people who want a smartphone but cannot quite afford one, people like Lu Da, a 26-year-old education consultant in Shanghai."I chose Xiaomi because it's good value for the money," he said.Skeptics say the company produces low-price iPhone imitations with no significant software or hardware advantages. They also say the company faces stiff challenges from Apple and Samsung, which are in a position to offer low-price smartphones.The marketing power of bigger local handset makers like Lenovo, Huawei and Taiwan's HTC, which together recently sold about 25 percent of all smartphones in China, cannot be discounted either.Whether the company succeeds, its rise has solidified Mr. Lei's reputation as a start-up wizard. Part entrepreneur and part start-up investor, he spent more than a decade at the Chinese software company Kingsoft and took it public in 2007. (He remains chairman and holds a $300 million stake.)He also invested in a string of successful software and Internet companies, including YY, an online social platform that went public on the Nasdaq stock exchange in the United States last year and is now worth about $1.5 billion. One of Mr. Lei's earliest successes came in 2004, when Amazon paid $75 million to acquire his e-commerce company Joyo.com."Lei Jun is a phenomenal entrepreneur," said Kai-Fu Lee, the former Google executive who now runs Innovation Works, a Beijing-based firm that invests in Chinese start-ups. "He's insightful about user needs and markets, and now he has this incredible desire to create a household brand in technology."Mr. Lei has revealed little about his personal life, but he has nearly five million followers on Sina Weibo, a sort of Chinese Twitter, and is treated like a celebrity in technology circles.He grew up near Wuhan, a gritty industrial city in central China, and studied computer science at Wuhan University. It was during college, in 1987, he says, that he read a book about Mr. Jobs, and decided to emulate him."I was greatly influenced by that book, and I wanted to establish a company that was first class," Mr. Lei said. "So I made a plan to get through college fast."
HONG KONG — Tens of thousands of Hong Kong residents, joined by a smattering of mainland Chinese, converged in central Victoria Park here on Tuesday to honor the 24th anniversary of the Tiananmen Square crackdown and vent their anger at a Chinese leadership that has increasingly signaled its intent to broaden its limited control over the territory.Speakers shouted "down with the Communist Party" and "free elections for all citizens."Such protests are effectively banned in mainland China, creating a draw for the mainlanders who attended."I came because you can't commemorate this day on the mainland," said one, a former magazine editor who gave his name only as Li for self-protection. "Here you can soak up the democratic atmosphere."The protesters pressed a variety of agendas. A 17-year-old student named Zheng from Guangdong Province was among several holding a flag of the Republic of China, whose leaders fled to Taiwan as the Communists took over the mainland in 1949. Wan Yun, 47, a Hong Kong resident formerly from the Chinese province of Hubei, laid out documents about a land dispute that she said had brought her a year in a labor camp.After the rally was well under way, an intense, wind-whipped rainstorm descended on the park, sending protesters scurrying for cover through flooded streets. But the rain abated a half-hour later, and the drenched throngs returned.The annual demonstration is the most vivid display of the continuing passions over the 1989 crackdown on student protests in Beijing, an event whose name and date has been stricken by censors on mainland China. Armed soldiers and armored vehicles swept through Beijing, shooting dead – by most estimates – hundreds of people to end two months of protests, hunger strikes and passionate speeches at Tiananmen Square. Student leaders backed by thousands of mainly young Chinese had been urging the Communist Party to attack official corruption, expand citizens' rights and take steps toward democracy.Twenty-four years after the bloodshed, China's Communist Party has honed its response to the unwelcome anniversary: detaining and silencing dissidents and bereaved families who hope to observe the day with mourning; mobilizing extra police officers to ensure that no protests break out around Tiananmen Square; and scrubbing Chinese Internet sites of any references and images that refer to or even hint at the upheavals of 1989.The major exception to this annual feat of erasure is the event in Hong Kong, a self-administered enclave under Chinese sovereignty, where tens of thousands gather each year for a candlelit memorial vigil and rally.This year's crowd was estimated by the police at 54,000 people, although organizers put the turnout at 150,000. Despite the rainstorm, the gathering seemed energized by its ire at a new cohort of Communist Party leaders in Beijing."Everyone feels disappointed that the initial hopes in Xi Jinping have evaporated," Mr. Li, the editor, said of the new head of the Chinese Communist Party.Few have any expectations that Mr. Xi and other leaders will alter the official version of what happened in 1989: the protests were a plot against the party that had to be quelled with force."Facts have clearly shown that during the past nearly quarter-century, China's top leaders have never been real political reformers," Tiananmen Mothers, an association for families of the people killed in the 1989 crackdown, said in a statement released by Human Rights in China, an advocacy group. "They come one after another, as if through a revolving door; and as they move forward, they become ever more distant and outrageous, causing a universal feeling of despair to descend on the people from all sides."This year's gathering was preceded by controversy about a slogan chosen by the main organizer, the Hong Kong Alliance in Support of Patriotic Democratic Movements in China. The group proposed "Loving the country, loving the people" as the vigil's theme, which drew criticism that it was bowing to party-backed patriotic dogma.
TAIPEI, Taiwan — Two men have been charged with planting cyanide-tainted bombs on a Taiwan high-speed train and at an office where the head of global electronics powerhouse Foxconn was scheduled to visit in April. The devices failed to explode.One suspect, a non-practicing lawyer, hired the other man to place the bombs and made stock market orders anticipating he could profit in the aftermath of the explosions, according to the Xinbei Prosecutors' Office.The bombs placed at a lawmaker's office targeted Terry Gou, head of Foxconn Technology Group, a statement from the prosecutors' office said late Thursday. Gou was scheduled to visit the lawmaker's office that day, April 12, to attend a religious event he had sponsored.Taiwan-based Foxconn produces parts for popular electronic devices at its extensive network of factories in mainland China, including iPads and iPhones for Apple Inc.The lawyer, Hu Tsung-hsien, 44, and Chu Ya-dong were indicted on charges of attempted homicide and endangering public security, which could carry the death penalty or life imprisonment if they are convicted.Prosecutors said Hu made the bombs at his home with knowledge gathered from the Internet and employed Chu to place the devices. Scores of bottles containing various chemicals were seized from Hu's home in the southern city of Tainan, the statement said.Hu attorney Fang Nan-shan said Hu has denied the charges. He said Hu was seeking to raise public awareness on Taiwan's widening gap between rich and poor. Chu has acknowledged he placed the luggage but denied knowing the contents.Each device had a timer to set off an attached gas can and release toxic cyanide into the air. Police say the bombs failed to explode because the electric current meant to ignite the gas cans was not sufficiently strong.Prior to the bombing attempts, Hu had placed short sell orders on the local stock exchange, betting the bombings would destroy investor confidence and allow him to reap huge profits, the prosecutors' statement said.Prosecutors said Hu plotted the bombings after he was charged in February in a separate case of intimidating a businessman. Data seized from his computer indicated Hu had been inspired by the English freedom fighter in the 2005 action thriller "V for Vendetta," they said.Hu and Chu fled to southern China after the bomb attempts but were arrested and repatriated to Taiwan.
BEIJING — China's workplace safety agency said negligence among factory managers and government inspectors caused "extremely chaotic" work-safety conditions at a poultry plant where a deadly fire killed 120 workers this week.Safety exits were blocked at the Jilin Baoyuanfeng Poultry Co. plant and managers neglected to hold required safety drills or worker education, State Administration of Work Safety head Yang Dongliang said in a statement posted Friday on the administration's website, confirming workers' accounts. No one at the plant took responsibility for safety, while the relevant local government departments failed to make proper inspections, Yang said.The preliminary findings came just four days after the deadly fire in Jilin province in northeastern China. The speed with which officials reacted suggests they have learned from past industrial disasters in which slow and incomplete responses have aroused considerable public anger."An initial investigation shows that the management of work safety at this plant was extremely chaotic," Yang was quoted as telling investigators and other officials Thursday at a meeting in Changchun, Jilin's capital."The accident also revealed that local government and relevant departments failed in their responsibilities while oversight and inspection work was weak and incomplete. This was a serious case of negligence," Yang said.Monday's fire was China's deadliest industrial accident in five years and highlighted the continuing gross neglect of worker safety, despite the growth and sophistication of the world's second-largest economy.Yang's accusations raise the likelihood of prosecutions over the disaster, of both company and government officials, although it's unclear whether any high-ranking officials will be dismissed.The open response so far has been in stark contrast to the way officials have handled some past disasters, including a July 2011 high-speed rail collision that killed 40 people and injured nearly 200. Railway officials were mocked over their actions, such as ordering wreckage to be cleared before all survivors had been found, curtailing state media coverage and refusing to answer basic questions about the accident's cause. That was seen as undermining public confidence not only in China's hugely ambitious high-speed rail system, but in the leadership of former Premier Wen Jiabao.Chinese President Xi Jinping, on a trip abroad that includes an informal summit in California with President Barack Obama, issued a statement Friday expressing concern about the heavy casualties in recent workplace accidents in China and urged that more be done to prevent them."Life is the most important thing and development must not proceed at the price of human lives. People's lives must be put above everything," Xi said in a statement read out on state broadcaster CCTV.While the official cause of the poultry plant disaster hasn't been announced, initial reports said the fire appeared to have been sparked by an explosion caused by leaking ammonia, a chemical kept pressurized as part of the cooling system in meat processing plants. The fire broke out during a shift change when about 350 workers were at the plant.In addition to the dead, 77 workers were hospitalized with injuries, while another 17 workers earlier listed as missing had been found alive, according to the Jilin provincial government. State media said that about 90 percent of the victims were female, that their ages ranged from 17 to the 50s and that they were from nearby farming villages.The plant's owner and managers have been taken into police custody and its assets have been frozen. Jilin province has ordered a wide-ranging crackdown on fire safety violations, as well as checks on mines and industries dealing with fireworks and dangerous chemicals.Workers quoted in state media said exits were locked to secure the property and to keep them from stepping outside for breaks, despite a law requiring that safety exits be kept open and clearly marked. China's labor law also mandates safe working conditions.Only a single door was open to permit escape. Workers trampled each other in the dark trying to survive.People who monitor labor conditions in China say enforcement of workplace safety laws is lax, with factories themselves usually left to decide whether or not to follow them.Officials will likely seek to step in quickly to compensate families of fire victims. That is considered to be a key step in maintaining public order — the government's overwhelming priority in a society where even minor disputes can turn into riots and attacks on government offices.Levels of compensation follow a complicated formula, but payment is usually made in cash by the government, with the responsible private companies and individuals later ordered to reimburse the state.
BEIJING — Safety management at the Chinese firm whose poultry slaughterhouse caught fire earlier this week killing 120 people was a "total mess" and two senior executives have been detained by the authorities, state media said on Thursday.The local government is also to blame for failing to fulfill its safety oversight role at Jilin Baoyuanfeng Poultry Co, the small feed and poultry producer that owns the plant in the northeastern province of Jilin, state news agency Xinhua said."As the main body of work safety enforcement, the company bears unshirkable responsibility for the accident, while the government is also responsible for its management and supervision duties," Xinhua cited Yang Dongliang, head of the State Administration of Work Safety, as saying.An initial probe showed that work safety management at the company was a "total mess", Yang added. Xinhua said the company never carried out evacuation drills or trained staff in safety awareness, adding the investigation found that escaping the blaze had been hampered by locked or blocked emergency exits."The accident has revealed that local governments and related authorities failed to carry out their responsibility of supervision and give thorough and effective checks," Yang said.Authorities are holding the company's board chairman, Jia Yushan, and general manager Zhang Yushen, while the firm's bank account has been frozen, Xinhua said.Yang also ordered safety checks across China, especially in risky sectors such as mining, transportation and the manufacture of dangerous chemicals, the report added.In protests this week, relatives of the fire victims have clashed with police.China, the world's second-largest economy, has a poor record on workplace safety. Fire exits in factories are often locked to prevent workers taking time off or stealing, or blocked entirely.Many of China's deadly industrial accidents happen in the huge coal mining industry, in which more than 1,300 people died last year from explosions, mine collapses and floods.
HONG KONG — Asian casino tycoon Stanley Ho's transport company is buying a stake in a budget airline that Qantas and China Eastern Airlines are setting up in Hong Kong, the companies said Thursday.Ho's Shun Tak Holdings Ltd. said Thursday it's paying $66 million for a third of the new venture that will fly under the Jetstar brand.Australia's Qantas Airways and Shanghai-based China Eastern said in March last year that the $198 million venture would serve swelling numbers of Chinese travelers.The venture was expected to start operating by mid-2013. But it has faced delays as it seeks regulatory approval.Landing a local partner may help the venture secure that greenlight.Hong Kong's transport department said earlier this week that it was reviewing its regime for designating local carriers and would freeze new approvals until the review is completed. It said businesses looking to start new airlines would have to meet requirements that include being incorporated in and having their main place of business in Hong Kong, a self-administered region of China with its own legal and financial system.Shun Tak's businesses include operating ferry and helicopter service to the nearby gambling island of Macau. Ho, 91, is founder and chairman of Shun Tak but the company is now managed by his daughter Pansy.Qantas' discount Jetstar brand also has ventures in Singapore, Vietnam and Japan.China Eastern Airlines Corp. said the new carrier would buy 18 Airbus A320 jets over the first three years of operation.The Jetstar Hong Kong venture is expected to fly short-haul routes to mainland China, Japan, South Korea and Southeast Asia.It's just one of a number of new budget carriers being launched around Asia, the world's biggest and fastest growing air travel market. The company hopes to profit from the rapidly growing numbers of Chinese travelers, including tens of millions that visit Hong Kong each year.
BEIJING — Animal-rights activists in China are claiming a rare victory after a company that raises bears to extract bile from their gall bladders withdrew its application for a public listing, although the company hasn't said why it pulled back.The plan for an initial public offering by Fujian Guizhentang Pharmaceutical, which uses the bile for traditional medicines, had caused outrage on social media and sparked online petitions from activists who say the practice is cruel and painful for the bears, and that the tonics produced are of debatable medicinal validity. The farming typically involves the daily extraction of bile from live, caged bears via catheters or holes in their bodies.The uproar reflected both a growing environmental awareness and the increasing affluence of ordinary Chinese, who keep pets, travel overseas and are changing attitudes toward traditions they may not have questioned in the past.When the company announced its IPO plans in February last year, dozens of Chinese entertainers, writers and other celebrities signed a petition delivered to the China Securities Regulatory Commission urging it to withhold approval for a share listing in Shenzhen.Last week, the China Securities Regulatory Commission listed Guizhentang as one of 269 companies that had withdrawn its application for an IPO this year. It was not immediately clear why the company withdrew. The move came amid increased scrutiny of IPOs by authorities. In October, China suspended IPOs because of a lack of investor appetite for them and general equity market declines, and they have not yet resumed.When called for comment Thursday, the company repeatedly hung up.Cai Jing, an analyst at Shanghai-based Yintai Securities, said he believed Guizhentang had withdrawn its IPO because of public pressure."It is true that many more companies have withdrawn their IPO applications this year than normal, but I read its financial reports at the time and didn't find any financial problem that would impede an IPO," Cai said. "The only big problem is the pressure from the public to protect the animals."The bears used for the bile are Asiatic black bears, also known as moon bears because of a yellow crescent moon shape on their chests.Guizhentang's website says it has more than 400 of the bears and in 2009 started to invest in a base that would hold more than 1,200 bears and eventually become "the biggest bear site in the world." The site also says the company has become "the industry standard" in breeding and feeding bears, draining their bile and preventing disease among the captive animals. It says bear bile helps prevent hepatitis and liver diseases in humans, improves vision and detoxifies the body, citing a famous doctor born 500 years ago and other old Chinese medicine books.Hong Kong-based Animals Asia welcomed the news of the withdrawal. Toby Zhang, its China external affairs director, said public pressure played an important role and that any future IPO application by Guizhentang would bring even more opposition."It is true that more and more people know about this issue," Zhang said. "Before, bear farming was such a small issue compared with other hot topics in society."China stopped issuing licenses for new bear farms in 1992 to protect the welfare of wild bears, but it also said bear bile is an important raw material in traditional Chinese medicine.While the number of bear farms has dropped from a few hundred to less than 100, the industry's production is increasing because farms are breeding more bears and illegally taking them from the wild, Zhang said.The China Association of Traditional Chinese Medicines said last year that China had more than 10,000 bears farmed for their bile, which can cost up to 4,000 yuan per kilogram ($295 per pound).AP researcher Fu Ting in Shanghai contributed to this report.
SHENZHEN, China — A government-financed research institute in the Pearl River Delta here boasts an impressive range of specialties, from robotics to nanomedicine to magnetic resonance imaging.But not all the cutting edge developments may be the result of indigenous innovation, according to American prosecutors, who last month charged three Chinese scientists at the New York University School of Medicine with taking bribes to share research findings with their real employers: the Shenzhen institute and a separate Shanghai medical technology company.Though considerable attention has been focused on Chinese cyberespionage efforts, the institute is at the vanguard of a related push to bolster China's competitiveness by acquiring overseas technology directly from Chinese scientists working in the United States and other developed countries, say American officials and analysts. Those scientists are heavily recruited to return to China or, in some instances, to share their knowledge while remaining overseas, according to the federal court case and a book released last month by three experts who do China research for the United States government.In advance of a summit meeting in California later this week between President Obama and President Xi Jinping of China, the two countries agreed to hold regular meetings on the issues of cybersecurity and commercial espionage. But there is no sign yet of what those discussions might accomplish.The authors of the new book, "Chinese Industrial Espionage," say that technology transfer is an official policy at all levels of the Communist Party and the state. It often takes place in a legal gray area, since laws governing technology transfer can be vague or nonexistent. The authors warn that the United States and other nations need to acknowledge the extent of the Chinese campaign, which they say far exceeds those of other countries and threatens American competitiveness.They contend that the scale of China's efforts to gather overseas technology is so immense that the National Counterintelligence Executive, a federal agency, has considered issuing separate annual reports each year: one for China and one for the rest of the world."China is in a different league altogether, exceeding the international norm not just in scale, the number and variety of transfer venues, the moral agnosticism of its practitioners, and the degree of government support," the authors, William C. Hannas, James Mulvenon and Anna B. Puglisi, said in written answers to questions. "It's an entire mind-set."China's strategies range from setting up science parks for Chinese returnees to persuading foreign companies to open research centers in China, they said.A private intelligence company in the Washington area, Defense Group Inc., which employs Mr. Mulvenon, says the government-financed center that the N.Y.U. scientists are accused of being part of, the Shenzhen Institutes of Advanced Technology, recruits overseas Chinese with technical knowledge and "has sought to develop collaborative relationships with foreign companies and research organizations which display high potential for technology transfer."A spokeswoman for the Shenzhen center said it was investigating the accusations in the N.Y.U. case. A lawyer for Yudong Zhu, an associate professor in the N.Y.U. radiology department and the lead scientist charged, said the government "has drawn some erroneous conclusions from some of the evidence they have observed" and that Mr. Zhu did not work for the Shanghai company.The Commission on the Theft of American Intellectual Property concluded in May that technology theft amounted to a loss of more than $300 billion a year, the equivalent of total annual United States exports to Asia. "Virtually every sector and technology is attacked," the commission said."National industrial policy goals in China encourage IP theft, and an extraordinary number of Chinese in business and government entities are engaged in this practice," said the report by the commission, which was led by Dennis C. Blair, a former director of national intelligence, and Jon M. Huntsman Jr., a former ambassador to China.The Chinese Foreign Ministry and the State Council, China's cabinet, declined to comment for this article. In early May, the Commerce Ministry denied accusations by the United States Trade Representative that China was weak on enforcing intellectual property rights. "The Chinese government attaches great importance to intellectual property protection and has made great progress in areas like intellectual property legislation and enforcement," it said.Cases like the one at N.Y.U. of overseas Chinese scientists and scholars accused of secretly transferring technical information are considered rare, especially given that the number of Chinese students going abroad reached 400,000 last year. But the growing emphasis in the United States on technology theft by China has made some Chinese-Americans and overseas Chinese fearful of undue persecution. They point to the fiasco of the Wen Ho Lee case, in which a Chinese-American scientist was wrongly accused by federal officials of stealing classified nuclear-related documents.
LIJIANG, China — Tourists from China's crowded coasts have long considered this city of 1.2 million in the Himalayan foothills to be a scenic getaway.Its hotel choices are still predominantly low- and mid-range properties, but a few of the world's top luxury hotel brands are putting the final touches on properties here in hopes of attracting the country's growing ranks of extremely wealthy travelers.As economic growth has slowed in Europe and the United States, Asian locations now dominate lists of the current and projected hot spots for luxury hotel and resort growth. And Asia-based planners from leading luxury hotel groups say China, the world's second-largest economy after the United States, is the top regional priority."There are several hot spots there because China is so massive," said David Spooner, vice president of sales and marketing at Banyan Tree Hotels & Resorts, which opened Lijiang's first international-standard luxury property in 2006. And, he added, the country's luxury sector is flourishing because "a growing market of Chinese travelers is much more sophisticated."In April, 253 of the 458 branded luxury hotel projects under construction or in the final planning stages were in the Asia-Pacific region, according to STR Global, a hotel research company.And of all such Asia-Pacific projects — branded and independent, and across all economic categories — 58 percent were in China, the company said.China will not be the only driver of Asia's future luxury hotel growth. Top-end hotel brands say they are expanding in India's cities and southwestern region, and that there is considerable buzz about Sri Lanka and Myanmar, countries where, until recently, unrest and political issues had limited visits by international travelers."Myanmar, at least medium to long term, has the potential to be a top tourism destination that could rival Thailand," said Michel Van der Hoeven, senior vice president of projects and development at Anantara Hotels, Resorts & Spas, a luxury hotel group based in Bangkok with properties in Asia and the Middle East. "It has amazing culture, it has natural beauty, it has heritage — what's lacking there is good-quality properties."The country has just two luxury hotels, both in Yangon: The Governor's Residence, an Orient-Express property, and The Strand, which is operated by Myanmar Hotels International, a joint venture of the government's Tourism Ministry and Strand Hotels International.But there are several high-end resorts in the central city of Bagan that could potentially qualify as luxury properties, said Jonas Ogren, Asia director at STR Global. And industry experts say the country's undeveloped islands offer immense potential, although construction is likely to be several years away at best.They also say destinations in Bhutan and Laos are beginning to attract interest among luxury hotel groups, as are Seoul, Kuala Lumpur and undeveloped islands in Indonesia and the Philippines.But the industry's primary focus is on China."China is obviously a key market for us," said Chris Hart, president of Asia-Pacific hotel operations at Four Seasons Hotels and Resorts. "I think eventually we will have as many hotels in China as we do in the United States."The group, which manages 31 U.S. properties, now has five in mainland China, with a sixth to open this year in Shenzhen and another under construction in Tianjin, a city of 10 million southeast of Beijing.Mr. Hart said the company, which is based in Canada, was expanding across China partly to expose its citizens to the brand and encourage them to stay in other Four Seasons properties.The number of annual overseas trips by Chinese travelers has risen to 83 million last year from 10 million in 2000, according to the U.N. World Tourism Organization. And their 2012 spending on international tourism — $102 billion — helped China overtake Germany to become the world's largest source of tourism spending."We want to be their first choice when they go on vacation, whether to the Maldives or to Paris or New York," Mr. Hart said.
BEIJING — The fire and ammonia gas leak at a poultry factory that killed at least 120 people and injured scores of others this week has stirred outrage and debate in China over workplace safety issues.One sharp question being asked by a wide range of critics on the Internet and in the state news media is why many of the doors were locked at the factory, the Jilin Baoyuanfeng Poultry Plant in Dehui, in northeastern China, where 300 to 400 people were working when the fire broke out on Monday.There have been previous instances of locked factory doors being revealed as hazards in China, but the phenomenon persists. Advocates of fair labor practices say it is one way managers prevent workers from leaving, and at least one survivor of the fire has said online that veteran workers there told her that managers had locked factory doors to prevent theft.On Wednesday, The Beijing Evening News ran a scathing commentary under the headline "How Many Emergency Exits Are Intentionally Blocked?"The author, Sun Wenyang, head of commentary at the newspaper, wrote: "Emergency exits that are intentionally blocked are merely the display of the ruthlessness of a small minority of people toward the large majority of people. I hope that the people responsible for investigating this accident find every single person who gave instructions and implemented the blocking of these emergency exits and punish them according to the law. Not a single person should be let off the hook."Xinhua, the state news agency, ran a report on Tuesday in which a survivor said it was normal for doors to be locked at the poultry plant during regular factory shifts. "During work hours, if you want to use the bathroom, you have to get the foreman's permission to open the door," said the survivor, who was identified by his surname, Li.After the factory fire, the Communist Party committee in Jilin Province, where the factory is, ordered a provincewide inspection of such workplaces to ensure that all fire exits were kept open, the article said.But this fire and previous reports of work safety violations show that regulatory actions by officials often fall short in China.Xinhua reported Wednesday that the Supreme People's Procuratorate had sent a team to Jilin to investigate the fire. Teams from the province and Dehui are also working on their own inquiries.More than 500 firefighters had scoured the site and determined that no victims were still trapped there, said Zhao Xian, deputy party secretary of Changchun, the provincial capital, according to Xinhua. Now, he said, the most difficult question is how to deal with the vessels that store ammonia, which is often used in the refrigeration of chickens. News reports have said a leak of ammonia gas caused an explosion that started the fire, and medical workers at the scene have determined that poisoning by ammonia gas was a main cause of death.Mr. Zhao said there were 13 vessels on the site, storing 50 tons of liquid ammonia. Only one had leaked, and the remaining 12 intact vessels were handed over by emergency teams to a chemical company in the province.Hu Xijin, the editor of Global Times, a state-run newspaper, said on his microblog that although accidents were bound to occur in such a large country, and especially in dangerous industries, "does it have to be such a big accident?""How come a potentially dangerous factory had no contingency plan?" he wrote. "I don't want to disturb the rescue effort, but the accident is too big to be acceptable. I thought China was already at a stage where industrial accidents that kill 119 people could be avoided, but we were all disappointed."An editorial published Tuesday in The China Business Morning Post pointed out that three fires had occurred over four days in northeast China, the other two under the watch of agricultural and oil companies. One reason, the editorial said, is that those responsible for workplace safety failed to do their jobs.
HONG KONG — China's nouveaux riches millionaires, wealthy princelings and bribing business executives may soon find their wallets a little thinner: The price for French Champagnes and Burgundies, Italian Barolos and pinot grigios and other European wines may soon rise in mainland Chinese stores.Less than a day after the European Union said it was imposing preliminary import tariffs on Chinese solar panels, China's Ministry of Commerce announced Wednesday that it had begun a trade investigation of wines imported from the European Union. The investigation could lead to the imposition of steep tariffs by China.The European Union's trade commissioner, Karel De Gucht, announced Tuesday in Brussels that he was imposing preliminary tariffs of 11.8 percent on solar panels imported from China, saying the panels were being "dumped," sold for less than they cost to make, in Europe.If China was trying to send a retaliatory signal to Mr. De Gucht personally, wine might be a good target. He owns a 50 percent stake in a wine-producing estate in the Tuscany region of Italy.The Chinese commerce ministry carefully avoided linking the solar panels to Wednesday's announcement that it would investigate European wines for improper duties or subsidies, saying instead that it was acting in response to a complaint from Chinese wineries.But the ministry issued a separate statement expressing "resolute opposition" to the decision on solar panels. "We hope the E.U. will further show their sincerity and show flexibility, through consultations to find mutually acceptable solutions," the statement said.The 27 countries of the European Union exported $980.7 million worth of wine to China last year, most of it from France, according to customs data compiled by Global Trade Information Services in Columbia, S.C. That is much smaller than Chinese exports of solar panels to Europe, which reached $27 billion in 2011 before a combination of trade frictions and cuts in European subsidies to buyers of solar panels started to discourage shipments.President François Hollande of France called on Wednesday for officials from all 27 countries to meet and form a united position on trade policy toward China, while France's trade ministry labeled the Chinese action as "reprehensible."Threatening to retaliate against fine wines during a trade dispute with the European Union is a time-honored tactic for international trade negotiators. Wine exporters are a powerful political constituency and national figures in some European countries, particularly France. A threat to limit their overseas sales is a way to bypass European leaders and appeal to public sentiment for a reduction in trade tensions.Mr. De Gucht was already bucking widespread opposition in Europe by taking on Beijing over solar panels, with a range of national politicians and executives from other industries eager to expand — not curtail — trade relations with China.In November 1992, in a dispute over European farm subsidies, the United States announced that it was imposing a 200 percent tax, to take effect in 30 days, on imports of still white wines from Europe, like Chablis from France and riesling from Germany, and a few red wines. The two sides quickly reached a compromise.Until now, China has tended to pursue retaliatory trade actions against industrial products, including imports of polycrystalline silicon, the main material for solar panels. That material is already the subject of a Chinese trade investigation after the United States imposed antidumping and antisubsidy tariffs totaling about 30 percent on Chinese solar panels.The Chinese threat against wine imports has the potential to upset consumers in China — at least some of the most affluent ones. The move may also end up impinging on some Chinese investors because growing wine consumption in China has prompted a surge of investment in French vineyards.In recent years, Chinese companies and business leaders have snapped up more than three dozen chateaus in Bordeaux, the wine region that has drawn the greatest interest from Chinese drinkers.
BEIJING — A fire on a bus in southeastern China has killed 47 people and is being investigated as a "serious criminal case", state media said on Saturday, just days after 120 people died in a fire at a poultry plant.The bus caught fire during rush hour on Friday as it was operating on elevated tracks in the coastal city of Xiamen, the official Xinhua news agency reported, without elaborating on the cause.The case in southeastern China has initially been identified as a "serious criminal case" and further investigations are under way, the report said.Earlier this week a fire at a poultry slaughterhouse in northeastern China killed 120. Authorities said safety management at the plant was a "total mess" and have detained two senior executives.Buses have been targeted before in China.In 2009 a passenger ignited gasoline on a bus in southwestern Chengdu, killing 27 and injuring dozens more. Another 24 people died the same year in a shuttle bus fire in Wuxi, near Shanghai, started by a disgruntled steel worker.In 2005 a 42-year-old farmer with terminal lung cancer set off a home-made bomb aboard a bus in southeastern China, in a suicide attack that wounded 31.
BEIJING — Chinese police said Saturday that they had identified a suspect who might be responsible for the fire that gutted a commuter bus, killing 47 and injuring dozens more during rush hour in a port city in southeastern China.Xiamen police did not provide further details in making the announcement online.The fire ripped through the bus during the Friday evening commute while it traveled on an enclosed and elevated road in the city. A local fire official said emergency responders found bodies piled inside the charred, skeletal bus. The official Xinhua News Agency said Saturday that in addition to the 47 dead, 34 people remained hospitalized.Investigators said early Saturday that the fire appeared to be intentionally set, and not an accident, Xinhua reported. Among the clues, Xinhua said, was that investigators found traces of gasoline on the wreckage, though the bus ran on diesel fuel and its oil tank and tires remained intact."It's a serious criminal case," the Ministry of Public Security, the national police agency, said in a statement on its website. Xiamen police declined further comment.China has seen bombings and arson of buses and public buildings in recent years, sometimes by people trying to settle personal scores and also by people with overtly political grievances. In 2009, an unemployed man set fire to a packed bus in the central city of Chengdu, killing himself and 26 others.Xiamen, a prosperous trading port known for centuries in the West as Amoy, was rattled by Friday's fire. The city immediately suspended service of the entire express bus system, known as Bus Rapid Transit, but operations resumed Saturday morning.Witnesses quoted by Xiamen's official news site said they heard sounds of explosions after the fire had been burning for 10 minutes. Photos posed online showed heavy black smoke curling from the burning bus on the elevated road.
BEIJING — Family members of a Chinese activist who fled house arrest and later moved to the U.S. have been granted passports so they can travel outside China, just ahead of a summit between Chinese President Xi Jinping and President Barack Obama.Chen Guangfu, the oldest brother of blind activist Chen Guangcheng, said that the passports for him and their mother, Wang Jinxiang, were delivered Friday and that they were planning to seek visas and visit Chen Guangcheng in New York.Chen Guangfu said local police had denied their earlier passport applications on the grounds that U.S. visas are difficult to obtain.Chen Guangcheng sparked a diplomatic crisis when he escaped house arrest in his rural town in eastern China's Shandong province in April 2012 and sought refuge in the U.S. Embassy in Beijing. Chinese officials later let him move to the U.S. with his wife and children.Since his escape, Chen has criticized China's human rights records, speaking about it before a U.S. congressional committee. He also has complained that Chinese authorities have reneged on assurances made to U.S. diplomats that his relatives would be treated according to the law.His nephew, Chen Kegui, was sentenced to 39 months in jail after he clashed with local officials who stormed into his parents' house in the wake of the activist's escape. Chen family supporters say the prosecution and sentence were retribution for the embarrassment the case has caused Chinese officials.Last month, Chen Guangfu complained that he and his family were subject to constant harassment by local thugs who beat him, distributed flyers with insulting language and tossed dead animals into the family yard. On Friday, the elder brother said the harassment has ceased.Obama and Xi are scheduled to hold talks in California on Friday and Saturday.
BEIJING — The man who once ran China's powerful railways ministry wept as he admitted his guilt and sought leniency at his trial on corruption charges, one of the country's highest-level graft cases in years.Liu Zhijun, 60, who oversaw the ministry's high-profile bullet train development, has been accused of taking massive bribes and steering lucrative projects to associates. The case is seen as an indicator of how top-level officials might fare in an anti-corruption campaign that Chinese leader Xi Jinping has vowed will target both high and low officials.The case presents a thorny challenge to the Chinese government, which wants to appear tough on graft but is mindful of how the prosecution of a massive case like Liu's could further hurt public confidence in the railways system. Such a case raises questions of whether the corruption affected the construction, management and operation of the railways that serve millions of Chinese every day.Liu's defense attorney, Qian Lieyang, said after Sunday's trial that his client admitted guilt and expressed remorse during the proceedings, weeping as he read out a personal statement. Qian also said he asked the court to consider Liu's contributions in spearheading the much-admired high-speed train system when drawing up the sentence.Even prosecutors asked the court for lenience on Liu's behalf, saying that he showed a positive attitude during investigations and confessed to many wrongdoings on his own accord, Qian told reporters.Qian's account of the prosecution's approach suggests that authorities were trying to lay the legal groundwork for delivering a sentence that would be appear tough on corruption, while not being too severe on a person whose name is so closely tied with the high-speed railways — a source of national pride."When the court makes a decision on sentencing, I hope it will consider his contributions to the country," Qian said.Liu went on trial at Beijing No. 2 Intermediate People's Court amid relatively tight security. Police cars were parked around the court's perimeter and officers stood on the sidewalk to prevent onlookers from getting close to the entrance or to a group of reporters gathered outside. Court officials and police told foreign journalists to leave the premises.The trial concluded by midday Sunday. The official Xinhua News Agency reported that prosecutors accuse Liu of using his position of influence to help about 11 business associates win promotions and project contracts and accepted 64.6 million Chinese yuan ($10.5 million) in unspecified bribes between 1986 and 2011."Liu's malpractice led to huge losses of public assets and damage to the interests of the state and people," the indictment said, according to Xinhua.State broadcaster China Central Television showed Liu, a thin, bespectacled man with a comb-over, being escorted into a courtroom and standing during part of the procedure, his face expressionless.Qian said he had argued for the severity of the charges to be reduced on the basis of Liu's remorseful attitude, his contributions to national development and questions over whether part of the bribery charges actually amounted to bribery by legal definition,The court said it would announce a verdict at a later, unspecified date.Liu was ousted in February 2011 for unspecified discipline violations. Months later, a high-speed train crash killed 40 people near the eastern Chinese city of Wenzhou.Earlier this year, Beijing dismantled the Ministry of Railways and separated its regulatory and commercial arms in a bid to reduce bureaucracy and boost efficiency.
BEIJING — China's former railways minister, Liu Zhijun, went on trial on Sunday charged with corruption and abuse of power, state media said, in a case which will demonstrate newly installed President Xi Jinping's resolve to crack down on pervasive graft.State radio said the trial had begun at a Beijing courthouse under heavy security. It provided no details.The trial may be over quite quickly, judging by similar graft cases in the past, and the verdict should come out within the next two weeks or so.Liu was formally charged in April with abuse of power, taking bribes and malpractice, according to previous reports by state media.Liu took bribes and misused his position to help the chairman of an investment company get illegal profits, according to previous accusations leveled by state media.In January, Xi said anti-corruption efforts should target low-ranking "flies" as well as powerful "tigers".But the effort has netted only a few high-ranking violators so far, among them Sichuan province deputy Communist Party boss Li Chuncheng and reportedly Politburo member Li Jianguo, both for "serious" disciplinary issues.China's railway system has faced numerous problems over the past few years, including heavy debts from funding new high-speed lines, waste and fraud.The government has pledged to open the rail industry to private investment on an unprecedented scale.The ministry suffered a big blow to its image when a crash in 2011 between two high-speed trains killed 40 people.Liu was sacked in February last year and later expelled from the Communist Party. He had successfully resisted a merger with the Ministry of Transport six years ago, but the government announced in March that the two ministries would be merged.While Liu's case attracted much attention when it first broke, it has been overshadowed by the much more sensational case of the former party chief of Chongqing, the ambitious Bo Xilai.Bo's downfall last year amid lurid accusations of murder and diplomatic intrigue caused division and uncertainty as the party prepared a transfer of power to a new generation of leaders.The government has yet to announce a trial date for Bo, or what charges he will face.
HUAIROU, China — A court sentenced the brother-in-law of China's imprisoned Nobel Peace Prize winner Liu Xiaobo to 11 years in prison Sunday — an unusually harsh punishment for a business dispute that the activist's wife immediately decried as a vendetta against the whole family.The court in suburban Beijing found Liu Hui guilty of fraud in a real estate dispute and issued the sentence after a brief hearing that came just hours after new Chinese leader Xi Jinping met with President Barack Obama at an informal summit in California.Liu Xia, the defendant's sister and the Nobel laureate's wife who is herself under house arrest but who was allowed to attend the trial, said she has seen no improvement in China's human rights situation under Xi despite hopes for political reform under his leadership."Judging from what has happened to my family and the type of life I have lived in the past two years, I cannot say I have seen any improvements, I cannot see any hope," she said.Liu Xia said authorities in China were being unscrupulous in persecuting her family, and wept as she briefly stood and spoke to reporters outside a car that was bringing her home from the hearing."How can they give an 11-year sentence? That does not stand. I do not know, perhaps this country has gone mad, or do they hate us so much?" she said. "My brother, my brother."Family members and their supporters have said the prosecution of Liu Hui is meant as further punishment of the Nobel laureate's family and is intended to intimidate other political activists.Liu Xiaobo was arrested in 2008 and soon after he was awarded the Nobel in 2010 for his campaigning for peaceful democratic change, his wife, Liu Xia, who is a poet and activist, was placed under house arrest. In the two-and-a-half years since, she has rarely been allowed out in public, kept in an apartment without phone or Internet connections to prevent her from becoming a rallying point for other activists.The 11-year sentence for a business dispute is harsh even by Chinese standards and matches the 11 years Liu Xiaobo is currently serving for authoring a programmatic call for democracy. Fraud is usually punishable by up to 10 years in jail, though judges — who answer to the ruling Communist Party — have discretion to issue longer terms for egregious cases.The arrest of her brother, Liu Hui, in February was seen as retaliation against Liu Xia after she twice spoke out — once to reporters for The Associated Press and once to other activists who managed to sneak past security and visit her apartment.An EU diplomat who attended the proceedings, Raphael Droszewski, said the EU was "concerned that Liu Hui's persecution and conviction might have been linked with the situation of his sister Liu Xia, Liu Xiaobo's wife.""The EU reiterates its call to the Chinese authorities to release Liu Xiaobo," he said, echoing calls from many foreign governments, including the United States, for the release of the Nobel peace laureate.Lawyers for the brother said he and another business partner were accused of pocketing 3 million yuan ($500,000) that was claimed by another party to the transaction. According to the lawyers, the money has since been returned, and police after first investigating the case last fall dropped it and then revived the charges early this year.Chinese courts do not usually publicize their argument, and Liu's case, in particular, has not been covered by state media, which usually do not report news about political dissidentsAfter Sunday's sentencing hearing, Liu Xia, said her brother has lost a lot of weight while in detention.
BEIJING — A suicidal man started a fire on a bus in China that killed 47 people, state media said on Saturday, a disaster that came just days after 120 people died in a fire at a poultry plant.The bus caught fire during the rush hour on Friday as it was on elevated tracks in the coastal city of Xiamen, the Ministry of Public Security said, labeling it a "serious criminal case".State television said Xiamen resident Chen Shuizong started the fire. A suicide note was found at his home and he was among those killed, it said."Chen Shuizong felt his life was not as he wished it and he was profoundly pessimistic, so he gave vent to his anger by setting the fire," the television added in a brief report.On Monday, a fire at a poultry slaughterhouse in northeastern China killed 120 people. Authorities said safety management at the plant was a "total mess" and have detained two executives.President Xi Jinping, visiting California for a summit with U.S. President Barack Obama, demanded his government pay closer attention to preventing fires, the Xinhua news agency said."Life is precious, and lives cannot be sacrificed in the pursuit of development," it cited him as saying. "Lessons must be learned from this spilling of blood and bitter experience."Buses have been targeted before in China.In 2009 a passenger lit petrol on a bus in Chengdu, killing 27 people and injuring dozens. Also that year, 24 people died in a shuttle bus fire in Wuxi, near Shanghai, started by a disgruntled steel worker.In 2005 a 42-year-old farmer with terminal lung cancer set off a crude bomb on a bus in a suicide attack that wounded 31.
BEIJING — A former Chinese railways minister goes on trial for corruption Sunday in one of the country's biggest graft cases in years, charged with taking massive bribes and steering the awarding of highly lucrative projects.The Beijing Second Intermediate People's Court told the official Xinhua News Agency that it will hear the case against 60-year-old Liu Zhijun, who spearheaded China's showcase bullet train network when he oversaw the powerful ministry.Sunday is a work day in China because of rescheduling to accommodate an upcoming national holiday.Liu's lawyer, Qian Lieyang, confirmed the trial date and said he plans to argue for the charges to be reduced to misdemeanors during the trial.Prosecutors have said Liu — as a government functionary — sought benefits for others by taking advantage of his position and accepting financial incentives from others.They say Liu engaged in malpractices for personal gain and abuse of power, leading to huge losses of public property.Liu was ousted in February 2011 for unspecified discipline violations. Months later, a high-speed train crash killed 40 people near the eastern Chinese city of Wenzhou.Earlier this year, Beijing dismantled the Ministry of Railways and separated its regulatory and commercial arms in a bid to reduce bureaucracy and boost efficiency.
BEIJING — The mother and older brother of Chen Guangcheng , a prominent rights advocate who fled to the United States last year, were both granted Chinese passports on Friday, allowing them to start applying for visas to travel to the United States to see Mr. Chen.His mother, Wang Jinxiang, and brother, Chen Guangfu, had applied for passports before but had been rejected, the brother said. Their most recent application, filed on May 27, was approved.To go to the United States, the two now need to get visas from the American Embassy in Beijing and buy airplane tickets.Mr. Chen said his mother had wanted to go to the United States to visit Chen Guangcheng since the spring of 2012, when he escaped from house arrest in the area of Linyi, in Shandong Province, and sought shelter in the American Embassy in Beijing before Chinese leaders eventually allowed him to go to the United States.Local officials in Linyi had kept him, his wife and their daughter under house arrest and intense harassment even after Mr. Chen, who is blind, had finished serving a four-year prison sentence for property destruction and organizing a mob to block traffic in 2010. Many say the sentence had been imposed for political reasons."I was very surprised to receive the passports today," Chen Guangfu said. He added that he would talk to his brother and review his family's personal finances before deciding when to go to the United States.Hu Jia, a well-known rights advocate who recently completed a prison sentence, posted photographs of the two passports on Twitter.The granting of the passports appears to be another concession made by the Chinese government in the prelude to a summit meeting between President Xi Jinping, the Communist Party leader, and President Obama in California.It is Mr. Xi's first trip to the United States since taking over last year as party leader. This week, Hu Zhicheng, an American engineer and entrepreneur who had been prevented from leaving China for five years after getting into a dispute with a Chinese business associate, returned home to Los Angeles after being released by the Chinese authorities. Mr. Hu was born in China but had become a naturalized American citizen.Chen Guangcheng had been keeping in touch with his family in Linyi through a telephone line that American officials had insisted be installed during negotiations with their Chinese counterparts.Chen Guangfu said Chinese officials recently cut off the line. Mr. Chen then bought a cellphone and regularly spoke with his brother in the United States that way.Chen Guangcheng's nephew Chen Kegui is still serving a three-year prison sentence for assault. Mr. Chen had slashed at a local official with a knife after officials tried to enter his home at night to look for Chen Guangcheng about the time of his escape.Chen Guangcheng's flight became the subject of an intense diplomatic standoff between the United States and China. It occurred at a particularly delicate time, when Hillary Rodham Clinton, the secretary of state at the time, was arriving in Beijing to engage in standard diplomatic talks with China.She and other senior State Department officials spent long hours trying to persuade the Chinese to allow Mr. Chen and his immediate family to leave the country for the United States after he expressed fears that he and his family would suffer further harassment if they remained in the country.Mr. Chen settled in downtown Manhattan and began studying English to attend law school at New York University, under an arrangement made by Jerome A. Cohen, a law professor at New York University and longtime friend. Mr. Chen now has a book contract to write a memoir.
HONG KONG — Rising operating costs and slumping commodity prices continue to create problems for global mining companies.The latest to come under pressure is Newcrest Mining, Australia's biggest gold miner, which said Friday it would write down assets worth 6 billion Australian dollars, or $5.7 billion, and scale back planned spending on exploration and new projects.Newcrest, which has gold mines in Australia, Papua New Guinea, Indonesia and Ivory Coast, said its moves were the result of ''the current market environment and outlook, including a recent sharp deterioration in the gold price, the largest in 30 years.'' The company also blamed rising costs and the strong Australian dollar.Large miners of ore and other raw materials have been drastically scaling back spending and dropping plans for new projects in recent months. BHP Billiton and Rio Tinto, two of the world's biggest mining companies, announced the departures of long-serving chief executives early this year after a number of financial setbacks.While revenue at the world's 40 biggest mining companies in 2012 was basically unchanged from the previous year at $731 billion, net profits fell 49 percent, to $68 billion, according to a report released Friday by the consulting firm PricewaterhouseCoopers. Forecast 2013 capital expenditure by the companies of $110 billion is 21 percent lower than spending for last year, the report said.''While longer-term demand fundamentals remain, mining companies need to handle rising costs, increasingly volatile commodity prices and other challenges such as resource nationalism, in order to regain investor confidence,'' Ken Su, the China mining practice leader at PricewaterhouseCoopers, said in a news release accompanying the report.Producers of a wide range of metal products are also struggling. On Wednesday, the Aluminum Corp. of China, known as Chalco, said that because of weak market conditions, it would impose a temporary shutdown of 420,000 tons of production capacity, equal to 9 percent of the company's output of primary aluminum products last year.Newcrest's problems are more directly tied to the dynamics of the global gold market. While demand from the two biggest consumers of gold, India and China, is expected to hold steady, the price of gold has been subject to high volatility in recent months.The price of gold has recovered some of the ground that was lost during a sudden, two-day rout in April, when the price fell 13 percent. But at $1,410 per ounce, the price is down 16 percent so far this year, and 21 percent since October, when the downtrend began.Shares in Newcrest closed down 7.6 percent Friday after it announced the plans to reduce capital expenditure in the financial year beginning in July to 1 billion dollars, down from a previous goal of 1.5 billion dollars. The company also said it would reduce outlays for exploration by about half, to 85 million dollars.Newcrest said it was aiming for gold production of 2 million to 2.3 million ounces in the coming financial year, an increase of 4 percent, based on the middle of the range.Australia was the world's second-biggest producer of gold after China last year, with output of 276 tons.
BEIJING — An unemployed man intent on killing himself set off an explosion that engulfed a bus in flames and killed 47 people in the southeastern city of Xiamen on Friday, according to reports on Saturday by state-run news organizations.The reports identified the man as Chen Shuizong, who was about 60 and impoverished. He had written a suicide note in which he expressed deep frustration, said the reports, which were based on details of the investigation released by officials in Xiamen. Mr. Chen was believed to have died in the explosion.Southern Daily, the official newspaper of Guangdong Province, posted on its microblog a photograph of the man identified as Mr. Chen. He is seen pulling a bag behind him. The picture appeared to have been taken by an overhead security camera in the bus depot or on a street near it.The state news agency Xinhua said earlier on Saturday that the explosion was believed to be a "serious criminal case." It occurred at 6:20 p.m. Friday, at the height of the rush hour. Ninety people were aboard the bus, which was part of Xiamen's Bus Rapid Transit system. Thirty-four people were hospitalized.Of those, seven were students. There were 15 students on board the bus, and eight were still unaccounted for, Xinhua reported.The Xinhua article did not say exactly how the bus explosion was caused. It said that the bus had a diesel engine and that Mr. Chen might have used gasoline. The tires and oil tank of the bus were not damaged before the explosion, Xinhua said.A photograph accompanying the Xinhua article showed a vehicle in flames on an elevated highway that runs through Xiamen. Dark smoke billowed from the wreckage. The accompanying caption said the explosion occurred near the Jinshan bus stop.Xiamen is on the southeast coast of China, in Fujian Province, and is considered one of the most livable cities in a country full of congested and polluted urban centers. Many prominent Chinese have worked and lived there at some point in their careers. Xi Jinping, the new leader of the Communist Party, served as Xiamen's vice mayor during his many years climbing the party ladder. Hu Shuli, a well-known journalist who founded Caixin, an investigative magazine, worked there for a state-run newspaper.In 1999, a corruption scandal involving many politicians and businessmen was uncovered in Xiamen. The scandal centered on smuggling operations run by Lai Changxing, a local entrepreneur who had founded a company called Yuanhua. Some of China's top politicians were implicated in the scandal.As of the 2010 census, Xiamen had a population of 3.5 million. The Xinhua report said that more than 265,000 trips are made daily on the city's bus system.There have been other deadly attacks on civilians in Chinese cities in recent years. In May 2011, at least two people were killed and six hurt in explosions at government office buildings in the city of Fuzhou, in Jiangxi Province. State news media reports said the explosions had been caused by a farmer angry at local officials; the farmer's home had apparently been demolished to make room for a highway.In May 2008, an explosion during the morning rush on a bus in Shanghai killed at least three people and wounded at least 12, according to state news media reports. In July 2008, bombs exploded in two buses in Kunming, the capital of Yunnan Province, killing at least two people. The explosions in both cities, along with violence in the western region of Xinjiang, raised security concerns before the 2008 Beijing Summer Olympic Games.Five days after the Kunming attack, a group called the Turkestan Islamic Party, which claims to be a jihadist group working for the liberation of Xinjiang, where many ethnic Uighurs are frustrated by the policies of the ruling ethnic Han, put out a video claiming responsibility for the explosions in Kunming and Shanghai.Chinese officials said their investigations showed that the group was not responsible for the attacks, but it was unclear who had carried them out.
HONG KONG — Chinese exports showed only modest growth in May, rising just 1 percent from a year earlier, officials said Saturday, an increase that was much lower than analysts' expectations.In April, the increase was 14.7 percent, a figure that was believed to have been artificially inflated. Before Saturday's figure came out, analysts expected Chinese exports to have risen at least 7 percent in May.Concern is rising about the sputtering Chinese economy and tightening liquidity. The European Union, China's biggest trading partner, remains mired in a stubborn economic downturn, while in the United States, China's next-largest export market, the Federal Reserve has recently been sending signals it may start curtailing its stimulative monetary policies.China's figures showed it had a trade surplus of $20.4 billion in May, up from $19.3 billion, as imports declined 0.3 percent, the Customs Administration said. The drop in imports — however slight — was a possible sign of weakness in the domestic economy.Chinese stocks declined last week, their first weekly decline in six weeks, amid signs of tightening liquidity within China. A clearer picture of the Chinese economy is expected Sunday, when the government releases data on retail sales, industrial output and inflation.Economists had expected the May figures to show a slowdown, as the government has begun a campaign to prevent companies from overstating their exports. Many businesses are believed to have done so in March and April as a way to bypass currency controls and bring more money into the country to speculate on further appreciation of China's renminbi.The main evidence for such strategies lay in official statistics showing soaring exports to Hong Kong and bonded export zones on the mainland even as exports to the rest of the world from these places remained weak.Louis Kuijs, an economist in the Hong Kong office of the Royal Bank of Scotland, had estimated in May that more than half of the officially reported growth of 14.7 percent in April from a year earlier was the result of companies' manipulating their statistics to place bets on the Chinese currency. The true rate of export growth in April, without the effects of these strategies, was more like 5.7 percent.The sharp slowdown in export growth in May "in part reflects the impact of a clampdown by the government on firms dressing up financial inflows as exports," Mr. Kuijs said in an e-mail on Saturday.Chinese customs data compiled by CEIC Data in Hong Kong showed that the mainland's exports to Hong Kong were up only 7.7 percent in May from a year earlier. In April, they had been up 57.2 percent from the same month last year, and in March they had been up 92.9 percent.Changing expectations about China's currency — fewer businesspeople now expect further appreciation — may have also reduced the incentive for companies to overstate exports, Mr. Kuijs said.
HONG KONG — The American intelligence contractor who disclosed U.S. government surveillance programs fled to Hong Kong because he believed he wouldn't get a fair trial in his home country, the journalist who broke the story said Monday.Glenn Greenwald of the British-based Guardian newspaper said Edward Snowden chose the semiautonomous Chinese region because it was the least bad option open to him.Greenwald said in an interview that Snowden wants to remain out of the "clutches" of the U.S. government for as long as possible but is fully aware that he won't succeed.Snowden says he worked as a contractor at the National Security Agency and the CIA.He allowed the Guardian and The Washington Post newspapers to reveal his identity on Sunday as the source of a series of top-secret documents outlining two NSA surveillance programs.The Guardian reported that Snowden arrived in Hong Kong on May 20. He checked out of the Mira Hotel on Monday and his current location is unclear.The Justice Department is conducting a criminal investigation into the leaks at the request of the NSA."If the Justice Department does end up indicting him, which almost certainly it will — it's basically inevitable at this point — he doesn't really trust the judicial system in the United States to give him a fair trial," Greenwald said in Hong Kong."I think if he trusted the political system and the political culture in the United States he would have just remained there and said 'I did what I did and I want to defend it,'" Greenwald said.He said Snowden chose Hong Kong because it has a history of strong political activism, free speech and respect for the rule of law. But he added that once Snowden decided to leak the information, "all of the options, as he put it, are bad options. There were no good options for him."Hong Kong, a former British colony, was handed back to China in 1997 but was allowed to retain a high degree of autonomy and its own legal system. The city has an extradition treaty with the U.S., but it contains some exceptions, including for crimes deemed political.Greenwald said Snowden had watched with concern the court martial of Bradley Manning, the U.S. Army private on trial for handing a trove of classified material to WikiLeaks, and that it had raised fears for him about secrecy and "abridgement of due process."Snowden, 29, believes he will eventually end up with the same fate as Manning, Greenwald said."I think that his goal is to avoid ending up in the clutches of the U.S. government for as long as he can, knowing full well though that it's very likely that he won't succeed and he will end up exactly where he doesn't want to be," Greenwald said.Snowden told The Guardian that he hoped for asylum in Iceland, which he believed was a champion of Internet freedom, though Greenwald said as far as he was aware, he hadn't filed a claim for asylum anywhere.When asked why Snowden didn't just head to Iceland, Greenwald said he was unsure but guessed that because the North Atlantic nation is a small country, it would find it much more difficult to say no to the United States than Beijing or Hong Kong."There's a lot of history in terms of small Scandinavian countries or small countries in Europe succumbing to U.S. demands and doing things that are contrary to their values or even their law," Greenwald said. "I think he feels that won't happen here."It's unclear how Snowden, who earned $200,000 a year while working at Booz Allen Hamilton Holding Corp., was funding his stay in Hong Kong. Greenwald said he had been "living on credit cards essentially for the last several weeks."But he added that since Snowden revealed his identity, he has been contacted by "countless people" offering to pay for "anything he might need."
BEIJING — China's astronauts have braved the tension of docking with a space station and performed delicate tasks outside their orbiting capsule, but now face a more down-to-earth job that is perhaps equally challenging: Talking to young people about science.Three Chinese astronauts will take flight this week, on Tuesday if weather permits, aboard a Shenzhou spacecraft to dock with China's Tiangong 1 space lab. On the heels of Canadian astronaut Chris Hadfield's wildly popular YouTube videos from the International Space Station, the Chinese crew plans to deliver a series of talks to students from aboard the Tiangong.The lectures come as China's human space program enters its second decade, after going from a simple manned flight to space lab link-ups in a series of methodically timed steps in just 10 years. Meanwhile, its American rival, now in its sixth decade of putting people into space, continues its routine work on the International Space Station and long-term plans to go to an asteroid and eventually Mars."China is in space for the long haul. The U.S. ignoring that and refusing to work with China will neither stop them nor slow them down," said Joan Johnson-Freese, an expert on the Chinese space program at the U.S. Naval War College.The Shenzhou 10 spacecraft — its name means "sacred vessel" — is to be launched aboard a Long March 2F rocket, a safer and more reliable version of that used in previous missions. It will transport the crew for a 12-day stay aboard the Tiangong 1, which functions as an experimental prototype for a much larger Chinese space station to be launched in 2020.The space classrooms mark the boldest step so far to bring the military-backed program into the lives of ordinary Chinese and follows in the footsteps of NASA, which uses student outreach to inspire interest in space exploration and sustain support for its budgets. Thus far, Chinese astronauts have been paraded before the public at rallies and other events, but they've had almost no genuine interaction with ordinary Chinese.The three-member team, announced on state media Monday and including one woman, will also conduct tests on the station's docking and life support systems, probing them for possible problems to be corrected in the design for the larger space station.Although two Chinese spacecraft, one of them crewed, have already docked with the Tiangong, or "heavenly palace," since it was launched in September 2011, China's space program says its space station remains in mint condition.China launched its first crewed mission, the Shenzhou 5, in October 2003, becoming the third nation after Russia and the U.S. to achieve that feat. The upcoming mission would be China's fifth crewed spaceflight.Starting in 1992, China has trained a corps of 21 astronauts, including a younger cadre of seven men and women recruited over the past three years. Shenzhou 10's sole female member is Wang Yaping, a 35-year-old air force pilot whose earlier duties included seeding clouds in an attempt to clear the skies for the 2008 Beijing Summer Olympic Games.Since the first 2003 manned mission, China has largely replicated the achievements of the U.S. and Russian programs but with updated technology and methodology. A single-man mission was followed by a two-man flight, then a pair of three-person flights, including the Shenzhou 9 that docked with the station and carried China's first female astronaut into orbit.Though China has conducted fewer launches than the earlier U.S. and Soviet programs, it has recorded greater strides with each one, partly as a result of not having to conquer the great unknowns that challenged those programs."They don't have to reinvent the basic technologies for spaceflight," said Morris Jones, an Australian writer and space analyst who monitors the Chinese program.While the material benefits of the Chinese program aren't always clear, it has brought China considerable international prestige, stimulated interest in science and engineering programs, and helped the military master new technologies in rocketry and remote guidance systems, Johnson-Freese said.It also has allowed China to show some technical prowess and break away "from the image of a country that is best at producing knock-off designer shoes and handbags," she said.The latest mission marks a turning point for the manned space program as it now shifts its target to launching the larger, three-module permanent station, Tiangong 2, seven years from now. The previous two missions to Tiangong 1 were considered experiments. From Shenzhou 10 on, they'll be treated as regular shuttle missions.The future station will weigh about 60 tons, slightly smaller than NASA's Skylab of the 1970s and about one-sixth the size of the 16-nation International Space Station. China was barred from participating in the International Space Station, largely on objections from the United States over political differences and the Chinese program's close links with the military.In the meantime, China is turning its attention to sending a rover to the moon. That could be followed by a crewed lunar mission if officials decide to combine the human spaceflight and lunar exploration programs, as Johnson-Freese says they are now considering doing.China will focus for now on development of the Long March 5 heavier-lift rocket needed to launch the Tiangong 2, said Charles Vick, an expert on the Chinese and Russian space programs at GlobalSecurity.org."The focus is now shifting from the near-term to those future systems," Vick said, adding that the military continues to dictate priorities. "China's space program has been a very deliberately focused effort that focuses on specific science and technology goals."
BEIJING — Bruno Paumard, the cellar master at a vineyard in China, cannot stop laughing while describing a bottle of supposedly French wine a friend gave him two years ago.It was white wine with a label proclaiming it was from the vineyards of Romanée-Conti; the bottle bore the logo that is on bottles of Château Lafite-Rothschild, declaring its origin as Montpellier in southern France.Domaine de la Romanée-Conti, better known for highly prized and highly priced vintages from the Burgundy region of France, makes only a tiny amount of white wine, labeled Montrachet. It has nothing to do with the equally prestigious Lafite, which is from the Bordeaux region, and neither brand is produced anywhere near Montpellier."It's the most magnificent example of a hijacked brand of wine I've ever seen," said Mr. Paumard, who works with Chateau Hansen in the Chinese desert region of Inner Mongolia. "It doesn't get better than that."Liquor stores, restaurants and supermarkets in China, the world's most populous nation and one of the biggest wine consumers, wage a constant battle against fake wines. The number of knockoffs on the market may increase as Beijing investigates wine imports from the European Union, threatening anti-dumping tariffs or import curbs.China announced the investigation last week after the Union slapped anti-dumping duties on Chinese solar panels."More expensive wine is O.K. I just don't want any fakes," said Helen Nie, a Beijing housewife sharing a bottle of the Italian house white wine at a restaurant with a friend. "If the cost goes up, I'd still buy wine, though some people wouldn't — the price makes a difference. But the quality is important; it's a health question."E.U. wine exports to China reached 257.3 million liters, or 67.9 million gallons, in 2012 for a value of nearly $1 billion, more than a tenfold increase since 2006 as rapidly increasing wealth has transformed lives and tastes in the world's fastest-growing major economy. More than half of the 2012 total, about 139.5 million liters — came from France.Nobody knows how much of the market is cornered by fakes and copycats, said Jim Boyce, who follows the Chinese wine industry on his blog, Grape Wall of China. "Things that are faked tend to be things that are very popular," Mr. Boyce said.And wine, especially expensive wine, is popular in China, sometimes more for bragging rights than taste."Those expensive wines are where you see more fakes," said Maggie Wang, who was sharing the house wine from Sardinia at the Beijing restaurant with Ms. Nie. "But there's lots of phony wine. Everything's faked in China," she said. "For a lot of Chinese consumers, the more expensive it is, the more they'll buy it. Chinese like things like that — they'll buy the most expensive house, drive the most expensive car. They don't want the best, they want the most expensive."Given the high margins and the demand, the counterfeiters tend to focus on European fine wines.The iconic Château Lafite has become the poster child for wine forgery. A bottle of Lafite from 1982, considered one of the greatest vintages of the 20th century, can cost upward of $10,000.That has led to a thriving industry in Lafite knockoffs in China. Aficionados say there are more cases of wine marketed as 1982 Lafite in China than were actually produced by the chateau during that year.However, Christophe Salin, president of Domaines Barons de Rothschild, which owns Lafite-Rothschild, says fake Lafite is not the major problem."I have never seen a bottle of fake '82 Lafite," said Mr. Salin, who has been traveling to China for 20 years."The problem we have is the creative attitude of some Chinese. They sometimes use our name in funny ways," he said in a telephone interview from Paris.Several wines on the market in China are branded with names close to Château Lafite, including Chatelet Lafite. Chatelet is the name of one of the busiest subway stations in Paris.Lafite "is such a generic brand in China that it has widespread appeal as a name and as a status symbol," Mr. Boyce said.The mystique extends beyond the wine — in Beijing, there is a La Fite British Exotic Bar and the Beijing Lafitte Chateau Hotel.The first step for anyone counterfeiting wine is to find or manufacture a bottle that is close to the original."People will also use real bottles with something else inside or make labels that are spelled differently," said Cheng Qianrui, the wine editor for the Chinese lifestyle Web site Daily Vitamin. "If you know wines, you can tell, but not a lot of Chinese do."The 10 percent surge last year in wine imports over 2011 was led by Spain, which accounted for 36 percent of cheaper bulk wine imports to China in 2012, according to Chinese customs figures. Bulk wine accounted for just under half of all wine imports last year.The copyright problems, however, tend to involve the better-known brands.The importer Torres Wines includes Château Mouton-Rothschild, another top-ranked Bordeaux, in its portfolio. Sun Yu, sales director, said phony wine brands like Mouton & Sons or Edouard Mouton popped up in the Chinese market: "It happens in secondary or third-tier cities where they don't have much wine knowledge."Elite winemakers are trying to fight back, sometimes by smashing bottles after tastings, to prevent them from being refilled with fakes for resale.Anti-counterfeiting measures by major international spirit brands, which also fall victim to fakes in China, include bottle buyback programs, tamper-proof caps and the covert tagging of bottles. But such measures are less common with wine brands, according to an executive at an international beverage company in China.Domaines Barons de Rothschild has been putting tamper-proof tags on bottles of Château Lafite and its second label, Les Carruades de Lafite, since the 2009 vintage.But the producer has been protecting its elite bottles since 1996, Mr. Salin, the company president, said, with four other identification techniques that he would not reveal. "If you show me a bottle of Lafite, I can instantly tell you when it was bottled, a lot of things," he said. "To counterfeit it is not easy."
MIAMI — Tracy McGrady 's sleepy eyes always belied his explosive first step and premier skills. But injury and erosion awakened him to the fickle realities of fate and left observers wondering if the eyes had turned from sleepy to sad.McGrady, 34, would most likely have been in decline at this point in his preps-to-pros career no matter what, having entered the N.B.A. in 1997. But would the drop have been so precipitous that McGrady, finally on the grandest stage after continual postseason failure, would be a last-resort substitute?A seven-time All-Star and two-time scoring champion, McGrady gets to play the leading man now only in practice, simulating LeBron James for the San Antonio Spurs in preparation for defending James and the Miami Heat in the N.B.A. finals."Just facilitate the way he does," McGrady, a late-season Spurs signee, said before the Heat evened the series with a 103-84 Game 2 victory on Sunday night. "He has a great I.Q. for the game and a great eye for picking apart defenses, attacking at the right moments. That's pretty much what LeBron does and what I was accustomed to doing."McGrady and the Spurs must have done something right in practice because they contained James in one of the tamest halves of his playoff career. But James began cooking late in the third quarter, the facilitator in full gear. He picked apart San Antonio's defense as the Heat turned a close game into a rout, and he finished with 17 points, 8 rebounds, 7 assists, 3 blocked shots and 3 steals.Even at his best, McGrady was never quite James's equal in impact on a team or stature in the sport. He came into the N.B.A. as a skinny teenager soon to be compared with Scottie Pippen as a shutdown defender. As time went on, he became more known for his scoring, and he was criticized for not carrying a single team beyond the first round of the playoffs.His convincing argument is that it was seldom, perhaps never, his fault. When McGrady left Toronto for Orlando to be part of a star medley, Grant Hill could not stay healthy, and Tim Duncan changed his mind about leaving the Spurs. In Houston, where McGrady was matched with Yao Ming, both had crippling injuries."What ifs?" he said. "That's what you can put on my career."In the finals, it is as if McGrady stepped into an alternative universe of what might have been. Asked if it was a frustrating twist to a career turned upside down, he said: "It is. But I think what I've gone through the last couple of years has prepared me mentally for not having my number called, if it doesn't get called."Playing the final eight minutes of a blowout Sunday was not what he had in mind, but McGrady did close the game when Spurs Coach Gregg Popovich pulled his starters to retrench for Game 3 in San Antonio on Tuesday night. He had two rebounds, two assists and a blocked shot. For what it was worth, he was part of finals history, a long way from where he was months ago.After sustaining a severe knee injury with Houston five years ago, he bounced around the league and finally out this season, all the way to Asia, where he averaged 25 points, 7.2 rebounds and 5.1 assists for Qingdao of the Chinese Basketball Association. He went there not as a means of career preservation but more as a forum for self-identification. Level of play notwithstanding, he wanted to again feel like himself."Having the ball in my hands, making exciting plays — China gave me that back, to be able to be celebrated in the fashion that I'm accustomed to being celebrated on the basketball court," he said.Yes, celebrity can occasionally sound like conceit. It can also be quixotic, capricious, cruel and crazy, even for James, a defending champion. In Game 1, he rang up a triple-double, including 18 rebounds, and heard ridiculous nit-picking that his 18 points were not enough, that he should have shot more and passed less.Here is what James remembered: with Cleveland in 2007, him against the world, he could not get a game off the Spurs.There is always a James critic ready to pounce. Dennis Rodman, of all experts, recently said that had James played in Michael Jordan's era, he would have been your run-of-the-mill star.McGrady rolled his eyes at that, saying of James, "That's definitely overboard because he's probably one of the most gifted athletes that we've ever seen in our game, any era." But on the subject of this era, he said he supported a change in the draft rules, increasing the current ban on high school players from one year to two."When I first came in, I mean, you still had M. J. and them guys in the game," he said while owning up to the contradiction of his position. "You had men. You played with men. Now it's a bunch of boys."Duncan might argue with that, as might Manu Ginobili, Dwyane Wade and even James, 28, who a decade ago was as man-sized a teenager as one could be. That season, 2003-4, McGrady averaged a league-leading 28 points, along with 6 rebounds and 5.5 assists, for the Magic.He was the scoring king, if not the globally acclaimed King whom McGrady has been playing behind closed doors. Sadly for him, few eyes have been watching, and no one has ever been celebrated for stardom in practice.
HONG KONG — After weathering the global financial crisis better than any other large economy, China is now showing signs of slackening growth despite heavy lending from state-owned banks and extensive government investment programs.Industrial production fell last month to its lowest growth rate since last September, data released over the weekend showed. Imports, mainly materials needed by factories, and fixed-asset investment both fell in May to their weakest growth since last August, when the economy was still mired in a sharp but deep summer slowdown.Producer prices, typically measured at the factory gate, have declined year-on-year every month for 15 months in a row and have accelerated downward through March, April and May. Chronic overcapacity has set off price wars even as blue-collar wages continue to rise.The May reports "have confirmed that the economy is stuck in stagnant growth again after quite a brief rebound" over the winter, said Xianfang Ren, a senior economist in the Beijing office of IHS, a global consulting firm. "Demand-side indicators are unanimously weak, with extremely weak exports growth and continued slide of fixed-asset investment growth."China's difficulties have global significance because the country has emerged as the world's largest consumer of many goods, including items like copper, steel, cars and cellphones.Economists from a number of international organizations and banks have been marking down their forecasts for Chinese economic performance this year, predicting growth of about 7.7 percent. That would be a robust pace by most countries' standards but is weak for China, where many businesses and families became accustomed to double-digit growth over most of the last three decades.Beijing's official target is 7.5 percent growth this year, but the country has often beaten targets in the past. Western economists, however, have long accused China of smoothing its data, understating true growth during boom years but also overstating it during downturns.In interviews over the last month, executives in China described being discouraged about overseas demand, although they are not yet nearly as worried as they were at the bottom of the global financial crisis in 2009. Some are also expressing the beginnings of concern about the health of domestic demand."Our export business has come down from last year and is not great, though still at acceptable levels," said Eric Tang, the sales manager for Suqian Green Glove, a manufacturer of vinyl gloves for medical examinations and food processing in Suqian, in east-central China. "Our domestic business is a small part of our overall activity and is middling along as well."A few executives say they already see considerable distress in their industrial sectors. Zhumadian City Kangmao Arts and Crafts, a 1,500-employee manufacturer of fabric shopping bags and backpacks in central China, has had to cut prices by a fifth in recent months because of lack of demand, particularly from overseas buyers."Our business has dropped greatly since the start of this year," said Wang Xuexin, the vice general manager.All the same, there are still signs of strength in the Chinese economy. Retail sales were up 12.9 percent in May, marginally better than the increase of 12.8 percent in April. Government spending on new rail lines and other infrastructure has also been strong, even as companies have cut back on manufacturing and real estate investments.Some executives say that their companies are fine, even as they acknowledge broader economic troubles. "While our factory is doing all right, many of our peers in the industry have had to deal with problems related to overcapacity and falling prices," said Sam Xu, a sales manager at the Yongkang Yongxin Industry and Trade, a maker of physical fitness equipment in Yongkang, in southeastern China.
HONG KONG — A potential extradition tussle in Hong Kong over an American who has exposed the U.S. government's top-secret surveillance programs could prove to be a test case for civil liberties in the financial hub controlled by China.Edward Snowden, 29, a contractor at the National Security Agency (NSA), chose Hong Kong as the international bolt-hole from where to leak details of the programs, endorsing the city for its "spirited commitment to free speech and the right to political dissent".Since the former British colony's return to Chinese rule in 1997, however, the city's pro-democracy politicians and activists have complained that Beijing has been steadily eroding Hong Kong's freedoms despite constitutional safeguards granting a high degree of autonomy.Packs of reporters continued to stake out hotels across the city on Tuesday but Snowden remained out of sight, a day after he checked out of a luxury hotel in the Kowloon district.Ewen MacAskill, a Guardian journalist who has been in close touch with Snowden in Hong Kong said he had no immediate plans to leave the territory and could be gearing up for a legal fight."I'd imagine there's now going to be a real battle between Washington and Beijing and civil rights groups as to his future," MacAskill told Reuters."They (the United States) could have taken all sorts of actions against him. Now it looks like the only one available to them is an extradition request," he added, declining to give any details of Snowden's movements or whereabouts.In talking up Hong Kong's autonomies and freedoms, Snowden has raised the political stakes should Washington make a formal extradition request, a process that could drag out for months in court.Hong Kong has a long-standing extradition agreement with the United States that has been exercised on numerous occasions since 1998.Snowden could challenge any U.S. extradition request, and also make a claim for political asylum, a course of action that typically takes months, if not years.For the moment, he has a 90-day visa which has about two more months to run. He could seek an extension, with the Hong Kong government having the right of refusal.Legal sources in Hong Kong said Snowden would likely seek representation with lawyers in the city, including two of the most prominent, Philip Dykes and Mark Daly, who have offered free legal services for high profile cases in the past.Dykes, who has worked on extradition and human rights cases, declined to confirm or deny whether he had been approached by Snowden.Daly, speaking by telephone from Geneva, said he wasn't aware of any approach by Snowden, but said he would be willing to represent him if asked.China, so far, hasn't publicly commented on Snowden's case given a three-day public holiday this week. Media coverage of the controversy has also been muted, with the official People's Daily newspaper carrying a headline "National security meets personal privacy, US government's secret surveillance scheme has intrigued discussion."Hong Kong's left-leaning Wen Wei Po newspaper described Snowden as a whistle-blower with an "American conscience".Comments on China's Weibo microblogging service referring to Snowden were not censored."He is an honest man and a fighter and a real American," wrote one microblogger named Mingdao Jijin. "The era of the United States being able to control others but not itself is over."Under the extradition agreement, Hong Kong's leader has the right to refuse the surrender of a person to the United States if it relates to the "defense, foreign affairs or essential public interest."Despite Snowden's value to China as a potential trove of U.S. intelligence, any moves by China to veto a U.S. extradition request could cause serious damage to U.S.-China relations just after a successful summit between President Barack Obama and Chinese President Xi Jinping in California."From a foreign policy perspective, I don't think China would block anything like that. It wouldn't look good," said David Zweig, a Hong Kong-based expert in Chinese politics.
BEIJING — A Chinese manned spacecraft blasted off with three astronauts on board on Tuesday on a 15-day mission to an experimental space lab in the latest step towards the development of a space station.The Shenzhou 10 spacecraft was launched from a remote site in the Gobi desert in China's far west at 5:38 p.m. (0938 GMT) under warm, clear blue skies, in images carried live on state television.Once in orbit, the craft will dock with the Tiangong (Heavenly Palace) 1, a trial space laboratory module, and the two male and one female astronauts will carry out various experiments and test the module's systems.They will also give a lecture to students back on Earth.China successfully carried out its first manned docking exercise with Tiangong 1 last June, a milestone in an effort to acquire the technological and logistical skills to run a full space station that can house people for long periods.President Xi Jinping oversaw Tuesday's launch personally, addressing the astronauts before they blasted off to wish them success, saying he was "enormously happy" to be there."You are the pride of the Chinese people, and this mission is both glorious and sacred," Xi said, according to state media.This mission will be the longest time Chinese astronauts have spent in space, and marks the second mission for lead astronaut Nie Haisheng.It is China's fifth manned space mission since 2003, and was accompanied by the usual outpouring of national pride and Communist Party propaganda, including children dressed as happy ethnic minorities waving off the three at the space centre.However, some wondered why China was spending so much money exploring space when it was still a developing country with a plethora of more pressing issues, from food safety and pollution to the prevalence of workplace fire disasters."Why don't they spend this money solving China's real problems instead of wasting it like this?" wrote one user on China's popular Twitter-like service, Sina Weibo.China's space program has come a long way since late leader Mao Zedong, founder of Communist China in 1949, lamented that the country could not even launch a potato into space.But China is still far from catching up with the established space superpowers, the United States and Russia.Rendezvous and docking techniques such as those which China is only testing now were mastered by the United States and the former Soviet Union decades ago, and the 10.5 meter-long Tiangong 1 is a trial module, not a fully fledged space station.Still, the Shenzhou 10 mission will be the latest show of China's growing prowess in space and comes while budget restraints and shifting priorities have held back U.S. manned space launches.China also plans an unmanned moon landing and deployment of a moon rover. Scientists have raised the possibility of sending a man to the moon, but not before 2020.While Beijing insists its space program is for peaceful purposes, a Pentagon report last month highlighted China's increasing space capabilities and said Beijing was pursuing a variety of activities aimed at preventing its adversaries from using space-based assets during a crisis.Fears of a space arms race with the United States and other powers mounted after China blew up one of its own weather satellites with a ground-based missile in January 2007.
BEIJING — In the capital of tropical Laos, two dozen students who see their future in trade ties with neighboring China spent their school year attending Mandarin classes in a no-frills, rented room. It's the start of China's first, and almost certainly not its last, university campus abroad."There are a lot of companies in Laos that are from China," said 19-year-old Palamy Siphandone. She said she chose the Soochow University branch campus after hearing it would offer scholarships to students with high scores."If I can speak Chinese, I get more opportunities to work with them," she said in a telephone interview during a trip to the eastern Chinese city of Suzhou — the home city of Soochow University.Education officials in China are promoting the notion of the country's universities expanding overseas, tapping new education markets while extending the influence of the rising economic power.China so far has been on the receiving end of the globalization of education, with Western institutions rushing to China to set up shop. Now it's stepping out.In addition to the emerging Laos campus, there are plans for what may become one of the world's largest overseas branch campuses in Malaysia and an agreement by a Chinese university to explore a joint campus with a British university in London."The Chinese government and its universities have been very ambitious in the reform and internationalization of Chinese higher education," said Mary Gallagher, director of the Center of Chinese Studies at University of Michigan."This is partly about increasing China's soft power, increasing the number of people who study the Chinese language and are knowledgeable about China from the Chinese perspective."Chinese universities historically have offered language lessons in foreign countries but usually to serve the overseas Chinese population. In recent years, the Chinese government has set up Confucius Institutes around the globe to promote Chinese culture and language.But full-fledged campuses that can confer degrees are a new experiment. China's Education Ministry declined The Associated Press' request for an interview on the issue, saying the effort was too nascent to discuss yet.The Laos branch of Soochow University, based in Vientiane, is now looking to raise money for a full-fledged campus of 5,000 students, university official Chen Mei said."The national policy wants us to go out, as the internationalization of education comes with the globalization of economy," she said.The Lao campus started as part of an economic development zone between Laos and Chinese governments, then continued after the larger project fell through.China's Xiamen University, based in eastern Fujian province, announced plans early this year to open a branch in Malaysia by 2015 and have annual enrollment of 10,000 by 2020. In May, China's Zhejiang University and Imperial College London signed an agreement to explore options for a joint campus, though the scope and funding are still to be spelled out.Philip G. Altbach, an expert on international higher education at Boston College, warns that Chinese universities might be venturing out too soon."I think that China's top universities have sufficient work to do at home that they do not need to expand into the risky and often expensive world of branch campuses outside of China," Altbach wrote in an e-mail. "China's global influence and prestige in higher education is best served by strengthening its universities at home and offering a 'world class' education to Chinese students and expanded numbers of overseas students."Starting in the 1990s, China — aiming to graduate more college students — began to build new campuses, encourage privatization of higher education and expand enrollment. The rush has been accompanied with criticism that quality has been overlooked by quantity and that Chinese colleges have failed to prepare their students for the job market, or to deliver a well-rounded education.The changes have helped draw international students, whose numbers in mainland China are growing and topped 290,000 in 2011.China also has encouraged its youth to seek education abroad and has invited foreign universities — especially top institutes — to set up joint programs and branch campuses to help meet the demand for quality education.The city of Kunshan in Jiangsu province is building a $260 million campus for Duke University, and New York University will open an outpost in Shanghai with classes to begin in this fall."Many people in higher education in China who are committed to educational reform hope that these moves overseas and also the move of foreign universities to China will create more pressure for reform within Chinese universities," Gallagher said.China maintains a highly specialized approach to university studies that has its roots in the Soviet model, but many Chinese educators want to blend in more liberal education to encourage social morals, civic responsibility, innovation and critical thinking.In Malaysia, where British universities have expanded in recent years, the plans by China's Xiamen University have been lauded by the government, with Prime Minister Najib Razak calling it "historic." The branch campus will likely attract many among Malaysia's large ethnic Chinese minority for courses that will range from economics to chemical engineering and Chinese literature.Ethnic Chinese comprise more than one-fifth of Malaysia's 29 million people, and some of them have complained that their children face difficulties securing places in Malaysian state-backed universities because of affirmative action policies that favor the ethnic Malay majority.Xiamen has roots in the country, in a sense: The university was founded in 1921 by Tan Kah Kee, a business tycoon who made his fortune in Southeast Asia, including what is now Malaysia."It's a giveback from history," Xiamen University President Zhu Chongshi said, as quoted by the national party newspaper People's Daily.The government is squarely behind the efforts by Chinese universities to expand abroad: The signing in China of the Zhejiang University agreement with London's Imperial College was attended by a provincial governor. But universities say they must find the funding for the branches on their own from tuition revenue and private sources.That is in contrast to the Confucius Institutes, which are directly subsidized by Beijing, said Chen of the Laos branch campus.But despite funding challenges, she said she is optimistic about the future of the branch campus in Laos, where she noted there is a growing middle class eager for quality education and keen to do business with China."We do not have to worry about finding students," she said. "There's a huge demand for education here."AP writer Sean Yoong in Kuala Lumpur, Malaysia, contributed to this report.
As unlikely as this may sound, we have lucked out in recent years when it comes to global warming .The rise in the surface temperature of earth has been markedly slower over the last 15 years than in the 20 years before that. And that lull in warming has occurred even as greenhouse gases have accumulated in the atmosphere at a record pace.The slowdown is a bit of a mystery to climate scientists. True, the basic theory that predicts a warming of the planet in response to human emissions does not suggest that warming should be smooth and continuous. To the contrary, in a climate system still dominated by natural variability, there is every reason to think the warming will proceed in fits and starts.But given how much is riding on the scientific forecast, the practitioners of climate science would like to understand exactly what is going on. They admit that they do not, even though some potential mechanisms of the slowdown have been suggested. The situation highlights important gaps in our knowledge of the climate system, some of which cannot be closed until we get better measurements from high in space and from deep in the ocean.As you might imagine, those dismissive of climate-change concerns have made much of this warming plateau. They typically argue that "global warming stopped 15 years ago" or some similar statement, and then assert that this disproves the whole notion that greenhouse gases are causing warming.Rarely do they mention that most of the warmest years in the historical record have occurred recently. Moreover, their claim depends on careful selection of the starting and ending points. The starting point is almost always 1998, a particularly warm year because of a strong El Niño weather pattern.Somebody who wanted to sell you gold coins as an investment could make the same kind of argument about the futility of putting your retirement funds into the stock market. If he picked the start date and the end date carefully enough, the gold salesman could make it look like the stock market did not go up for a decade or longer.But that does not really tell you what your retirement money is going to do in the market over 30 or 40 years. It does not even tell you how you would have done over the cherry-picked decade, which would have depended on exactly when you got in and out of the market.Scientists and statisticians reject this sort of selective use of numbers, and when they calculate the long-term temperature trends for the earth, they conclude that it continues to warm through time. Despite the recent lull, it is an open question whether the pace of that warming has undergone any lasting shift.What to make of it all?We certainly cannot conclude, as some people want to, that carbon dioxide is not actually a greenhouse gas. More than a century of research thoroughly disproves that claim.In fact, scientists can calculate how much extra heat should be accumulating from the human-caused increases in greenhouse gases, and the energies involved are staggering. By a conservative estimate, current concentrations are trapping an extra amount of energy equivalent to 400,000 Hiroshima bombs exploding across the face of the earth every day.So the real question is where all that heat is going, if not to warm the surface. And a prime suspect is the deep ocean. Our measurements there are not good enough to confirm it absolutely, but a growing body of research suggests this may be an important part of the answer.Exactly why the ocean would have started to draw down extra heat in recent years is a mystery, and one we badly need to understand. But the main ideas have to do with possible shifts in winds and currents that are causing surface heat to be pulled down faster than before.The deep-ocean theory is one of a half-dozen explanations that have been proffered for the warming plateau. Perhaps the answer will turn out to be some mix of all of them. And in any event, computer forecasts of climate change suggest that pauses in warming lasting a couple of decades should not surprise us.Now, here is a crucial piece of background: It turns out we had an earlier plateau in global warming, from roughly the 1950s to the 1970s, and scientists do not fully understand that one either. A lot of evidence suggests that sunlight-blocking pollution from dirty factories may have played a role, as did natural variability in ocean circulation. The pollution was ultimately reduced by stronger clean-air laws in the West.Today, factory pollution from China and other developing countries could be playing a similar role in blocking some sunlight. We will not know for sure until we send up satellites that can make better measurements of particles in the air.What happened when the mid-20th-century lull came to an end? You guessed it: an extremely rapid warming of the planet.So, if past is prologue, this current plateau will end at some point, too, and a new era of rapid global warming will begin. That will put extra energy and moisture into the atmosphere that can fuel weather extremes, like heat waves and torrential rains.We might one day find ourselves looking back on the crazy weather of the 2010s with a deep yearning for those halcyon days.
What does a leaker look like? Sometimes, people who reveal secrets remain in the shadows, and the public is left to guess at their motivations, agendas and states of mind.Edward Snowden, the 29-year-old man behind the recent revelations about the National Security Agency's pursuit of phone and computer data, upended that history. He is a new kind of leaker of the wired age: an immediately visible one with a voice and the means to go direct with the public. In a era of friction-free Web communication, he disdained the shadows and stepped into view with a lengthy video interview he gave to The Guardian, which broke the story based on information he provided. He stated his motivation plainly, saying, "The public needs to decide whether these programs and policies are right or wrong."By identifying himself as the leaker, Mr. Snowden is helping to ensure that the debate occurs in the public common and goes beyond a closely held government investigation followed, perhaps, by prosecution. The video, which can be seen by all, means that he will be judged by all in real time.The video presents a portrait of a man who was not a marginal loser lashing out as he flailed in his personal life: he gave up a well-paid job and his life in Hawaii with his girlfriend and is now holed up in a hotel in Hong Kong. At first blush he appears reasonable and careful, which will make him a hard target for those who seek to marginalize him or suggest that his concerns are overblown.Of course, with visibility comes scrutiny. For the time being, the video and his interview with The Guardian are what define Mr. Snowden, but in the coming days, weeks and months, we will learn far more about his personal and professional life, and perhaps a more complicated narrative about his motivations will emerge. For the time being, we only know that he was the source of the leaks and we know his explanation of why he did what he did. Various interested parties will now set about their work, trying to make him out as a hero or a villain as it suits their agendas. And as Mr. Snowden knows better than anyone, any secrets he has will not stay that way for long.It's important to note that Mr. Snowden did not just dump a bunch of unredacted documents on the Web and slink back to his job. He apparently thought a great deal about where the information belonged and contacted Barton Gellman, who had a long and respected career in national security reporting at The Washington Post. According to an article by Mr. Gellman in Monday's Post, Mr. Snowden asked for guarantees about what The Post would print, and when. After The Post said it could not provide any guarantees, according to Mr. Gellman, Mr. Snowden turned to Glenn Greenwald of The Guardian, who has covered national security and secrecy issues in a chronic and ferocious manner. (Mr. Greenwald disputes that timeline, saying he has been in contact with Mr. Snowden since February).In spite of the uproar around WikLeaks and a new age of electronic drop boxes, there has never been a shortage of whistles; what has been in short supply is people to blow them. In this instance, the Web is not just a repository of leaked material, but a means of changing the dynamics of the debate into a two-way affair in which the public has access to the leaker. The administration, in both its public remarks and its investigations into leaks, has tried to portray those who leak as marginal people with nefarious motivations. By using the Web and speaking on his own behalf, Mr. Snowden is not allowing himself to be defined by the government.As a whistle-blower who has come to his own defense, Mr. Snowden has engaged the public as a player in the debate. Social media, most notably Twitter, is alive with commentary about who he is and what he did. What is normally a vacuum — in which the government characterizes the leaker and those who enabled him — is now a dialogue. The debate over secrets has gone viral and as a result, is itself much less secret. In the past, few leakers would have been able to broadcast their messages to the world even before the government and the public had time to absorb the implications of what they did.Mr. Snowden is not the first whistle-blower to draw attention to himself. Daniel Ellsberg, the central figure in the Pentagon Papers affair and one of the historical figures whom Mr. Snowden pointed to as precedents, never hid who he was. Mr. Ellsberg reasoned, correctly as it turned out, that he would be seen as someone who acted in the broader interest of the country even as he divulged its most precious secrets.But Mr. Snowden's visibility in an Internet age is more immediate and more ubiquitous. He is now the face of the opposition to state-sponsored information gathering. Even though he is in Hong Kong, he is everywhere.To those sympathetic to Mr. Snowden's viewpoint, the information he revealed seems all the more disturbing because he comes off as calm and measured. He is a real person, not a shadow, and his arguments, while very open to debate, are based in careful rhetoric.Freedom, the right to privacy and open debate are the rare issues that surpass ideology in a very divided nation. After it was disclosed that the National Security Agency was seizing phone records, Josh Earnest, the White House deputy press secretary, said, "The president welcomes a discussion of the trade-offs between security and civil liberties."That debate has arrived courtesy of Mr. Snowden and will begin in earnest, perhaps not on the terms or on the schedule that the president had in mind. The age of the leaker as Web-enabled public figure has arrived.
HONG KONG — In choosing Hong Kong as an initial place to take refuge from the United States government, the National Security Agency contractor who has acknowledged leaking documents has selected a jurisdiction where it may be possible to delay extradition but not avoid it, legal and law enforcement experts here said.The contractor, Edward J. Snowden, was apparently still in Hong Kong at 12:30 p.m. Monday. The Mira Hotel, an elegant boutique hotel on the Kowloon side of Victoria Harbor, said Monday evening that he had stayed at the hotel but checked out at that time.It was not clear whether Mr. Snowden remained in Hong Kong or left the territory, which is part of China but has a high degree of autonomy. The hotel gave no further information, and the Hong Kong government declined to discuss Mr. Snowden's whereabouts, citing a policy of not commenting on individual cases."All cases will be handled in accordance with the laws of Hong Kong," the government said in a brief statement.The United States Consulate in Hong Kong referred questions to the Justice Department in Washington, which has said only that it is in the initial stages of an investigation into the release of information about government programs to monitor telephone and Internet communications.The Obama administration has said the programs were focused on the communications of people who were not American citizens. But Mr. Snowden asserted in a video interview, released by the Guardian newspaper of Britain on Sunday, that the scale of the surveillance was much broader and involved the recording of a vast array of communications in the United States and elsewhere.Hong Kong was a British colony before its return to Chinese sovereignty in 1997, and it still follows the legal system it inherited from the British, with broad protections for civil liberties. Mr. Snowden told The Guardian that he had fled here because "they have a spirited commitment to free speech and the right of political dissent."But Hong Kong won that reputation mainly as a place where Chinese political dissidents sought refuge from mainland authorities, not people sought by other governments. The Hong Kong authorities have worked closely with law enforcement agencies in the United States for years and have usually accepted requests for extradition under longstanding bilateral agreements, according to Regina Ip, a former secretary of security who is now a member of the territory's legislature."He won't find Hong Kong a safe harbor," Ms. Ip said. "Those agreements have been enforced for more than 10 years. If the U.S. submits a request, we would act in accordance with the law."Nicholas Bequelin, a researcher with Human Rights Watch who is based in Hong Kong, wondered why Mr. Snowden would have considered the territory a good place to stay after he left Hawaii three weeks ago."If he took time to talk with a lawyer, he would have decided somewhere else was a better prospect" to avoid extradition, Mr. Bequelin said. "His explanation of his choice of Hong Kong was a bit off."The Hong Kong Police Force would not arrest him unless he broke a Hong Kong law or the United States issued an Interpol notice or sent a warrant, said Stephen Vickers, a former head of the force's intelligence division who now runs his own risk consulting firm. But he said the police probably began monitoring Mr. Snowden as soon as word spread that he had taken responsibility for the leaks.The Hong Kong authorities have generally been willing to extradite suspects when the United States sends a warrant, said Jonathan Acton-Bond, a barrister and former magistrate who has represented clients in some of the best-known extradition cases here.Hong Kong enforces extradition laws more than other jurisdictions in Southeast Asia, Mr. Acton-Bond said. But Hong Kong did not follow Britain's example after the Sept. 11 attacks of lowering the standard of legal evidence required before approving extradition to the United States. Hong Kong also has legal protections against politically motivated extradition cases, but they have seldom been invoked.
BEIJING — Chinese state security officials have detained a journalist who recently disappeared after completing a documentary on labor camp abuses, the photographer's sister and close friend said Thursday.The detention of Beijing-based video and photojournalist Du Bin, 41, is likely related to his work, said democracy activist Hu Jia, who said he's been a close friend of Du's for more than a decade. Du had recently completed a documentary exposing torture allegedly inflicted on detainees at a notorious labor camp in northeastern China as well as a 600-page book about the 1989 military crackdown on pro-democracy protesters in Beijing, published in Hong Kong.Hu guessed from the timing of Du's detention late last month that authorities were being particularly sensitive during the anniversary of the June 4, 1989, Tiananmen crackdown."His work directly challenged the authorities. They are suppressing him to send a message to others," Hu said.His detention comes amid a broader crackdown on China's small, beleaguered community of rights activists and dissidents launched under new Communist Party chief Xi Jinping. The campaign has dashed hopes that the new leadership might ease controls on civil society."I think that from a larger perspective, there has been no improvement in China's human rights situation since Xi Jinping took power, but in fact since the start of this year ... things have become even more conservative," Hu said.Du Bin's sister Du Jirong said an officer at the local You'anmen police station verbally informed her on Thursday that her brother was being held at a detention center under state security orders. The sister said, however, that the family has not received any official notice about an investigation into Du Bin, who in the past has done freelance photo assignments for The New York Times.A woman who answered the phone at the You'anmen police station confirmed that Du's family had been briefed but said she could not provide details of his case to people who are not his family members. The woman refused to give her name. Calls to the Fengtai District Detention Center, where Du's sister said he was being held, rang unanswered.Hu and Du Jirong said Du Bin was last heard from on May 31 and that his apartment was searched by police the next day.Chinese dissidents have decried what they see as a deterioration in the country's human rights record under Xi's leadership, pointing to detentions of activists calling for officials to declare their assets as well as an ideological offensive to undermine calls for constitutional governance. Activists slammed a Beijing court's ruling on Sunday to jail the brother-in-law of Nobel Peace Prize winner and democracy activist Liu Xiaobo for 11 years over a real estate dispute.
HONG KONG — The former CIA employee who leaked top-secret information about U.S. surveillance programs said in a new interview in Hong Kong on Wednesday that he is not attempting to hide from justice here but hopes to use the city as a base to reveal wrongdoing.Edward Snowden dropped out of sight after checking out of a Hong Kong hotel on Monday. The South China Morning Post newspaper said it was able to locate and interview him on Wednesday. It provided brief excerpts from the interview on its website.It said Snowden, who has been both praised and condemned for releasing documents about U.S. telephone and Internet surveillance programs, said he was "neither a traitor nor hero. I'm an American."Asked about his choice of Hong Kong to leak the information, Snowden said, "People who think I made a mistake in picking Hong Kong as a location misunderstand my intentions. I am not here to hide from justice; I am here to reveal criminality."The newspaper quoted him as saying that he had several opportunities to flee from Hong Kong, but that he "would rather stay and fight the United States government in the courts, because I have faith in Hong Kong's rule of law.""My intention is to ask the courts and people of Hong Kong to decide my fate," he said.Snowden said he plans to stay in the city until he is "asked to leave," the newspaper said.Snowden, 29, arrived in Hong Kong from his home in Hawaii on May 20, just after taking leave from his National Security Agency contracting firm Booz Allen Hamilton, which has since fired him.He said he had not dared contact his family or girlfriend since disclosing that he was the source of the top-secret documents."I have not spoken to any of my family," he told the newspaper. "I am worried about the pressure they are feeling from the FBI."Two FBI agents visited Snowden's father's home in Pennsylvania on Monday.Questions remain about why Snowden chose to go public in Hong Kong, a Chinese autonomous region that maintains a Western-style legal system and freedom of speech.Hong Kong has an extradition agreement with the United States, but there are exceptions in cases of political persecution or where there are concerns over cruel or humiliating treatment.U.S. authorities have yet to bring charges against Snowden or file an extradition request with Hong Kong.Supporters of Snowden have organized a march on Saturday that will pass in front of the U.S. Consulate."We call on Hong Kong to respect international legal standards and procedures relating to the protection of Snowden; we condemn the U.S. government for violating our rights and privacy; and we call on the U.S. not to prosecute Snowden," the organizers said in a statement.
HONG KONG — It was perhaps the most spectacular flight approach in the world: amid mountains, seas and frequently tempestuous winds, aircraft nearing Kai Tak Airport in Hong Kong would stage a stomach-churning right turn, glide over the densely populated Kowloon Peninsula and land on a runway that jutted straight out into the sea.Starting Wednesday, passengers approaching the old runway will do so at crawl speed — and from the sea, rather than from the air. After 15 years of lying idle, the former airport will reopen its gates to the world's travelers — as a cruise ship terminal at the southern end of the old runway.Gleaming silver, and 850 meters, or about half-mile long, the new terminal building has airy immigration and check-in halls reminiscent of, yes, an airport. A large, manicured rooftop garden with 360-degree views of the Hong Kong skyline will open to the public in the next few months. And the terminal's two berths will be able to accommodate the largest cruise ships in the world — behemoths more than 300 meters long that can carry thousands of passengers.The first of those giants — the 15-deck, 310-meter Mariner of the Seas, operated by Royal Caribbean International and carrying more than 3,000 passengers — is scheduled to dock at the terminal Wednesday evening.The new terminal cost 8.2 billion in Hong Kong dollars, or about $1 billion, and was designed by the architectural firm of Norman Foster, whose other designs include plans for the renovation of the New York Public Library. Mr. Foster's firm also designed the larger airport that replaced Kai Tak in July 1998.For now, most of the old airport, including the area where the terminal building once stood, lies empty, the shiny new cruise terminal awkwardly isolated at the far end of the former runway. The nearest neighborhoods — Kwun Tong and Kowloon Bay — are somewhat rundown, and until planned public transportation connections are completed in the coming years, the terminal building's rooftop gardens will be tough for ordinary visitors to reach.While Hong Kong is home to one of the busiest container ports in the world, cruise companies held off factoring the terminal into their itineraries until it was actually finished. Just 19 ships are scheduled to dock at the new terminal in the next 12 months.Still, industry executives say they believe that traffic will gradually increase as cruise activity in Asia picks up, and Hong Kong policy makers see the project as crucial to expanding tourism in the city.Gregory So, the Hong Kong secretary for commerce and economic development, said at a media briefing last week that the new terminal would "greatly enhance the berthing capacity for cruise ships in Hong Kong, thereby enhancing our competitiveness and attractiveness."The decision to convert the old airport site is, in essence, a bet on Asia's growing appetite for travel.Over the last few decades, thanks to rising affluence and improved transport links, Asia has evolved from being primarily a destination for wealthy Westerners to being an increasingly important source of new travelers — Asians journeying to places within the region and beyond. Travel from mainland China, in particular, has soared, making the country both the biggest source of foreign tourists in the world, and the biggest spender in global tourism, according to the World Tourism Organization.This growth has yet to extend into the cruise ship segment, which remains overwhelmingly focused on travel within the Mediterranean and the Caribbean. Just under two-thirds of the roughly 21 million people in the world who will take a cruise this year will come from North America, and about 27 percent will come from Europe, according to Cruise Market Watch, an American firm that compiles data on the industry. Only about 7 percent come from Asia.In part, that is because Asians have only recently begun to approach travel as something that involves relaxation and leisure, rather than an activity focused on shopping and sightseeing, said Liu Zinan, chairman of the Asia Cruise Association and vice president of Asia for Royal Caribbean.The lack of terminals that accommodate cruise ships also has hampered growth in the region."Compared to the Mediterranean and the Caribbean, there is a paucity of destinations for cruise ships to go," said Jeff Bent, managing director of Worldwide Cruise Terminals, which manages the new terminal in Hong Kong. "Cruise lines have fewer options to put together interesting itineraries."That is changing rapidly as port cities and cruise companies race to expand their capacities in the region."The market potential for cruising in Asia is huge as the total potential number of cruise passengers could reach 3.7 million by 2017, and double to over seven million by 2020," said Pier Luigi Foschi, the Asia head of Carnival Cruise Lines, which opened an office in Singapore last month to spearhead its operations in the region.Singapore opened a large new cruise ship terminal last year, which, like the new center in Hong Kong, can handle ships as large as 220,000 tons. The terminal expects 100 ship calls in the coming cruise season, which runs from October to May.In Hong Kong, the debut of the Kai Tak Cruise Terminal opens the city to superlarge cruise liners, which are too large to dock at the existing Ocean Terminal, just across Victoria Harbor from the city's skyscraper-studded financial district.And in mainland China, new operations have been developed in several coastal cities."Hong Kong, Shanghai, Tianjin, Singapore — they are all racing with each other to become leading cruise ports in the region," said Mr. Liu of Royal Caribbean. Hong Kong's geographic location and hotel and transport infrastructures, he added, mean the new terminal will be an important feature on tour operators' itineraries.Anyone who might want to reminisce over the old Kai Tak Airport and its legendary flight approach, however, will have to look elsewhere. The new building retains little of the site's former incarnation, though a park being planned alongside it will have an "aviation theme."
BEIJING — Chinese authorities have arrested an American teacher on suspicion of molesting six children at an international school in Shanghai.Prosecutors in the Pudong district of Shanghai approved the arrest of a 32-year-old man from the United States named David McMahon on charges of child molestation, the city's prosecution office said in a brief notice on its website late Thursday.McMahon is suspected of molesting four girls and two boys, aged 6 to 10, who are all foreign nationals, the official Xinhua News Agency reported. No further details about McMahon were released.Shanghai police said earlier McMahon had been detained May 13, the day after one of the children and her parents reported to police that she had been molested by McMahon several times.Police said in a statement on their official microblog that an investigation showed McMahon was suspected of taking the children alone to the school library or open, empty areas on the pretext of checking their homework, then forcing them to take their clothes off and molesting them.Another 6-year-old child reported having seen McMahon allegedly molesting the child's classmates, the statement said.China has been grappling with a recent spate of child sex abuse cases allegedly involving school teachers or employees. The cases — whose victims have mostly been young girls — have triggered public fury and a pledge by the country's Supreme People's Court to crack down on crimes against children.
HONG KONG — For months, China has tried to turn the tables on the U.S. to counter accusations that it hacks America's computers and networks. Now, former intelligence contractor Edward Snowden may have handed Beijing a weapon in its cyber war of words with Washington.In an interview with the South China Morning Post newspaper, Snowden claims the U.S. has long been attacking a Hong Kong university that routes all Internet traffic in and out of the semiautonomous Chinese region.Snowden said the National Security Agency's 61,000 hacking targets around the world include hundreds in Hong Kong and mainland China, the paper reported late Wednesday. The Post, Hong Kong's main English-language newspaper, said Snowden had presented documents to support those claims, but it did not describe the documents and said it could not verify them.Snowden's comments were his first since the 29-year-old American revealed himself as the source of a major leak of top-secret information on U.S. surveillance programs. He flew to Hong Kong from Hawaii before revealing himself, and the Post said he is staying out of sight amid speculation the U.S. may seek his extradition.Snowden, who worked for the CIA and later as a contractor for the NSA, has revealed details about U.S. spy programs that sweep up millions of Americans' telephone records, emails and Internet data in the hunt for terrorists. American law enforcement officials are building a case against him but have yet to bring charges.U.S. officials have disputed some of his claims, particularly his assertion to the Guardian newspaper of Britain that he "had the authority to wiretap anyone." He also said he made $200,000 a year, although contractor Booz Allen Hamilton, where he worked before being fired this week, said his salary was $122,000.Snowden's allegations about U.S. hacking add a new twist to the long-running battle between Washington and Beijing over cybersecurity.The U.S. been delivering a steady flow of reports accusing China's government and military of computer-based attacks against America. U.S. officials have said recently that the Chinese seem more open to trying to work with the U.S. to address the problems.Snowden's allegations follow comments last week from China's Internet security chief, who told state media that Beijing has amassed huge amounts of data on U.S.-based hacking. The official held off on blaming the U.S. government, saying it would be irresponsible and that the better approach is to seek to cooperate in the fight against cyberattacks.On Thursday, Ministry of Foreign Affairs spokeswoman Hua Chungying said China is a "major victim" of cyberattacks but did not lay blame.The reaction was stronger online. Air Force Col. Dai Xu, known for the hawkish opinions he voices on his Sina Weibo microblog, wrote: "I have always said, the United States' accusations about Chinese hacking attacks have always been a case of a thief crying for another thief to be caught."The Post cited Snowden as saying the NSA has been hacking into computers in Hong Kong and mainland China since 2009, citing documents he showed the paper, which it said it could not verify. It didn't provide further details about the documents.He said that among the targets was the Chinese University of Hong Kong, which hosts the Hong Kong Internet Exchange, the main hub for the city's Internet traffic. Set up in 1995, it allows all data between local servers to be routed locally instead of having to pass through exchanges in other countries, including the United States."We hack network backbones — like huge Internet routers, basically — that gives us access to the communications of hundreds of thousands of computers without having to hack every single one," Snowden told the Post.According to Snowden's documents, other NSA hacking targets included Hong Kong public officials, students and businesspeople, as well as targets on the mainland, though they did not include Chinese military systems, the paper said, without providing further details.A large number of mainland Chinese businesses, including ones that are state-owned, have offices in Hong Kong, a former British colony that passed back to Chinese control in 1997. The People's Liberation Army has a base in Hong Kong and the Beijing central government and foreign affairs department have offices.The university is also home to the Satellite Remote Sensing Receiving Station, which captures data and imagery used to monitor the environment and natural disasters in a 2,500-kilometer radius around Hong Kong, an area that includes most of mainland China and Southeast Asia.Staff at the facilities did not return phone calls.The school said in a statement that "every effort is made to protect" the exchange, which is monitored around the clock to defend against threats."The university has not detected any form of hacking to the network, which has been running normally," it said.At a meeting in California last week, President Barack Obama pushed Chinese President Xi Jinping to do more to address online theft of U.S. intellectual and other property coming from China. Xi claimed no responsibility for alleged cyberespionage and said China was also a victim.Virginia-based cybersecurity firm Mandiant published a detailed report in February directly linking a secret Chinese military unit in Shanghai to years of cyberattacks against U.S. companies.In November 2011, U.S. intelligence officials publicly accused China for the first time of stealing American high-tech data for economic gain.
BEIJING — Soon after a fire on a crowded commuter bus killed 47 people and injured 34, Chinese authorities offered an explanation: One of the dead had written a suicide note, boarded the bus during the evening rush and set it on fire.After doubts were raised online, police said they found pieces of the burned cart and woven bag the arsonist used to transport gasoline. They said survivors saw Chen Shuizong set the fire, and that his wife and daughter confirmed that the suicide note was written in his handwriting.Many Chinese still aren't buying it. Their reaction reveals at least as much about their distrust of the government as it does about the June 7 fire in Xiamen, a prosperous port city in southeast China's Fujian province."How can you solve a case in such a short period of time?" asked Liu Shanying, a political scientist at the Chinese Academy of Social Sciences. "And the suspect is dead. From a legal point of view, the case just looks very suspicious."China's authoritarian government tightly controls access to information, censors the media and regularly refuses to provide data. Incidents of authorities or officials denying an event or guilt only to later be found to have been lying have added to citizens' distrust, as has endemic corruption.Police changed their story twice following an explosion that killed four people last year at a community center in southwest Yunnan province's Qiaojia county. Twelve hours after the blast, they said a woman with a 1-year-old baby was the perpetrator. Days later, they named a different suspect and stated categorically that he was responsible. Three months later, two other men were named the criminal suspects.Last month, authorities announced in a terse statement that they were investigating "suspected serious disciplinary violations" by Liu Tienan, the deputy chief of the planning agency in charge of steering the Chinese economy. But that came months after an agency Liu worked for fiercely denied a prominent journalist's accusations that Liu had shady ties with a businessman, was involved in large, problematic bank loans and had made up his academic qualifications.Such backpedaling has made Chinese more suspicious of the official versions of events.In the case of the bus fire, police on Monday offered a greater level of substantiation than usual, but skeptics are demanding more. They want to see the suicide note, which has not been released, and any video that may have been taken inside the bus."So many suspicious points if you really think about it," said Xie Tianming, a photographer who is based in Fujian. "How is there the space for a person to pour out gas and light it in a crowded place? And no one saw it to stop it? No testimony from survivors? Where is the driver? Who can believe the lie that in this high-tech era we can't get surveillance footage?"In a microblogging account reported by state media to be Chen's, the writer claimed to be destitute and pleaded for an opportunity to live. The writer chronicled his frustrated efforts to get a local police station to correct his age so he could be eligible for social security payments. The last entries were made a day before the fire, and the account was removed a day after the fire.Some question how an impoverished man needing social security could afford a computer, or that a man of his age — born in 1954, according to authorities — knew how to use the microblogging site."A confession online, and an identity of petitioner makes one a suspect," lawyer Liu Xiaoyuan wrote on the Sina Weibo, referring to people who take local grievances to the central government. "It is lucky there was only one petitioner on the bus. What if there were more? It would be seen as a group alienating themselves from society. Why doesn't the police release the evidence directly?"Such doubts are voiced every time China has a violent episode that the government blames on a loner. They illustrate the tensions between a government that wants to control information and citizens emboldened to question official accounts online where, there is lively debate, criticism and access to more information than ever."People are becoming even more distrustful," said David Zweig, professor of social science at Hong Kong University of Science and Technology."In general, society in China pays a huge price for all kinds of government abuse or for company misbehavior," he said. "That's the main theme in China these days and so if this guy cracked because of one of those situations the entire bureaucracy has no interest in it being publicized ... And the Chinese people know it."In some cases where doubts surfaced about the official version, the perpetrators became instant heroes online.In 2011, Qian Mingqi, a man upset over a long-running land dispute with the government, set off three bombs in the southern city of Fuzhou, killing himself and two others and stirring sympathy among a public angry at official corruption and indifference.After state media identified him as the culprit, Qian's blog drew hundreds of messages, many of them admiring, and he garnered thousands of followers. Today, he still has more than 20,000, and people continue to leave messages.One says, "Came back to visit Mr. Qian after the Xiamen fire case."AP researchers Flora Ji in Beijing and Fu Ting in Shanghai contributed to this report.
BEIJING — China's latest manned space capsule docked with an orbiting space station Thursday, and the three astronauts climbed aboard what will be their home for the next week, state media reported.Automated controls guided the Shenzhou-10's docking with the space lab, the Xinhua News Agency said. After entering the space lab, the crew exchanged their space gear for blue jumpsuits, Xinhua said.During their 12-day stay at the lab, the astronauts will perform a manual docking exercise and conduct scientific experiments. They will also deliver a series of science lectures — part of an outreach to increase the space program's popularity among younger Chinese.The lab, the Tiangong-1, is an experimental space station. In operation for less than two years, it will be taken out of use later this year and replaced by a larger, more durable module by 2020.The latest Shenzhou flight the fifth manned mission in a decade in a program that has been marked by methodical advances to catch up with the other two manned space powers — Russia and the U.S.
HONG KONG — Fresh revelations by former CIA employee Edward Snowden have raised concerns that the U.S. National Security Agency (NSA) may have hacked into Hong Kong's key internet exchange, which handles nearly all the Chinese territory's domestic web traffic.In an interview in Hong Kong's South China Morning Post newspaper published on Thursday, Snowden said the NSA had been hacking computers in Hong Kong and mainland China since 2009. Among those institutions hacked, he said, was the Chinese University of Hong Kong, which houses the Hong Kong Internet Exchange.Snowden did not mention the exchange, but his comments have raised concerns that it may have been one of the NSA's targets."The fact that the Chinese University was hacked was probably a good choice, if it happened it probably would have been a good choice," said Charles Mok, a member of Hong Kong's legislative council and an IT specialist."So the fact that the internet exchange with much of the local domestic traffic would have gone through was probably picked as a target."Snowden's allegations have until now largely focused on the extent to which the NSA was eavesdropping on U.S. citizens. His most recent comments about China and Hong Kong - where he is believed to be in hiding - draw attention to NSA's role in conducting surveillance of foreign countries.Snowden was quoted as saying he believed that the NSA had conducted more than 61,000 hacking operations globally. "We hack network backbones - like huge Internet routers, basically - that give us access to the communications of hundreds of thousands of computers without having to hack every single one," the Post quoted him as saying.The Hong Kong Internet Exchange is one of dozens of Internet Exchange Points, or IXPs, around the globe handling domestic traffic between local service providers and some regional traffic. Such exchanges remove the need for such traffic to take lengthy detours via overseas servers.The exchange was set up in the mid 1990s and is still run by the university. The university said in a statement that it closely monitored the exchange and had not detected any form of hacking to the network.Journalists visiting the facility on Thursday, however, were able to walk through an access-restricted door into a "central computer room" with racks of servers without being challenged.Cathy Huang, an analyst at Frost and Sullivan in Singapore, said that Hong Kong may be especially vulnerable to eavesdropping since its laissez faire economy left it lagging countries like Japan and Australia in setting and enforcing regulations on internet security."Hong Kong is quite an open economy and therefore, the government doesn't have many stringent regulations to ensure organizations devote enough resources into Internet security," she said.Some security experts, however, said that gaining undetected and continuous access to the exchange and placing eavesdropping software or hardware would be hard.According to people familiar with the operations of the facility, it would be extremely difficult for an unauthorized organization to insert equipment into the facility without the knowledge of the exchange's administrators.Mok, the legislative council member, said after talking to administrators at the exchange that any large-scale eavesdropping would have been noticed."Certainly they haven't noticed anything," he said. "If it's very advanced, fine, but they can't be copying everything over. It would be noticed and targeted."
HONG KONG — The former CIA employee who leaked top-secret information about U.S. surveillance programs remains in Hong Kong, where activists rallied in his support Thursday outside the American Consulate.The news of Edward Snowden's whereabouts, revealed by an editor of a local newspaper that interviewed him Wednesday, is the first since he went to ground Monday after checking out of his hotel in the autonomous Chinese territory.The interview with the South China Morning Post, which is believed to have been conducted at Snowden's behest, bore the marks of a canny step to win sympathy in Hong Kong, which maintains an independent Western-style legal system distinct from that in authoritarian mainland China, as well as a strong tradition of freedom of speech.In the interview, Snowden, 29, said he wanted to stay in Hong Kong as long as he was welcome and that he had evidence of U.S. government computer hacking in the territory."He talked about coming to Hong Kong not to hide but to reveal information, so I think he really wanted to reach out to the public and that is probably why he chose us," said Chow Chung Yan, the newspaper's news editor.Chow declined to give details about the interview other than to say it took place Wednesday at a secure location. He said it had been at the request of Snowden, who despite going public Sunday as the source of the information about the massive U.S. data collection programs has decided to remain out of sight amid speculation the U.S. may ask Hong Kong to extradite him for trial.While Hong Kong's government has yet to formally comment on his case, his anti-surveillance stance has struck a chord with some members of the Hong Kong public.About a dozen human rights activists rallied outside the U.S. Consulate in the city Thursday afternoon, chanting "Snowden is my brother" and carrying signs criticizing the U.S. government. A larger rally is planned for Saturday.Chow said he wasn't at Wednesday's interview and could not comment on Snowden's mental state, appearance, or financial state. However, he said Snowden's remarks appeared to show he believed his actions were rational."It appears to me he is fully aware of his actions as well as the consequences of his actions. He believes what he is doing is correct and thought this out well, so it's not an irrational decision," Chow said.Snowden arrived in Hong Kong from his home in Hawaii on May 20, just after taking leave from National Security Agency contracting firm Booz Allen Hamilton, which has since fired him from his job as a computer systems analyst.
HONG KONG — Edward J. Snowden, the former National Security Agency computer technician who has acknowledged leaking highly classified documents about the United States government's monitoring of Internet and telephone communications, told a Hong Kong newspaper on Wednesday that he planned to stay in the city and fight extradition."People who think I made a mistake in picking Hong Kong as a location misunderstand my intentions," he told the newspaper, The South China Morning Post. "I am not here to hide from justice; I am here to reveal criminality."He also said the United States' surveillance program had gained access to hundreds of computers in Hong Kong and China since 2009. "We hack network backbones — like huge Internet routers, basically — that give us access to the communications of hundreds of thousands of computers without having to hack every single one," the newspaper quoted him as saying.The newspaper did not say where in Hong Kong Mr. Snowden has been hiding since he checked out of a hotel early Monday afternoon. The Guardian newspaper of Britain, with which Mr. Snowden has shared a series of documents, reported Wednesday morning that he had moved to a safe house, but did not provide details.Mr. Snowden's decision to stay in Hong Kong came as a person with knowledge of the Hong Kong government's work on the case said local government lawyers, working with United States government lawyers, had identified several dozen offenses with which Mr. Snowden could be charged under Hong Kong and American laws.The United States and Hong Kong operate under a 1996 bilateral extradition agreement, and any attempt by the United States to extradite Mr. Snowden would have to cite offenses that violate the laws in both countries, are punishable by jail terms of a year or more and meet the terms of that agreement. The person familiar with Hong Kong government efforts, who spoke on the condition of anonymity because of the delicate legal and diplomatic aspects of the case, said one of the offenses involves the release of official secrets, which is illegal in Hong Kong and the United States. That offense is covered by a catch-all clause in the extradition agreement, the person said, although some lawyers disagree. Mr. Snowden could delay extradition proceedings by requesting political asylum in Hong Kong. But he would almost certainly be taken into custody and jailed as soon as he filed for asylum, because he would no longer qualify as a visitor to Hong Kong, the person said.Leung Chun-ying, the chief executive of Hong Kong, said Tuesday on an official visit to New York that his government would not discuss Mr. Snowden's case. "We have existing laws and policies; otherwise we can't comment on individual cases," he said, according to an official transcript released here.An ideological divide has opened in Hong Kong's legal profession over how long Mr. Snowden can manage to avoid extradition to the United States. Some human rights lawyers say he could resist for years, partly by filing for asylum, although they predict that he would eventually lose his case and be sent back.Human rights lawyers and advocates have long criticized Hong Kong for not adopting the 1951 Refugee Convention. As a result, people seeking asylum have fewer rights here than in most jurisdictions around the world, and it is hard to obtain asylum.Hong Kong laws do allow for asylum for someone who fears torture, or is being prosecuted overseas mainly for political, as opposed to criminal, reasons. The United States military's treatment of Pfc. Bradley Manning, accused of responsibility for the WikiLeaks release of classified documents, has been compared to torture by activists and legal scholars here.But Private Manning has been held in military prisons and tried under the military code; Mr. Snowden, as a civilian, is subject to the civilian criminal system in the United States, which has not received similar criticism."He doesn't stand a good chance of avoiding extradition," said Nicholas Bequelin, a Human Rights Watch researcher here. "When all is said and done, the Hong Kong government does cooperate with the United States on these cases. The only thing that could stop it is for China to step in." Legal and diplomatic experts said it was highly unlikely that China, which has no formal extradition apparatus with the United States, would intervene.Former judges and prosecutors tend to agree that the court system here has almost always granted extradition requests from the United States.These litigators note that extradition cases are heard in Hong Kong by judges — not juries, whose members might be more easily swayed by Mr. Snowden's appeals to public opinion."If Uncle Sam wants you, Uncle Sam will get you," said Kevin Egan, a former prosecutor who has since worked as a defense lawyer on extradition cases.While Mr. Snowden could say that he was the subject of political persecution in the United States, "the judiciary here is notoriously unsympathetic" to such claims, Mr. Egan added.Mr. Snowden is almost certainly under surveillance by the Hong Kong authorities, said Steve Vickers, who oversaw police criminal intelligence here before Britain returned Hong Kong to China in 1997. He now runs his own risk consulting firm.
BEIJING — The wife of China's jailed Nobel Peace Prize winner has written an open letter to new Chinese leader Xi Jinping to protest an 11-year prison term given to her brother, the family's lawyer said Friday.In the letter, Liu Xiaobo's wife Liu Xia said the sentencing was unfair and urged Xi to govern China in a way that respects the rights of individuals and avoids "ruthless suppression based on violence."The letter was a rare occasion for Liu Xia to express herself at greater length than the few seconds or minutes at a time she has had to speak to reporters and a handful of activists during the past more than two and a half years since she was placed under house arrest in her Beijing apartment.A Beijing court convicted the brother, Liu Hui, on Sunday of fraud in a real estate dispute in prosecution that the family's supporters have said is meant as further punishment of the Nobel laureate's family and is intended to intimidate other political activists.Liu Xia said the government's right to rule should be based on its ability to safeguard justice for all. "Any event that denies the rights of the individual can result in tragedy, therefore casting a bleak shadow on the legitimacy of state power," Liu wrote. "I can't imagine that the justice we expect can be achieved if the rights of the accused have been completely ignored."The letter was handwritten and signed by "citizen Liu Xia." Beijing lawyer Shang Baojun, who represented Liu Xiaobo and Liu Xia's brother, confirmed the authenticity of the letter, which he posted online.Liu Xia, who has been kept under house arrest since her husband won the Nobel prize in 2010, also questioned the legal basis of her own incarceration at home: "Thinking about it over and over again, I realize that in China it's supposed to be some kind of 'crime' to be the wife of Liu Xiaobo."She also touched on the concept of the "Chinese Dream," a political phrase that Xi has espoused in various situations since he came to power, in an apparent bid to tap into middle class aspirations or drum up nationalism."Mr. President, the Chinese Dream you mentioned relies on every single citizen realizing it," Liu Xia wrote. "I hope that for individuals like us, the Chinese Dream won't become a 'Chinese nightmare'."
BEIJING — A popular Communist Party-backed newspaper urged China's leadership to milk a former U.S. contractor for more information rather than send him home, saying his revelations about secret American surveillance programs concern China's national interest.Friday's Global Times editorial follows Snowden's allegations that the U.S. National Security Agency hacked 61,000 targets, including hundreds in Hong Kong and mainland China, in an interview published in the Hong Kong-based South China Morning Post.Snowden revealed last weekend he was the source of a major leak of top-secret information on NSA surveillance, saying he was uncovering wrongdoing. He spoke to reporters from an undisclosed location in the semiautonomous Chinese territory of Hong Kong, a choice that raised questions about whether and how Washington would seek his return for possible prosecution.The Global Times said in the editorial, which ran in the paper's Chinese- and English-language editions, that Snowden could offer intelligence that would help China update its understanding of cyberspace and improve its position in negotiations with Washington."Snowden took the initiative to expose the U.S. government's attacks on Hong Kong and the mainland's Internet networks. This concerns China's national interest," the commentary said. "Maybe he has more evidence. The Chinese government should let him speak out and according to whether the information is public, use it as evidence to negotiate with the United States openly or in private."The paper said that the Chinese government should not only consider Beijing's relations with the United States but also the opinion of its domestic public, which the paper said would be unhappy if Snowden were sent back."We have realized the United States' aggressiveness in cyberspace, we have realized that nine Internet companies have assisted the U.S. government in intelligence outsourcing," said the paper known for a nationalist stance. "We have realized their hypocrisy in saying one thing and doing another, and we have realized their ruthlessness in doing what they please with no regard for other people.""China is a rising power, and it deserves corresponding respect from the United States," it said.True public sentiment on the issue in China is hard to gauge given the lack of scientifically conducted opinion polls, but Chinese leaders and senior officials have said that in the Internet age they feel increasingly under pressure from public opinion. By whipping up public sentiment on an issue like this, the paper could be putting Beijing in a bind.Some experts have said China is unlikely to use Snowden against the United States given its recent efforts to foster a new, closer working relationship between the countries' two leaders, Xi Jinping and Barack Obama, who met for informal talks in California last weekend.The Chinese Foreign Ministry has taken a cautious stance in commenting on the surveillance leaks. In a routine briefing on Thursday, spokeswoman Hua Chunying responded to repeated questions about whether American authorities have sought Snowden's return to the U.S. by saying that China had "no relevant information to share."Hua reiterated China's stance that the country is a victim of cyberattacks and said Beijing remained keen to cooperate with the United States on cybersecurity, though she implied that the U.S. might want to refrain from portraying China as a major perpetrator."We also think that the adoption of double standards would bring no benefit to the settlement of the relevant issue," Hua said.
BEIJING — A group of Chinese scholars, analysts and military officials convened on a recent morning in a spartan schoolroom to draw attention to China's simmering territorial dispute with Japan. Participants spoke in urgent tones. Reporters took notes. A spirit of solidarity reigned.But the deliberations were not about the barren rocks in the East China Sea that are known as Diaoyu in China and Senkaku in Japan and that the two nations have been sparring over with competing naval patrols.Instead, the group that gathered at Renmin University was focused on a more enticing prize — Japan's southernmost island chain, which includes the strategic linchpin of Okinawa, home to 1.3 million Japanese citizens, not to mention 27,000 American troops.The Chinese government itself has not asserted a claim to Okinawa or the other isles in the Ryukyu chain. But the seminar last month, which included state researchers and retired officers from the senior ranks of the People's Liberation Army, was the latest act in what seems to be a semiofficial campaign in China to question Japanese rule of the islands.A magazine affiliated with the Chinese Foreign Ministry published a four-page spread on the issue in March. People's Daily, the Communist Party's official newspaper, weighed in next with an op-ed by two scholars at the Chinese Academy of Social Sciences. Two more pieces appeared in Global Times, another state newspaper.And a week before the seminar, a hawkish Chinese military official argued that the Japanese did not have sovereignty over the Ryukyu Islands because its inhabitants paid tribute to Chinese emperors hundreds of years before they started doing so to Japan."For now, let's not discuss whether they belong to China — they were certainly China's tributary state," the official, Maj. Gen. Luo Yuan, told the state-run China News Service. "I am not saying all former tributary states belong to China, but we can say with certainty that the Ryukyus do not belong to Japan."Another senior Chinese military official appeared to back off those remarks. The official, Lt. Gen. Qi Jianguo, a deputy chief of staff, assured a conference in Singapore this month that China's position on the islands had not changed. "Scholars are free to put forward any ideas they want," he said. "It doesn't represent the views of the Chinese government."But almost all the voices in China pressing the Okinawa issue are affiliated in some way with the government. Many of them, including General Luo, are known for spouting nationalistic views that can go beyond the official line — and for being called on to do so when it serves a wider propaganda goal.In this case, the goal may be to strengthen China's claim on the islands known as the Senkaku and the Diaoyu, more than 250 miles west of Okinawa. Tensions have been running high since September, when the Japanese government bought three of the islands from a private owner. Japan said it did so to prevent them from falling into radical nationalist hands, but the move prompted protests in China.Analysts say that Beijing may be raising the prospect of a simultaneous dispute over the Okinawa chain to strengthen its negotiating hand and convey to Japanese officials that the Chinese government must contend with nationalist public sentiment, too.At the Renmin seminar, Zhang Shengjun, deputy dean of the school of political science and international studies at Beijing Normal University, said that questioning the ownership of Okinawa was useful for projecting China as a regional power."People think that China's foreign policy has only one face — wanting a harmonious world," Mr. Zhang said. But the Okinawa issue, he said, was helpful in showing the "black face" of Chinese foreign policy. In Chinese opera, the black face is a reference to a tough, bold character.Noboru Yamaguchi, a retired Japanese Army general and now a professor at the National Defense Academy in Tokyo, said the Chinese approach might backfire. It will make the Japanese resist Chinese efforts to get control of the Senkaku/Diaoyu islands even more, he said, and it will have broader effects. "I don't think it is wise for the Chinese to do this, because it hurts their reputation in the international community," he said.
HONG KONG — After several days of relative silence on the issue, Chinese state news media Thursday highlighted revelations that the United States government was engaged in widespread monitoring of Internet and telephone communications, carrying reports suggesting the disclosures could damage relations between the two countries.The disclosures come at an uncomfortable time for American officials, just after President Obama pressed for Beijing's cooperation in curtailing Chinese cyberespionage. Chinese government officials have refrained from directly criticizing the United States on the disclosures, but the state news media have been reporting on the controversy."The massive U.S. global surveillance program revealed by a former National Security Agency employee in Hong Kong is certain to stain Washington's overseas image and test developing Sino-U.S. ties," said an article in the state-run newspaper China Daily, citing analysts. It quoted Li Haidong, a researcher of American studies at China Foreign Affairs University, warning of the impact the disclosure could have on relations between the United States and China."For months, Washington has been accusing China of cyberespionage, but it turns out that the biggest threat to the pursuit of individual freedom and privacy in the U.S. is the unbridled power of the government," Mr. Li was quoted as saying.Edward J. Snowden, the former N.S.A. computer technician who disclosed the surveillance, is now believed to be in Hong Kong, which is administered by China but has a large degree of legal autonomy.As American officials pursue possible charges against him in preparation for an extradition effort, the authorities in Hong Kong, rather than the mainland government, are likely to decide whether to turn Mr. Snowden over to the United States, which has a long history of cooperation with Hong Kong on such matters.Mr. Snowden said Wednesday in an interview with The South China Morning Post that the United States had gained access to hundreds of computers in Hong Kong and China since 2009.One mainland news outlet, The Global Times, a newspaper that is part of the Communist Party-run People's Daily group, called for assertive Chinese action to confront Washington in the wake of Mr. Snowden's revelations."Before the U.S. government rushes to shut Snowden's mouth, China also needs to seek an explanation from Washington," the newspaper said in an editorial. "We are not bystanders. The issue of whether the U.S. as an Internet superpower has abused its powers touches on our vital interests directly."For the Chinese media, coverage of the issue can be a delicate balancing act, since the allegations that the United States is employing a double standard naturally focuses attention on its assertions that Chinese entities are engaged in widespread cyberspying, an issue that Chinese state media outlets have shied away from.There is also the tricky issue of Mr. Snowden's presence on Hong Kong soil, a potentially problematic development as China and the United States have recently worked to improve relations.Officials in the United States have rebuffed suggestions that the surveillance by the N.S.A. was in any way comparable to Chinese cyberspying. One intelligence employee, speaking on condition of anonymity because of the delicacy of the issue, said the two situations — China's stealing of trade and military secrets and N.S.A. surveillance to track possible terrorist attacks — were not comparable."I can tell you with absolute certainty the U.S. government does not pass on technological secrets obtained through (strictly speaking, as a byproduct of) espionage to U.S. firms, both as a matter of principle and because there is no fair way to do it," he wrote in answer to an e-mailed question."I recall some senior bureaucrat proposing this some two decades ago — and he got nowhere," he wrote. "None of the agencies wanted anything to do with it.""China, by contrast, deliberately targets foreign technology for military and commercial purposes, so this is apples and oranges," he wrote. "But in the propaganda war, that fact won't matter."While meeting with the Chinese president, Xi Jinping, in California last week, Mr. Obama pressed the issue of Chinese cyberspying, but Mr. Xi did not acknowledge any culpability.At a daily news briefing Thursday, Hua Chunying, a spokeswoman for China's Ministry of Foreign Affairs, was pressed repeatedly to address Mr. Snowden's disclosures, but said she had "no relevant information to supply."
HONG KONG — The battered Japanese stock market lurched into bear-market territory Thursday, after a tumble of 6.4 percent took the combined decline in the Nikkei 225 index since a peak on May 23 to more than 21 percent.A pronounced sell-off in the morning and early afternoon accelerated shortly before the markets closed in Tokyo. The Nikkei ended down more than 840 points at 12,445.38, its lowest level since early April.Global markets reacted badly at first, with the Euro Stoxx 50, a benchmark for euro zone blue chips, down almost 2 percent in morning trading. But European shares later recovered most of their losses, and stocks on Wall Street opened quietly after new reports showed recent improvements in the American economy.The drop in Japan on Thursday was one of many sharp declines seen in recent weeks, since a feverish six-month rally in Japanese stocks — incited by optimism over the government's aggressive efforts to reinvigorate the listless economy — came to an abrupt end.The Nikkei 225 soared more than 80 percent between mid-November and mid-May, but staged a sudden about-face with a 7.3 percent plunge on May 23.Sentiment has been fragile and trading volatile ever since, as investors have taken stock of the challenges that face "Abenomics," the economic policies of Prime Minister Shinzo Abe, and weighed the pros and cons of taking profits after the rally.A renewed rise in the yen also has eroded a factor that, for months, had worked to support Japanese stocks. The yen weakened substantially between November and May – a welcome development for Japanese exporters as it made their goods less expensive for customers overseas.But the currency's move, like that of the stock market, reversed in late May. On Thursday, the yen traded around 94.00 to the American dollar, its strongest level since early April.In Tokyo, Yoshihide Suga, the chief cabinet secretary, brushed off the market plunge."I feel it's important not to swing from joy to sorrow every time stock prices rise or fall, and keep on doing what we need to do," Mr. Suga said at a news conference Thursday morning, as shares fell. "The Japanese economy is steadily improving.''The Bank of Japan governor, Haruhiko Kuroda, met with Mr. Abe on Thursday to exchange views on the economy, according to local news reports. Mr. Abe told the governor he was determined to do his part in putting a growth plan into action, Mr. Kuroda later told reporters. Mr. Kuroda told the prime minister that the central bank was committed to supporting the Japanese economy through monetary stimulus.Mr. Kuroda also said he expected markets to soon "calm down to reflect positive developments in the economy," according to the Nikkei Web site. On Monday, the Japanese government revised its first-quarter gross domestic product figures, saying its economy grew at an annualized pace of 4.1 percent between January and March, better than the 3.5 percent it initially reported. But that upgrade has not been enough to calm investor jitters.Factors beyond Japan also have helped send markets lower around the world.In China, which is a key engine of global growth, the flow of economic data in recent weeks has reinforced the picture of an economy that is struggling to regain momentum.And in the United States, comments on May 22 by Ben S. Bernanke, the chairman of the Federal Reserve, that he and his colleagues might consider paring back their bond-buying programs "in the next few meetings" if the economy shows signs of improvement have helped fan global nervousness. Investors and analysts have struggled to assess the implications of even a small withdrawal of the bond buying that has supported markets in recent years.In the United States, the Dow Jones industrial average and the Standard & Poor's 500-stock index have sagged 3.2 percent and 4 percent, respectively, in the past three weeks. The DAX in Germany has fallen about 4.5 percent and the CAC 40 in France has dropped more than 6 percent.Key markets in the Asia-Pacific region have tumbled even more. The Straits Times index in Singapore and the S.&P./ASX 200 in Australia have lost more than 9 percent since May 22, and in Hong Kong, the Hang Seng has shed more than 10 percent.A pessimistic outlook issued Wednesday by the World Bank added to the gloom, with Kaushik Basu, the bank's chief economist, noting in a news release that "the slowdown in the real economy is turning out to be unusually protracted."The bank, based in Washington, cut its forecast for global growth to 2.2 percent from a January forecast of 2.4 percent growth.In explaining the revision, Mr. Basu cited high unemployment in the developed world and slower-than-expected growth in emerging economies. He also noted that India was expanding at a rate below 6 percent for the first time in a decade.
HONG KONG — A few hundred rights advocates and political activists marched through Hong Kong on Saturday to demand protection for Edward Snowden, who leaked revelations of U.S. electronic surveillance and is now believed to be holed up in the former British colony.Marchers gathered outside the U.S. consulate shouting slogans denouncing alleged spying operations aimed at China and Hong Kong, but the numbers were modest compared to rallies over other rights and political issues."Arrest Obama, free Snowden," protesters shouted outside the slate grey building as police looked on. Many waved banners that said: "Betray Snowden, betray freedom", "Big brother is watching you" and "Obama is checking your email".In his first comments on Snowden's case, Hong Kong leader Leung Chun-ying said late on Saturday that the government would handle it in accordance with established laws."When the relevant mechanism is activated, the Hong Kong SAR Government will handle the case of Mr Snowden in accordance with the laws and established procedures of Hong Kong," he said."Meanwhile, the government will follow up on any incidents related to the privacy or other rights of the institutions or people in Hong Kong being violated."Some protesters blew whistles in support of Snowden, 29, the American former CIA contractor who has acknowledged being behind leaks of the surveillance programs by the National Security Agency.The procession moved on to government headquarters in the city, which reverted to Chinese rule in 1997 but enjoys far more liberal laws on dissent and freedom of expression.About a dozen groups organized two rallies, including the city's two largest political camps. Leaders of major political parties sought explanations for Snowden's allegations of spying.Hong Kong's largest pro-Beijing political party, the DAB, demanded an apology from Washington, clarification of "illegal" espionage activities and an immediate halt to them."I think the Hong Kong government should protect him," the DAB's vice-chairwoman, Starry Lee, said outside the consulate.Snowden reportedly flew to Hong Kong on May 20. He checked out of a luxury hotel on Monday and his whereabouts remain unknown. Snowden has said he intends to stay in Hong Kong to fight any potential U.S. moves to extradite him.China has avoided any explicit comment on its position towards Snowden. A senior source with ties to the Communist Party leadership said Beijing was reluctant to jeopardize recently improved ties with Washington.Snowden told the South China Morning Post this week that Americans had spied extensively on targets including the Chinese University of Hong Kong that hosts an exchange which handles nearly all the city's domestic web traffic. Other alleged targets included government officials, businesses and students.Snowden pledged not to "hide from justice" and said he would place his trust in Hong Kong's legal system. Some legal experts, however, say an extradition treaty between Hong Kong and the United States has functioned smoothly since 1998.It is unclear whether Chinese authorities would intervene over any U.S. attempts to extradite Snowden, though lawyers say Beijing has rarely interfered with extradition cases.His arrival comes at a sensitive time for Hong Kong leader Leung Chun-ying, whose popularity has sunk since taking office last year amid a series of scandals and corruption probes into prominent figures. Leung has offered no comment on Snowden.Interest among residents into the case is growing and numbers could rise if extradition proceedings are launched.Demonstrations on issues ranging from denunciations of pro-communist education policy imposed by Beijing, high property prices and a growing wealth gap have attracted large crowds.A vigil marking the anniversary of China's June 1989 crackdown on democracy advocates drew tens of thousands this month and a record 180,000 last year.Diplomats and opposition figures in the city have warned of growing behind-the-scenes meddling by Beijing in Hong Kong's affairs, as well as deep-rooted spying activities.
WASHINGTON — Top U.S. intelligence officials said Saturday that information gleaned from two controversial data-collection programs run by the National Security Agency thwarted potential terrorist plots in the U.S. and more than 20 other countries — and that gathered data is destroyed every five years.Last year, fewer than 300 phone numbers were checked against the database of millions of U.S. phone records gathered daily by the NSA in one of the programs, the intelligence officials said in arguing that the programs are far less sweeping than their detractors allege.No other new details about the plots or the countries involved were part of the newly declassified information released to Congress on Saturday and made public by the Senate Intelligence Committee. Intelligence officials said they are working to declassify the dozens of plots NSA chief Gen. Keith Alexander said were disrupted, to show Americans the value of the programs, but that they want to make sure they don't inadvertently reveal parts of the U.S. counterterrorism playbook in the process.The release of information follows a bruising week for U.S. intelligence officials who testified on Capitol Hill, defending programs that were unknown to the public — and some lawmakers — until they were revealed by a series of media stories in The Guardian and The Washington Post newspapers, leaked by former NSA contractor Edward Snowden, who remains in hiding in Hong Kong.The disclosures have sparked debate and legal action against the Obama administration by privacy activists who say the data collection goes far beyond what was intended when expanded counterterrorism measures were authorized by Congress after the terror attacks of Sept. 11, 2001.Intelligence officials said Saturday that both NSA programs are reviewed every 90 days by the secret court authorized by the Foreign Intelligence Surveillance Act. Under the program, the records, showing things like time and length of call, can only be examined for suspected connections to terrorism, they said.The officials offered more detail on how the phone records program helped the NSA stop a 2009 al-Qaida plot to blow up New York City subways. They say the program helped them track a co-conspirator of al-Qaida operative Najibullah Zazi — though it's not clear why the FBI needed the NSA to investigate Zazi's phone records because the FBI would have had the authority to gather records of Zazi's phone calls after identifying him as a suspect, rather than relying on the sweeping collection program.
MOGANSHAN, China — MARK KITTO is still here. But he is leaving soon, he swears. It will happen sometime this summer, he said, after a final road trip with his family to the outer reaches of the Chinese empire, where two decades ago as a British soldier he joined a 59-day expedition to cross the Taklamakan Desert.The furniture has already been removed from the home he rebuilt atop this bamboo-cloaked mountain three hours from Shanghai. And his Cantonese wife, Joanna Kitto, is handing day-to-day management of their restaurant and three atmospheric guesthouses to others.Many foreigners in China think Mr. Kitto left the country last summer. But Mr. Kitto, 46, one of the better-known foreign entrepreneurs of his generation in China, is only now making good on the promise that he set forth in a provocative essay titled "You'll Never Be Chinese." It was published in August in Prospect, a British literary magazine, and it was Mr. Kitto's farewell to a time when he made Shanghai and then Moganshan his adopted homes, all after being born Cornish, growing up in Wales, attending college in London and completing service in the Welsh Guards.In the essay, he laid out why, after 16 years in this country, he would be heading back to his homeland. He wrote about the hardships of sustaining a business here, of a government that sacrifices the well-being of its people to stay in power and finally of very personal concerns over raising his two children, ages 8 and 10, in China."I wanted China to be the place where I made a career and lived my life," he wrote. "I have fallen out of love, woken from my China Dream."The dream still looks rather attractive from the perch where Mr. Kitto recently had lunch with a couple of visitors — an outdoor table at a local restaurant with panoramic views of the valley. He pointed to a half-finished Buddhist temple below. Local officials were building it to attract tourist revenue, he said, even though no monks lived in the valley.But back to the essay: "After that article came out, there was quite a lot of reaction," he said.Mr. Kitto's article became widely circulated among expatriates in China, forcing some to question the basic assumptions they had made in trying to build a life here. Others asked whether Mr. Kitto had been unrealistic in what he had expected from China. And what exactly did Mr. Kitto mean by saying "You'll never be Chinese?" What foreigner expected to become Chinese anyway?But Mr. Kitto seems to have been a harbinger. In the months afterward, other expatriates wrote essays about leaving China. The departures appear to have accelerated this year, as people who moved here around 2008, in the prelude to the Summer Olympics, cycle out. Foreigners also increasingly fear the pollution in northern China, among the worst in the world, and the shortcomings in water and food safety.The exodus seems to be particularly pronounced among expatriates who, like Mr. Kitto, are immersed in the literary and journalistic scene. They have all prided themselves on being engaged with China in a much deeper way than your average corporate employee posted here by a multinational company. They are descendants of the kinds of foreigners that the historian Jonathan D. Spence wrote about in his first book, "To Change China": students of the language, entrepreneurs, explorers."I think Mark sees himself in the continuum of British adventurers in China," said Harvey Thomlinson, a publisher in Hong Kong who owns the non-American rights to Mr. Kitto's memoir, "China Cuckoo."And Britons do have a colorful history here, whether adventurers like Sir Edmund Backhouse, who claimed to be an insider in the Qing imperial court and a lover of the Empress Dowager Cixi, or the missionaries who built stone villas atop Moganshan in the early 20th century. Each generation of foreigners has a different character, much of it dependent on the changes in China."I think Beijing's entered a new stage in its development," said Alex Pearson, a longtime British expatriate, bookstore owner and friend of Mr. Kitto who is also leaving China this summer. "You have a new kind of foreigner coming, and young Chinese with different goals. It's a different vibe than when I came here."MR. KITTO'S history here is well documented. He first embraced China while a student at the School of Oriental and African Studies, University of London. Then there was the crossing of the Taklamakan in 1993, in a camel caravan led by another British adventurer, Charles Blackmore. But Mr. Kitto is best known for publishing in the late 1990s and early 2000s an authorized expatriate magazine in three Chinese cities — unheard of for a foreigner. The profitable venture was seized by officials in 2004, he said, and Mr. Kitto retreated to Moganshan to start another China career.
HONG KONG — The decision by a former National Security Agency contractor to divulge classified data about the United States government's surveillance of computers in mainland China and Hong Kong has complicated his legal position, but may also make China's security apparatus more interested in helping him stay here, law and security experts said on Friday.The South China Morning Post, a local newspaper, reported on Friday that Edward J. Snowden, the contractor, had shared detailed data showing the dates and Internet Protocol addresses of specific computers in mainland China and Hong Kong that the National Security Agency penetrated over the last four years. The data also showed whether the agency was still breaking into these computers, the success rates for hacking and other operational information.Mr. Snowden told the newspaper that the computers were in the civilian sector. But Western experts have long said that the dividing line between the civilian sector and the government is very blurry in China. State-owned or state-controlled enterprises still control much of the economy, and virtually all are run by Communist Party cadres who tend to rotate back and forth between government and corporate jobs every few years as part of elaborate career development procedures.Kevin Egan, a former prosecutor here who has represented people fighting extradition to the United States, said that Mr. Snowden's latest disclosures would make it harder for him to fight an expected request by the United States for him to be turned over to American law enforcement. "He's digging his own grave with a very large spade," he said.But a person with longstanding ties to mainland Chinese military and intelligence agencies said that Mr. Snowden's latest disclosures showed that he and his accumulated documents could be valuable to China, particularly if Mr. Snowden chooses to cooperate with mainland authorities."The idea is very tempting, but how do you do that, unless he defects," said the person, who spoke anonymously because of the diplomatic delicacy of the case. "It all depends on his attitude."The person declined to comment on whether Chinese intelligence agencies would obtain copies of all of Mr. Snowden's computer files anyway if he were arrested by the Hong Kong police pursuant to a warrant from the United States, where the Justice Department has already been reviewing possible charges against him.A Hong Kong Police Force spokeswoman said earlier this week that any arrest would have to be carried out by the Hong Kong police and not by foreign law enforcement. The Hong Kong police have a responsibility to share with mainland China anything of intelligence value that they find during raids or seizures of evidence, according to law enforcement experts.Patricia Ho, a lawyer who specializes in political asylum at Daly and Associates, a Hong Kong law firm, said that if Beijing decides that it wants Mr. Snowden to stay in Hong Kong for a long time, the simplest way to do so would be for mainland officials to quietly tell Hong Kong's government officials not to hurry the legal process.The United States and China have long accused each other of monitoring each other's computer networks for national security reasons. The United States has also accused China of hacking to harvest technological secrets and commercial data on a broad scale from American companies and transferring that information to Chinese companies to give them a competitive advantage.Tom Billington, an independent cybersecurity specialist in Washington, said that mainland China could benefit by obtaining a copy of the data that Mr. Snowden gave to The South China Morning Post. The data, if independently verified, could help Chinese officials figure out which computers have been hacked, patch security holes, itemize compromised data, analyze the quality of computer security defenses and develop techniques for hardening other Chinese computers against future surveillance by the N.S.A."It certainly would seem valuable data for the Chinese," Mr. Billington said.
BEIJING — Chinese dissident Chen Guangcheng, who was allowed to travel to the U.S. after escaping from house arrest, said Monday that New York University is forcing him and his family to leave at the end of this month because of pressure from the Chinese government. The university on Monday again denied Chen's allegations.Chen said in a statement that China's Communist Party had been applying "great, unrelenting pressure" on NYU to ask him to leave, though he did not provide details or evidence to back his claim. Chen said Beijing's authoritarian government has more influence on the American academic community than is perceived."The work of the Chinese Communists within academic circles in the United States is far greater than what people imagine, and some scholars have no option but to hold themselves back," he said. "Academic independence and academic freedom in the United States are being greatly threatened by a totalitarian regime."NYU officials called Chen's account puzzling, saying that his fellowship was meant to be a one-year position and had simply concluded as planned, and that school officials have been talking with him for months about what his next step might be.The blind dissident sparked a diplomatic crisis between China and the U.S. last year when he fled to the U.S. Embassy in Beijing from house arrest. Since last May, he'd been a special student at NYU's U.S.-Asia Law institute. He has been working on a book due out later this year.NYU spokesman John Beckman said in a statement Monday that the conclusion of Chen's fellowship had nothing to do with the Chinese government."We are very discouraged to learn of Mr. Chen's statement, which contains a number of speculations about the role of the Chinese government in NYU's decision-making that are both false and contradicted by the well-established facts," Beckman said.Beckman said that even before Chen's family's arrival in the States the fellowship he was to take at the university was discussed as a one-year position."NYU believes it has been generous in supporting this family, and we are puzzled and saddened to see these false claims directed at us," Beckman said.The dissident said that as early as last August and September, three to four months after his family had arrived in the United States, NYU was already discussing their departure.Beckman responded that the university began talking to the Chens "not because of some fictional 'pressure' from China, but so that they could use the months to make their transition a smooth one."Chinese Foreign Ministry spokeswoman Hua Chunying also dismissed Chen's allegations that NYU was under pressure from Beijing, saying at a regular briefing: "I don't know whether the case has been misreported or Chen Guangcheng has intentionally made up the case."NYU said Chen has two offers for new institutional affiliations. Earlier, a spokesman for New York-based Fordham University confirmed that Chen was negotiating with Fordham Law School's Leitner Center but said he didn't know what kind of position was being discussed.The incident has highlighted the potential public relations benefits and risks that American universities face in engaging Chinese dissidents at a time when many are trying to expand in China and Chinese students are an increasingly important source of tuition income for colleges.Chinese students form the largest population of foreign students at American universities, with nearly 200,000 this year, up 25 percent since last year — and they often pay full tuition.NYU raised its profile and earned itself goodwill by offering a fellowship to Chen as a solution to last year's diplomatic crisis. Beckman said the university provided housing, food, health care and insurance, special law tutorials, translation services, English lessons and connections to a publisher. To help him pursue his advocacy, Chen was also invited to speak at many events facilitated by the school, Beckman said.However, the university's association with such a prominent dissident has brought greater scrutiny of its engagement with China. A U.S. newspaper, the New York Post, had earlier reported that NYU's decision was related to the university's development of a campus in Shanghai, though the university rejected the claim.NYU has said that its new campus in China's financial capital will be a degree-granting, liberal arts and science college, with classes scheduled to begin this fall. Its partners are a Chinese university, the Shanghai city education commission and the government of the city's Pudong district.Bob Fu, a U.S.-based rights activist and one of Chen's key supporters, said U.S. academic institutions may shun outspoken Chinese dissidents on their own initiative due to growing economic interest in China. But, he said, in doing so they risk hurting their reputations as being havens for free speech that make them attractive to young Chinese who don't experience those and other freedoms at home."U.S. universities are out chasing the China dollar and are very reluctant to work with dissidents who have a strong voice in China," said Fu, president of the Texas-based rights group ChinaAid. "It does not always have to be direct pressure from Beijing, there is also self- censorship, particularly if a college President believes their China campus or the future enrollment of Chinese students will be sabotaged."
WASHINGTON — Current and former top U.S. officials on Sunday defended the government's collection of phone and Internet data following new revelations about the secret surveillance programs, saying the operations were essential in disrupting terrorist plots and did not infringe on Americans' civil liberties.In interviews on Sunday talk shows, guests ranging from White House chief of staff Denis McDonough to former Vice President Dick Cheney and former CIA and National Security Agency head Michael Hayden said the government's reliance on data collection from both Americans and foreign nationals was constitutional and carefully overseen by executive, legislative and court authorities.All three branches of government, using "aggressive internal checks inside the administration, from inspectors general and routine audits, are overseeing how we do these programs," McDonough said. He added, "I think that the American people can feel confident that we have those three branches looking."The latest reassurances came as a new Washington Post report Sunday described the massive intertwined structure of four major data collection programs that have been set up by the government since the 9/11 attacks. The Post report follows earlier stories based on documents provided by NSA contractor Edward Snowden.Two secret programs, the Post reported in its new disclosures, are aimed at phone and Internet metadata, while two more target contents of phone and Internet communications.Metadata includes logs and timing of phone calls and lists of Internet communications, but does not include the actual contents of communications. Even without knowing those contents, intelligence officials can learn much from metadata, including likely locations and patterns of behavior.A previously reported surveillance program aimed at the phone logs and location information of millions of Americans is called Mainway, the Post reported. A second program targeting the Internet contact logs and location information of foreign users is called Marina.A third program, which intercepts telephone calls and routes their contents to government listeners, is called Nucleon.A fourth program, Prism, exposed recently by Snowden, forces major Internet firms to turn over the detailed contents of Internet communications. Prism is aimed at foreign users but sometimes also sweeps up the content of Americans' emails and other Internet communications, officials have acknowledged."The metadata story does touch upon Americans in a massive way with phone records but not the content. The Prism story is about foreigners and it is about content," Hayden said told NBC's "Meet the Press."Rep. Mike Rogers, who heads the House Intelligence Committee, said that any phone metadata from Americans swept up in the surveillance is held under careful safeguards, kept in a "lockbox" that can only be accessed if it becomes relevant to terror investigations. U.S. officials also said Saturday that gathered data is destroyed every five years."This is a lock box with only phone numbers, no names, no addresses in it, we've used it sparingly," Rogers, R-Mich., said on CNN's "State of the Union".But one Congressional critic of the secrecy surrounding the government's surveillance raised doubts about the effectiveness about the widespread collection of Americans' phone metadata."I don't think collecting millions and millions of Americans' phone calls — now this is the metadata, this is the time, place, to whom you direct the calls — is making us any safer," said Sen. Mark Udall, D-Colorado. Udall said he would introduce a bill this week to narrow the reach of that collection to only "those who have a link to terrorism."Hayden said he worried that news reports about the programs have often provided erroneous information, "much to the harm of a rational national debate." He did not specify those concerns.The disclosures, provided in recent days by both the Post and the Guardian newspaper, came from classified documents exposed by Snowden, 29, who was working as a private contractor with the NSA and later said he grew disenchanted by what he saw as a growing secret American surveillance apparatus. After working with the two newspapers, Snowden turned up in Hong Kong, prompting concern that he might cooperate with Chinese authorities."I am very, very worried that he still has additional information that he hasn't released yet, the Chinese would welcome the opportunity and probably willing to provide immunity for him or sanctuary for him, if you will, in exchange for what he presumably knows," Cheney said on "Fox News Sunday."Cheney added that he has "trouble believing" Snowden had access to all the materials he has disclosed, suggesting the possibility that Snowden had an accomplice inside U.S. security circles."I think you have to ask that question," Cheney said.McDonough, speaking on CBS' "Face the Nation," declined to speculate on Snowden's dealings with China or his access to secret documents, citing a law enforcement investigation. But he cautioned against "some of the hyperbole that now is being thrown around from him and from others involved in this debate that would somehow cast a pall on the intelligence community."But McDonough also disputed Snowden's claim that he had the ability to listen in on any phone conversation, including the president's.
HONG KONG — China 's cabinet has adopted 10 measures to improve air quality in the latest move aimed at responding to the dense smog that has repeatedly enveloped Beijing and other major Chinese cities in recent years.Many of the measures had previously been enacted by some cities, or were the subject of national experiments that had not yet received the imprimatur of the cabinet, which is known as the State Council. The measures, adopted Friday, were announced Saturday in state-controlled news media.The newest and least-expected of them is a mandate that heavy polluters like coal-fired power plants and metal smelters must release detailed environmental information to the general public.Ma Jun, the director of the Institute of Public and Environmental Affairs, one of the best-known independent environmental advocacy groups in Beijing, said that 5,000 of the country's biggest factories account for three-fifths of its industrial pollution, but that the public knows few details about their emissions."In China, the factories can just discharge without letting people know," he said. "If we can bring them under public supervision, it would make a big difference."Still, Mr. Ma cautioned that while national leaders may want a cleaner environment, enforcing tough pollution regulations at the local level could prove difficult.The cabinet also ordered that heavy polluters reduce their emissions for each renminbi or unit of economic output by 30 percent by the end of 2017. But if the economy grows 7 percent or more a year, as forecast, the decrease in total pollution would be modest.During the past two years, China has seen a rapid growth of environmental protests. Crowds numbering in the thousands have taken to the streets in coastal cities including Dalian, Tianjin and Xiamen to prevent the construction or continued operation of large chemical plants.Coal-fired power plants have been blocked in the southern provinces of Guangdong and Hainan. And rock-throwing mobs forced the cancellation of a copper smelter a year ago in Shifang, a town near Chengdu in Sichuan Province, in western China.The new 10-part program calls for greater cooperation among cities and provinces. For example, Beijing is trying to reduce its consumption of heavily polluting coal, but the nearby city of Tianjin and adjacent Hebei Province are expanding their already huge coal-dependent industries in sectors like petrochemicals and steel.The cabinet's action includes some measures already taken by very large municipal governments like Beijing and Shanghai. Both cities already require much cleaner gasoline and diesel, so that cars and trucks emit less tailpipe pollution, and those policies are now supposed to be applied nationwide.The State Council also called for more cities to prepare emergency response plans for heavy pollution, including traffic restrictions and limits on local industries.In addition, it ordered heavier fines for polluters and stricter requirements for environmental impact statements. Concerns about street protests over environmental disputes had already led the cabinet to announce last November that it would require a "social risk assessment" before allowing major industrial projects to proceed.Corporate leaders say that the Chinese public has rapidly become more prone to question the wisdom of big investment projects, particularly in the chemical industry."This is quite fast, how this reaction has stepped up, particularly in China," Martin Brudermüller, the vice chairman of the German chemicals giant BASF, said in a meeting with reporters in Hong Kong on June 4.With the protests, he later added, "China becomes a little bit more like the West."
HONG KONG — Chanting slogans like "Shame, U.S. government," demonstrators marched from a downtown park to the United States Consulate on Saturday to urge that Edward J. Snowden, the former National Security Agency contractor accused of leaking documents about American surveillance programs , be allowed to remain in Hong Kong.One of the protest's organizers, Tom Grundy, a British expatriate, called on China and the United States to refrain from pressuring Hong Kong about Mr. Snowden. "We want an independent judiciary to decide on the case," Mr. Grundy said.Hong Kong, which was ruled by Britain until its return to China in 1997, retains a legal system that is widely respected for its independence in its status as a special administrative region of China. Some activists, however, have criticized recent court appointees as having more pro-Beijing connections than their predecessors.In his first comment on Mr. Snowden's case, Hong Kong's chief executive, Leung Chun-ying, indicated Saturday that Hong Kong would follow established procedures if it is asked to surrender Mr. Snowden to the United States. He also indicated that the Hong Kong government would look into Mr. Snowden's disclosure that the National Security Agency might have gained covert access to the main hub of Internet servers here, located at the Chinese University of Hong Kong."When the relevant mechanism is activated, the Hong Kong S.A.R. government will handle the case of Mr. Snowden in accordance with the laws and established procedures of Hong Kong," Mr. Leung said in a statement. "Meanwhile, the government will follow up on any incidents related to the privacy or other rights of the institutions or people in Hong Kong being violated."Though the protest was small — organizers said about 900 showed up, but the police said it was more like 300 — it underlined the political maneuvering set off by Mr. Snowden's arrival here. He has disclosed classified documents about the United States government's monitoring of the Internet in the United States and in mainland China and Hong Kong.Saturday's march was organized by more than two dozen groups advocating free speech, democracy and personal liberties on the Internet. Many of the groups, including the Democratic Party of Hong Kong, have long been outspoken critics of China for restricting individual liberties."He should be given the right to stay in Hong Kong," Albert Ho, a former chairman of the Democratic Party, said in a speech at the start of the rally. "We must not let anybody intervene — we must be able to show that Hong Kong will not give in to pressure from other governments."In the last two days, the state news media in mainland China have embraced Mr. Snowden and confirmed details to The South China Morning Post, a Hong Kong newspaper, about how the United States monitors Internet traffic on the mainland and in Hong Kong.The official newspaper China Daily usually ignores pro-democracy activists in Hong Kong, or derides them. But the lead story on its front page on Saturday described calls by democracy advocates in the legislature that Mr. Snowden not be sent back to the United States, and it discussed the planned demonstration, too.Martin Lee, the founding chairman of the Democratic Party, said the Chinese government engages in far more extensive monitoring of phone calls and Internet activity in Hong Kong than the United States government does. And unlike the United States, the Chinese government has been willing to leak personal details of people's lives to the news media to punish them for not toeing the line politically, he said.China Daily gave the most prominent position on its opinion page on Saturday to excerpts from a pro-Beijing newspaper in Hong Kong asserting that Mr. Snowden's disclosures had damaged the standing of democracy advocates and their admiration for the United States. "The latest leaks have put the local rights politicians in a rather awkward position by exposing their idol's true character," the column said.Mr. Snowden has some committed supporters here. Dozens of protesters held banners in a light rain before the event began, and more arrived as the rain stopped."Snowden is being persecuted by a huge institution," said Marcus Ho, a retiree who said that he seldom attended rallies. "We must do something to help."
WASHINGTON — Edward Snowden, the American who leaked details about U.S. National Security Agency surveillance programs, said on Monday he decided to disclose the information after observing "a continuing litany of lies" from senior officials to Congress."Seeing someone in the position of James Clapper - the Director of National Intelligence - baldly lying to the public without repercussion is the evidence of a subverted democracy. The consent of the governed is not consent if it is not informed," he said in a forum on the Guardian newspaper website."It was seeing a continuing litany of lies from senior officials to Congress - and therefore the American people - and the realization that that Congress, specifically the Gang of Eight (senior U.S. lawmakers), wholly supported the lies that compelled me to act," he said.Snowden, who revealed himself as the source of leaked information about U.S. government surveillance programs last week from Hong Kong, denied having given classified information to China. "I have had no contact with the Chinese government," he said. "I only work with journalists."
BEIJING — A Chinese university has built the world's fastest supercomputer, almost doubling the speed of the U.S. machine that previously claimed the top spot and underlining China's rise as a science and technology powerhouse.The semiannual TOP500 listing of the world's fastest supercomputers released Monday says the Tianhe-2 developed by the National University of Defense Technology in central China's Changsha city is capable of sustained computing of 33.86 petaflops per second. That's the equivalent of 33,860 trillion calculations per second.The Tianhe-2, which means Milky Way-2, knocks the U.S. Energy Department's Titan machine off the No. 1 spot. It achieved 17.59 petaflops per second.Supercomputers are used for complex work such as modeling weather systems, simulating nuclear explosions and designing jetliners.It's the second time a Chinese computer has been named the world's fastest. In November 2010, the Tianhe-2's predecessor, Tianhe-1A, had that honor before Japan's K computer overtook it a few months later on the TOP500 list, a ranking curated by three computer scientists at universities in the U.S. and Germany.The Tianhe-2 shows how China is leveraging rapid economic growth and sharp increases in research spending to join the United States, Europe and Japan in the global technology elite."Most of the features of the system were developed in China, and they are only using Intel for the main compute part," TOP500 editor Jack Dongarra, who toured the Tianhe-2 facility in May, said in a news release. "That is, the interconnect, operating system, front-end processors and software are mainly Chinese."
BEIJING — China will host talks with North Korea this week, the Foreign Ministry said on Monday, after Pyongyang offered high-level negotiations with the United States to ease tension on the Korean peninsula.North Korea's proposed talks with Washington came days after it abruptly canceled planned official negotiations with South Korea. The White House has said any talks must involve actions by Pyongyang to show it is moving towards scrapping its nuclear weapons.Chinese Vice Foreign Minister Zhang Yesui will meet North Korea's First Vice Foreign Minister Kim Kye-gwan on Wednesday in Beijing, spokeswoman Hua Chunying told a regular news briefing."Holding this kind of strategic dialogue is because China and North Korea always maintain close communication," Hua said. "China is also paying close attention to the situation on the Korean peninsula and is proactively working to promote each side to quickly restart dialogue and consultation."China, North Korea's one major ally, has urged Pyongyang to abandon its nuclear weapons program and return to talks.Washington has been skeptical of any move by Pyongyang towards dialogue as it has repeatedly backtracked on deals, most recently in 2012, when it agreed to a missile and nuclear test moratorium only to fire a rocket weeks later.Earlier this year, North Korea threatened nuclear and missile strikes against South Korea and the United States after it was hit with U.N. sanctions for its February nuclear weapons test.
HONG KONG — Hong Kong billionaire Li Ka-shing is buying a Dutch waste and renewable energy company for 943.7 million euros ($1.3 billion), his companies said Monday, as the infrastructure and utilities businesses of Asia's richest man expand further internationally.Four companies controlled by Li including Cheung Kong Infrastructure Holdings Ltd. said they were teaming up to buy AVR-Afvalverwerking BV.The group said it was buying AVR because it represents a "compelling long-term investment opportunity for the consortium."The group also includes Li's property business, Cheung Kong Holdings Ltd., his utility company, Power Assets Holdings Ltd., and his charitable foundation.The deal, which needs approval from regulators including the European Commission's competition authority, is expected to close in the third quarter of 2013.Li's companies are buying AVR from Van Gansewinkel Groep, a Dutch company owned by private equity firms CVC Capital Partners and Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co.It's the second time this year that Li has bought a waste company. In January, Cheung Kong Infrastructure paid $412 million for New Zealand's second biggest garbage disposal company, Envirowaste.AVR is the biggest waste processor in the Netherlands, with about 23 percent of the market. The company's plants in Rotterdam and Duiven, near the German border, have the capacity to incinerate up to 1.7 million metric tons of waste to produce electricity, steam and district heating."Cheung Kong Infrastructure is making good inroads in the area of waste management," said Kam Hing-lam, Cheung Kong Infrastructure's group managing director. "With waste treatment being an imminent issue in most places around the world, we see good growth potential in this business," Kam said.AVR, which has 430 employees, earned 42.3 million euros in profit after tax and other items last year, more than double the $20.7 million euros it earned in 2011.Li is worth $31 bilion, making him the world's eighth richest person, according to Forbes.
HONG KONG — A record seven million students will graduate from universities and colleges across China in the coming weeks, but their job prospects appear bleak — the latest sign of a troubled Chinese economy.Businesses say they are swamped with job applications but have few positions to offer as economic growth has begun to falter. Twitter-like microblogging sites in China are full of laments from graduates with dim prospects.The Chinese government is worried, saying that the problem could affect social stability, and it has ordered schools, government agencies and state-owned enterprises to hire more graduates at least temporarily to help relieve joblessness. "The only thing that worries them more than an unemployed low-skilled person is an unemployed educated person," said Shang-Jin Wei, a Columbia Business School economist.Lu Mai, the secretary general of the elite, government-backed China Development Research Foundation, acknowledged in a speech this month that less than half of this year's graduates had found jobs so far.Graduating seniors at all but a few of China's top universities say that very few people they know are finding jobs — and that those who did receive offers over the winter were seeing them rescinded as the economy has weakened in recent weeks."Many companies are not expanding at all, while some of my classmates have been hired and fired in the same month when the companies realized that they could not afford the salaries after all," said Yan Shuang, a graduating senior in labor and human resources at the Beijing Institute of Technology.Ms. Yan said she had been promised a job at a sports clothing company over the winter. But the company canceled all hiring plans in March as the economy weakened.China quadrupled the number of students enrolled in universities and colleges over the last decade. But its economy is still driven by manufacturing, with a preponderance of blue-collar jobs. Prime Minister Li Keqiang personally led the cabinet meeting, on May 16, that produced the directive for schools, government agencies and state-owned enterprises to hire more graduates, a strategy that has been used with increasing frequency in recent years to absorb jobless but educated youths."Any country with an expanding middle class and a rising number of unemployed graduates is in for trouble," said Gerard A. Postiglione, the director of the Wah Ching Center of Research on Education in China at Hong Kong University.A national survey released last winter found that in the age bracket of 21- to 25-year-olds, 16 percent of the men and women with college degrees were unemployed.But only 4 percent of those with an elementary school education were unemployed, a sign of voracious corporate demand persisting for blue-collar workers. Wages for workers who have come in from rural areas to urban factories have surged 70 percent in the last four years; wages for young people in white-collar sectors have barely stayed steady or have even declined.Economists have long estimated that the Chinese economy needs to grow 7 or 8 percent annually to avoid large-scale unemployment. But that rule of thumb has become less reliable in recent years as the labor market has split.Relatively slow growth is still creating enough jobs to provide full employment for the country's blue-collar workers. But much faster growth may be needed to create white-collar jobs for the graduates pouring out of universities.The International Monetary Fund predicts the Chinese economy will grow 7.75 percent this year — slower than the growth of 10 to 14 percent before 2008, but still a much faster pace than in the West. The main problem for China lies in the sheer growth in graduates; the United States produces three million graduates a year, while China has increased its annual number of graduates by more than five million in a single decade.
BEIJING — A bus carrying 36 people veered from a road in heavy fog and crashed into a valley in western China, killing at least 15 people, state media reported.The accident happened Tuesday afternoon when the bus was traveling to a tourist spot near Changji city in the Xinjiang region, the official Xinhua News Agency reported.A Changji police official, who gave only his surname, Ma, confirmed the accident, but didn't have any information about casualties.Road accidents are common in China because of poor road conditions and bad driving habits.
BEIJING — China has announced that individuals and groups are banned from privately adopting abandoned infants, in a country where tens of thousands are abandoned each year and where baby trafficking has been a perennial problem.The Ministry of Civil Affairs announced Tuesday that people who find an abandoned child must immediately tell local residential committees and the police and not adopt the child at will.The abandonment of children is a big problem in China. Its strict one-child policy — which limits most urban couples to one child and rural couples to two if their first-born is a girl — and a traditional preference for male heirs result in the abandonment of girls and disabled children. Poverty and the social stigma for unwed mothers are also factors.China's adoption law forbids baby trafficking and trafficking abandoned babies in the name of adoption, but doesn't mention whether individuals are allowed to keep abandoned babies. The new rules that forbid keeping such babies are outlined in a document from several government departments that was posted on the Ministry of Civil Affairs's website.The new rules say people wanting to adopt must go through official channels and meet requirements, which under Chinese law include being healthy, over 30 and childless.People who use abandoned children for illegal and profitable ends will be severely punished, the rules say, without specifying.The document also sets out measures that should be taken when an abandoned baby is found, requiring that police try to track down the parents or guardians, and transfer children to a government-sanctioned nursing home for temporary care if they fail. These homes should only take the children under official care if no guardian is found within a certain period.China's chronically underfunded state orphanage system has been unable to adequately provide shelter for many of the children who have been abandoned, and such services have often been left to private citizens with few resources and no legal authority. In January, the issue was highlighted when a fire at an illegally run orphanage killed six children and one young adult.Zhou Xiaozheng of Renmin University's School of Society and Population Studies said nearly 200,000 babies were estimated to be abandoned in China each year, mostly girls whose parents wanted to try again for a boy."It's good for the government to strengthen its management of abandoned children, but it will also bring revenue to the government because any potential adopters must pay a handsome adoption fee," Zhou said.
WASHINGTON — Edward J. Snowden, the former National Security Agency contractor who has confessed to disclosing troves of highly classified documents detailing American surveillance at home and abroad, said Monday that he had not given any classified materials to the government of China."This is a predictable smear that I anticipated before going public," Mr. Snowden, who is believed to be in hiding in Hong Kong, said in an online question-and-answer session on the Web site of The Guardian, the British newspaper that has published most of the secret information to date. He said that such speculation was "intended to distract from the issue of U.S. government misconduct.""Ask yourself: If I were a Chinese spy, why wouldn't I have flown directly into Beijing? I could be living in a palace petting a phoenix by now," he said.President Obama, meanwhile, defended the legality of the N.S.A. programs disclosed by Mr. Snowden, as well as their importance in preventing terrorism, in his most extensive comments to date on the programs."The one thing people should understand about all these programs, though, is they have disrupted plots, not just here in the United States but overseas as well," Mr. Obama said on the "Charlie Rose" show on PBS in an interview recorded Sunday and broadcast Monday night. He added that many other factors were at work in stopping attacks, saying "at the margins we are increasing our chances of preventing a catastrophe like that through these programs."But Mr. Obama said he wanted to prompt "a national conversation" about the programs and the broader trade-offs between the use of "big data" by government and companies and possible intrusions on privacy. He said he had urged intelligence officials to see what more information they could make public about the surveillance programs without jeopardizing security."We're going to have to find ways where the public has an assurance that there are checks and balances in place, that they have enough information about how we operate that they know their phone calls aren't being listened to, their text messages aren't being monitored, their e-mails are not being read by some Big Brother somewhere," the president said.A new CNN/ORC International poll showed that Americans were divided over the domestic surveillance programs and that in the wake of several recent controversies, Mr. Obama's approval rating had slipped to 45 percent from 53 percent in mid-May.Even as Mr. Obama tried to calm public fears about the N.S.A. programs, Mr. Snowden defended his claim to be a whistle-blower alerting the world to intelligence excesses, and he denied accusations that he had betrayed the United States.Mr. Snowden's choice to go to Hong Kong to denounce oppressive government surveillance, and his decision to tell the South China Morning Post about N.S.A. hacking into computers in mainland China and Hong Kong last week, has fueled accusations of disloyalty to the United States. On Sunday, former Vice President Dick Cheney called Mr. Snowden a "traitor" and hinted he might be spying for China.But Mr. Snowden denied any contact with the Chinese government and said it was "the highest honor you can give an American" to be called a traitor by Mr. Cheney, whom he denounced as "a man who gave us the warrantless wiretapping scheme as a kind of atrocity warm-up on the way to deceitfully engineering a conflict that has killed over 4,400 and maimed nearly 32,000 Americans, as well as leaving over 100,000 Iraqis dead."Asked why he did not go directly to Iceland, where he has said he would like to obtain asylum, Mr. Snowden said he sought a place where he was less likely to be immediately arrested."There was a distinct possibility I would be interdicted en route, so I had to travel with no advance booking to a country with the cultural and legal framework to allow me to work without being immediately detained," he said. "Hong Kong provided that. Iceland could be pushed harder, quicker, before the public could have a chance to make their feelings known, and I would not put that past the current U.S. administration."In answering questions for about 90 minutes, Mr. Snowden said there was "no single moment" in which he decided to act, but denounced "a continuing litany of lies" both from senior government officials to Congress and Congressional leaders. In particular, he accused James R. Clapper Jr., the director of national intelligence, of "baldly lying to the public without repercussion," saying that such actions subverted democratic accountability.
BEIJING — Astronauts struck floating martial arts poses, twirled gyroscopes and manipulated wobbling globes of water during a lecture Thursday from China's orbiting space station that's part of efforts to popularize the space program among young people.Wang Yaping demonstrated principles of weightlessness and took questions live from among the 330 grade school kids gathered at a Beijing auditorium during the 51-minute class from aboard the Tiangong 1 space station. Her fellow crew members Nie Haisheng and Zhang Xiaoguang answered questions about living, working and staying fit in space."I want to know how you know which way is up," said one student.During one playful moment, Nie adopted the mythical cross-legged lotus position familiar to all fans of Chinese martial arts films."In space, we're all kung fu masters," Wang remarked.In a later demonstration resembling a magic show, Wang injected droplets into an increasingly larger suspended ball of water, drawing exclamations of "wow" and polite applause from the students, another 60 million of whom were watching the live TV broadcast in their classrooms. The astronauts also spun gyroscopes and swung a ball on its tether to show how weightlessness affects objects in motion.The lesson was "aimed at making space more popular," Zhou Jianping, designer-in-chief of China's manned space program, was quoted as saying by the official Xinhua News Agency. "The spirit of science among youth is an important drive for the progress of mankind," Zhou said.China's second female astronaut, Wang smiled her way through the carefully rehearsed class, which more closely resembled a children's TV science program than Canadian astronaut Chris Hadfield's recent free-wheeling YouTube videos from the International Space Station.The lectures come as China's human space program enters its second decade, after going from a simple manned flight to space lab link-ups in a series of methodically timed steps in just 10 years. China launched its first crewed mission in 2003, becoming the third nation after Russia and the U.S. to achieve that feat.The current Shenzhou 10 mission is the second crewed trip to the Tiangong 1, launched in 2011 and due to be replaced by the larger, three-module permanent station, Tiangong 2, seven years from now.The future station will weigh about 60 tons, slightly smaller than NASA's Skylab of the 1970s and about one-sixth the size of the 16-nation International Space Station. China was barred from participating in the International Space Station, largely on objections from the United States over political differences and the Chinese program's close links with the military.
BEIJING — Unkind things were happening in the Temple of Magnificent Kindness on Tofu Pond Lane, a former Taoist place of worship with high, wood-beam ceilings and grand red doors, now an art venue, bar and grocery store.Li Xinmo was chewing a razor blade. Yan Yinhong was simulating being raped by a policeman. Fenni was keening, a cloth with bloodlike stains wrapped around her eyes, while Lan Jiny was crouched on the floor, methodically popping 108 red balloons — a figure that approaches China's gender imbalance of 118 males to 100 females — then drawing baby boys' penises in celebratory gold on old bedclothes from a Beijing birthing hospital, a reference to the skewed boy-girl gender ratio in China from sex-selective abortion and female infanticide. Ms. Lan allowed a final balloon to be a girl, a token female in a male-controlled world, she said.It was the second annual "Bald Girls" feminist art show, this time called "Bald Girls: A Door." And it was well, "heavy," as the artists put it, proudly."The heaviness comes from our lives, from the experiences that so many women have buried deep in their hearts. So many have been the victims of sexual violence," said Ms. Yan, adding she included children in that. "It is really a severe problem in our society today."High on her mind, as well as those of the other artists, were several recent reports of rape of young girls by men in positions of authority — teachers and government officials — drawing revulsion here. Mostly such abuse goes unreported, they said. "We hear about maybe 1 percent," Ms. Li said."Chinese people are very good at covering up their feelings," Ms. Yan said in an interview after the afternoon event. "But if you really understand China and its problems, then you will discover the great pain that lives in many hearts. As an artist it's my responsibility to express it."Ms. Yan's own performance expressed well the ugliness of rape.Dressed in a long red dress, her hair flowing, she danced around the room, her movements growing wilder until, gradually but unmistakably, they portrayed a rape, her face frozen in horror, rhythmic thrusts jarring her body from behind. Afterwards, stumbling forward, she dropped her underpants on the floor.For several seconds, tension shot through the audience as we realized she was preparing to do a handstand. I'm sure I wasn't the only one who wondered what we would see as she flung up her legs.It was a Chinese policeman's face over her crotch, unsmiling under a peaked hat, clad in a green uniform — the entire figure painted onto a flesh-colored leotard. Ms. Yan's skirt fell to the floor, covering her face and setting him off as if on a pedestal."The policeman represents dictatorship," she said later. "People wearing uniforms also break the law. They also go at kids. He represents police, officials, guards, lots of people." Feminists say rape in police custody is a widespread but rarely discussed problem.While recent public performance art by young, 20-something feminists here has poked fun at the establishment with actions like street dancing to highlight invasive gynecological examinations for aspiring female civil servants, the four, over-30 artists gathered in the Zajia Lab, as the former temple space is called, said the emotional rawness, the "heaviness" of their show, was essential. It was a howl of pain, a picture of the brutality that surrounds women and must be exposed, they said."There's very little about it in the official media," Ms. Li said, even taking the recent reports into account."The government wants everyone to be happy," she said. "No one really wants to hear about it. The mainstream media don't want to talk about it. The state doesn't want to see it."Dressed in a long white gown, she wordlessly untied a man's shaving razor from a string around her neck and placed it in her mouth. Struggling to speak without cutting herself, she recounted an incident — which she said happened to the daughter of an artist friend of hers — in which a father entered a shower where his young daughter was and raped her. Her muffled words showed the difficulty of speaking about such painful events. Blood began seeping from her mouth. Finally she spat out the razor."I swallowed the blood," she said, adding her tongue was not cut but she suffered cuts to the inside of her mouth.In a recent essay, Ms. Li wrote: "All men in contemporary society are engaged in a competition, a struggle, for power, money and women. The more power men have the more power they have to occupy women's bodies."Chinese society hasn't essentially changed since ancient times. What the state is transmitting is a kind of will to power, with all of society having these relations: ruler and ruled, old and young, teacher and student, upper class and lower class. Deliberately or not deliberately," powerful men "offend women, and the women violated are their subordinates, employees and students."
WASHINGTON — A budget shortfall has forced a Pentagon security unit to sharply cut back on regular investigations used to update security clearances for defense contractor employees.In a little-noticed announcement posted on its website on June 7, the Defense Security Service said that "due to a funding shortfall," it has been obliged to suspend "most" routine re-investigations of defense contractor employers cleared at the "Top Secret" level, at least through the end of September.The announcement came two days before Edward Snowden went public in a video released by Britain's Guardian newspaper as the source of leaks about the U.S. government's top-secret surveillance of phone and Internet activity.Snowden was a contractor for Booz Allen Hamilton working as a systems administrator at a National Security Agency facility in Hawaii.The leaks have alarmed the U.S. intelligence community and have raised questions about whether the government is doing enough to vet individuals for security clearances.A Senate Homeland Security subcommittee has scheduled a hearing for Thursday to examine the security clearance process, at which Defense Security Service Director Stan Sims and other U.S. officials are scheduled to testify.A person familiar with the matter said that because Snowden worked as a government employee and contractor for the NSA and Central Intelligence Agency, his security clearances would have been handled by them, rather than the Defense Security Service.But the Defense Security Service announcement shows how the government has been forced to recently scale back its oversight of security clearances in general for contractors.A government source familiar with the matter said the policy change was related to automatic federal spending cuts known as sequestration that began earlier this year when Congress failed to agree on an alternative deficit reduction plan.If a scheduled reinvestigation is delayed or canceled due to the budget crunch, clearance holders will be allowed to hold their clearances, officials said. "Nothing will happen to them," said Cindy McGovern, a spokeswoman for the Defense Security Service.The security service is a Defense Department agency responsible for authorizing, and then paying for, background investigations which the government conducts to determine defense contractors' eligibility for security clearances.The agency itself does not investigate contractor personnel, but commissions investigations from the Office of Personnel Management. That agency then employs its own contractors to conduct investigations in the field.Under government rules, both government and contractor employees with clearances at the Top Secret level are supposed to be re-investigated every five years to ensure that problems have not cropped up in their finances, backgrounds or behavior.It is these routine re-investigations for Top Secret clearance holders that the Defense Security Service says it is being forced to suspend.McGovern said that, in general, budget restrictions will force personnel at the agency to cut back their working weeks, and hence their pay, to four days per week, starting in July.She declined to comment on the case of Snowden, who is believed to be hiding in Hong Kong and is under criminal investigation for the leaks. Snowden had a clearance for "Top Secret/Sensitive Compartmented Information."The Defense Security Service's announcement said that despite the budget crunch, five-year re-investigations will continue for "key management" contractor personnel as well as people needing access to "mission essential" information "directly supporting the Intelligence Community."
BEIJING — Chinese courts have sentenced 11 people for inciting religious extremism and related crimes in the northwestern Muslim region of Xinjiang, just weeks ahead of the anniversary of bloody ethnic rioting that spread through the region four years ago.The Justice Ministry's official newspaper Legal Daily said Thursday that Aihetaimu Heli was given the harshest sentence of six years in jail for uploading to the Internet materials promoting jihad and ethnic hatred. The sentence on charges of inciting ethnic hatred and ethnic prejudice was handed down Wednesday in the far-western city of Aksu, the paper said.In the city of Kashgar, an additional eight people were sentenced to between two to five years for creating a public nuisance after breaking into homes and destroying 17 television sets in what the paper called a religious frenzy.Two others were fined and given less serious administrative punishments of from five to 15 days for posting extremist material to a blog and spreading rumors of a suicide bombing on the popular QQ Internet messaging service.Calls to the courts either rang unanswered or were answered by people who said no one was available to comment.All of the defendants identified by name appeared to be from Xinjiang's native Turkic Muslim Uighur ethnic group, who are culturally, linguistically, and religiously distinct from China's majority Han.Xinjiang sees periodic outbreaks of anti-government and anti-Chinese violence, some of it inspired by resentment over economic marginalization by Han migrants who have flooded into the region in recent decades, along with restrictions on Uighur social and cultural life.Authorities have consistently responded with overwhelming force and repression, and the period leading up to the anniversary of the July 2009 riots in the regional capital Urumqi is always one of heightened tension and increased security.Almost 200 people were killed in the violence that began with Uighur attacks on Han residents, followed by revenge attacks by Han armed with knives and iron rods.China said much of the violence was coordinated through text messages and blog postings and in its wake redoubled efforts to monitor online material considered subversive or threatening, including extremist and jihadist material produced abroad.
BEIJING — Chinese authorities have given courts the powers to hand down the death penalty in serious pollution cases, state media said, as the government tries to assuage growing public anger at environmental desecration.An increasingly affluent urban population has begun to object to China's policy of growth at all costs, which has fuelled the economy for three decades, with the environment emerging as a focus of concern and protests.A new judicial interpretation which took effect on Wednesday would impose "harsher punishments" and tighten "lax and superficial" enforcement of the country's environmental protection laws, the official Xinhua news agency reported."In the most serious cases the death penalty could be handed down," it said."With more precise criteria for convictions and sentencing, the judicial explanation provides a powerful legal weapon for law enforcement, which is expected to facilitate the work of judges and tighten punishments for polluters," Xinhua said, citing a government statement."All force should be mobilised to uncover law-breaking clues of environmental pollution in a timely way," it added.Previous promises to tackle China's pollution crisis have had mixed results, and enforcement has been a problem at the local level, where governments often heavily rely on tax receipts from polluting industries under their jurisdiction.Protests over pollution have unnerved the stability-obsessed ruling Communist Party.Thousands of people took to the streets in the southwestern city of Kunming last month to protest against the planned production of a chemical at a refinery.Severe air pollution in Beijing and large parts of northern China this winter have added to the sense of unease among the population.Human rights groups say China executes thousands of people a year, more than all other countries combined. The death penalty is often imposed for corruption and other economic crimes.
BEIJING — A top North Korean diplomat repeated an offer for international talks over his country's disputed nuclear programme during a meeting in China on Wednesday, saying the denuclearisation of the peninsula was the "dying wish" of North Korea's founder.The Beijing trip by First Vice Foreign Minister Kim Kye-gwan comes just days after North Korea offered talks with the United States to ease tension that spiked this year when the North threatened the United States and South Korea with nuclear war.The White House said any talks must involve action by the North to show it is moving towards disarmament.China's Foreign Ministry, after Kim's talks with Chinese Vice Foreign Minister Zhang Yesui, cited the North Korean, who has previously represented his country at talks to get it to halt its nuclear programme, as saying North Korea wanted talks."The denuclearisation of the Korean peninsula was the dying wish of Chairman Kim Il-sung and General Secretary Kim Jong-il," the Chinese ministry said in statement, citing Kim as saying.Kim Il-sung founded the country. His son Kim Jong-il, who died in 2011, oversaw North Korea's first two nuclear tests. North Korea conducted a third test in February."North Korea is willing to have dialogue with all sides and attend any kind of meeting, including six-party talks, and hopes to peacefully resolve the nuclear issue via negotiation," Kim Kye-gwan was cited as saying.Zhang, for his part, said that talks, stability and the denuclearisation of the Korean peninsula were in everyone's best interests, China's Foreign Ministry added."China supports talks between the various parties and hopes for an early resumption of the six-party talks," Zhang said.China has repeatedly urged North Korea to return to so-called six-party talks that aimed to get the North to halt its nuclear programme.In 2009, North Korea said it would never return to those talks. The four other participants in the negotiations were South Korea, the United States, Japan and Russia.The White House said any talks must involve action by North Korea to show it is moving towards disarmament.North Korea was looking for holes in the international consensus that it must denuclearise by seeking dialogue with various countries, said Wang Dong, an international relations professor at Peking University in Beijing."If China's stance is still firm, North Korea will understand that there are no loopholes to exploit," Wang said."You can't have your cake and eat it too. I think China will make this clear to North Korea," he said, referring to Pyongyang's refusal to give up its nuclear weapons while at the same time trying to mend ties with key powers.The talks are the highest-level contact between China and North Korea since U.S. President Barack Obama and Chinese President Xi Jinping met in California in early June and agreed that North Korea had to denuclearise.North Korea has repeatedly said it will never abandon its nuclear weapons, calling them its "treasured sword", a term one of its official newspapers used again on Wednesday.Late last month, North Korean leader Kim Jong-un sent another envoy to Beijing. According to a source with knowledge of that visit, Chinese officials gave the envoy a lukewarm reception while saying Beijing wanted an end to the North's nuclear and missile tests.Li Bin, a nuclear policy expert at the Carnegie-Tsinghua Centre for Global Policy in Beijing, said he did not believe North Korea was ready to discuss its nuclear programme with China."But now they see that China is very serious with sanctions and is very angry. My guess is that they are coming to Beijing to avoid a situation in which the relationship between the two countries gets worse," he said.China, the closest thing Pyongyang has to a major ally, backed the latest round of U.N. sanctions on North Korea, imposed for its February 12. nuclear test. Some Chinese banks have also curtailed ties to their North Korean counterparts in the wake of a U.S. crackdown on the North's finances.Next week, South Korea's President Park Geun-hye visits China, where North Korea is likely to be high on the agenda.Washington has been sceptical of any move by Pyongyang towards dialogue as it has repeatedly backtracked on deals, most recently in 2012, when it agreed to a missile and nuclear test moratorium only to fire a rocket a few weeks later.
BEIJING — China's new leader Xi Jinping is commanding wayward Communist Party cadres to purify themselves of corruption, and he's summed it up in a pithy slogan as Mao Zedong might have done: Look in the mirror, take a bath.China's leadership wants to show a cynical public that it's modernizing and serious about graft, but it appears to be favoring a top-down ideological campaign — with study sessions, self-criticism and propaganda — over imposing real checks on power. That worries many observers, not only because they doubt it will work, but because the tactic appears to be ripped out of the playbook of Mao, the founder of Communist China."Winning or losing public support is an issue that concerns the Communist Party's survival or extinction," Xi said in a message via teleconference Tuesday to top party cadres gathered in groups in their provinces and cities nationwide.The officials, who were nearly uniformly dressed in summer-casual, open-collar white shirts, sat in rows and dutifully studied sheets of paper in their hands as Xi spoke to them from a large, rectangular screen above.State broadcaster CCTV repeatedly aired footage of the meetings starting late Tuesday. Party newspapers and websites proclaimed that Xi will fight "formalism, bureaucracy, hedonism and extravagance."Xi said his "rectification" campaign will focus on self-purification, encapsulated in the phrase "look in the mirror, straighten your attire, take a bath and seek remedies," the official Xinhua News Agency said. In practical terms, party organs and officials at or above the county level are to "reflect on their own practices and correct their misconduct."Xi's decision to roll out the campaign in such a high-profile way hews him closely to Mao. Observers say that is not an encouraging sign for those who hoped the new leadership would consider substantive political reforms and bolster China's rule of law.Mao led a bloody two-decade revolution that ended with the establishment of Communist China in 1949, then held power until his death in 1976. His policies plunged the nation into years of famine and led to the deaths of tens of millions. Xi's father was a Communist revolutionary alongside Mao until he fell out of favor with the increasingly paranoid leader in 1962."Coming from the leader of such a huge country, it is a bit worrisome and shocking that he apparently is really a true believer of some of Mao's approaches," said Willy Lam, a Chinese politics expert and professor at Chinese University of Hong Kong.Many Chinese still recall the chaos of the Cultural Revolution, the 1966-76 ideological campaign Mao launched to purge the bureaucracy of pragmatic "capitalist roaders" and restore ideological purity to the revolution.Youths were "sent down" to the countryside to learn from peasants — including Xi, who spent seven years as a farmer in a northern province. Millions were persecuted in the upheaval in which people were denounced by one another — including parents by their children — and labeled and victimized.The "self-purification" plan announced this week might produce a purge of its own. Such ideological campaigns are widely perceived as a means for new party leaders to weed out their political opponents, who might be accused of foot-dragging in failing to meet the campaign's goals.Lam said Xi "is resorting to these metaphysical political campaigns of a bygone era which have proven already that attempts to brainwash people and change their worldview will not work.""I'm afraid the reaction of most party members would be quite cynical," he added. "They'll put up a show, but whether this purge will improve the moral quality of party members and cadres is another question."Pressure on the party to fix corruption and malfeasance is high. As Xi rolled out the new campaign, he was competing for the attention of a public riveted by the trial of a former city official at the center of a sex tapes scandal in which officials allegedly were extorted by real estate developers after being secretly filmed in liaisons with hired women."This campaign is necessary because the (Communist Party) as a ruling party has been struggling to deal with popular distrust — popular cynical, critical, even confrontational reaction to everything the party says or does," said Ding Xueliang, a Chinese politics expert at Hong Kong University of Science and Technology.He added, however, that the campaign is likely to achieve little in the long term as long as it remains a top-down effort in which the party is expected to police itself. "If they are re-using Mao Zedong-era slogans to deal with today's problems, no matter how much resources are put into the campaign, the outcome will be very tiny," he said.The party's resistance to political reforms leaves Xi with few options, said Hu Xingdou, a political economist at the Beijing Institute of Technology."The best solution to improving the relationship between people and officials is democracy. Let people supervise the government, so they can't abuse their power," Hu said. "But since political reform can't be pushed forward because of strong opposition from vested interest groups, they have to use Mao's tactics instead."Associated Press researcher Flora Ji contributed to this report.
BEIJING — Authorities in central China executed a former Communist Party official for raping 11 underage girls, state media said on Wednesday, following an online uproar about the latest case of abuse of power.Li Xingong, who was the party's deputy head in Yongcheng city in Henan province, was found guilty of assaulting the girls during police interrogations starting from the second half of 2011, the official Xinhua news agency reported.Li appealed against the guilty verdict, but was rejected by the Supreme Court, Xinhua said.The case was widely discussed on Weibo, China's popular Twitter-like microblogging site, after reports about the rapes naming Li as the perpetrator began circulating online in May last year."Yet another great example of a party cadre," wrote one Weibo user sarcastically after the execution was announced."What is wrong with the party that they have animals like this in their ranks? There needs to be discussion about how to better select officials," wrote another.While the government has encouraged people to take to the internet to expose corruption and abuse of power, especially at the grassroots, it generally keeps tight rein on what can be said about similar problems with more senior officials.After briefly allowing free online discussion following the sacking in March last year of former Chongqing party boss Bo Xilai and the naming of his wife as a suspect in the murder of a British businessman, censors moved to block the topic.The ruling Communist Party has long pushed to eradicate corruption, underscoring a broader fear that, if left unchecked, the problem could hurt the legitimacy of one-party rule and perhaps threaten its survival.Newly appointed President Xi Jinping has vowed to make the fight against graft and abuse of power a key policy platform, but has made little apparent progress, with few senior officials being probed and no movement towards establishing an independent anti-corruption body.Xi this week reminded officials of the need for a "thorough cleanup of undesirable work styles such as formalism, bureaucratism, hedonism and extravagance", state media reported on Wednesday."These four forms of decadence are the problems most hated, and complained of, by the people, severely damaging relations between the party and ordinary people," Xi was quoted as saying.
BEIJING — A top North Korean diplomat repeated an offer for international talks over his country's disputed nuclear program during a meeting in China on Wednesday, saying the denuclearization of the peninsula was the "dying wish" of North Korea's founder.The Beijing trip by First Vice Foreign Minister Kim Kye-gwan comes just days after North Korea offered talks with the United States to ease tension that spiked this year when the North threatened the United States and South Korea with nuclear war.The White House said any talks must involve action by the North to show it is moving towards disarmament.China's Foreign Ministry, after Kim's talks with Chinese Vice Foreign Minister Zhang Yesui, cited the North Korean, who has previously represented his country at talks to get it to halt its nuclear program, as saying North Korea wanted talks."The denuclearization of the Korean peninsula was the dying wish of Chairman Kim Il-sung and General Secretary Kim Jong-il," the Chinese ministry said in statement, citing Kim as saying.Kim Il-sung founded the country. His son Kim Jong-il, who died in 2011, oversaw North Korea's first two nuclear tests. North Korea conducted a third test in February."North Korea is willing to have dialogue with all sides and attend any kind of meeting, including six-party talks, and hopes to peacefully resolve the nuclear issue via negotiation," Kim Kye-gwan was cited as saying.Zhang, for his part, said that talks, stability and the denuclearization of the Korean peninsula were in everyone's best interests, China's Foreign Ministry added."China supports talks between the various parties and hopes for an early resumption of the six-party talks," Zhang said.China has repeatedly urged North Korea to return to so-called six-party talks that aimed to get the North to halt its nuclear program.In 2009, North Korea said it would never return to those talks. The four other participants in the negotiations were South Korea, the United States, Japan and Russia.The White House said any talks must involve action by North Korea to show it is moving towards disarmament.North Korea was looking for holes in the international consensus that it must denuclearize by seeking dialogue with various countries, said Wang Dong, an international relations professor at Peking University in Beijing."If China's stance is still firm, North Korea will understand that there are no loopholes to exploit," Wang said."You can't have your cake and eat it too. I think China will make this clear to North Korea," he said, referring to Pyongyang's refusal to give up its nuclear weapons while at the same time trying to mend ties with key powers.The talks are the highest-level contact between China and North Korea since U.S. President Barack Obama and Chinese President Xi Jinping met in California in early June and agreed that North Korea had to denuclearize.North Korea has repeatedly said it will never abandon its nuclear weapons, calling them its "treasured sword", a term one of its official newspapers used again on Wednesday.Late last month, North Korean leader Kim Jong-un sent another envoy to Beijing. According to a source with knowledge of that visit, Chinese officials gave the envoy a lukewarm reception while saying Beijing wanted an end to the North's nuclear and missile tests.Li Bin, a nuclear policy expert at the Carnegie-Tsinghua Centre for Global Policy in Beijing, said he did not believe North Korea was ready to discuss its nuclear program with China."But now they see that China is very serious with sanctions and is very angry. My guess is that they are coming to Beijing to avoid a situation in which the relationship between the two countries gets worse," he said.China, the closest thing Pyongyang has to a major ally, backed the latest round of U.N. sanctions on North Korea, imposed for its February 12. nuclear test. Some Chinese banks have also curtailed ties to their North Korean counterparts in the wake of a U.S. crackdown on the North's finances.Next week, South Korea's President Park Geun-hye visits China, where North Korea is likely to be high on the agenda.Washington has been skeptical of any move by Pyongyang towards dialogue as it has repeatedly backtracked on deals, most recently in 2012, when it agreed to a missile and nuclear test moratorium only to fire a rocket a few weeks later.
BEIJING — Call me a lecher but don't call me a crook, an ex-city official at the heart of a sex tape scandal has said in his unusually spirited courtroom defense against corruption charges.The case of Lei Zhengfu, former party chief of a district in the southern city of Chongqing, has riveted the Chinese public since video clips went viral of the portly 55-year-old having sex with a woman hired by property developers allegedly in an elaborate extortion scheme.In a country where corruption trials of high-level officials typically look like the scripted outcome of backdoor bargaining, Lei's case has offered a rare look at what happens when a lower-level official is caught in a high-profile crackdown — with few political cards to play.Lei is accused of accepting more than 3 million yuan ($500,000) in bribes from a developer to pay off a businessman who was allegedly using the tape to blackmail him. Lei rejects the charge of bribery, saying the money was a loan."Although I'm quite lecherous, I'm not greedy for money," he said in a Chongqing court Wednesday, reading out a personal statement.Public anger and disgust over official corruption found an easy target in the images of his jowly, pop-eyed face in the throes of passion. Lei was soon fired from his post, and in ensuing weeks, more tapes were found, felling 11 other Chongqing officials.The scandal has exposed in lurid detail the shady intertwining of sex, business and politics in Chinese society at a time when a newly installed generation of Communist Party leadership has vowed to crack down on widespread graft. It also tapped into public outrage over what is seen as the moral degradation of the country's leaders."The people's hatred of official corruption is not only because of their illegal behavior but because of resentment that they enjoy a special status that is higher than others and lets them enjoy more social resources," said Liu Shanying, a politics researcher at the Chinese Academy of Social Sciences in Beijing. "They hope to see them punished by the law, which would help them vent that anger."The court said it would issue a verdict at a later, unspecified date. On Thursday, those accused of running the extortion ring stood trial in a closed hearing.Wednesday's proceedings involving Lei were in stark contrast to the corruption trial of China's former railways minister Liu Zhijun earlier this month, a much bigger case involving bribery amounting to 64 million yuan ($10.5 million) spanning more than two decades.The railways minister's trial was a smoothly orchestrated affair of just a few hours, concluding before lunchtime. He pleaded guilty and showed remorse, thanking the Communist Party for the years it invested in him. Only the official Xinhua News Agency and state broadcaster CCTV were allowed inside the courtroom and media reports were uniformly similar and lacking in the salacious detail that has featured in Lei's case.The trials of high-level officials accused of corruption are often seen as foregone conclusions hammered out by politicians and the party's graft investigators and announced by a court. There is usually little dispute aired during proceedings, and most of it is kept out of the public eye. In the railways minister's case, the two sides were so in tandem that even prosecutors were making a case for the court to show leniency for Liu.As a district party chief, Lei is probably at the lowest rung of the party ladder in terms of officials who matter — and his case comes during a big political shakeup in the city of Chongqing after the downfall of its party chief in a major scandal. Lei appears to have been left to fend for himself and has sought to make the case that he was the victim of a heinous extortion gang that preyed on his weakness for women who were not his wife.Here's how the scheme that allegedly ensnared Lei and the other officials is said to have worked: Attractive women were hired by Xiao Ye, a local businessman, to have sex with city officials and secretly videotape the trysts. Xiao then promised to make the tapes go away — for a price.In Lei's case, a property developer agreed to provide the hush money of 3 million yuan in return for his patronage in business deals. Prosecutors say the transaction amounts to a bribe that Lei accepted, but defense attorney Ye Dongqiang said his client had always considered it a loan and had kept a record of it."We believe that from a truth-seeking, legal perspective, it does not amount to bribery," Ye said in an interview. "We can't just convict him because this case has a big social impact and because there are negative remarks in society. He has violated morals, but the law must have a bottom line."Associated Press researcher Flora Ji contributed to this report.
BEIJING — Vietnam's president was being feted by China's leaders on a visit through Friday as Beijing continues to shun another rival for South China Sea territory that has challenged its claims on legal grounds, the Philippines.President Truong Tan Sang is on a three-day visit to boost economic ties with China, Vietnam's communist ally and biggest trading partner. How to manage their disputed territorial sea claims — which last month led to a damaged fishing boat and allegations of a crew's lives being put at risk — is also on the agenda.China and Vietnam agreed on Wednesday to set up a hotline to resolve fishing incidents in their disputed waters. Both sides should inform the other of any detentions or incidents involving fishermen or fishing boats within 48 hours.China claims virtually the entire South China Sea and its island groups, while Vietnam and other Southeast Asian countries claim some areas. The islands sit amid some of the world's busiest commercial sea lanes, along with rich fishing grounds and potential oil and gas deposits.The claims are longstanding but new skirmishes have erupted in the last two years between China and Vietnam and the Philippines.Last month, Vietnam accused China of damaging a fishing boat that it said was operating in Vietnamese waters, risking the lives of 15 crew members. China said the Vietnamese fishing boat was fishing illegally around islands in Chinese waters. Earlier this month, anti-China protesters staged a show of dissent in Vietnam's capital, demonstrating the domestic pressure its government faces when dealing with China's territorial claims.China has painted a more consolatory picture with Vietnam than with the Philippines, which made the daring move earlier this year to legally challenge China's vast claims before a tribunal under the United Nations Convention on the Law of the Sea. China has ignored the move.China wants the disputes settled by negotiating one on one with each of the rival claimants, something that will give it an advantage because of its sheer size."Of course it is desirable for China to set up fishing hotlines with other countries if such agreements can be reached, but the problem is it's even more difficult to sit down for negotiations with countries like the Philippines," said Li Jinming of the Institute for South China Sea Studies at Xiamen University.President Sang met his counterpart Xi Jinping on Wednesday. In remarks carried by the official Xinhua News Agency, Xi said the countries should seek a political solution and not let the issue affect bilateral ties. On Thursday, he was meeting Premier Li Keqiang.
SHANGHAI — David Beckham drew a line under China's soccer history on Thursday, saying he hoped to inspire local children to get back into the sport.Appointed in March as a Chinese soccer ambassador shortly before the start of the new Super League season, the former England captain faces a tough task with local soccer still in a quagmire following a long line of graft issues.In February, two former soccer administration heads were banned for life by the Chinese Football Association for accepting bribes, while Shanghai Shenhua, who made waves by signing former Chelsea strike duo Didier Drogba and Nicolas Anelka, were docked points for matchfixing and stripped of the 2003 title."When I first came on as ambassador of the Super League, I was well aware of what has happened in the past, and people question why I wanted to be involved in something that in the past had a bad name or corruption involved," Beckham told reporters in Shanghai."For me, the past is the past, this is the future," added Beckham who had to cut short his programme at the Tongji University where his arrival sparked a stampede in which at least five people were injured.He was mobbed by some 500 fans, some pushing police officers as they tried to film Beckham."Beckham didn't finish what he (was) scheduled to do here because of today's disorder," university student Zhou Xiru said."He just walked around in the field and left. I think the impression of Tongji University in Beckham's mind must be bad."The image of China's soccer has not been great either.The graft issues and problems with on-field violence have been blamed for China's lack of success at international level, with the team qualifying only once for the World Cup, in 2002.Despite his retirement in May, the former Manchester United and Real Madrid midfielder remains one of world sport's most marketable athletes and was already fulfilling his mandate by attracting fans back, officials said."Obviously everyone pays attention to Chinese football, we know that it is going through a rough time, but we are working very, very hard," China Super League deputy general Zhu He Yuan said."We invited David Beckham to inspire kids to participate in the game and to inspire more people to watch the game and from his last two trips we have achieved this goal."The former Paris St Germain and LA Galaxy midfielder will continue his week-long tour with a trip to Hangzhou, a scenic lake town two hours from Shanghai.One of England's wealthiest footballers, Beckham has not revealed how much he is getting paid for his role.
BEIJING — He is no musician, but dissident artist Ai Weiwei is using music to convey his criticism and mockery of China's authoritarian state.On the second anniversary of his 81-day secret detention, Ai released his first music album "The Divine Comedy," which includes the previously released single, "Dumbass."The song is meant to reconstruct his detention, which was part of an overall crackdown on dissent in 2011. Ai's subsequent conviction for tax evasion has been seen by his supporters as punishment for his activism.The full album released Saturday has five other songs documenting Ai's experiences with police and sharing his reflection on China's current conditions.Musician Zuoxiao Zuzhou, a friend of Ai, wrote the music, with influences from pop, rock, punk and heavy metal. Ai's vocals appear to spoken more than sang, and the lyrics include obscenities to express his anger at what he sees as a repressive police state."I had been thinking about how to recover from the trauma. And I came up with the idea of using music to convey a sentiment that is tremendously secret, and private, to the public," Ai said last month when "Dumbass" was released.A sculptor, designer and documentary-maker, Ai has irked Beijing by using his art and online profile to draw attention to injustices in China and the need for greater transparency and rule of law.After his release in June 2011, Ai's design firm was slapped with a $2.4 million tax bill, which he fought unsuccessfully in the Chinese courts.
BEIJING — Chinese state television has shown men catching a 2-and-a-half-year-old girl who apparently fell from a fifth-story window.The girl, Qiqi, escaped with small scrapes on her face.The security camera footage aired by CCTV showed a group of men in an alley pointing and looking up the side of a building. They dash into a huddle just as the youngster falls into their arms.CCTV said workers at a delivery company nearby heard the girl crying as her legs dangled out the window. The report quoted her parents as saying they left Qiqi home alone while she was sleeping but she climbed onto the windowsill after she woke.It happened Thursday in Ninghai, in eastern Zhejiang province.
REYKJAVIK, Iceland — An Icelandic business executive said Friday that a private plane is on standby to transport National Security Agency secrets leaker Edward Snowden from Hong Kong to Iceland.Olafur Vignir Sigurvinsson said he has not spoken directly with Snowden but has been in touch with a third party representing him.The businessman, who has connections to the WikiLeaks secret-spilling organization, said he has access to planes in Hong Kong and mainland China that Snowden could use.But Iceland's government says it has not received an asylum request from Snowden, who has revealed his role in providing secret NSA documents about widespread surveillance programs.Iceland Interior Ministry spokesman Johannes Tomasson said Snowden hasn't approached the ministry and could initiate an asylum request if he was already in Iceland.When asked about the reports of Sigurvinsson chartering a private plane to fly Snowden to Iceland, Tomasson said: "We don't object to that. But we don't have any knowledge other than what has been in the news. We can't comment any further on that."U.S. officials have expressed an interest in prosecuting Snowden for his admitted role in the publication of the documents. Snowden fled to Hong Kong and is hiding.Sigurvinsson said that Snowden's potential private flight is being funded by private donations."There are a number of people that are interested in freedom of speech and recognize the importance of knowing who is spying on us," he said. "We are people that care about privacy."Money is being raised on Snowden's behalf by the Progressive Change Campaign Committee based in the United States, but it was not expected to be tapped to help with the cost of a possible flight to Iceland.Spokesman Matt Wall said Friday that more than $20,800 had been raised so far to pay for possible legal fees but that this would not be put to use for Snowden's personal expenses.Sigurvinsson is a former director of DataCell, a data hosting service provider that, as one of its services, processed donations for WikiLeaks. He previously worked for investment and technology companies, including Baugur Group, MerkurPoint and iCell.He said his group hopes to obtain Icelandic citizenship for Snowden."We are hoping that the government does what they did with Bobby Fischer," he said, referring to the late chess master who went to Iceland to escape U.S. prosecution for breaking sanctions imposed on the former Yugoslavia. "We will see what happens."
WASHINGTON — Since the disclosure of National Security Agency surveillance documents by the British newspaper The Guardian began this month, President Obama, top intelligence officials and members of Congress have repeatedly assured Americans that they are not the target of the N.S.A.'s sweeping electronic collection system."Nobody is listening to your telephone calls," Mr. Obama said when the news broke.But as experts on American intelligence knew, that was not the whole story. It left out what N.S.A. officials have long called "incidental" collection of Americans' calls and e-mails — the routine capture of Americans' communications in the process of targeting foreign communications.On Thursday, in the latest release of documents supplied by Edward J. Snowden, the former N.S.A. contractor now believed to be hiding in Hong Kong, The Guardian published two documents setting out the detailed rules governing the agency's intercepts. Dated 2009 and signed by Attorney General Eric H. Holder Jr., they advise N.S.A. eavesdroppers on how to judge whether a target is a foreigner overseas, and therefore fair game, and what to do when they pick up Americans at home or abroad.They show, for example, that N.S.A. officers who intercept an American online or on the phone — say, while monitoring the phone or e-mail of a foreign diplomat or a suspected terrorist — can preserve the recording or transcript if they believe the contents include "foreign intelligence information" or evidence of a possible crime. They can likewise preserve the intercept if it contains information on a "threat of serious harm to life or property" or sheds light on technical issues like encryption or vulnerability to cyberattacks.And while N.S.A. analysts usually have to delete Americans' names from the reports they write, there are numerous exceptions, including cases where there is evidence that the American in the intercept is working for a terrorist group, foreign country or foreign corporation.The documents, classified "Secret," describe the procedures for eavesdropping under Section 702 of the FISA Amendments Act, including an N.S.A. program called Prism that mines Internet communications using services including Gmail and Facebook. They are likely to add fuel for both sides of the debate over the proper limits of the government's surveillance programs.They offer a glimpse of a rule-bound intelligence bureaucracy that is highly sensitive to the distinction between foreigners and "U.S. persons," which technically include not only American citizens and legal residents but American companies and nonprofit organizations as well. The two sets of rules, each nine pages long, belie the image of a rogue intelligence agency recklessly violating Americans' privacy.But the very existence of the rules suggests that Americans routinely fall into the agency's global net, even if they are not the intended target of the eavesdropping. And since a major focus of American intelligence since 2001 has been the terrorist threat to the United States, calls and e-mails in and out of the country draw particular attention.In addition, current and former N.S.A. officials acknowledge that "incidental" collection of Americans' communications occurs more often today than in the past because of the proliferation of cellphones and e-mail, which can make it harder to determine a person's identity and location.A senior American intelligence official said that while the possibility of incidental collection of Americans' calls and e-mails had always been acknowledged, the N.S.A.'s goal is to focus on foreigners. "The point we've been making is this is not a tool for listening to Americans," the official said.Another American official noted that the default procedure when an American is incidentally picked up is to stop listening and destroy the record, and that exceptions are made mostly for threats to security."If there's a terrorist attack planned or a threat of a cyberattack, I think Americans want us to pay attention to it," the official said. Both officials agreed to discuss the classified rules on condition of anonymity.But Jameel Jaffer, deputy legal director of the American Civil Liberties Union, said the detailed rules only underscored the intrusion on American privacy from the agency's eavesdropping."From the beginning the concern was that the government would sweep up Americans' communications in the course of surveillance directed at people outside the country," Mr. Jaffer said. "These documents suggest that it's even worse than we thought."He noted a clause about restrictions on the intercept of attorney-client communications but said it allowed wide latitude for sharing such communications inside the government.William C. Banks, an expert on national security law at Syracuse University College of Law, said many of the issues raised by the leaked documents were thoroughly discussed when the FISA Amendments Act was passed in 2008 and renewed last year. But he said there appeared to be little reason for the rules to be secret."I can't imagine there's great harm to national security from these rules being out," Professor Banks said. "If this helps us learn more about what the government's doing, that's probably a good thing."F.B.I. agents and American prosecutors are believed to be building a criminal leak case against Mr. Snowden, who turns 30 on Friday. Officials in Iceland say Mr. Snowden's representatives have contacted them to explore the possibility that he might be granted asylum there.
HONG KONG — As pollution in Singapore soared to record levels on Thursday, local officials pressed Indonesia to curtail the widespread burning of forests, which they say is causing the stubborn haze enveloping the city-state.The Pollution Standards Index, a uniform system used by Singapore to measure pollution, hit 371 at 1 p.m., topping the previous record of 226, which was set in 1997. Health officials consider any level above 300 to be hazardous to health.Residents were urged to remain indoors, while air traffic controllers at Changi Airport were told to take extra precautions in directing flights. In neighboring Malaysia, more than 200 schools were ordered closed because of the pollution.The persistence of the pollution this week has tested ties with Indonesia, where farmers in Sumatra often burn forests at this time of year as a cheap way to prepare the land for new plantings. Though such burning violates local laws, Indonesian officials have failed to stop it."No country or corporation has the right to pollute the air at the expense of Singaporeans' health and well-being," Vivian Balakrishnan, Singapore's environment minister, said in calling for Indonesian action to curb the fires.Indonesian officials say Malaysia and Singapore deserve part of the blame because their companies control many of the palm oil plantations where the burning takes place.An Indonesian official struck back on Thursday at the criticism from Singapore. Agung Laksono, the coordinating minister for people's welfare, said, "Singapore shouldn't be like children, in such a tizzy," according to The Straits Times of Singapore.The problems in Singapore and Malaysia come at a time of increasing concern about pollution across Asia, particularly in China, where pollution readings this year have been at least 30 percent higher than in previous years.
BEIJING — The reported cause of death was respiratory failure, but the images circulating over Chinese social media on Thursday — showing a man staring blankly from a hospital bed, his gaunt body covered with bruises and scabs — told a different story.The man, Qian Guoliang, 48, is the third Chinese official in the last three months known to have died while under detention by Communist Party investigators. His death on Wednesday, which came two months after he was ordered to submit to an extralegal investigative procedure reserved for party members, has raised concerns about China's renewed efforts to crack down on official corruption.Xi Jinping, China's new leader, has said that the Communist Party's failure to control graft could threaten its survival. On Tuesday, he began a "party rectification" campaign to stamp out waste, bureaucracy and graft, and has said the party must fight both "tigers and flies," meaning top officials and lowly cadres.In recent months, a handful of senior officials have been targeted in corruption investigations, including Liu Tienan, a top economic planner, and Ni Fake, a former vice governor of Anhui Province. Liu Zhijun, the former head of the Ministry of Railways, went on trial earlier this month, charged with receiving millions of dollars in bribes, and Bo Xilai, formerly a rising party secretary in Chongqing, has been in detention for more than a year while under investigation on charges of corruption and abuse of power.The Communist Party makes use of a secretive system of detention known as "shuanggui" to scrutinize and discipline its members. The investigative mechanism exists outside the Chinese legal system, offering wide potential for abuse."Shuanggui has its own rules," said Fu Hualing, a law professor at the University of Hong Kong. "It doesn't follow the rule of law."Shuanggui, which means "double regulations," refers to a set time and place at which party members are meant to appear. The targets can be held at special party detention centers or hotels. The system allows open-ended detention, and subjects are sometimes beaten, starved and deprived of sleep to force confessions."The practice of shuanggui is above and outside the law, yet it is so commonly used," said Si Weijiang, a lawyer hired by Mr. Qian's family who has represented the families of other officials who have died in custody. "It is highly dangerous. I'm afraid this death won't be the last if this practice continues."Reports of the abuse of criminal suspects can often generate public concern in China, but sympathy for officials who have died in shuanggui custody is tempered by greater anger over corruption."If you look at all the surveys, corruption is always ranked as a top public concern," Professor Fu said. "As long as shuanggui is used as an anticorruption enforcement weapon, I think it has the support of general public."Lower-level officials, the "flies" in Xi Jinping's formulation, have endured the harshest treatment while under investigation. Jia Jiuxiang, a 49-year-old court official in Sanmenxia, a city along the Yellow River in central Henan Province, died on April 23 after 11 days in custody. His death was reported as a heart attack, but his family said his body was swollen and bruised.Yu Qiyi, a 41-year-old engineer with a state-owned firm in the southern coastal city of Wenzhou, died on April 9 after five weeks of detention. Six people have been arrested and charged with intentional assault in connection with his death, according to Mr. Si and to a microblog account run by Mr. Yu's family.Mr. Qian, the latest official to die while under investigation, was head of the seismological bureau in Huangmei County, in central Hubei Province. He was detained by Communist Party investigators on April 8, but after he began to suffer convulsions and lose consciousness he was sent to a hospital on June 3, according to the Guangzhou-based Southern Metropolis Daily, which first reported his death."So far the family has not received any official explanation as to why this happened to Qian," said Mr. Si, the lawyer. "The family demands to see recorded videos and audios of the interrogation, but there has been no reply."The Huangmei County propaganda department did not answer calls seeking comment on Thursday.Mr. Qian's wife, Wang Qizhen, confirmed her husband's death in a brief phone interview but declined to discuss his case further, saying she was preparing for his funeral. She told The Southern Metropolis Daily that they had earlier heard rumors that Huangmei County was under orders to uncover at least three corrupt officials this year, but her husband was unconcerned."We don't know who the next unlucky one will be," she quoted her husband as saying, "but I'm a clean official, so I can sleep easy."
HONG KONG — China's financial system is in the throes of a cash squeeze as the government tries to restructure the economy and punish speculators, with interbank lending rates spiking on Thursday and bank-to-bank borrowing nearly stalled.China's interbank and money market rates have soared over the last two weeks, and banks and other financial institutions are afraid of lending to one another. Without that lending, an economy can quickly stultify. Those in need of short-term cash, or liquidity, must pay dearly or risk default.China's central bank, the People's Bank of China, has refused to provide large amounts of additional cash to the credit market. Analysts say the government is holding off for a reason: it is trying to reshape the economy while reducing its future role. The bank is not independent, unlike many other central banks, and reports to the State Council.A huge shadow banking operation has emerged in China in recent years, with smaller banks and trust companies borrowing from bigger state-run banks and relending that money at high interest rates to private companies and property developers, a practice that fuels speculation.Pressuring speculators is a risky strategy for the Chinese government, which is also grappling with a slowing economy. Many borrowers may have a harder time paying back their loans, and analysts fear the losses could ripple through the banking system."The central bank wants to accelerate reform," said Zhu Haibin, an economist at JPMorgan Chase. "They want to give the market a lesson: you need to manage your risk and not rely on the central bank."Mr. Zhu and other economists say restructuring the economy, which has grown addicted to easy money, could be perilous for another reason. The decision could reduce lending and slow growth too quickly.The worst case, absent intervention by policy makers, would be defaults at lenders with the most exposure and shakiest balance sheets. The damage could spread to other banks, setting off runs on deposits by ordinary Chinese. In the near term, markets will probably continue to be rattled, especially shares in financial institutions.That was certainly the fear on Thursday around the globe. "China's interbank market is basically frozen — much like credit markets froze in the United States right after Lehman failed," said Patrick Chovanec, managing director and chief strategist at Silvercrest Asset Management. "Rates are being quoted, but no transactions are taking place."Stock markets across greater China fell Thursday on news of the liquidity situation and a disappointing survey on manufacturing. The Hang Seng Index in Hong Kong dropped 2.9 percent, and the Shanghai composite index fell 2.8 percent.The combination of slower economic expansion and the liquidity squeeze offers one of the biggest challenges yet to the newly installed leadership in Beijing.Prime Minister Li Keqiang, who took office in March, has said he plans changes that will promote sustainable growth, as opposed to relying on the easy credit from state-controlled banks that helped the country rebound since the 2008 financial crisis."While the economy faces up to many difficulties and challenges, we must promote financial reform in an orderly way to better serve economic restructuring," China's State Council said in a statement Wednesday after a meeting presided by Mr. Li, according to Xinhua, the state-run news agency.The interest rate that Chinese banks must pay to borrow money from one another surged overnight to a record high of 13.44 percent Thursday, according to official daily rates set by the National Interbank Funding Center in Shanghai. That was up from 7.66 percent on Wednesday and less than 4 percent last month.China's policy makers have an arsenal of options at their disposal to inject more money into the financial system, including open market operations — trading in securities to control interest rates or liquidity — or, more drastically, freeing up some of the trillions of renminbi that banks are required to keep on reserve with the central bank.
BEIJING — In a rare case of gun violence in China, a man fatally shot five people and beat a sixth to death, including some of his factory colleagues and a soldier, police said Sunday.The 62-year-old man's killing spree started when he used unspecified tools to beat a colleague to death over an economic dispute, according to Shanghai police. The man identified as having the surname Fan killed his colleague on Saturday afternoon at a chemical factory in Shanghai's Baoshan district, the Shanghai Public Security Bureau said on its microblog.The bureau said Fan then took a hunting rifle that was hidden in his dormitory, asked a driver to take him to another district and then shot him on the way. After killing the man, Fan drove the vehicle back to Baoshan and killed a soldier who was guarding the entrance to a barracks. He also took the soldier's gun.Fan then returned to the factory and fatally shot three more people with his hunting rifle, including a manager. Police said they captured him in the factory about six hours after his killing spree started.Guns are hard to come by in China. Firearms are tightly controlled and private ownership is for the most part illegal. Citizens who have hunting permits may apply at their local police station for permission to own a hunting rifle.
ROGERS, Ark. — Stacy Lewis has made no secret about her desire to earn a championship in front of her adopted hometown fans.The world's No. 2 golfer has also been open about how that internal pressure has caused her to struggle in recent years at the LPGA NW Arkansas Championship.Lewis put all distractions aside on Saturday, shooting a 6-under 65 to join a group of four players atop the leaderboard at 10 under overall after the second round of the tournament at Pinnacle Country Club.The round was a welcomed bit of excitement for a surging and vocal gallery that followed Lewis' every shot. It was especially gratifying for the former world No. 1, who played collegiately at nearby Arkansas — and who has struggled to contend in recent years at the tournament.Lewis earned an unofficial win at the rain-shortened event as an amateur in 2007. Since then, however, the former Rookie of the Year and last year's Player of the Year entered this week having finished in an average of 23rd place in front of her many fans — including a 49th-place finish last year.Back-to-back wins earlier this year briefly vaulted Lewis into the top spot in the world rankings, a position she said prepared her for the hectic schedule she faces this week."It's everything I deal with this year with the week that I became No. 1 in the world. It was just chaos," Lewis said. "Dealing with that pressure of being No. 1 in the world, I learned a lot from that."I honestly think that's why I've come here this week and it doesn't seem so busy anymore, doesn't seem too hard to play with all the fans."Chie Arimura and Beatriz Recari both equaled Lewis' 65 on Saturday and are tied entering the final round with So Yeon Ryu.I.K. Kim and defending champion Ai Miyazato tied for the lowest round of the day, each shooting a 7-under 64.First-round leader Mika Miyazato shot a 70 and is three shots back, while top-ranked Inbee Park leads a group of three players two shots back at 8 under.They will all be chasing Lewis on Sunday, at least in terms of the attention from the galleries to begin with. She will be paired with Recari in the final grouping of the day, and she is well aware of the excitement she will feel."I think the harder part is I'm going to want it so bad, and I know the fans are going to want me to get it really bad," Lewis said. "So, it's going to be hard. The hardest part is going to be staying patient and not trying to force putts and running them four feet by (the hole)."Lewis was as low as 11 under after 17 holes on Saturday, thanks in large part to needing only 27 putts for her round — a number that included several near misses and a three-putt on her final hole. The 28-year-old Lewis, who played during the morning, thrilled her pro-Arkansas gallery with four straight birdies on her first nine holes.After starting on the back nine, she birdied holes 14-17 to reach 8 under before the par-5 18th took its toll. Lewis' approach on her third shot came up just short and rolled to the bottom of the hill in front of the green. Her following chip did the same.Fortunately for Lewis, she managed to save bogey with an up-and-down — thanks to her fifth straight one-putt. She then reached 11 under after four more birdies later in her round before bogeying her final hole of the day.Lewis will have plenty of challengers Sunday on a leaderboard that features seven players within two shots of the lead, including Park — with two major wins this year.Arimura, the rookie from China, also needed only 27 putts on Saturday in shooting a bogey-free 65. She tied for the lead with birdies on her final two holes. Ryu birdied the par-5 7th hole — her 16th hole of the round — to reach 10 under in the final tournament before next week's U.S. Open.Recari also posted a bogey-free round, birdieing four of her first seven holes before making the last of her six birdies on the par-5 14th. The Spanish golfer already has one win this year, the Kia Classic in March."I think overall I'm pretty happy and proud of how I handled myself the last two days," Recari said. "I have a very clear idea of what I have to do mentally, so I feel very confident and very good for my last round."Kim, Pornanong Phatlum and Ji Young Oh are each at 8 under along with Park, while amateur Lydia Ko and Miyazato are at 7 under.Juli Inkster followed an opening 71 with a 6-under 65 on Saturday.Lewis, meanwhile, said she planned to play a round of golf with her nephew on Saturday afternoon before relaxing for the rest of the day in anticipation of what she hopes is a hometown celebration on Sunday."I'm definitely going to use the crowd some, but then I need to also just kind of scale it back and just stay in what I am doing right now because it's working," Lewis said.
HONG KONG — Hong Kong was silent Saturday on whether a former National Security Agency contractor should be extradited to the United States now that he has been charged with espionage, but some local legislators said the Chinese government should decide.Edward Snowden, believed to be holed up in Hong Kong, has admitted providing information to the news media about two highly classified NSA surveillance programs.It is not known if the U.S. government has made a formal extradition request — a process that could take years, and the Hong Kong government had no immediate reaction to the charges against Snowden. Police Commissioner Andy Tsang told reporters only that the case would be dealt with according to the law. A police statement said it was "inappropriate" for the police to comment on the case.When China regained control of Hong Kong in 1997, the former British colony was granted a high degree of autonomy and granted rights and freedoms not seen on mainland China. However, under the city's mini constitution Beijing is allowed to intervene in matters involving defense and diplomatic affairs.Outspoken legislator Leung Kwok-hung said Beijing should instruct Hong Kong to protect Snowden from extradition before his case gets dragged through the court system. Leung also urged the people of Hong Kong to "take to the streets to protect Snowden."Another legislator, Cyd Ho, vice-chairwoman of the pro-democracy Labour Party, said China "should now make its stance clear to the Hong Kong SAR (Special Administrative Region) government" before the case goes before a court.China has urged Washington to provide explanations following the disclosures of National Security Agency programs which collect millions of telephone records and track foreign Internet activity on U.S. networks, but it has not commented on Snowden's status in Hong Kong.Another disclosure came late Saturday when the South China Morning Post reported on its website that Snowden claimed the NSA hacked Chinese cell phone companies to steal SMS data. The paper also said, without citing any source, that Snowden was "safe" in Hong Kong and not in police custody.Snowden claimed to have supporting documents of the text-message hacking, the paper said, though its report did not explain his alleged evidence. He spoke to the paper in a June 12 interview.A formal extradition request to Hong Kong could drag through appeal courts for years and would pit Beijing against Washington at a time China tries to deflect U.S. accusations that it carries out extensive surveillance on American government and commercial operations.Snowden told the Post in the same interview that he hoped to stay in the autonomous region of China because he has faith in "the courts and people of Hong Kong to decide my fate."A prominent former politician in Hong Kong, Martin Lee, the founding chairman of the Democratic Party, said he doubted whether Beijing would intervene yet."Beijing would only intervene according to my understanding at the last stage. If the magistrate said there is enough to extradite, then Mr. Snowden can then appeal," he said.Lee said Beijing could then decide at the end of the appeal process if it wanted Snowden extradited or not.The criminal complaint unsealed Friday in a U.S. federal court alleged Snowden engaged in two violations of the Espionage Act and committed theft of government property. All three crimes carry a maximum 10-year prison term.If formal extradition is pursued, Snowden could contest it on grounds of political persecution.Hong Kong lawyer Mark Sutherland said that the filing of a refugee, torture or inhuman punishment claim acts as an automatic bar on any extradition proceedings until those claims can be assessed."Some asylum seekers came to Hong Kong 10 years ago and still haven't had their protection claims assessed," Sutherland said.
The turbulence that struck China's banks this week is the latest episode in a political drama likely to play out in coming months: President Xi versus President Xi.The country's new leader, Xi Jinping, has ignited expectations of bold economic liberalization, but he has also cast himself as a resolute defender of Communist Party control, leaving even insiders uncertain about how far he will push changes that could strain the webs of state patronage and unsettle the stability that he and many other officials also prize.The changes proposed by some Chinese officials include rolling back certain state controls on prices of energy and natural resources, encouraging private business in industries long dominated by state conglomerates and bringing more market competition into the financial sector.But such ambitions could falter in the face of opposition from other officials and state-owned companies, as well as the concerns of party leaders about social instability and slowing growth. The turmoil of bank-to-bank loans is but one example of the kind of economic jitters and pitfalls that Mr. Xi and his colleagues could confront as they grapple with these policy choices, analysts said."So much risk has already been accumulated, but they need to avoid panic while pushing forward real reforms," said Tao Ran, an economics professor and director of the China Center for Public Economics and Governance at Renmin University in Beijing. "It's politically very difficult."The interest rates that banks charge to lend to each other shot up Thursday and lending between banks nearly seized up after the People's Bank of China uncharacteristically failed to intervene to relieve a cash squeeze. The move seemed to be part of the government's effort to force state banks to cut lending to inefficient or risk-laden programs favored by local officials and politically connected investors, many of them state-owned companies.On Friday, the People's Bank of China appeared to retreat a bit from its hard-line stance, and financial industry executives said the central bank was releasing more money for lenders, calming investors whose worries about China's growth had rippled across stock markets. Bank-to-bank rates climbed down from Thursday's record highs, but the situation remained volatile."I thought that was a show of policy makers' determination," Yiping Huang, chief economist for emerging Asia at Barclays Capital in Hong Kong, said of the cash crunch. "They want to impose some near-term pain for long-term benefits. What they are doing is preparing steps for liberalization and, hopefully, for better market discipline."In China, the Communist Party's power rests on a marriage of political and economic control, but Prime Minister Li Keqiang and other officials have said market liberalization is needed to foster new sources of growth.Yet those changes could require painful, even risky, surgery on the party's limbs of power: state-owned banks, local governments, and companies and investment vehicles controlled by the government. And that is the conundrum facing China's leaders: they want to maintain the growth needed to satisfy an increasingly prosperous and vociferous society, yet worry that the proposed changes could erode the political reach and stability they see as underpinning one-party rule."Economic reform, I mean real reform, undoubtedly now involves questions about the political system, because excessive state power is a key issue," said Deng Yuwen, who was dismissed this year as an editor at a party newspaper, The Study Times, after bluntly criticizing state policies.Mr. Xi, as party leader, must come up with at least part of his answer to these questions by autumn, when the party's Central Committee gathers. With slightly more than 200 senior officials as full, voting members, the committee meets in seclusion at least once a year to approve policy priorities. This meeting, or plenum, is the third for this cohort of the committee — by custom, third plenums set the direction for economic policy — and Mr. Xi and other officials have indicated that they want this gathering to unveil major changes.
BEIJING — China's credit squeeze eased Friday after lending resumed among banks and financial institutions that had been desperately seeking cash through the week in the interbank market.China's central government made no official announcement on the situation, and it remained unclear whether policy makers had intervened, but short-term interest rates fell sharply Friday from the day before, when they had reached some of the highest levels in a decade.Still, rates for Chinese institutions seeking interbank financing on Friday were substantially higher than they had been a few weeks ago.Financial experts said they expected the higher interest rates to persist for some time because the Chinese government appeared to have abandoned its longstanding policy of responding to any hint of an economic slowdown by expanding credit. Analysts say the government is holding back because it is determined to rein in excess credit expansion and avert a financial crisis that could result from years of poor lending practices and overinvestment. There are also hints that a huge shadow banking operation in China could be masking more serious financial risk-taking."The government at the moment wants to signal, we're working on reform; we're not interested in short-term stimulus, like China did in the past," said Louis Kuijs, the chief China economist at the Royal Bank of Scotland.The government's reluctance to increase bank liquidity is troubling investors because of concerns that China's economy is weakening much faster than expected.Economists in China cut their growth forecasts sharply in the last week, though projections remain robust at 7 percent. Prices of Chinese shares plunged on the Shanghai and Shenzhen stock markets, ending one of the worst weeks in four years.Joe Zhang, a longtime banker and the author of "Inside China's Shadow Banking: The Next Subprime Crisis?," said the apparent decision by the central bank to discipline banks by allowing rates to rise this past week was necessary."Effectively, they're telling commercial banks to go and sort out their problems," Mr. Zhang said by telephone on Friday. "The banks have lent out too much money. And what happens over time? You go from prime to subprime to silly loans. This is what happened with the U.S. subprime crisis. Banks start lending to bad projects. We've been too reckless."Determined to shore up defenses in a financial system that now underlies the world's second-largest economy after the United States, China's top leaders are slowing the flow of the fuel that has helped foster many of the risks: credit from state-run banks.For much of the last decade, when the economy has slowed, Beijing has pressed state-owned banks to lend more aggressively.But when interbank lending tightened this month — after aggressive lending early in the year — the central bank refrained from adding liquidity to the market, which would have kept short-term interest rates low.As credit markets began to freeze up and mistrust among banks spread, rumors circulated of defaults. Late Thursday, the Bank of China, one of the country's biggest lenders, was forced to issue a statement on its Web site denying local news reports that it had defaulted on interbank payments.By late Friday, the markets had settled somewhat. The overnight lending rate between banks had dropped to 8.49 percent, down from a record-high fixing of 13.44 percent on Thursday, but still much higher than last month's levels of less than 4 percent.The situation remains volatile. Another benchmark rate for bank-to-bank borrowing costs, the seven-day repurchase rate, opened Friday at 8.1 percent, briefly soared as high as 25 percent and closed at 5.5 percent."Persistent tight liquidity conditions in China's financial sector could constrain the ability of some banks to meet upcoming obligations on maturing wealth management products on a timely basis," the credit ratings agency Fitch Ratings said in a report. Wealth management products are instruments sold to investors through banks and trust funds but do not appear on the financial companies' balance sheets.Referring to wealth management products, Fitch went on: "Issuance of new products, and borrowing from the interbank market, are among the most common sources of repayment for maturing W.M.P.'s, and the recent interbank liquidity shortage complicates both."
WASHINGTON — The United States pressured Hong Kong on Saturday to act soon on its request to extradite former U.S. government contractor Edward Snowden to face espionage charges."If Hong Kong doesn't act soon, it will complicate our bilateral relations and raise questions about Hong Kong's commitment to the rule of law," said a senior Obama administration official.
HONG KONG — A Hong Kong lawyer representing ex-CIA contractor Edward Snowden said on Monday that a middle man claiming to represent the Hong Kong government told Snowden that he should leave the city.Legislator Albert Ho told reporters he was approached by Snowden several days ago, and that Snowden had sought reassurances from the Hong Kong government on whether he would be able to leave the city freely, if he chose to do so.Ho, however, said that an individual claiming to represent the Hong Kong government had subsequently indicated to Snowden that he was free to leave the city and should do so."By going through not entirely legal avenues, and using a person whose identity isn't entirely clear to tell him (Snowden) that the government wants him to leave. This is a highly unusual action."
WASHINGTON — The head of the National Security Agency said on Sunday he did not know why his agency failed to prevent former NSA contractor Edward Snowden from leaving Hawaii for Hong Kong with a trove of secrets about U.S. surveillance programs."It's clearly an individual who's betrayed the trust and confidence we had in him. This is an individual who is not acting, in my opinion, with noble intent," General Keith Alexander told the ABC News "This Week" program.Snowden had been working as a contractor for the NSA in Hawaii when he fled to Hong Kong and he flew to Moscow on Sunday.Asked if he knew why the NSA did not catch Snowden before he left Hawaii, Alexander said: "No, I don't."
BEIJING — A giant panda has given birth to twins, the first pair of the endangered species born in the world this year, according to a wildlife center in southwest China.The China Conservation and Research Center for the Giant Panda in Sichuan province said the panda named Haizi gave birth to the two cubs 10 minutes apart on Saturday.Staffers at the center, which is part of the Wolong Nature Reserve, say one cub is a female and weighs 79.2 grams (2.79 ounces). Haizi has yet to release the other cub from her embrace.Giant pandas have difficulty breeding, with females fertile for only two or three days a year.Pandas number about 1,600 in the wild, where they are critically endangered due to poaching and development. More than 300 live in captivity, mostly in China's breeding programs.
But earlier this month, his unmistakable likeness began appearing on wanted posters across the capital; in recent days, the police have been scouring the gated apartment complex where he lives, hunting for him and other fugitive canines in a campaign that is striking fear into the hearts of otherwise law-abiding Beijingers."I feel like we're living in one of those war movies in which the Communists are searching for the Japanese and threatening to wipe them out," said the woman who considers herself Dou Dou's adoptive mother. "How can the government be so cruel?"Dou Dou's is among the dozens of dog breeds, including supposed miscreants like collies, Dalmatians and Labradors, that the Beijing government has long banned from much of the city. But over the last 10 days, the prohibition against such "large and vicious dogs," as they are officially branded, has been enforced with zeal, alarming pet owners who thought the size restrictions had long since lapsed."People are in a complete panic," said Mary Peng, chief executive of the International Center for Veterinary Services, a pet hospital in Beijing. "My phone has not stopped ringing."The police, often tipped off by cynophobic neighbors, have been carrying out nighttime raids on homes, and scores of dogs have been wrenched from the grip of their distraught owners, even those that had been legally registered with the authorities.Although the crackdown has its supporters, it has provoked fury from pet owners, a growing legion that includes young professionals and retirees, many of whom can be seen whiling away their days in Beijing's hutongs, or alleys, accompanied by their wheezing, overfed companions.The well-heeled have been bundling off their boxers and oversize poodles to kennels outside the city limits, while others who cannot afford such accommodations are keeping their pets hidden at home. "I'm not about to give up one of my dogs without putting up a fight," said Huang Feng, 30, a pet-store owner who has a fondness for big, lumbering breeds. "What's happening is criminal."Dog owners have been posting stories of heartbreaking encounters with the police, and a video that went viral last week shows an officer confiscating a small white dog whose owner claimed he left his dog license at home. A cartoon making the rounds on Sina Weibo, China's version of Twitter, portrays a terrified dog chased by three policemen, one of whom is firing what appears to be a cannon. "How about catching thieves instead of little dogs?" reads the caption.The Beijing Municipal Public Security Bureau did not respond to an interview request, but in public statements, the police have said they are simply enforcing the longstanding ban on dogs taller than 13.7 inches in the districts that make up the heart of the capital. Officials note that rabies last year killed 13 people in Beijing, more than double the number in 2011. Big dogs, the police contend, are incompatible with city living. "All resistance as well as violence against enforcement will be investigated and dealt with by the police," they said in a statement.The authorities appear to be so worried about a backlash that they have been deleting online criticism of the stepped-up enforcement. Last week they detained a woman who described how the police had kicked to death a golden retriever in front of its owner. The police later issued a statement saying the woman admitted to fabricating the account, a claim that has been met with widespread skepticism.In addition to risking the seizure of offending dogs on the spot, owners can be fined $800, an amount that doubles if the owner is a business. Once confiscated, large dogs cannot be retrieved.With the exception of high-end pedigrees, animal rights advocates say, many of the seized animals are likely to end up in the hands of dog meat traders."We wish the police could find a more humane way to deal with this issue," said Feng Dongmei, who runs the dog and cat welfare program at Animals Asia, a Hong Kong-based organization that wrote the government to plead for a change in the city's dog regulations.Other groups are asking the police to clarify what appear to be contradictions in the rules. Can a dog legally registered in rural areas come to Beijing for a checkup at the vet? And why, they ask, have the police in recent years been licensing large-breed dogs across the city and happily collecting the annual $160 registration fee?For years, animal advocacy groups have been trying to make a simple point to the police: big does not necessarily equal vicious. In fact, many experts note that petite breeds like Chihuahuas, dachshunds and Jack Russell terriers are often nastier than the Afghans and English sheep dogs that are officially banned."There is no bona fide scientific correlation between size and behavior," said Ms. Peng, the veterinarian.Instead of hunting down large dogs, advocates say, the government should focus on administering rabies vaccines and requiring owners to leash their pets when out for a walk. Encouraging people to spay and neuter their dogs, especially males, they say, can also have a calming effect on canines.Pet owners are scrambling for ways to keep their dogs out of harm's way. Some have stashed their beloved animals at rented farms in Hebei, the province that surrounds the capital, while those of modest means have come up with creative ways to evade the dog catchers, some of whom have admitted operating under quotas that require them to bring in 10 dogs each.One woman described how she sets her alarm for 2 a.m., taking her black Labrador retriever for brief walks when she knows the police are sleeping. Another woman no longer allows her 2-year-old husky to venture outside. Instead, he relieves himself on the balcony of her apartment after dark. "It's getting disgusting out there," she said.Like most, a 25-year-old designer, who asked that only her surname, Gao, be printed, is hoping the take-no-prisoners campaign will blow over. Earlier this month, a squad of men swept through her neighborhood with nets and metal snares. Since then, she has been staying home from work, having been traumatized by the sight of a dozen unlicensed dogs, whimpering and bloodied, being thrown into a large metal cage on the back of a police truck."Every time there's a knock at the door, my heart stops," she said. "I just don't understand why people think big dogs are a menace. My dog might be big, but he wouldn't hurt a fly."
On Sept. 5, 2003, Beijing passed the overall regulation on dog breeding . The rule, which took effect on Oct. 15 that year, stipulated among other things that "large and vicious dogs" were not allowed in "key management areas" in Beijing. The rule defined those areas — the districts that make up the heart of the capital — but not the dog breeds.Then, on Oct. 13, two days before the rule was set to take effect, the Beijing Municipal Bureau of Agriculture, the authority in charge of husbandry and veterinary affairs, issued the definitive explanation notice on the banned breeds. "In key management areas, vicious dogs as well as dogs of maturity height over 35 centimeters are not allowed," the announcement said. The notice excluded guide dogs for the blind and other similar helper dogs from the height restriction. The notice listed the following dogs as examples of those that were banned:
HONG KONG — The State Department has asked Hong Kong to extradite Edward J. Snowden to face espionage and theft charges in the United States, officials confirmed on Saturday, setting off what is likely to be a tangled and protracted fight over his fate.Tom Donilon, President Obama's national security adviser, told CBS Radio News that the request makes "a good case" under the extradition treaty between the United States and Hong Kong for the return of Mr. Snowden, the former National Security Agency contractor whose disclosures about American surveillance programs have riveted the country. "Hong Kong has been a historically good partner of the United States in law enforcement matters, and we expect them to comply with the treaty in this case," Mr. Donilon said.A public battle over the status of Mr. Snowden could prove uncomfortable for the Obama administration. His revelations have provoked new criticism of the N.S.A.'s eavesdropping and data collection, and a drawn-out legal struggle could put a harsh spotlight on the tension between Mr. Obama's pledges of transparency and civil liberties and his administration's persistent secrecy and unprecedented leak prosecutions.Mr. Snowden, 30, left a hotel room in Hong Kong two weeks ago after revealing that he was the one who leaked highly classified documents to The Guardian and The Washington Post. Hong Kong police officials would not comment on Saturday about Mr. Snowden's whereabouts.Stephen Vickers, who oversaw police criminal intelligence in Hong Kong before Britain returned the territory to China in 1997, said Saturday that the police could detain Mr. Snowden if Hong Kong government lawyers determine that the charges he faces in the United States are also illegal offenses in Hong Kong, which is likely."I have no doubt whenever the government decides to take action, they will pick him up fast," said Mr. Vickers, who now runs a risk consulting firm.David H. Laufman, a former federal prosecutor, said that American officials are likely to press Hong Kong to make sure Mr. Snowden no longer has access to the news media while in custody for fear that he could reveal more N.S.A. secrets. "He's a walking disclosure time bomb," Mr. Laufman said.If and when the Hong Kong police detain him, Mr. Snowden can then appeal to a magistrate for his release. But he faces another complication: his 90-day tourist visa runs out in mid-August, giving the local authorities another reason to keep him in custody. Should he go to jail, Mr. Snowden would "have slightly greater privileges than prisoners" elsewhere in Hong Kong, said a lawyer with experience in Hong Kong extradition cases, including the choice of Chinese or Western food and access to books — but not to computers.The more daunting challenge facing the United States is its request to have Mr. Snowden sent back to face charges in the Eastern District of Virginia. Federal prosecutors there have handled many major national security cases, and Mr. Snowden's most recent employer, the N.S.A. contractor Booz Allen Hamilton, has headquarters in the district.A senior Obama administration official suggested on Saturday that strong pressure was being applied privately on the Hong Kong authorities to swiftly return Mr. Snowden. "If Hong Kong doesn't act soon, it will complicate our bilateral relations and raise questions about Hong Kong's commitment to the rule of law," the official said.But the appeal to the rule of law cuts both ways, because the United States's surrender treaty with Hong Kong has an exception for political offenses. Mr. Snowden and his lawyers, whom associates say he has retained but who have not been publicly identified, could tie up the extradition effort by asserting that his alleged crimes are political in nature, said Regina Ip, a former Hong Kong secretary of security and a current legislator. She added that such an assertion would have "to go through various levels of our courts."Alternatively, Mr. Snowden could apply for asylum. Currently, asylum claims are facing delays of several years in Hong Kong, because they are handled by Hong Kong officials in cooperation with the office of the United Nations High Commissioner for Refugees. Nazneen Farooqi, a local protection officer with the United Nations refugee agency, suggested last week, without addressing Mr. Snowden's case directly, that his case would not be fast-tracked should he go this route, since "we prioritize older cases." And people who make asylum applications can be held in detention for weeks, months or even longer.
CHONGQING, China — Determined to learn their way out of the Great Recession — or eager to rise above the deprivation of developing lands — unprecedented millions of people have enrolled in colleges and universities around the world in the past five years.What they're finding is an educational landscape turning upside down.In the United States — where top schools have long championed a liberal style of learning and broad education before specialization — higher education's focus is shifting to getting students that first job in a still-shaky economy. Tuition is so high and the lingering economic distress so great that an education not directly tied to an occupation is increasingly seen as a luxury.Elsewhere in the world, there is a growing emphasis on broader learning as an economic necessity.Advocates hear employers demanding the "soft skills" — communication, critical thinking, and working with diverse groups — that broad-based learning more effectively instills. They want to graduate job-creators, not just job-fillers. They think the biggest innovations come from graduates who are well-rounded — from empathetic engineers, say, or tech-savvy anthropologists.In Europe, where for centuries students have jumped straight into specialized fields and studied little else, recent changes have pushed back specialization, making more room for general education. In Africa and the Middle East, experiments are moving away from a relentlessly narrow education tradition. And on a much bigger scale, China is breaking down the rigid disciplinary walls that have long characterized its higher education system.All of this is happening in the shadow of the Great Recession, which began in late 2007 with the near-collapse of the global financial system, depressing economies and employment worldwide. Today, some countries are recovering, but all are coming to grips with a world altered by hard times.Higher education is widely seen — both by nations and individuals — as the way to prosperity.Over roughly the last half-decade, according to UNESCO, enrollment in colleges and universities rose one-third in China and almost two-thirds in Saudi Arabia, nearly doubled in Pakistan, tripled in Uganda, and surged by 3 million — 18 percent — in the United States. In 2001, global enrollment first passed 100 million; a decade later, the estimated figure was 182 million.But what kind of education will best drive economic growth?When foreign delegations visit American campuses these days, they increasingly skip the usual research universities to scope out liberal arts colleges such as Amherst and Williams, says Patti McGill Peterson of the American Council on Education.They're seeking the "magic" that helped launch companies like Apple and Google. China, in particular, is recruiting disheartened American academics and putting them to work.There's "a weird symmetry" at work in the educational world, says Columbia University professor Andrew Delbanco, author of "College: What it Was, Is, and Should Be."As people in the United States "talk less and less about the value of liberal education," he says, "our so-called economic competitors talk about it more and more."On the outskirts of Chongqing, a sprawling megalopolis of 29 million in southwest China, stand a pair of college campuses — one representing education's past in the world's most populous country, and the other, perhaps, its future.In its mission and dreary name, the College of Mobile Telecommunications is typical of China's hundreds of Soviet-era universities: rote learning, hyper-specialization and a lock-step course of study for all.On a hill above it, surrounding a secluded courtyard, stands a new experiment, something very different — Yuanjing Academy. Here, college students take a broad array of subjects their first year, in small classes, learning to do things like argue about literature and play the guitar.On a recent sunny afternoon, in the checkered shadow of a traditional Buddhist "Bodhi" tree of wisdom on campus, a visiting Dutch academic named Hans Adriaansens sat conversing with Yuanjing students about their ambitions, work and daily worries.Adriaansens is an adviser to the school, and his journey here is a kind of microcosm of the global movement.Early in his career, he studied at American campuses including Harvard and Smith College, falling in love with liberal arts learning. Later, he struggled for decades to bring the model to Europe, where students historically have been channeled into specialties as early as age 12."When I started, everybody was against it, even at my own university," he says.That's changed. In recent years, he's helped leading Dutch universities install liberal arts colleges within their campuses. Across Europe, schools have opened space during the first years for broader learning, delaying specialization."The Europeans won't say this, but it's kind of Americanizing their system," says Philip Altbach, a Boston College expert on international higher education.Singapore and Hong Kong have made similar changes.The prophet of this movement, quoted often by Adriaansens and others, is Steve Jobs, the late co-founder of Apple. Jobs called the marriage of liberal arts, humanities and technology the secret to Apple products "that make our hearts sing." Far from burying interest in broader learning, advocates say, Europe's economic malaise has increased interest in nurturing innovative thinkers.While the old Soviet system was a byword for rigid specialization, elite St. Petersburg State University in Russia recently opened its first liberal arts faculty. Jonathan Becker, the vice president for international affairs at Bard College in New York who has worked in Europe for decades, says it's no accident that effort has been led by a former Russian finance minister."They realize," Becker says, that "narrow boundaries of disciplines are not the answer to modern world problems."There are similar projects in Poland, Slovakia and elsewhere. Even in Germany, which invented the rigid disciplinary model, a first-of-its-kind four-year liberal arts college was being formally inaugurated Monday at the University of Freiburg. The reasoning is both economic and political, especially in Eastern Europe."There's memory of the problems of following a rigorous ideology, and a belief that following a rigorous interdisciplinary program is a way of overcoming that legacy," Becker says.Now, Adriaansens has moved to the movement's biggest stage yet: China."It's new to them but, to my surprise, it's going much faster than it went in my country," he says.In its once tightly planned economy, China's universities churned out graduates for specific lines of work. Students declared their academic intentions as early as 10th grade. Universities often were overseen by a national ministry or trade agency. Their names say it all: Chongqing Nanfang Translators College, Nanjing Audit University, North China Electric Power University.Peng Hongbin excelled in that system, studying at a prestigious university and later getting rich in the flooring business. But he doesn't credit his education: Under the rote learning style he never learned to speak up, and he overcame his shyness only later, in the business world."China does not teach you how to communicate," says Peng, who in 2007 bought the telecommunications college when it went private and, five years later, founded Yuanjing on the hill above it."For a country to innovate, to be creative, it needs imagination, not a knowledge and know-how from a specific field of study," he says.His academy picks 150 students from the freshman class of 5,000 at the telecommunications college, which also is undergoing changes, adding clubs, sports, community service and art appreciation.Peng is not alone in his quest; China's leaders have taken steps in the same direction. They want China to invent the next iPad, not build the last one.The government moved toward a broader curriculum in 1995, offering electives. Recently, the movement has accelerated and spread across China's big public universities. Hangzhou's Zhejiang University in eastern China, for example, has reduced the number of majors from more than 200 to seven general directions.There is no suggestion that the Chinese system yet resembles the traditional American one, or will soon."The 12 years of education has not given our students the habit of thinking," says Bai Fengshan, who is leading a new liberal arts curriculum at prestigious Tsinghua University, a public school traditionally known for technology and engineering. "They simply take whatever is given. They can tell when what's given is bad, but they don't know why."Students "lack the ability to be critical," he says, "which is different from the ability to criticize."Despite the obstacles, Bai is committed to the transition."When a person leaves the university, he or she should be a whole person," he says.Yuanjing students make much the same point."We are adults," says Zhang Panyu, an 18-year-old student whose reading of "Jane Eyre" helped him navigate his own first romance. "We need to know something about everything,"The University of Farmers is not like Yale or Yuanjing. In fact, it's not officially a university, at all.U of F is a corporate training operation of America's Farmers Insurance, and its students are agents and adjusters. It has campuses in California and at a suburban office park beside the Grand Rapids airport in Michigan.The University of Farmers is not a place where the works of the great philosophers are discussed; it is a place where people learn things that will help them do their jobs and jobs they hope to have some day. And in that, it reflects a major shift the Great Recession accelerated in American higher education.Michael Hoffman, 29, started working at Farmers two years ago but hit a ceiling without a degree. He's one of thousands of employees Farmers is helping pursue their diplomas. In Michigan, many shuttle between the Farmers training program and nearby Davenport University, which awards the degrees.Farmers will support degrees in a range of fields, and emphasizes that specialized business degrees aren't required to work there. But virtually all choose business. Some, including Hoffman, are in a new management program that focuses them even more narrowly: They are essentially majoring in insurance."I want what's going to be specifically oriented to my career and my career goals," says Hoffman, explaining a curriculum focused on things like underwriting regulation, ethics and licensing. And with an infant at home, "Really, that's all I have time for."Davenport's curriculum injects broad-based skill building in every course, says an associate dean at the school, Frank Novakowski. But he also calls Davenport pragmatic, noting Farmers is halfway through hiring 1,600 new workers here."We don't have degrees that are just there for the fun of it or because Professor Wonderful started it 30 years ago," he says. "People are getting really serious about 'what am I getting an education for, and what am I going to do after?' And if the kids aren't asking, their parents are."Getting a job has always driven Americans to college and affected what they study, says Arthur Levine, a researcher who now leads the New Jersey-based Woodrow Wilson Foundation, which supports leadership development in education and teaching. Levine has tracked students' attitudes toward college since the 1960s and takes an even longer view than that. Even the medieval theologians reading Latin at the first universities wanted secure work in the church, he notes.Recently, though, he has identified a substantial shift. In the 1970s, fewer than half of U.S. college students felt increasing earnings was the chief benefit of college. Now, about two-thirds do.A national survey of U.S. college freshmen shows a jump in such attitudes starting in 2007, when the economy turned. About three-quarters of freshmen want colleges to provide more specialized career training."There's just been a lot more emphasis in the kitchen-table conversations about choosing a college and choosing a major that is a clear path to a good-paying job," says Richard Ekman, president of America's Council of Independent Colleges. "That has shown up in the pattern of majors and in the choice of institutions."Tuition list prices at American four-year colleges rose 27 percent above inflation over the last five years. Students' combined debt now exceeds $1 trillion by some estimates. They want specialized, job-focused offerings. And colleges have obliged:—Over the last decade, the number of academic subjects tracked by the U.S. government has expanded about one-fifth, with 354 new and increasingly specialized subjects identified since 2000. Drexel University in Philadelphia has added 20 majors in the last decade, including game and art production, culinary science and property management.—The fastest-growing majors in the United States are mostly tied narrowly to professions, areas like homeland security, law enforcement and firefighting (up 76 percent over the last decade); health professions (up 60 percent) and parks, recreation, leisure and fitness studies (up 90 percent). The largest undergraduate major by far is business, accounting for nearly one-quarter of U.S. degrees. The field is fracturing further into sub-fields like hospitality management and insurance.The share of four-year degrees in the general arts and sciences has held fairly constant — some fields, like psychology, have even grown. But overall, literature, philosophy and other humanities have suffered. Harvard reported this month that one-third fewer students enter planning to major in the humanities than in 2006.And most higher education growth is happening outside traditional four-year colleges. From 2006 to 2010, enrollment at for-profit colleges — which typically focus on vocational education — grew five times faster than college enrollment overall.Higher education's fastest-growing segment is even more narrowly focused: certificates. These bite-sized educational credentials in narrow occupational fields — offered by community colleges, industry groups and companies — are available for everything from diesel mechanics to specific IT skills. According to the Georgetown Center on Education and the Workforce in Washington, D.C., certificates have more than tripled in roughly 15 years in the U.S., with more than 1 million awarded in 2010.American politicians are encouraging the trend of practicality in higher education. The governors of Florida and North Carolina, for example, have pushed to shift state funding away from liberal arts subjects to programs that lead more directly to jobs.On average, people with career-focused degrees do have higher earnings and lower unemployment — at least out of the gate, according to research by the Georgetown center. Certificates also boost earnings.It's been harder to pin down how majors affect careers over the long-term.Employers who complained that millions of jobs were unfilled during the Great Recession because too few graduates had the necessary technical skills also lament that students aren't well-rounded enough — lacking an ability to communicate and continue to learn. A recent employer survey by the Association of American Colleges and Universities found 93 percent reported that capacities to think critically, communicate clearly and solve complex problems were more important than an undergraduate major.University of Michigan education professor Janet Lawrence says employers can't resist hiring graduates with focused training whom they can put straight to work. Then their new hires don't always work well in teams or grow into a job."They're getting technically skilled accountants," she says, "but they don't know what they don't know."Four thousand miles east of Michigan, high in a verdant stretch of Morocco's remote Middle Atlas mountains, Driss Ouaouicha is trying to persuade his skeptical country that broader learning isn't a luxury. It's an economic necessity.Ouaouicha is president of the private Al-Akhawayn (Two Brothers) University, started two decades ago with support from the kings of Morocco and Saudi Arabia.Morocco's public universities follow the traditional French model of early and strict separation of subjects. Al-Akhawayn follows the model Ouaouicha first encountered as a student at tiny St. John's College in New Mexico, which offers a "great books" curriculum based on the foundations of Western literature.Outside the hard sciences and some elite specialty programs, higher education in Morocco clearly isn't working. Here, and across the Middle East, unemployment is higher for those with college degrees than for those without. Graduates blame the government for sending too many into narrow programs not suited for the job market and not offering enough spots in science.While Al-Akhawayn is a success (virtually all the university's recent graduates are working or in graduate school), it is not necessarily a template for Moroccan education. Its roughly $11,000 annual cost puts the school out of reach for almost everyone in a developing country where public universities are free."We don't have the financial means" to replicate Al-Akhawayn, says Lahcen Daoudi, Morocco's minister of higher education, who sits on Al-Akhawayn's board.Still, Ouaouicha is trying to persuade cash-strapped educators around the Middle East that they can emulate some of what works here and turn a culture of government dependency into an entrepreneurial one.His graduates "learn the experience of teamwork and learning," Ouaouicha says. "They learn there are different ways ... to do things."He sees some progress. The Moroccan system has implemented a small "common core" of general education classes, he says. And he is encouraged by similar college experiments in places like Lebanon and Saudi Arabia.In many of the world's worst-off countries, a tug-of-war goes on over what kind of educational system they should build. Educators who say a broad education might be the best path in the long run must contend with others who say technical skills are needed to bring their economies closer to first-world levels, especially in view of decades of underinvestment in practical training.India's National Skills Development Mission, a public-private partnership that is one of the country's principal development efforts, wants to use for-profit vocational institutions to give 500 million people tangible job skills by 2022.Yet while employers in India say they're desperate for skilled workers, they're not looking for one-task robots."We're not asking you to train plumbers," Manish Sabharwal, chairman of TeamLease, a giant temporary staffing company, told education leaders at a conference in Delhi last November. "We're asking you for curious, confident risk-takers."Rwanda is focused on agriculture, tourism and information technology. With its history of genocide, it needs leaders who've wrestled with subjects like history, politics and justice. But its 12 million people, crammed into a mountainous country roughly the size of Maryland, also desperately need jobs."There's a price to be paid if you let education become too focused and pragmatic," says Bruce Krogh, an electrical engineer at Pennsylvania's Carnegie Mellon University who currently is working in Rwanda. But, he adds, "It's a different game when you're trying to bootstrap an economy."Says Francisco Marmolejo, a Mexican educator and now the World Bank's point person for higher education: "This is the dilemma all higher education institutions face around the world. Many times, the discourse is about getting a job, rather than creating a job."In fact, he and others say, countries will need both broad thinking across subjects and specialized expertise. And so will individuals."There is an argument for getting specific training in the active field you want," says Marc Tucker, president and CEO of the Washington, D.C.-based National Center on Education and the Economy, a non-profit organization that looks at the implications of changes in the international economy for American education. "But if your thinking stops there, you are going to be outcompeted in another five or six or 10 years by somebody who did that and also got a liberal education."Adriaansens believes the broad-based approach will eventually win the global argument."Who can tell what kind of job will exist four years from now for these students?" he asks.A narrow degree may misfire, he says, but a broader degree gives graduates the tools to reinvent themselves."You can build a high mountain on a very broad base," he says.Pope reported from Michigan. AP reporter Paul Schemm contributed reporting from Rabat and Ifrane, Morocco, and news researcher Judith Ausuebel contributed from New YorkGeorgetown Center on Education and the Workforce: http://cew.georgetown.edu/Commission on the Humanities and Social Sciences report: http://www.humanitiescommission.org/
TAIPEI — Blind Chinese dissident Chen Guangcheng, who has accused New York University of bowing to Chinese pressure to ask him to leave, refused to shed light on the issue on Monday, adding to the mystery of a case that has been marred by allegations of lies and spying.Chen has maintained his silence for a week since he made his accusations that have been vigorously denied by the university, which says the fellowship was only ever planned to last a year.Chen sparked a diplomatic crisis between the United States and China after he fled house arrest in China and sought refuge at the U.S. Embassy in Beijing. He has been a research fellow at NYU Law School since he flew to the United States in May 2012.His accusations, which have sparked a debate on U.S. academic freedom, have baffled some of his closest friends, including Jerome Cohen, an NYU law professor who helped broker the deal for Chen to study in the United States.Chen, who is in Taipei to meet Taiwan opposition lawmakers and address Taiwan's parliament, bristled when pressed to detail evidence behind his accusations."Why do you keep asking about NYU?" he asked. "I'll wait till a more suitable time to talk."Chen also said he did not know about possible spyware being inserted into an iPhone and iPad given to him as gifts. The gadgets were intended to spy on Chen, according to Cohen and another source familiar with the episode.The two sources told Reuters that the wife of Bob Fu, the founder of ChinaAid, a Texas-based Christian advocacy group that has campaigned for Chen, had given him the gadgets shortly after he arrived in New York so that his communications could be monitored - a charge that Fu rejected.Fu runs a Christian group called ChinaAid that supports underground churches in China and victims of forced abortions.Critics have suggested that Chen has been co-opted by conservative, Christian groups in the United States. Chen declined to address these questions, saying: "Let's not talk about this."Cohen, who has taken issue with Chen's allegations publicly, accompanied Chen on the trip to Taiwan and was in the audience when Chen met reporters at a briefing.Chen is a self-schooled legal advocate who campaigned against forced abortions. He was jailed for four years on charges that he and his supporters said were spurious, and then held in his village home for 19 months after being released.Chen's visit to Taiwan will be closely watched by Beijing. In late May, China had warned Chen to mind his language ahead of his trip.Taiwan, the democratic, self-ruled island which China claims as its own, regularly plays host to people China despises, including exiled Tibetan spiritual leader the Dalai Lama.Taiwan President Ma Ying-jeou has no plans to meet Chen, according to Taiwan's presidential spokeswoman. Chen said he understood why Ma, who has come under fire for being soft on human rights issues, would not meet him."This is exactly an example of how a dictatorship threatens a free society," he said.
BEIJING — Chinese anti-graft authorities announced an investigation into a former vice governor, making him latest senior provincial official to be ensnared in a crackdown that the country's new leadership hopes will show its determination to root out widespread graft.The Ministry of Supervision said on its website that Guo Yongxiang was suspected of unspecified "serious disciplinary violations," a vague term that usually refers to corruption.Guo's current title is chairman of Sichuan's provincial arts and literary federation, though that's believed to be a semi-retirement position for the 64-year-old official who was formerly vice governor of the southwestern province.China's new leader Xi Jinping has made a crackdown on corruption and extravagant, wasteful work styles a key feature of his first half-year in power. He has vowed that the crackdown will target both low and senior-level officials.Since he took over as head of the Communist Party in November, half-a-dozen vice-ministerial level officials have come under investigation, including the deputy party secretary of Sichuan province, Liu Chuncheng, who was fired following state media reports that he was suspected in influence-peddling and questionable real estate deals.But observers noted that in the latest case, Guo's long association with China's now-retired former security chief Zhou Yongkang suggested the probe into Guo could be part of a larger factional struggle within the party's leadership.Until the leadership handover in November, Zhou was the party's security boss and its No. 9 ranking official and wielded enormous influence over the police and paramilitary forces charged with maintaining internal stability at a time of growing unrest over corruption and uneven development."There's a reasonably high likelihood that this has to do with a vendetta against Zhou Yongkang," said Willy Lam, a professor at Chinese University of Hong Kong."We've had ample evidence in the past that officials who have been investigated are usually also a victim of factional strife, people who are on the losing end of a factional battle," Lam said.Guo and Zhou's careers overlapped for 12 years and spanned the China National Petroleum Corp., the Ministry of Land and Resources and the Sichuan government.In a 2002 report by Sichuan's official news portal, Zhou, who was then Sichuan's party boss, was shown visiting an elderly veteran communist cadre with Guo, who was the party committee's secretary general, bearing flowers and cake. Guo has also been cited in reports accompanying Zhou on visits to Sichuan petroleum executives and attending meetings in Beijing.
TAIPEI, Taiwan — The Chinese activist who fled to America after taking refuge in the U.S. Embassy in Beijing last year said Monday that China's relentless efforts to crush opposition forces or suppress human rights will backfire.Chen Guangcheng said he is convinced that rapidly growing yearnings for freedoms and human rights among the Chinese will eventually "put an end to the authoritarian rule" in the communist country. Chen spoke at a news conference in Taiwan, where he is on a two-week visit.But Chen evaded questions about his criticism last week of New York University, where he spent the last year as a special student after leaving China. He said the university caved to pressure from China's Communist Party when it asked him to leave. The university denied that, saying it had agreed to give Chen a one-year fellowship to assist his departure from China, and that he was leaving because the year was over.Chen said he may have hit a "sore point" with his comments, but he did not give any details. He also declined to comment on reports that one of his supporters in the United States gave him an iPhone and iPad installed with software to track his activities. "I am no computer expert," he said.On Monday, Chen accused Beijing of spending billions of dollars annually to monitor dissidents and activists and put them in jail if they refused to stop their advocacies."No other regimes in the world have feared or monitored their own people in such a way," Chen said, adding that whatever the Chinese authorities do "they cannot make me shut up. That will be out of the question."In Beijing, Foreign Ministry spokeswoman Hua Chunying, when asked to comment on Chen's visit to Taiwan, said "every Chinese citizen has obligations to abide by the constitution and laws of China and refrain from doing things that will hurt the national interest." She did not elaborate.Chen, a self-taught lawyer who has been blind since birth, had angered local Chinese officials by documenting complaints about forced abortions.He escaped house arrest in his rural town in eastern China's Shandong province in April 2012 and sparked a diplomatic crisis when he fled to the U.S. Embassy in Beijing. Chinese officials later let him move to the U.S. with his wife and children.Once in the United States, Chen gave speeches, and spoke about China's human rights record before a U.S. congressional committee.He said he regretted that Taiwanese President Ma Ying-jeou had declined to meet him, but added Taiwan's democracy is exerting pressure on its neighbor and political rival. Ma's spokesman did not give a reason for not meeting Chen, but Ma has been working to improve ties with Beijing."Now is a crucial moment for the entire mainland and Asia to move on to practice democracy," Chen said, adding China's eventual democratization could "spell the end of dictatorship for the entire humankind."Taiwan and China split amid civil war in 1949, but relations have improved in recent years.
BEIJING — An American executive said he has been held hostage for four days at his medical supply plant in Beijing by scores of workers demanding severance packages like those given to 30 co-workers in a phased-out department.Chip Starnes, 42, a co-owner of Coral Springs, Florida-based Specialty Medical Supplies, said local officials had visited the 10-year-old plant on the capital's outskirts and coerced him into signing agreements Saturday to meet the workers' demands even though he sought to make clear that the remaining 100 workers weren't being laid off.The workers were expecting wire transfers by Tuesday, he said, adding that about 80 of them had been blocking every exit around the clock and depriving him of sleep by shining bright lights and banging on windows of his office. He declined to clarify the amount, saying he wanted to keep it confidential."I feel like a trapped animal," Starnes told The Associated Press on Monday from his first-floor office window, while holding onto the window's bars. "I think it's inhumane what is going on right now. I have been in this area for 10 years and created a lot of jobs and I would never have thought in my wildest imagination something like this would happen."Workers inside the compound, a pair of two-story buildings behind gates and hedges in the Huairou district of the northeastern Beijing suburbs, repeatedly declined requests for comment, saying they did not want to talk to foreign media.It is not rare in China for managers to be held by workers demanding back pay or other benefits, often from their Chinese owners, though occasionally also involving foreign bosses.The labor action reflects growing uneasiness among workers about their jobs amid China's slowing economic growth and the sense that growing labor costs make the country less attractive for some foreign-owned factories. The account about local officials coercing Starnes to meet workers' demands — if true — reflects how officials typically consider stifling unrest to be a priority.A local police spokesman said police were at the scene to maintain order. Four uniformed police and about a dozen other men who declined to identify themselves were standing across the road from the plant."As far as I know, there was a labor dispute between the workers and the company management and the dispute is being solved," said spokesman Zhao Lu of the Huairou Public Security Bureau. " I am not sure about the details of the solution, but I can guarantee the personal safety of the manager."Representatives from the U.S. Embassy stood outside the gate much of the day, and eventually were let in. U.S. Embassy spokesman Nolan Barkhouse said the two sides were on the verge of an agreement and that Starnes would have access to his attorneys. It was unclear what agreement might be reached, and subsequent attempts to contact Starnes were not immediately successful.Starnes said the company had gradually been winding down its plastics division, planning to move it to Mumbai, India. He arrived in Beijing last Tuesday to lay off the last 30 people. Some had been working there for up to nine years, so their compensation packages were "pretty nice," he said.Some of the workers in the other divisions got wind of this, and, coupled with rumors that the whole plant was moving to India, started demanding similar severance packages on Friday.Christian Murck, president of the American Chamber of Commerce in China, said he wasn't familiar with Starnes' case, but that such hostage-taking was "not a major problem" for the foreign business community."It happened more often say 15 years ago than today, but it still happens from time to time," he said. "It rarely leads to personal harm to the managers involved, but there are cases when it has in years past."
LONDON — More than a third of patients infected with a new strain of bird flu died after being admitted to the hospital earlier this year, Chinese researchers report in a new study.Since the new H7N9 bird flu first broke out in China in late March, the strain has sickened more than 130 people and killed 37. The World Health Organization has previously described H7N9 as "one of the most lethal influenza viruses" it has ever seen and said it appeared to spread faster than the last bird flu strain, H5N1, that threatened to unleash a pandemic.After making some adjustments for missing data, the Chinese scientists estimated the overall death rate to be 36 percent. The outbreak was stopped after China closed many of its live animal markets — scientists had assumed the virus was infecting people through exposure to live birds.That makes the new strain less deadly than H5N1, which kills about 70 percent of the people it infects. Still, H7N9 is more lethal than the swine flu that caused a 2009 global epidemic. That had a death rate of less than one percent.The results were released in two papers on the H7N9 strain, published online Monday in the journal Lancet."The good news is that numbers of (H7N9) cases have stalled," Cecile Viboud and Lone Simonsen of the U.S. National Institutes of Health wrote in a commentary accompanying the article.However, they warned that the threat of the virus still "persists" and predicted that the strain might return in the winter, when flu viruses are typically most active.That assessment echoes the WHO, which earlier this month also warned of the virus adapting.
BEIJING — The Chinese government made the final decision to allow Edward J. Snowden, the former National Security Agency contractor, to leave Hong Kong on Sunday, a move that Beijing believed resolved a tough diplomatic problem even as it reaped a publicity windfall from Mr. Snowden's disclosures, according to people familiar with the situation.Hong Kong authorities have insisted that their judicial process remained independent of China, but these observers — who like many in this article spoke on the condition of anonymity to talk freely about confidential discussions — said that matters of foreign policy are the domain of the Chinese government, and Beijing exercised that authority in allowing Mr. Snowden to go.From China's point of view, analysts said, the departure of Mr. Snowden solved two concerns: how to prevent Beijing's relationship with the United States from being ensnared in a long legal wrangle in Hong Kong over Mr. Snowden, and how to deal with a Chinese public that widely regards the American computer expert as a hero."Behind the door there was definitely some coordination between Hong Kong and Beijing," said Jin Canrong, professor of international relations at Renmin University in Beijing.Beijing's chief concern was the stability of the relationship with the United States, which the Chinese believed had been placed on a surer footing during the meeting between President Xi Jinping and President Obama at the Sunnylands estate in California this month, said Mr. Jin and a person knowledgeable about the Hong Kong government's handling of Mr. Snowden.The Chinese government was pleased that Mr. Snowden disclosed the extent of American surveillance of Internet and telephone conversations around the world, giving the Chinese people a chance to talk about what they describe as American hypocrisy regarding surveillance practices, said Mr. Jin and the person familiar with the consultations between Hong Kong and China.But in the longer term, China's overall relationship with the United States, which spans global economic, military and security issues, was more important than the feelings of the public in China and Hong Kong, who felt that the contractor should be protected from the reach of the United States, analysts said.Mainland Chinese officials "will be relieved he's gone — the popular sentiment in Hong Kong and China is to protect him because he revealed United States surveillance here, but the governments don't want trouble in the relationship," said the person familiar with the consultations between Beijing and Hong Kong.Mr. Snowden went public in Hong Kong on June 9, the day after the meeting between Mr. Obama and Mr. Xi ended, as the source of a series of disclosures in the British newspaper The Guardian and The Washington Post about classified national security programs.The stream of information about the extent of American worldwide eavesdropping shifted the focus in the public sniping between the Obama administration and China over cybersecurity that had been unfolding for months.In a series of speeches, senior officials in the Obama administration, including the national security adviser, Tom Donilon, and the defense secretary, Chuck Hagel, had taken the offensive against China, publicly accusing it of cyberespionage against American businesses. Mr. Donilon said in a speech in March that China was responsible for theft of confidential business information and proprietary technologies through digital intrusions on an "unprecedented scale."In response to those accusations, China said that it was the victim of cyberattacks from the United States.Mr. Snowden's disclosures appeared to confirm the Chinese government's argument, and put the United States on the defensive. The highly classified documents that Mr. Snowden gave to the two newspapers showed that the N.S.A. compiled logs of virtually all telephone calls in the United States and collected the e-mail of foreigners from American Internet companies.Mr. Snowden has denied giving China classified documents and said he had spoken only to journalists. But his public statements, directly and to reporters, have contained intelligence information of great interest to China.Two Western intelligence experts, who worked for major government spy agencies, said they believed that the Chinese government had managed to drain the contents of the four laptops that Mr. Snowden said he brought to Hong Kong, and that he said were with him during his stay at a Hong Kong hotel.If that were the case, they said, China would no longer need or want to have Mr. Snowden remain in Hong Kong.The disclosures by Mr. Snowden set off a surge of commentary against American "double faced" and "arrogant" behavior by many users of China's version of Twitter.In some instances, the Chinese news media made snide references to what it called the gap between how the United States portrayed itself, and what the United States practiced. "Washington must be grinding its teeth because Snowden's revelations have almost overturned the image of the U.S. as the defender of a free Internet," Global Times, which often reflects the official point of view, wrote in an editorial.The precise details of how the Chinese government dealt with Hong Kong authorities were not immediately known.But Beijing appears to have decided that weeks of focus on Mr. Snowden in Hong Kong and his disclosures about the American government's global surveillance practices were enough, and that he could turn into a liability, said a second person familiar with the handling of Mr. Snowden. "Beijing has gotten the most they can out of the Snowden situation," that person said.A senior diplomat familiar with the way the Chinese government works said just before the departure of Mr. Snowden became public that he believed that Beijing would do all it could to keep Mr. Snowden out of American hands. The Chinese public would be outraged if the contractor was extradited, put on trial and jailed, he said. At the same time, the Obama administration would put relentless pressure on Beijing to get Mr. Snowden, he said."I see the sun of Sunnylands disappearing into the snow of Snowden," the diplomat said.
TAIPEI, Taiwan — The activist Chen Guangcheng, who fled house arrest in China and later moved to the United States, arrived Sunday in Taiwan, where he is to give several speeches expected to attract the attention of Beijing.Mr. Chen told reporters at Taipei's airport that he was impressed with Taiwan's democracy and its concern for the human rights situation in China. "Your support has been very important to us," he said.The 18-day trip is part of Mr. Chen's efforts to enhance freedoms and human rights for his fellow Chinese, the organizer, the Taiwan Association for Human Rights, said in a statement.Mr. Chen set off a diplomatic crisis between China and the United States last year when he fled to the United States Embassy in Beijing from house arrest. He was allowed to leave China for the United States, where he has been a special student at New York University's U.S.-Asia Law Institute while working on a book scheduled to be published this year. Last week he suggested that the university was forcing him to leave because of pressure from China, an accusation the university denied.Mr. Chen's Taiwan visit offers a challenge to President Ma Ying-jeou, who has built his administration around better relations with China, from which Taiwan split amid civil war in 1949.China claims Taiwan as its territory and resents any Taiwanese activity that embarrasses Beijing.Mr. Chen will hold a news conference, address the island's legislature, meet Speaker Wang Jin-pyng and speak at universities, organizers said.Mr. Chen had originally angered local Chinese officials by documenting complaints about forced abortions. A self-taught lawyer, he has criticized China's human rights record, speaking about it before a Congressional committee.
HONG KONG — A factory employee in Shanghai bludgeoned a colleague to death and shot dead five other people in a spasm of violence apparently set off by a business dispute, the city's police authority said Sunday. It was a rare instance of a gun rampage in China, where few civilians own firearms.On Saturday, the employee, identified by only his last name, Fan, is said to have used a tool from the chemical plant where he had worked to fatally beat a colleague, and then grabbed a hunting rifle hidden in the factory's living quarters, the Shanghai Bureau of Public Security said on its Web site.Mr. Fan got into a private vehicle — the statement did not specify what kind — and killed the driver, and then a soldier who was guarding an army barracks. Mr. Fan returned to the factory and killed three more people. Four people were injured.Police officers who had gone to investigate the initial killing at the factory caught Mr. Fan there near midnight.The episode was rare and alarming enough to prompt the national Ministry of Public Security to convene an emergency video meeting and demand a nationwide check on the availability of firearms. China is not immune to crimes of violent rage, despite the sweeping powers wielded by the police. But few civilians have permits to own firearms, and shooting rampages are rare.Meng Jianzhu, the secretary of the Communist Party committee that runs the legal and police apparatus, and Guo Shengkun, the minister of public security, issued orders for the case to be promptly investigated and to "resolutely strike hard against violent criminal activities that seriously menace public safety, ensuring overall social stability," the Ministry of Public Security said on its Web site.The official statements did not give details about the business dispute involving Mr. Fan, who is in his early 60s. One former employee at the chemical factory said Mr. Fan was embroiled in a conflict with the owner, according the Xinmin Evening News, a newspaper in Shanghai.
BEIJING — A U.S. executive held captive by workers in his Beijing factory since Friday said the dispute that has kept him behind the plant's barred windows was a misunderstanding over pay.Chip Starnes, president of the Florida-based Speciality Medical Supplies, said about 100 workers were demanding severance packages identical to those offered to 30 employees laid off from the company's plastics division, which was moved to India to lower production costs.The workers' demands followed rumors that the entire plant was being closed, though Starnes said no more layoffs were planned."We never had that intention. They were never told they were going to lose their jobs," Starnes told Reuters on Tuesday."It (the rumor) ran rampant and quickly spiraled out of control. It's a sad situation."Starnes said he was never physically harmed but had been intimidated, and was unhappy about the way local authorities have handled the dispute."I think disappointment is a really good word," the 42-year-old said from a window of the factory in the Beijing suburb of Huairou where the firm has been operating for nearly a decade.A number of plain-clothes police officers could be seen standing outside the factory compound. Authorities said they were in place to maintain order, though they had not acted to end the stand-off.Starnes said his lawyers were in talks with the workers with mediation from the district labor administration and labor union.Chu Lixiang, head of the Huairou labor union's rights and interests department, said Starnes had not paid the workers for two months and they feared the plant was closing and that he would run away without paying severance."The workers' request, firstly, will be for the company to pay up. Second, they (the managers) need to abide by the law, to deliver compensation as deserved. That's all," Chu said.Strikes and work disputes in China have become more common as workers demand greater compensation and the pool of cheap labor shrinks."We just ask that our boss pays our salary and the labor compensation we deserve," said Gao Ping, an employee for six years.Foreign Ministry spokeswoman Hua Chunying told reporters at a daily briefing that she hoped the issue could be "resolved through dialogue".
BEIJING — China rebuked the United States on Tuesday for accusing it of facilitating the flight of fugitive U.S. spy agency contractor Edward Snowden, and said suggestions that it had done so were "baseless and unacceptable".The remarks from the Chinese foreign ministry and earlier comments from state media have underscored the strain in ties between the two countries since Snowden, who is wanted by the U.S. government on charges of espionage, fled Hong Kong on Sunday.The White House said the decision by the Chinese territory to allow Snowden to leave was "a deliberate choice by the government to release a fugitive despite a valid arrest warrant, and that decision unquestionably has a negative impact on the U.S.-China relationship."The U.S. side has no reason to call into question the Hong Kong government's handling of affairs according to law," Foreign Ministry spokeswoman Hua Chunying said at a regular briefing. "The United States' criticism of China's central government is baseless. China absolutely cannot accept it."Hua also defended the Hong Kong government's decision to let Snowden go, saying it "handled the relevant case completely according to law."This is beyond dispute. All parties should respect this."Experts on both sides however said the tirade should quickly blow over, and that neither country would be keen to let ties deteriorate permanently just weeks after a successful summit meeting between President Barack Obama and President Xi Jinping."China does not want this to affect the overall situation, the central government has always maintained a relatively calm and restrained attitude because Sino-U.S. relations are important," said Zhao Kejing, a professor of international relations at China's elite Tsinghua University."The United States has no reason to exert greater pressure, otherwise it would lose moral support."Kenneth Lieberthal, a China expert at the Brookings Institution who was an Asia adviser in Bill Clinton's White House, said sanctioning Beijing was "inconceivable" and linking Snowden to other issues would undo careful policy aimed at handling issues in separate lanes to avoid big ruptures in ties."Over the years, we've sought to prevent any serious disagreement in one issue area from spilling over and degrading the entire relationship," he said.At the summit earlier this month, Obama confronted Xi over allegations of cyber-theft. Xi earlier told a news conference with Obama that China itself was a victim of cyber attacks but that the two sides should work together to develop a common approach.Snowden's revelations of widespread snooping by the U.S. National Security Agency in China and Hong Kong have given Beijing considerable ammunition in the tit-for-tat exchange."In a sense, the United States has gone from a 'model of human rights' to 'an eavesdropper on personal privacy', the 'manipulator' of the centralised power over the international Internet, and the mad 'invader' of other countries' networks," said the overseas edition of China's People's Daily, which can reflect the government's thinking."The world will remember Edward Snowden," the newspaper said. "It was his fearlessness that tore off Washington's sanctimonious mask."Beijing was torn about keeping Snowden or letting him go, but decided that allowing him to leave was "the lesser of three evils", a source with ties to China's leadership told Reuters, requesting anonymity to avoid repercussions for speaking to a foreign reporter."If Snowden was handed over to the United States, China would be perceived to be a running dog of the United States and be criticised by (Chinese and foreign) Internet users sympathetic to Snowden," the source said."Allowing Snowden to continue to stay in Hong Kong or come to the mainland would cause more trouble and headache," the source said. "Allowing Snowden to leave was the only option".The Chinese government has said it was gravely concerned by Snowden's allegations that the United States had hacked into many networks in Hong and China, including Tsinghua University, which hosts one of the country's Internet hubs, and Chinese mobile network companies. It has said it had taken the issue up with Washington."Not only did the U.S. authorities not give us an explanation and apology, it instead expressed dissatisfaction at the Hong Kong Special Administrative Region for handling things in accordance with law," wrote Wang Xinjun, a researcher at the Academy of Military Science, in the People's Daily commentary.State news agency Xinhua was more conciliatory in its tone."Both Beijing and Washington fully know that an isolated case should not be allowed to hurt one of the most critical relationships in the world," Xinhua said in a commentary. "It is in the interest of both countries to keep the positive momentum in bilateral relations."Still, China's academics and state media have been loud in their calls for the Obama administration to apologise to Beijing."The United States should not shift the real focus," said Liu Feitao, the deputy chief of U.S. studies at the China Institute of International Studies, a think-tank affiliated with China's foreign ministry."This thing has nothing to do with China, except that America owes China an explanation on the cyber attack leaks by Snowden."
TAIPEI, Taiwan — Chen Guangcheng, the legal activist who left China with his family amid a diplomatic crisis last year, praised Taiwanese democracy on Monday while refusing to talk about controversies in the United States.At a news conference in Taipei to start his 18-day visit to Taiwan, Mr. Chen avoided discussing his recent allegation that New York University, which has hosted him for the past year, had been pressured by China to remove him, or the university's assertion that one of Mr. Chen's supporters in the United States had given him electronic equipment with spyware installed.New York University is establishing a campus in Shanghai and has important exchanges of students and faculty with China, any of which could be jeopardized if the Chinese authorities wanted to retaliate. The university has denied that Mr. Chen's planned departure was the result of Chinese interference.Mr. Chen has not provided details of his claims that the university was pressured."I have nothing to add," Mr. Chen said when asked Monday about his earlier claims. "Now that I'm in Taiwan, let's focus on Taiwan and its democracy."Bob Fu, founder of ChinaAid, a nongovernmental organization supporting Chinese Christians and a longtime ally of Mr. Chen's, said American universities were desperate for opportunities in China and thus wary of hosting dissidents who might anger the country's Communist Party leadership.Last week, Mr. Fu was at the center of another twist in Mr. Chen's saga when New York University said an iPad and iPhone given to the activist and his family by ChinaAid had spyware installed that would allow outside parties to track their movements and use. Mr. Fu denied knowledge of the monitoring software and said he wanted as much as anyone to learn its origin.Asked about those allegations Monday, Mr. Chen said, "I'm not a computer expert, so I can't answer your question."He instead sought to focus on human rights issues in China and to contrast them with Taiwan, a Chinese-speaking democracy with a boisterous free press."The democracy and rule of law in Taiwan show that democracy is not an institution that is unique to the West," Mr. Chen said. "The success of democracy in Taiwan also exposed the Chinese government's lie that democracy does not work for the Chinese."In Taiwan, which has been governed autonomously since the end of the Chinese civil war in 1949 and which China still claims as its territory, Mr. Chen has been portrayed as a symbol of the dangers of growing too comfortable with China."Taiwan's government has trumpeted its many cross-strait agreements with Beijing, but these deals rely more on China's good will than legal niceties," The Taipei Times wrote in an editorial before Mr. Chen's arrival. "Chen is living proof that neither Beijing's good will nor its legal system can be relied upon."Some in Taiwan fear that its autonomy is under threat from growing ties with China, and worry that Taiwanese who live and work in China could fall victim to its arbitrary legal system. A proposal to allow Taiwan and China to set up mutual representative offices has stalled over Beijing's unwillingness to allow Taiwan's representatives unrestricted access to their compatriots detained on the mainland.Taiwan's refusal last year to allow a visit by the Dalai Lama, who had been to the island three times previously, was widely seen as an effort to avoid angering the Chinese government, which opposes the exiled Tibetan spiritual leader.President Ma Ying-jeou, whose Kuomintang, the governing party, has pushed for closer relations between Taiwan and China since he took office in 2008, is not scheduled to meet Mr. Chen, nor is Wang Jin-pyng, the legislative speaker."I think they are sensitive to seeing a figure the Chinese government doesn't like," said Lin Jih-wen, a research fellow at the Institute of Political Science at Academia Sinica, a government-sponsored academy. "They don't want to get into trouble."Mr. Chen is expected to address the Legislature in Taiwan on Tuesday and meet opposition politicians, including Su Tseng-chang, chairman of the Democratic Progressive Party.Mr. Chen's visit to Taiwan has brought little comment from Beijing, although the allegations of Chinese influence in his departure from New York University prompted a Chinese Foreign Ministry spokeswoman to say either the news was erroneous or Mr. Chen was "fabricating information."The Global Times, a Beijing newspaper run by the Communist Party-owned People's Daily Group, wrote last week that Mr. Chen's "embarrassing situation mirrors the fate of many 'pro-democratic activists' in the 1980s."
HONG KONG — Edward J. Snowden, the former National Security Agency contractor who has acknowledged leaking numerous documents about American surveillance operations around the world, planned his escape from Hong Kong over a surreptitious dinner of pizza, fried chicken and sausages, washed down with Pepsi.It was a cloak-and-dagger affair. Mr. Snowden wore a cap and sunglasses and insisted that the assembled lawyers hide their cellphones in the refrigerator of the home where he was staying, to block any eavesdropping. Then began a two-hour conversation during which Mr. Snowden was deeply dismayed to learn that he could spend years in prison without access to a computer during litigation over whether he would be granted asylum here or surrendered to the United States.Staying cooped up in the cramped Hong Kong home of a local supporter was less bothersome to Mr. Snowden than the prospect of losing his computer."He didn't go out, he spent all his time inside a tiny space, but he said it was O.K. because he had his computer," said Albert Ho, one of Mr. Snowden's lawyers. "If you were to deprive him of his computer, that would be totally intolerable."After the meeting, Mr. Ho was sent to ask the Hong Kong government if Mr. Snowden would be released on bail if he were arrested or whether he would be allowed to leave the country.A person with detailed knowledge of the Hong Kong government's deliberations said that the government had been delighted to receive the questions. Leung Chun-ying, the chief executive, and his top advisers had been struggling through numerous meetings for days, canceling or postponing other meetings, while trying to decide what to do in response to an American request for Mr. Snowden's detention, even as public opinion in Hong Kong seemed to favor protecting the fugitive.But Mr. Snowden's choice of Mr. Ho to represent him raised a problem, said the person with knowledge of the government's deliberations, who insisted on anonymity because of the diplomatic sensitivities in the case. Mr. Ho, a member of the territory's legislature for nearly 20 years, is a former chairman of the Democratic Party and a longtime campaigner for full democracy here, to the irritation of government leaders of the territory, which was returned by Britain to China in 1997."The Hong Kong government doesn't trust him," the person said, adding that the government also did not want to be involved in any direct negotiations with Mr. Snowden. So it found an intermediary, someone with longstanding connections to the local government but not in office, to bypass Mr. Ho and contact Mr. Snowden.The intermediary told Mr. Snowden on Friday night that the government could not predict what Hong Kong's independent judiciary would do, but that serving jail time while awaiting trial was a possibility. The intermediary also said that the Hong Kong government would welcome Mr. Snowden's departure, Mr. Ho and the person who insisted on anonymity said. Both declined to identify the intermediary.Mr. Snowden went through the same security and immigration channels as most passengers at the airport, rather than a special channel usually used for people involved in highly political cases — a sign that the Hong Kong government wanted to minimize its involvement in Mr. Snowden's departure, Mr. Ho said.At the same time, the Hong Kong government's encouragement for Mr. Snowden to leave had convinced him that staying was risky because the Hong Kong government might not be on his side. "He would not like to fight with the Hong Kong government, with the Chinese government and the U.S. government" against him, Mr. Ho said.Mr. Ho said that the disclosure late Friday evening of a sealed indictment against Mr. Snowden in the United States had prompted his client to become considerably more anxious about staying in Hong Kong.Mr. Ho said that if the Hong Kong government had not assured Mr. Snowden of safe passage to the airport and exit from the territory, his client intended to seek the advice of Stephen Young, the United States consul general here, whom Mr. Ho knows socially. But the Hong Kong government's assurance of safe passage meant that this plan was never discussed in depth, Mr. Ho added.Obama administration officials expressed annoyance on Sunday that Hong Kong let Mr. Snowden get away. But the person with knowledge of the Hong Kong government's deliberations said that there was considerable annoyance in Hong Kong about Washington's handling of the case.
HONG KONG — In its first direct comment about a credit crunch last week that raised concerns about the health of the Chinese financial system, China's central bank insisted Monday that there was ample cash in the banking system but stressed that the country's commercial banks needed to be better managed.Bank-to-bank lending rates, which had hit record highs last week, further eased Monday. But stocks slumped sharply in a sign that markets remained intensely nervous about China's growth prospects and the uncertainties that surround the Chinese leadership's efforts to reshape the economy.The Shanghai composite index, which has been under pressure for months amid mounting evidence that the Chinese economy is cooling, plunged 5.3 percent, its biggest single-day drop in nearly four years, taking its decline so far this year to more than 13 percent. The Shenzhen composite index dropped 6.1 percent, while in Hong Kong, the Hang Seng Index fell 2.2 percent, sagging below the 20,000-point mark for the first time since last September.Markets in Europe were down almost 2 percent in afternoon trading, while Wall Street shares were down 1 percent shortly after the opening.Numerous analysts have revised downward their growth projections — HSBC, for example, cut its forecast for this year to 7.4 percent from 8.2 percent — amid signs that Beijing's new leaders are willing to tolerate slower growth in the short term as they pursue stability for the long term.The interbank lending market's benchmark overnight rate, which serves as a gauge of liquidity in the financial market, stood at 6.489 percent Monday. That was down from 8.492 percent Friday and well below the record high of 13.44 percent it hit Thursday, but still elevated compared with the level of about 3 percent of most of the past 18 months.In a statement dated June 17 but published Monday, the Chinese central bank, the People's Bank of China, addressed some of the concerns about the cash crunch, saying that "currently, liquidity in our country's banking system is overall at a reasonable level." But, in a stern sign to Chinese lenders, it called on financial institutions to improve "awareness about preventing risks" and to "strengthen their analysis and forecasting about factors affecting liquidity.""Follow the requirements of macro prudence in allocating assets in a sensible fashion," the central bank's instructions to lenders went on, "and cautiously control the risks that the excessively rapid expansion of credit and other assets may lead to liquidity risks. When there is turbulence in market liquidity, swiftly adjust the structure of assets."The fact that the People's Bank of China had allowed interbank lending rates to soar last week — rather than injected money into the financial system — was widely interpreted as a deliberate effort to rein in excessive lending and force banks to focus on prudent, low-risk loans.A buildup of debt by local governments, property developers and state-owned companies, while useful for supporting economic growth, bears substantial risk, including asset price bubbles and potentially destabilizing defaults if loans turn sour, analysts have cautioned. The rapid expansion of lending in unregulated and often opaque shadow banking activities, in particular, has worried many.Last month, the International Monetary Fund cautioned that the growth in credit "raises concerns about the quality of investment and its impact on repayment capacity, especially since a fast-growing share of credit is flowing through less-well supervised parts of the financial system."Beijing has responded in recent months with efforts to address the potential risks. "Policy makers have taken measures to slow the rapid growth in credit and at the same time tightened rules about irregular and imprudent activity in the financial system, including interbank bond repo transactions," economists at JPMorgan in Hong Kong wrote in a research note Friday, referring to bond repurchases. That "tough-line attitude," they added, had caused the recent increase in interbank funding costs.Although factors like a seasonal demand for liquidity and a crackdown on cash hoarding at banks also contributed to the rate increase, the JPMorgan team wrote, it seemed that the P.B.O.C. also "wants to use this as an opportunity to address" banks' expectations that it is always there to provide backup.Yiping Huang and Jian Chang, China economists at Barclays, said in a report that with "China's credit-to-G.D.P. ratio at 200 percent, we believe that the P.B.O.C. is acting in line with the government's efforts to deleverage, rebalance and position the economy towards a path for sustainable growth." Though the central bank is likely to stabilize the interbank market in the near term, they added, "short-term rates are likely to remain elevated, at least for a while, possibly leading to the failing of some smaller financial institutions."Louis Kuijs, an economist at Royal Bank of Scotland and former China economist at the World Bank, said conditions in the interbank market were likely to remain "tight and nervous" in the coming weeks."We expect conditions on the interbank market to normalize gradually after that," Mr. Kuijs added.
BEIJING — A U.S. businessman held captive by about 100 workers in a Beijing factory said on Wednesday he was hopeful of a resolution to a row about pay in the next day or two.Chip Starnes, president of the Florida-based Specialty Medical Supplies, said from behind his barred office window that the workers were demanding severance packages identical to those offered to 30 recently laid off employees - even though there weren't going to be any more layoffs.The six-day-old stand-off in the suburb of Huairou, not far from sections of the Great Wall, has highlighted one of the lesser known risks of doing business in China, where the level of trust between workers and managers is low and faith in the legal system is weak."I'm hoping we can come to some sort of agreement here today or tomorrow, or something like that," Starnes told Reuters by telephone from inside the plant, which produces alcohol pads and plastic blood lancets for diabetics.Talks between Starnes's lawyers and the workers were under way, though Chu Lixiang, head of the Huairou labor union's rights and interests department, told reporters at the factory it would take time to reach a deal."As of now, we are still in the process of solving this. There is no new news nor any result that has come about yet," Chu said.Angry employees holding employers captive is not uncommon in China, according to consultants and lawyers. Detailed figures are difficult to obtain, but the cases often arise out of a mix of mistrust, mismanagement and desperation.The U.S. State Department's consular information sheet on China notes cases of civil business disputes in which U.S. citizens have been prevented from leaving the country for months or years, been harassed or intimidated by "debt collectors" or physically detained as leverage.Charles Scholz, managing director of Big Bear Safety & Security Management, said illegal detentions typically happened in the construction and manufacturing sectors.He described a case in which a manufacturer in Suzhou, near Shanghai, had completed 80 percent of the work contracted to it, but the foreign partner cancelled the contract after a quality dispute and told the contractor to leave the site. The Chinese partner claimed it was still owed 20 million yuan ($3.25 million) and refused."They locked in the foreign general manager and three of his clients as well as 60 of the staff, blockaded them into a factory for three days... they wouldn't let them leave," said Scholz.Starnes flew to China last Tuesday and his detention by the workers started on Friday. Asked if he had any inkling that something like this might happen while moving part of his China operation to India, Starnes replied: "No. Zero."Kevin Jones, a Shanghai-based partner at the U.S. law firm Faegre Baker Daniels, said companies laying off staff in China should consider simple steps to mitigate risk, like making the announcement on neutral ground, and splitting up employees."Any time you have a reduction in the force you have the potential that it could end up like this," he said.Police are loath to wade into business disputes and tend to keep their distance as long as things remain peaceful.The workers' demands in Huairou followed rumors that the entire plant was being closed after the company's plastic injection molding division began a move to India to lower production costs. Starnes has said no more layoffs were planned.U.S. officials in Beijing met Starnes on Monday and confirmed that he had not been physically harmed, U.S. embassy spokesman Nolan Barkhouse said."The embassy and the U.S. government have maintained regular contact with Mr. Starnes and we are aware that he remains safe and that he has had personal contact with his attorneys," Barkhouse said.
BEIJING — A U.S. executive held captive by workers in his Beijing factory since Friday said the dispute that has kept him behind the plant's barred windows was a misunderstanding over pay.Chip Starnes, president of the Florida-based Specialty Medical Supplies, said about 100 workers were demanding severance packages identical to those offered to 30 employees laid off from the company's plastics division, which was moved to India to lower production costs.The workers' demands followed rumours that the entire plant was being closed, though Starnes said no more layoffs were planned."We never had that intention. They were never told they were going to lose their jobs," Starnes told Reuters on Tuesday."It (the rumor) ran rampant and quickly spiraled out of control. It's a sad situation."Starnes said he was never physically harmed but had been intimidated, and was unhappy about the way local authorities have handled the dispute."I think disappointment is a really good word," the 42-year-old said from a window of the factory in the Beijing suburb of Huairou where the firm has been operating for nearly a decade.A number of plain-clothes police officers could be seen standing outside the factory compound. Authorities said they were in place to maintain order, though they had not acted to end the stand-off.Starnes said his lawyers were in talks with the workers with mediation from the district labor administration and labor union.Chu Lixiang, head of the Huairou labor union's rights and interests department, said Starnes had not paid the workers for two months and they feared the plant was closing and that he would run away without paying severance."The workers' request, firstly, will be for the company to pay up. Second, they (the managers) need to abide by the law, to deliver compensation as deserved. That's all," Chu said.Strikes and work disputes in China have become more common as workers demand greater compensation and the pool of cheap labor shrinks."We just ask that our boss pays our salary and the labor compensation we deserve," said Gao Ping, an employee for six years.Foreign Ministry spokeswoman Hua Chunying told reporters at a daily briefing that she hoped the issue could be "resolved through dialogue".
BEIJING — Gangs armed with knives attacked a police station and a local government building on Wednesday in China's restive far western Xinjiang region, leaving 27 dead in clashes with police, the government news agency Xinhua said.The unrest in the region, home to a large Muslim Uighur minority, was the deadliest since July 2009, when nearly 200 people were killed in riots pitting Uighurs against ethnic Chinese in the region's capital Urumqi.Xinhua said Wednesday's unrest erupted at about 6 a.m. in the remote township of Lukqun, about 200 km (120 miles) southeast of Urumqi.Gangs attacked Lukqun's police stations, the local government building and a construction site, stabbing people and setting fire to police vehicles, Xinhua quoted regional Communist Party officials as saying.Nine policemen and security guards and eight civilians were killed before police shot dead 10 of the attackers, Xinhua quoted the officials as saying.The reasons for the attacks were not immediately clear.Many Uighurs, Muslims who speak a Turkic language, chafe at what they call Chinese government restrictions on their culture, language and religion.China says it grants Uighurs wide-ranging freedoms and accuses extremists of separatism.
HONG KONG — Markets from Sydney to Beijing rallied for a second day Thursday after the U.S. said quarterly growth may be weaker than expected, raising investors' hopes that the Federal Reserve would delay plans to wind down its stimulus program.Japan's Nikkei 225 rose 1.9 percent to 13,081.01 and Hong Kong's Hang Seng gained 1.5 percent to 20,648.81. South Korea's Kospi surged 3 percent to 1,836.36.The Shanghai Composite Index advanced 1.2 percent to 1,976.15 and the smaller Shenzhen Composite Index rose 1.3 percent to 913.87. Australia's S&P/ASX 200 gained 1.9 percent to 4,821.00. Benchmarks in New Zealand, Singapore and Taiwan also rose.The U.S. government cut its estimate for second-quarter economic growth to 1.8 percent, down sharply from 2.4 percent because of lower than predicted consumer spending.While news of the weakness in the world's biggest economy was disappointing, it was also positive for investors, who were rattled last week after Fed Chairman Ben Bernanke said the U.S. central bank would slow its bond-buying program if the U.S. economy continues to strengthen. That program has kept interest rates low and made stocks more attractive."This doesn't put a new spin on the outlook but it certainly makes one wonder all the more about the Fed's 'new and improved' outlook for 2014," economists at DBS Bank wrote in a commentary.Benchmark oil for August delivery was up 55 cents to $96.05 a barrel in electronic trading on the New York Mercantile Exchange. The contract rose 18 cents to end at $95.50 a barrel on Wednesday.In currencies, the euro rose to $1.3029 from $1.3012 late Wednesday in New York. The dollar rose to 97.76 yen from 97.74 yen.
Three Chinese astronauts returned safely to earth on Wednesday after a 15-day mission that included docking exercises, a televised science demonstration for children and a phone call from their country's president, Xi Jinping, state television reported. The Shenzhou 10 capsule landed in northeast China, ending China's fifth manned space mission. China is seeking to master the skills and technology needed to operate a manned space lab for long stretches, and the crew on the latest flight practiced rendezvous and docking exercises with the orbiting Tiangong 1 space module, a small prototype of such a lab. China first sent an astronaut into space in 2003, and government engineers have said they may eventually try to send an astronaut to the moon.
BEIJING — An American business executive being held hostage by employees at his medical supply plant on the outskirts of the capital spent a fifth day on Tuesday in a surreal standoff that has highlighted the dearth of legal protections in China for foreign investors and workers.The executive, Chip Starnes, 42, a founder and president of Specialty Medical Supplies, was kept out of sight Tuesday afternoon, with local government officials insisting that he was merely busy with his lawyers in negotiations."He is completely free within the factory; it's just that he has stuff to do," said Chu Lixiang, an official with the government-run labor union in Huairou, a district of Beijing.The dispute, which has drawn a throng of police officers, Chinese reporters and American diplomats to the factory, began when the company, which is based in Coral Springs, Fla., closed its injection molding division and gave roughly 30 employees what Mr. Starnes described in a telephone interview on Tuesday night as a generous severance package.The division, which manufactured medical goods like lancets and insulin syringes, is being moved to India. But rumors soon spread that Mr. Starnes was planning to close the entire plant and flee without paying the rest of the workers, which happens often in China.Although he explained that the remaining workers were not being laid off, about 100 employees barricaded the exits on Friday and stopped him from leaving until he agreed to give them compensation identical to that given to the laid-off employees, a sum he contends would bankrupt the company.Since then he has been trapped within the factory grounds, occasionally appearing at the barred window of his office looking haggard and in the same clothes he has worn since Friday. Over the weekend, local officials coerced him into signing contracts that met some of the workers' demands, even as employees kept him awake with bright lights and loud noises.In the interview, Mr. Starnes bemoaned his fate, saying local officials were pressing him to provide lavish compensation to workers who were not scheduled to be laid off. "The union just wants to do anything that will calm the people," he said. "They are asking me to commit business suicide."Workers paint a starkly different picture of a company that has not paid its employees in weeks as news spread that Specialty Medical was moving some operations to India. "We have been given an i.o.u. for two months and all assembly lines have stopped," said one manager, who gave only his surname, Wang. "We went without work. What were we going to do?"Mr. Starnes rejected the accusations of unpaid wages. "That's ridiculous," he said, citing the payroll schedule. "They were all paid on Monday." The factory was producing goods right up until the workers went rogue, he added.China often favors economic development over labor rights, leaving workers with little recourse to resolve salary disputes. Sometimes, those who feel cheated turn to intimidation or violence.In February, a factory owner in south China's Guangxi Autonomous Region was kidnapped from a hotel by two contractors who claimed that he owed them $618,000. A month earlier, a migrant worker in Shandong Province stabbed the relatives of a construction contractor, killing the man's 5-year-old nephew, over what news reports said was a $245 debt. In December, 14 women died in a fire at a bra factory in Guangzhou, which the police determined had been set by a worker upset over $490 in unpaid wages.Western business executives say foreign companies are especially vulnerable to the strong-arm tactics of employees who have little faith in the Chinese legal system.One business executive in Beijing described how workers at his company got wind of an impending closing and took managers hostage even before plans for compensation had been made public.He said the crisis was defused by the local government, backed by the police, although officers sided with the workers."It's easy in China to agitate around a foreign employer," said the executive, who asked that his identity and his company's be kept secret because he still does business in China. "This society is accustomed to using tools of mass mobilization, and when a spark erupts in the wrong place, things can quickly get out of control."Diplomats say they are relatively helpless when a foreign business owner is embroiled in such disputes. Officials from the United States Embassy visited Mr. Starnes on Monday, but could do little more than check on his welfare and make sure that he had access to his lawyers.In the meantime, Mr. Starnes is unsure how the dispute can be resolved in a way that persuades his employees to come back to work. "They hear a rumor and there's a big payday possibly, they'll stick together," he said.
HONG KONG — The Chinese central bank reassured investors worried about a lingering credit squeeze and declared that it had already been selectively supporting bank liquidity, as Chinese stock markets swung wildly again Tuesday after several days of volatility.The central bank, People's Bank of China, eager to rein in soaring lending growth and financial risk, initially refrained from intervening as bank-to-bank interest rates soared last week, but then apparently released more money for lenders. Uncertainty over the central bank's position produced wide trading swings Tuesday, with the main Chinese stock indexes dropping to their lowest levels since early 2009 before recovering most of the day's losses near the end of trading.The Shanghai composite index, which tumbled 5.3 percent Monday, slumped more than 5 percent again by early afternoon Tuesday. It recovered almost all of those losses to close down 0.2 percent. The index's total decline since a peak in early February has been nearly 20 percent.After China's stock markets closed, the People's Bank of China issued a statement apparently meant to soothe investors' nerves and maintain pressure on banks deemed to be carrying too much risk."In recent days, the central bank has provided liquidity support to some financial institutions that meet the demands of macro prudence," the bank said on its Web site. "Some banks with ample liquidity have also begun to play a stabilizing role in circulating capital into markets."On Tuesday the bank pledged that it would apply open market operations — buying or selling securities to manage liquidity and rates — and other methods to offset "short-term abnormal volatility, stabilize market expectations and maintain stability in monetary markets."The reassurances were accompanied by a warning to commercial banks to contain risk and to report promptly any "sudden major problems." Chinese banks that follow government policies in lending practices and risk controls can expect support from the central bank if they have brief capital shortfalls, the bank said. But wayward banks can expect tougher treatment, it suggested."For institutions that have problems in their liquidity management, corresponding measures will be taken on a case-by-case basis, while maintaining the overall stability of money markets," it said."The stock markets are continuing to react to the very elevated funding costs," said Dariusz Kowalczyk, a senior economist and strategist at Crédit Agricole in Hong Kong, referring to the recent surge in interbank lending rates. Those rates determine what banks pay to borrow from each other, often to cover short-term obligations.Interbank lending rates, which began to decline last Friday, continued to do so Tuesday. The benchmark overnight lending rate, a gauge of liquidity in the financial market, stood at 5.736 percent. That was down from 6.489 percent on Monday and well below the record high of 13.44 percent reached last Thursday.But with rates still well above where they were in the last 18 months, around 3 percent, anxiety over the effect on the financial system and the economy persisted Tuesday.The central bank's stance could help economic conditions in China, many analysts have said, by instilling more lending discipline and reducing the chances of asset price bubbles and loan defaults that have increased with rapid lending growth in the last few months.In its latest statement Tuesday, the central bank urged commercial banks to "prudently control the excessively rapid expansion of credit and assets that may lead to liquidity risks."Still, many analysts contend that the central bank's tough stance has risks."We believe the biggest risk comes from the P.B.O.C. potentially mishandling the situation," Ting Lu, China economist at Bank of America Merrill Lynch, said Tuesday, referring to the People's Bank of China. "That being said, we believe the P.B.O.C. and Chinese policy makers will be aware of the potential dangers and take decisive measures to revive the interbank market, to calm investors and to stabilize the economy."In the rest of the Asia-Pacific region, the prospect of slower economic growth in China has weighed on markets for months.
BEIJING — On a rare trip to Tibet, the U.S. ambassador to China has met with residents and officials and urged authorities to allow foreigners to travel more freely in the tightly controlled region.Gary Locke's three-day local government-organized trip in and around the region's capital, Lhasa, with members of his family and embassy staff ends Friday. U.S. Embassy deputy spokesman Justin Higgins said it was the first time Chinese authorities had approved an embassy request to visit Tibet since September 2010.The embassy said that in his meetings, Locke lobbied for opening access to Tibet to foreign diplomats, journalists and tourists and stressed the "importance of preserving the Tibetan people's cultural heritage, including its unique linguistic, religious and cultural traditions."China restricts journalists' access to Tibetan areas of western China and to Tibet itself. Foreign tourists must apply for special permits to visit Tibet, and Chinese authorities periodically close the region to foreigners, usually during periods of unrest.More than 100 Tibetans have set themselves on fire since 2011 to protest Chinese policies in the region and call for the return of the Dalai Lama, their beloved spiritual leader, from exile."We remain concerned by the deteriorating human rights situation in Tibetan areas, including the tragic self-immolations," Higgins said.The U.S. urges Beijing to "engage in substantive dialogue with the Dalai Lama or his representatives without preconditions," he said.Human Rights Watch said in a report released Thursday that since 2006, the Chinese government has relocated more than 2 million Tibetans or placed them in government-built homes, often without consulting or adequately compensating them."Tibetans have no say in the design of polices that are radically altering their way of life, and — in an already highly repressive context — no ways to challenge them," the group's China director, Sophie Richardson, said in a statement.China's Foreign Ministry dismissed the report, calling the rights group prejudiced against Beijing. "Great achievements have been made in Tibet politically, socially and economically in recent years. That is an undeniable fact," spokeswoman Hua Chunying said at a regular briefing.
BEIJING — Chinese factory workers on Thursday released their U.S. boss, held captive for a week, after a compensation dispute was resolved, a company official and union representative said.Chip Starnes, president of Specialty Medical Supplies, in the Beijing suburb of Huairou, was allowed to leave the factory and was resting in a hotel, the company official said.The workers had demanded severance packages identical to those offered to 30 employees who were recently laid off, even though the firm planned no further layoffs, Starnes said earlier."The mass labor dispute incident for this unit has been resolved," said Chu Lixian, head of the rights and interests department of the Huairou District Labour Union."Both sides have come to an agreement through joint efforts made by Mr. Starnes and the workers' side. The results have turned out to be satisfactory."The workers' demands followed rumors that the entire plant was being closed after the company's plastic injection molding division began a move to India to lower production costs."As of now my boss Chip feels exhausted after two harsh days and has gone back to a hotel, okay?" Specialty Medical General Manager Xing Shuang told Reuters Television. "This is all I have to say."Starnes spent the week inside the plant, which produces alcohol pads and plastic blood lancets for diabetics, behind barred windows. He could not be immediately reached for comment.The stand-off highlighted one of the lesser-known risks of doing business in China - that trust between workers and management, and faith in the legal system, is often low.Starnes, whose company is based in Florida, flew to China on June 18 and his detention started on Friday.
BEIJING — A pay dispute was resolved Thursday at a medical supply factory, ending a labor standoff in which the Chinese workers detained their American boss for nearly a week inside the plant until they reached agreement on a compensation package.Chip Starnes, a co-owner of Florida-based Specialty Medical Supplies, told The Associated Press he had been forced to give in to what he called unjustified demands while he was held by about 80 workers inside the factory, an experience he described as "humiliating, embarrassing."The workers began blocking all exits from the plant in Huairou district on the outskirts of Beijing on June 21 after seeing equipment being packed for shipment to India and thinking the entire factory was being shut down. They said the company owed them unpaid salary.At the start of the standoff, the workers deprived Starnes of sleep by shining bright lights and banging on windows of his office, he said.Police had made no moves to end the standoff but guarded the plant and said they were guaranteeing Starnes' safety while a labor official was brought in to broker negotiations.It's not rare in China for managers to be held by workers demanding back pay or other benefits, often from their Chinese owners. Police are reluctant to intervene, as they consider it a business dispute, and local officials typically are eager to see the matter resolved in a way least likely to fuel unrest.Starnes, who had spoken to reporters in recent days through the barred window of his factory office, said the workers' demands were unjustified. Neither he nor district labor official Chu Lixiang gave details of the compensation deal.Chu said all the workers would be terminated, although Starnes said some would be rehired later."It has been resolved to each side's satisfaction," Chu told reporters at the plant. She said they had been sorting out paperwork until 5 a.m. and that 97 workers had signed settlement agreements.Starnes had quietly departed the factory grounds by the time Chu spoke. He wrote in a text message: "Yes!! Out and back at hotel. Showered. 9 pounds lost during the ordeal!!!!!!"He told the AP he was "saddened" by the experience.He has said the company had been winding down its plastics division, with plans to move it to Mumbai, India. When he arrived in Beijing last week to lay off the last 30 people, workers in other divisions started demanding similar severance packages.The deal reached Thursday would also pay those workers, even though the company said they weren't being laid off."We have transferred our funds from the U.S.," he said. "I am basically free to go when the funds hit the account here of the company."Starnes said he planned to get back to business, and even rehire some of the workers who had been holding him.The labor action reflected growing uneasiness among workers about their jobs amid China's slowing economic growth and the sense that growing labor costs make the country less attractive for some foreign-owned factories.
BEIJING — China, which has long been North Korea's benefactor, will signal its displeasure with Pyongyang again on Thursday when it welcomes President Park Geun-hye of South Korea for an elaborate banquet and a highly anticipated meeting with China's leader, President Xi Jinping, who has called her "an old friend."Ms. Park's visit will contrast with the furtive, hastily arranged appearances in Beijing recently of two North Korean officials, a senior military officer and a diplomat, who were scolded by their Chinese hosts for North Korea's growing arsenal of nuclear weapons.And Ms. Park, 61, the daughter of an anti-Communist dictator, is coming to China before the leader of North Korea, Kim Jong-un, who is supposed to be China's ally.At the top of the agenda for her visit, according to both sides, will be North Korea and, specifically, how South Korea and China can together push Mr. Kim toward giving up his nuclear weapons.The symbolism of a frustrated China, which is North Korea's benefactor, joining hands with South Korea, an ally of the United States, in calling for a Korean Peninsula free of nuclear weapons will send a clear and unpleasant message to the North, analysts say."When the leaders of the two countries meet reporters, they will say they have reached some consensus on denuclearization of the peninsula," predicted Wang Junsheng, professor of Asian affairs at the Chinese Academy of Social Sciences.That would be a demonstration of a new solidarity in the relationship between China and South Korea. The previous president of South Korea, Lee Myung-bak, did not have China's support, Mr. Wang said.Ms. Park, who speaks Chinese and has shown an admiration for Chinese culture, will be arriving at a time of turmoil among China's foreign policy specialists, who are debating whether North Korea should be considered an ally or a liability.The constituencies in China's hierarchy who stand by North Korea appear to be dwindling, but the People's Liberation Army and segments of the Communist Party remain in favor of keeping North Korea on Beijing's side, Chinese experts say.After North Korea conducted a third nuclear test this year, China voted in favor of economic sanctions against North Korea at the United Nations. Since then, Beijing has called for the resumption of the six-party talks — involving China, Japan, Russia, the United States, South Korea and North Korea — that are aimed at ridding North Korea of its nuclear weapons.Those talks collapsed in 2008 when North Korea walked out, and though Ms. Park has shown more warmth to China on North Korea than her predecessor, she has said she is not in favor of "talks for talks' sake," a position that coincides with the view in Washington.Indeed, as a leader well regarded by President Obama — Ms. Park made her first overseas visit to Washington after assuming the presidency this year — she could well become a channel between the United States and China on North Korea, experts say."The Chinese leaders will try to tell her that China is firm on denuclearization and will encourage a return to six-party talks," said Sun Zhe, director of the Center for U.S.-China Relations at Tsinghua University in Beijing. "We need to have some more joint South Korea and China efforts. Strengthening the South Korean-China relationship will send a clear message to North Korea."On the eve of Mrs. Park's arrival, The Beijing Morning Post flattered her with a profile headlined "China Hand." It told how Zhao Yun, a Chinese military general of the early third century, is one of her favorite characters. She can sing Chinese songs and likes Sichuan cuisine, the profile said. Her autobiography, "Steeled by Despair, Motivated by Hope," leads the Chinese Amazon list of biographies of political figures.
BEIJING — Next week, millions of fifth graders across China will struggle with their end-of-year examinations. And, with just one year of elementary education left, their parents will struggle with choosing a high school for them.For many cosmopolitan Chinese parents, the agonized deliberations look like this: How Chinese should our child's education be? How Western? Is there a middle ground?"I have a friend who couldn't sleep at night because of this. She nearly went mad," said Ms. Ma, the mother of a fifth grader at the state-run Fangcaodi Elementary School in Beijing, which my son also attends. "Don't become like that!" she advised me.Ms. Ma is perplexed by the challenge of choosing a high school for her 11-year-old. "I'm really worried about his future studies," she said. She took her son to the United States in May to tour schools, but that didn't produce a decision."He feels American, but his friends are here. He wants to stay here. I feel that China's basic education is very good, but, for later, I want him to have the space to explore and create, not just learn from books," said Ms. Ma, who only offered her surname.Then there's the values issue, which is inclining her toward the United States."I think traditional Chinese values and morals are very good," she said. "But they don't exist anymore. And he has to learn how to be an upright person."Parents' concerns here can be very intense, in part perhaps reflecting a "tiger mom" or "wolf dad" mentality. But they also speak to a deeply held cultural identity. As China grows in influence, many here believe their children will be a core part of the globalized future. And like parents everywhere, they want what's best for them.Some are leaning toward a more Chinese education, out of concern that the language is just too difficult. Miss these formative years and, you never catch up."I think it's difficult to have a truly bilingual education," said Qiu Dong, the mother of another fifth grader. "I think you have to pick a language."After years in the United States, she and her family are back in China. She tried an international school, a bilingual school and, now, a Chinese one for her two sons, and thinks the Chinese route works best. In order to ensure her children's future here, if that's what they want one day."If you want your kids to really learn the language, then elementary isn't enough," said Ms. Qiu, drawing on her own experiences as a child. She was 15 when she left for the United States with her 10-year-old sister. Today, "the difference is huge," she said. Ms. Qiu is fluent in Chinese, including the written language. Her sister is not."You need the classical Chinese, know how it works, the forms and the structure of the language," she said. "You have to understand not just the language but the whole cultural context. You have to know how the system operates."For her, the answer is another elite Chinese school. Like quite a few parents at Fangcaodi, she hopes her son, Oliver, passes highly competitive tests for the No. 4 High School, one of the best-regarded in the country.It's all a balancing act of enormous, often clashing factors — culture, identity and money, said Zhang Qiao, the mother of Natalie, a half-German fifth grader."The reality is that our children are living in two cultures," said Ms. Zhang.She has decided on the international stream of the state-run No. 80 High School. Chinese schools increasingly are offering international streams where students need a foreign passport to enter and where an International Baccalaureate curriculum may be offered.For Ms. Zhang, unlike Ms. Ma or Ms. Qiu, money is an issue, as it is for many. Natalie spent some time at an international school in Beijing, but the cost was crippling. "It was my whole savings!" said Ms. Zhang. "I can't do that."International schools in the capital cost around 230,000 renminbi, or more than $37,000, for annual tuition alone, depending on the child's age.Another negative for some globalized Chinese parents is the expatriate "bubble" they see at international schools, which they feel keeps children apart from the "real" China. Some say Chinese children may be at a social as well as linguistic disadvantage there.Ms. Zhang says state-run Chinese schools will teach better Chinese and demand of students an old-fashioned respect for their elders. She's happy with that. Her daughter feels German, but "we have to teach the kids how to take the best of both worlds," Ms. Zhang said. "This is the next generation, and the world will look like that."Many parents like Ms. Zhang prefer the idea of international streams within Chinese schools. But there are concerns: These may be halfway houses that don't really nail either the Chinese or the Western curriculum. State schools are tightly managed by the education authorities and the Communist Party, and parents have little input. Some worry foreign teachers hired by these schools, often through agencies whose decisions and finances are opaque, are hired too cheaply and may be inexperienced.It is, perhaps, no wonder that some parents are losing sleep over their choice. They want the critical thinking and creativity of Western education but not the very high fees and expatriate "bubble" of international schools; the cultural immersion, language and math skills of Chinese schools but not the very long hours and competitiveness that can cause burnout. They want their kids to be moral and truly global, to be both Chinese and Western. No school seems to offer all that. And with much at stake amid this conflicting mix of values, the choice feels truly difficult for many.
HONG KONG — Mongolians appeared Thursday to have re-elected their president to a second four-year term, giving him half the vote needed to avoid a runoff election in a race that focused on demands that the resource-rich country do a better job of distributing wealth to its citizenry.Election results released Thursday morning showed that President Tsakhia Elbegdorj received slightly more than 50 percent of the vote. His re-election means that Mr. Elbegdorj is likely to continue with his anti-corruption and pro-growth policies that have seen the country's economy expand by 17 percent in 2011 and 12 percent last year, placing it among the world's five fastest-growing economies, according to the International Monetary Fund.But how that wealth is distributed overshadowed the election campaign amid concern that foreign companies are exploiting the country's abundant natural resources without much benefit to the Mongolian people. A plan by two foreign companies, Rio Tinto of Australia and Turquoise Hill Resources of Canada, to begin shipments from a huge copper mine was delayed by the government before the election amid demands that Rio Tinto keep more proceeds in Mongolia. The $6 billion mine is expected to provide a third of government revenues by the end of the decade.Mongolia, a landlocked country between China and Russia that is home to 2.7 million people, held its first national elections in 1992, two years after its Communist leadership fell from power in a peaceful transition.Mr. Elbegdorj's main challenger, Badmaanyambuu Bat-Erdene, a champion wrestler who is the candidate of the Mongolian People's Party, received 41 percent of the vote, while Natsag Udval, from the Mongolian People's Revolutionary Party, received 8 percent. Both opposition candidates had called for changing the terms of Rio Tinto's contract for the mine, located at Oyu Tolgoi.Many in Mongolia are concerned about how the vast expansion of the country's mining industry has changed the nation's character from a nomadic land to one of lightning-fast economic development, with pollution now afflicting the country and its capital, Ulan Bator. At the end of last year, the Mongolian Parliament passed a law that would extract more royalties from the operations of the Oyu Tolgoi mine, which has alarmed foreign investors given the $6 billion investment by Rio Tinto and its partners in the mine.
HONG KONG — The abrupt departure from Hong Kong on Sunday of Edward J. Snowden, the American former national security contractor, with the explicit approval of the Hong Kong government, has drawn the ire of the United States. But in Hong Kong the focus remains on Mr. Snowden's exposure of American intelligence-gathering operations in Hong Kong and mainland China.Leung Chun-ying, the territory's chief executive, has called repeatedly for the United States to explain its surveillance activities here, brushing aside White House criticism that Mr. Snowden was allowed to fly to Moscow despite a pending American request for his arrest."Snowden has left, but the matter is not over," Mr. Leung said at a tea with local journalists on Tuesday, the contents of which were confirmed on Wednesday by the government. "The Hong Kong government needs to safeguard the interests of Hong Kong."Mr. Snowden's release of documents showing American efforts to hack into computers in Hong Kong and mainland China has drawn support not just from pro-Beijing groups in this semi-autonomous Chinese territory, but from pro-democracy groups that have long looked to the United States as an example of strong protections for civil liberties.Emily Lau, the chairwoman of the Democratic Party, said that she would be very disturbed if Mr. Snowden someday came out of hiding and said that he had been forced by the local government or Beijing to leave Hong Kong against his will.But with Mr. Snowden's lawyers insisting this week that he left Hong Kong voluntarily, Ms. Lau said she had few other concerns about the case. She said she was focused on whether Hong Kong engaged in deliberate foot-dragging in not detaining Mr. Snowden sooner, which has been the complaint of the White House."My overriding concern is we operate according to the law," she said, adding that she was not aware of any clear evidence that the Hong Kong government had broken its legal obligations.The Hong Kong government contends it did not have a legal basis for stopping Mr. Snowden when he headed for the airport. Mr. Leung has noted that Hong Kong had posed questions to the United States last Friday about the details of an American request for his provisional arrest, which had been made six days earlier. The Hong Kong government had not yet received a reply when Mr. Snowden went to the airport Sunday morning and left the territory on an Aeroflot flight to Moscow.Simon Young, director of the Center for Comparative and Public Law at Hong Kong University, said that in allowing Mr. Snowden to leave while legal wrangling continued, Hong Kong had acted within the letter of the law as set by its bilateral agreement with the United States for the surrender of fugitives. But Hong Kong did not act expeditiously, he said, and it is still unclear why Hong Kong did not detain Mr. Snowden on the United States' allegation that he had stolen information, leaving the touchier issue of espionage charges for later.Mr. Young said that based on his research, it usually took three to four days in previous cases for a request from overseas to lead to an arrest."It's really about good faith and wanting to be a strong partner in these things, or keeping a distance," he said, adding that Hong Kong had clearly chosen to keep its distance from the United States.Security experts and democracy proponents say that mainland China's domestic surveillance operations in Hong Kong are far more extensive than the American effort. But those operations have largely disappeared from public discussion as attention has focused on the many details released by Mr. Snowden.Martin Lee, the founding chairman of the Democratic Party but now mostly retired from day-to-day politics, has been a lonely voice here in questioning the Hong Kong government's handling of Mr. Snowden. Mr. Lee said that he was concerned whether Hong Kong had fully followed its obligations to detain or surrender fugitives under its bilateral agreement with the United States."It looks like the government turned a blind eye to all these formalities and let him go," he said.
HONG KONG — At least 27 people died in rioting in far western China on Wednesday, when protesters attacked a police station and government offices and the police fired on the crowd, state media said. It was the worst spasm of violence for years in Xinjiang, a region troubled by tensions between Uighurs, an overwhelmingly Muslim ethnic minority, and China's Han majority.The confrontation broke out in the morning in Lukqun, a township in Turpan Prefecture, the state-run news agency, Xinhua, reported, citing unnamed officials."Knife-wielding mobs attacked the township's police stations, the local government building and a construction site, stabbing at people and setting fire to police cars," the English-language report said. In the initial outburst of bloodshed, 17 people were killed, including nine police officers and security guards, and the police then fatally shot 10 rioters, it said.The Xinhua report gave no explanation of what set off the confrontation. Nor did it give the ethnic background or other details of the rioters. Uighurs predominate in Turpan.In the past, Uighur residents have often given accounts of unrest sharply at odds with those given by Chinese government officials.Repeated efforts to contact residents, and a spokeswoman for the Xinjiang regional government, were unsuccessful.A spokesman for the World Uyghur Congress, an exiled group that advocates independence for the region, said the bloodshed had been stoked by a burst of detentions of Uighurs in the area over recent months."This clash did not happen by chance," said the spokesman, Dilxat Raxit, who lives in Sweden. "There have been sweeps and crackdowns in the area, leading to many Uighur men disappearing, and the authorities have refused to give information about their whereabouts," he said, citing recent phone conversations with residents.Images circulated on Chinese Internet sites, which could not be verified, showed a body, apparently dead, splayed on the road, next to an abandoned and smashed police car. Other pictures showed burned out vehicles near a fire-gutted police station and a puddle apparently red with blood."It's inconvenient to talk," said an official in the propaganda office of Shanshan County, which includes Lukqun in its jurisdiction. "Leaders are all out, it's inconvenient to take interviews."Many members of the Uighur minority, a Turkic-speaking group, resent the growing presence in Xinjiang of Han Chinese people, whom they say get the better jobs and land. Government restrictions on religion have become a growing source of tensions with Uighurs, who have embraced more conservative currents of Sunni Islam.The bloodshed struck a part of Xinjiang where relations between Uighur and Han people have traditionally been relatively untroubled, said Nicholas Bequelin, a senior researcher in Hong Kong for Human Rights Watch."But the tension has been escalating in recent years," said Mr. Bequelin, who takes a particular interest in Xinjiang. "The tensions are linked to the introduction of policies that call for much finer control and monitoring of local Uighur affairs by officials. You have a lot of rehousing and relocation there, too."The government has placed blame for past violence in Xinjiang on groups it accuses of using terror to seek independence for the region, including the East Turkestan Islamic Movement. But advocates of Uighur self-determination and some foreign scholars say the discontent has local causes and is not orchestrated from abroad.In July 2009, Urumqi, the regional capital of Xinjiang, was troubled by the worst ethnic violence in China in many years, when Uighurs attacked Han Chinese after the police broke up a protest by Uighurs. At least 197 people were killed, most of them Han Chinese, according to the Chinese government. Crowds of Han Chinese residents then marched through Uighur neighborhoods, demanding vengeance and attacking residents with rocks and cleavers.Chinese news Web sites initially featured the Xinhua report on the latest violence. But later in the day, those reports disappeared, in what appeared to be a government effort to stifle alarm or anger about the deaths.In April, at least 21 people died in fighting in Xinjiang between security forces and a group of what a government spokesman called "gangsters." In March, two courts convicted and sentenced 20 people accused of militant separatism in the region.Uighurs once formed the vast majority of residents in Xinjiang, which neighbors Central Asia and came under the control of Chinese Communist forces in 1949. In recent decades, the number of Han Chinese residents has grown, aided by migration. Uighurs now make up 46 percent of Xinjiang's civilian population of 22 million, and Han Chinese account for 40 percent, according to government estimates.Lukqun, where the rioting erupted, has about 30,000 residents, 90 percent of them Uighur, according to a report in the Xinjiang Daily last year.Jiang Zhaoyong, a Chinese former journalist who has written extensively about Xinjiang, said police stations had been a target of ethnic violence there before. "This appears to be the act of a local group," he said of the latest attack.Last year, Mr. Jiang visited the area where the rioting broke out on Wednesday. "In the past, that area wasn't one where tensions were especially acute."
HONG KONG — At least 27 people died in rioting in far western China on Wednesday, when protesters attacked a police station and government offices and the police fired on the crowd, state media said. It was the worst spasm of violence for years in Xinjiang, a region troubled by tensions between Uighurs, an overwhelmingly Muslim ethnic minority, and China's Han majority.The confrontation broke out in the morning in Lukqun, a township in Turpan Prefecture, the state-run news agency, Xinhua, reported, citing unnamed officials."Knife-wielding mobs attacked the township's police stations, the local government building and a construction site, stabbing at people and setting fire to police cars," the English-language report said. In the initial outburst of bloodshed, 17 people were killed, including nine police officers and security guards, and the police then fatally shot 10 rioters, it said.The Xinhua report gave no explanation of what set off the confrontation. Nor did it give the ethnic background or other details of the rioters. Uighurs predominate in Turpan.In the past, Uighur residents have often given accounts of unrest sharply at odds with those given by Chinese government officials.Repeated efforts to contact residents, and a spokeswoman for the Xinjiang regional government, were unsuccessful.A spokesman for the World Uyghur Congress, an exiled group that advocates independence for the region, said the bloodshed had been stoked by a burst of detentions of Uighurs in the area over recent months."This clash did not happen by chance," said the spokesman, Dilxat Raxit, who lives in Sweden. "There have been sweeps and crackdowns in the area, leading to many Uighur men disappearing, and the authorities have refused to give information about their whereabouts," he said, citing recent phone conversations with residents.Images circulated on Chinese Internet sites, which could not be verified, showed a body, apparently dead, splayed on the road, next to an abandoned and smashed police car. Other pictures showed burned out vehicles near a fire-gutted police station and a puddle apparently red with blood."It's inconvenient to talk," said an official in the propaganda office of Shanshan County, which includes Lukqun in its jurisdiction. "Leaders are all out, it's inconvenient to take interviews."Many members of the Uighur minority, a Turkic-speaking group, resent the growing presence in Xinjiang of Han Chinese people, whom they say get the better jobs and land. Government restrictions on religion have become a growing source of tensions with Uighurs, who have embraced more conservative currents of Sunni Islam.The bloodshed struck a part of Xinjiang where relations between Uighur and Han people have traditionally been relatively untroubled, said Nicholas Bequelin, a senior researcher in Hong Kong for Human Rights Watch."But the tension has been escalating in recent years," said Mr. Bequelin, who takes a particular interest in Xinjiang. "The tensions are linked to the introduction of policies that call for much finer control and monitoring of local Uighur affairs by officials. You have a lot of rehousing and relocation there, too."The government has placed blame for past violence in Xinjiang on groups it accuses of using terror to seek independence for the region, including the East Turkestan Islamic Movement. But advocates of Uighur self-determination and some foreign scholars say the discontent has local causes and is not orchestrated from abroad.In July 2009, Urumqi, the regional capital of Xinjiang, was troubled by the worst ethnic violence in China in many years, when Uighurs attacked Han Chinese after the police broke up a protest by Uighurs. At least 197 people were killed, most of them Han Chinese, according to the Chinese government. Crowds of Han Chinese residents then marched through Uighur neighborhoods, demanding vengeance and attacking residents with rocks and cleavers.Chinese news Web sites initially featured the Xinhua report on the latest violence. But later in the day, those reports disappeared, in what appeared to be a government effort to stifle alarm or anger about the deaths.In April, at least 21 people died in fighting in Xinjiang between security forces and a group of what a government spokesman called "gangsters." In March, two courts convicted and sentenced 20 people accused of militant separatism in the region.Uighurs once formed the vast majority of residents in Xinjiang, which neighbors Central Asia and came under the control of Chinese Communist forces in 1949. In recent decades, the number of Han Chinese residents has grown, aided by migration. Uighurs now make up 46 percent of Xinjiang's civilian population of 22 million, and Han Chinese account for 40 percent, according to government estimates.Lukqun, where the rioting erupted, has about 30,000 residents, 90 percent of them Uighur, according to a report in the Xinjiang Daily last year.Jiang Zhaoyong, a Chinese former journalist who has written extensively about Xinjiang, said police stations had been a target of ethnic violence there before. "This appears to be the act of a local group," he said of the latest attack.Last year, Mr. Jiang visited the area where the rioting broke out on Wednesday. "In the past, that area wasn't one where tensions were especially acute."
HONG KONG — Mainland Chinese stocks slipped slightly on Wednesday, and European and many other Asian markets edged higher, as investors reacted to moves by China's central bank late Tuesday to assuage concerns about a lingering credit squeeze in the country's financial system.The Shanghai composite index ended down 0.4 percent after a day that was calm compared with the previous two days. On Monday, the index had plunged 5.3 percent, and on Tuesday, it had gyrated wildly. Interbank lending rates, which determine how costly it is for banks to borrow money from one another, also continued to relax on Wednesday, falling slightly – though remaining well above where they have been over the past year.Late on Tuesday, the People's Bank of China, which had mostly stood on the sidelines in recent weeks as China's cash crunch deepened, issued a statement aimed at soothing market nerves but still maintaining pressure on commercial banks to take a more prudent approach to lending.In its statement, the P.B.O.C. said some larger lenders had already started playing a stabilizing role by injecting capital into the market. The central bank cautioned against risky lending practices but pledged to support banks facing cash shortfalls, adding that it would offset "short-term abnormal volatility, stabilize market expectations and maintain stability in monetary markets."That the central bank waited until this week to comment on a situation that intensified last week had added to the general uncertainty and nervousness. In an interview with Reuters on Wednesday, the chairman of Industrial and Commercial Bank of China, the country's largest bank, hinted at the banking sector's frustration with the central bank's handling of the situation."We hope that in future, policy expectations can be clearer. That would help us understand the overall market situation better and more deeply," Jiang Jianqing told Reuters. "Those few days, even for us, we were genuinely a bit tense.""We too needed a few days to finally become clear on the risks, and to understand the underlying reasons for the market movements," he said, adding that the marketwide situation was improving.Analysts welcomed the change in the central bank's tone, saying that it could help ease the tumult in China's financial system and address concerns that the liquidity situation could further impact the country's slowing economic growth.The central bank "has fine-tuned its tone to ease the liquidity tightness," China economists at ANZ in Hong Kong wrote in a research note Tuesday. "The market interest rates are likely to decline significantly in the remaining week, which will help stabilize the market and the real economy."Analysts at Citibank noted in a research report that "there has been criticism that P.B.O.C. underestimated the impact of its inaction and artificially created financial risks." The central bank's statement on Tuesday "may reduce the chance of a recurrence of the recent episode."And economists at Société Générale wrote that although it remained difficult to fully understand the intentions of policy makers, "it is quite clear that the stand-off in the money market was a way to contain runaway credit growth and reduce risks in the financial market, especially the so-called shadow banking system. While this task is clearly not complete, it appears that the 'hot phase' of this battle is nearing its end."Markets in much of the rest of the Asia-Pacific region responded favorably to the central bank's comments, as well as positive new data on the U.S. housing market that was released Tuesday.In Hong Kong, the Hang Seng Index closed up 2.4 percent, while the markets in Australia and Taiwan added 1.6 percent.European stock markets also firmed in early trading. By midmorning, the DAX index in Germany had climbed 0.6 percent, the CAC-40 in France had risen 0.3 percent, and in London, the FTSE 100 index had edged up 0.2 percent.
BEIJING — The family of a French billionaire and art collector eased a sore point in history on Friday by returning two bronze animal heads, among Chinese treasures pillaged from a Beijing palace by French and British troops more than a century and a half ago.The sculptures, of a rabbit and a rat, are among 12 animal heads representing the Chinese zodiac that were looted from Beijing's Old Summer Palace in 1860 by Anglo-French troops during the Second Opium War.The mystery of the heads' whereabouts and lengthy efforts by Chinese authorities to retrieve them have built up a mystique around the artifacts."By returning these two marvels to China, my family is loyal to its commitment to preserving national heritage and artistic creation," said Francois-Henri Pinault, chief executive of luxury and retail group Kering, at a ceremony at China's National Museum alongside Tiananmen Square.Pinault's father, Francois Pinault, and Chinese Vice Premier Liu Yandong pulled red silk covers off the small busts to unveil them in front of reporters.The animal heads were part of a fountain at the Old Summer Palace, known as Yuanmingyuan in Chinese. Today the palace grounds are an extensive park, with the rubble of smashed buildings kept intentionally in place as a reminder of how China was ransacked at the hands of Britain, France and other foreign powers.To date, seven of the Chinese animal heads have been found and are now in museums in Beijing."This gesture is an expression of deep friendship with the Chinese people," Chinese Vice Minister of Culture Li Xiaojie said.The Pinault family bought the heads from a private collector who had bought them at auction for 14.9 million euros ($18.3 million dollars) each, the People's Daily newspaper said this week."For my family it is above all a contribution to the promotion of art, and the preservation of an important cultural heritage," Pinault said. "We always have the desire to accompany our enterprises with gestures and actions not necessarily economic or financial, but environmental or in the artistic domain."The brand portfolio of Kering, which until March of this year was known as PPR, includes Gucci, Stella McCartney, Balenciaga and St. Laurent Paris.The Pinault family also controls the famed Chateau Latour vineyard in Bordeaux, the French magazine Le Point and Swiss economic newspaper L'Agefi.While preserving and restoring art are motivations for the Pinault family members, their philanthropy will also likely benefit the company's ventures into the huge Chinese market.In December, Kering made its first acquisition in China - a majority stake in fine jeweller Qeelin - and said more small deals could follow in this country, a critical and growing market for western luxury goods.
BEIJING — China's National Museum on Friday unveiled a pair of Qing dynasty bronzes looted from a Beijing palace more than 150 years ago and returned this year by the family that runs French luxury-goods conglomerate Kering.The recovery of the bronze heads of a rat and rabbit is a major in a victory for China's campaign to erase a legacy of past bullying by foreign powers, but also a masterful stroke of corporate public relations for a firm seeking fat profits from newly wealthy Chinese consumers with a growing taste for luxury."This act represents the affection and respect of the Pinault family for the people of China," Kering Group CEO Francois-Henri Pinault told guests and media at a ceremony at the hulking museum that looks out across Tiananmen Square in the heart of Beijing. "They now return to their old home, Beijing."The bronzes were among 12 animal heads that formed the centerpieces of an elaborate zodiac fountain and were carried off during the sacking of the old Summer Palace in Beijing by French and British troops in 1860 at the close of the Second Opium War. The palace's buildings were burned and left in ruins as a punishment for the Qing emperor's obstinacy, and the bronzes spirited abroad into private hands.China has made a priority of recovering them in recent years amid burgeoning pride in the country's economic achievements and a desire to reconstruct its former cultural and political glory. Five have already been returned to China and one is in Taiwan, but the whereabouts of four others remain unknown.The symbolism of the bronzes derives from their origins in the reign of the Qing emperor Qianlong during the second half of the 17th century, a time when the empire's power, prestige and national territory were at their zenith.Designed by the Italian Jesuit missionary Giuseppe Castiglione, they had been part of a rococco clepsydra, or water clock, placed in the forecourt of a pavilion inspired by Versailles.The sacking of the palace, by contrast, stood as one of the major humiliations in the country's so-called century of shame that ended, according to the ruling Communist Party, only with the success of the revolution in 1949.The fact that they are being returned by a company representing one of the nations that carried out the violation heightens the gesture's importance for Chinese who tend to equate nations with their business and cultural interests, said Joseph Cheng, China politics expert at the City University of Hong Kong."It shows that China is now in a position to win back these treasures," Cheng said.The bronzes had been owned by the French fashion designer Yves Saint Laurent and were put up for auction in 2009 following his death. China strongly protested the sale and the auction was botched after a Chinese businessman refused to honor his winning bid of $40 million.They were later acquired by the Pinault family, whose company owns a stable of luxury brands that includes Gucci and Saint Laurent, as well as the auction house Christies.At the conclusion of Friday's ceremony, red velvet covers were lifted from the football-size bronzes by Chinese Vice Premier Liu Yandong and Kering's founder, Francois Pinault, an avid art collector. The pieces are to go on permanent display at the National Museum, providing a new draw amid the thousands of exhibits seeking to glorify communist rule.Li Xiaojie, director of China's State Administration of Cultural Heritage, thanked the Pinault family for its "act of respect for and protection of China's cultural heritage," and said he hoped it would inspire others to return lost pieces of China's cultural heritage.For Kering, formerly known as PPR, the donation is a smart PR move that shows respect for Chinese consumers who often feel slighted by Western luxury brands that do little to cater to their sensibilities, said Shaun Rein, managing director of China Market Research Group."It shows respect and shows that Kering is a friend of China," Rein said.That also reflects the values of newly rich Chinese, who take it as a point of pride to buy or bid on remnants of China's cultural heritage that have flowed overseas from porcelain vases to rare manuscripts.Macau casino billionaire Stanley Ho blazed a trail for the Pinault family with his own purchase of the horse's head from the Qing bronze zodiac in 2007 for $8.9 million that prevented it from being auctioned off by Sotheby's. Ho donated the piece to the Chinese government and it is displayed in a Beijing museum.China's Cultural Relics Association estimates that more than 10 million cultural relics were taken overseas between 1840 and 1949, with many of them now displayed in museums in Europe and the U.S.It says about 1.5 million pieces alone were taken from the old summer palace, known as the Yuanmingyuan, which are now spread across more than 2,000 museums in 47 countries.The donation "will really resonate with wealthy Chinese who almost see it as a duty to bring back China's cultural heritage," Rein said.Chinese consumers, whose taste for expensive brands has continued to grow through the global recession, will account for about a 20 percent share of luxury sales by 2015 worth around $27 billion, according to business consultants McKinsey & Co. China's major cities now burst with boutiques and show rooms for pricey goods from exclusive automobiles to vintage wines.While Kering needs to exercise good taste in leveraging the bronzes for marketing purposes, it could use them to heighten the sense of exclusivity by offering viewings as a perk for VIP customers, Rein said."But already, the public relations and word of mouth they've gained just by people reading about it has been huge," Rein said.
BEIJING — Violent incidents have spread over the past week in a tense minority region of western China, just days before the fourth anniversary of a bloody clash between minority Uighurs and the ethnic Han majority that left almost 200 people dead and resulted in a major security clampdown.China's communist authorities have labeled some of the incidents — including one that left 35 people dead — as terrorist attacks, and President Xi Jinping has ordered that the situation be promptly dealt with to safeguard overall social stability, state media has reported. A state-run newspaper said Saturday that authorities had beefed up security in the region.The latest violence reportedly took place Friday in southern Xinjiang's Hotan area. In one incident, more than 100 knife-wielding people mounted motorbikes in an attempt to storm the police station for Karakax county, the state-run Global Times reported.In another, an armed mob staged an attack in the township of Hanairike, according to the news portal of the Xinjiang regional government. It did not say what sort of weapons the mob had.The official Xinhua News Agency reported a "violent attack" Friday afternoon on a pedestrian street in downtown Hotan city. No casualties were reported in any of the incidents, which state media said were quickly brought under control. The government's news portal, Tianshan Net, said there were no civilian casualties in Hanairike.An exiled Uighur activist, Dilxat Raxit, spokesman for the Germany-based World Uyghur Congress, disputed those accounts, saying there were several protests in the Hotan area against what Uighurs see as China's suppressive policies in Xinjiang. He said 48 people were arrested."It's a crisis of survival," said Dilxat Raxit, who called for international observers to be sent to the region to help curb what he said was excessive violence against Uighurs by the Chinese government.It has not been possible to independently verify the different accounts of the violence because of tight controls over information in the region.The incidents Friday in Xinjiang came after what the government described as attacks on police and other government buildings Wednesday in eastern Xinjiang. The violence in Turpan prefecture's Lukqun township killed 35 people and was one of the bloodiest incidents since the July 5, 2009, unrest in the region's capital city, Urumqi, killed nearly 200.Xinjiang (shihn-jeeahng) is home to a large population of minority Muslim Uighurs (WEE'-gurs) in a region that borders Central Asia, Afghanistan and Pakistan, and has been the scene of numerous violent acts in recent years.Critics often attribute the violence in Xinjiang to what they say is Beijing's oppressive and discriminatory ethnicity policies. Many Uighurs complain that authorities impose tight restrictions on their religious and cultural life.The Chinese government says that it has invested billions of dollars in modernizing the oil- and gas-rich region and that it treats all ethnic groups equally.Calls to local government agencies were either unanswered or were responded to by people who said they were unauthorized to speak to reporters.State-run media reported that the incident Wednesday started when knife-wielding assailants targeted police stations, a government building and a construction site — all symbols of Han authority in the region.Photos released in state media show scorched police cars and government buildings and victims lying on the ground, presumably dead.Dilxat Raxit also disputed that account, saying the violence started when police forcefully raided homes at night.Xinhua said 11 assailants were shot dead, and that two police officers were among the 24 people they killed."This is a terrorist attack, there's no question about that," Foreign Ministry spokeswoman Hua Chunying said Friday at a regular news briefing. "As to who masterminded it, local people are still investigating."State news reports did not identify the ethnicity of the attackers, nor say what may have caused the conflict in the Turkic-speaking region. The reports said police captured four injured assailants.The Global Times reported Saturday that police had stepped up security measures, deploying more forces to public areas, governmental institutes and police compounds. It said a suspect was captured Friday afternoon in Urumqi.
HONG KONG — Members of a congressional advisory panel believe U.S. regulators should tighten scrutiny of casino companies operating in Macau, the world's top gambling market, because of the risk of money laundering."We need to go deeper into this," said Michael Wessel, a member of the U.S.-China Economic and Security Review Commission, which heard testimony in Washington on Thursday."I'm not sure the companies are looking as deep as they need to in their own organizations and the profits are driving their activities. It's worth some stricter scrutiny."The commission was set up in 2000 to examine national security implications of the trade and economic relationship between China and the U.S. and make recommendations to the U.S. Congress.Nevada-based Las Vegas Sands Corp., Wynn Resorts Ltd. and MGM Resorts International are among six operators that have shared in the casino boom in Macau, the only place in China where gambling is legal. The former Portuguese colony earned $38 billion in gambling revenue last year, about six times more than the Las Vegas Strip.Most of Macau's gambling revenue comes from the tens of millions of mainland Chinese gamblers who visit each year. However, the central government in Beijing imposes strict capital controls that limit the amount of money that can be taken out of mainland China to 20,000 yuan ($3,200) per trip.To get around these controls, wealthy Chinese gamblers use so-called junket agents who arrange for them to travel to Macau, visit private VIP rooms, lend them money for their bets and collect on debts. VIP gamblers account for about two-thirds of Macau's total gambling revenue."The structure of the casino system in Macau effectively allows people to use the casinos to circumvent these capital controls," Commission Chairman William Reinsch said in opening remarks.State and federal regulators want to make sure casino companies "do not get drawn into activities that would be considered illegal or improper in the United States," he said.A.G. Burnett, chairman of the Nevada State Gaming Board, testified that it is "common knowledge that the operation of VIP rooms in Macau casinos had long been dominated by Asian organized crime, commonly referred to as triads."He said the casinos themselves may not be aware of illegal transactions."Criminal transactions are widely alleged to take place just out of the direct purview of the casino," he said.The commission's concerns come as Sands and Wynn face investigations from U.S. authorities over their activities in Macau. The two companies earn most of their profits from the tiny gambling enclave, an hour from Hong Kong by high-speed ferry.Spokespeople for Sands' and Wynn's China units declined to comment. Macau's gambling regulator and a spokesperson for MGM China did not reply to a request for comment.Burnett said that U.S. casino companies have strong compliance programs in Macau to make sure there are "no nefarious activities" in their operations. He said the influence of the junket operators in Macau may be waning and that the casinos may not have rely on them so much in the future to bring in wealthy gamblers.When asked whether Nevada regulators had ever seen any organized crime at U.S. casinos in Macau, including at VIP rooms, or had taken any disciplinary action against a casino for violations there, he said they had not.Burnett said that U.S. casinos had already suffered "to some extent" because they are required to cover the Nevada regulators expenses, including dispatching staff to Macau to meet their counterparts and check operations."Travel to China is not cheap," Burnett said. "We are routinely sending agents there now."
BEIJING — Like a boxer slimming down for a fight, Li Zhongjian is shrinking his 20-year-old business manufacturing cigarette lighters to brace for a credit crunch he sees looming over China's entrepreneurs.Li's workforce in the southeastern city of Wenzhou has shrunk by half to 300 this year and he isn't replacing employees who leave. He said he used to borrow money but is preparing to do without credit that might no longer be available as regulators try to force Chinese banks to cool a lending boom they worry could race out of control."The authorities' shifting policies are not offering stable surroundings for businesspeople to be confident to work," said Li. "I won't try to get loans for my business any more. I'll wait and see how the market and policies are doing. I won't invest, either."A cash shortage that hit China's credit markets this month was the first shock wave from what analysts say could be Beijing's most drastic clampdown on credit in two decades. The central bank has called for tighter lending standards, which should reduce risk but is likely to reduce financing for a private sector that generates China's new jobs and wealth.China will benefit in the long run from a safer financial system, but the short-term cost could be a painful squeeze on entrepreneurs. Some say a recovery that already was faltering could weaken further."It's going to be a bloodbath," said Anne Stevenson-Yang, research director of J Capital Research in Beijing."Rates are shooting up in the private market and regular commercial loans are being pulled back very quickly," she said. "All industrial businesses here run on credit, so as soon as you close that down, they just stop producing and selling stuff."The government has yet to say how extensive the controls will be or what it might do to ensure lending for producers who Chinese leaders have said they want to support.Some branches of two of China's biggest lenders — Bank of China and Industrial and Commercial Bank of China — have temporarily suspended lending to businesses and individuals, the business magazine Caixin reported, citing sources at the banks.The credit clampdown hits amid uncertainty about whether China's lackluster recovery from its deepest downturn since the 2008 global crisis is stalling.Economic growth decelerated to 7.7 percent in the first quarter from 7.9 percent the previous quarter. May retail sales fell short of forecasts and export growth slowed. An HSBC Corp. survey of manufacturers showed June activity fell to a nine-month low and was contracting.Tighter credit controls could cause growth to dip below 7 percent in coming quarters, according to Nomura economist Zhiwei Zhang. That would be China's weakest performance since the early 1990s.Harder times for Chinese entrepreneurs could have global repercussions. China's slowdown already is depressing demand for iron ore, copper and other commodities, crimping the flood of money that drove a boom for Australia, Brazil and other suppliers. Demand for industrial components from Southeast Asia and factory equipment from the United States and Europe could be hurt if credit-starved manufacturers put off purchases.The crackdown is part of a broader effort by communist leaders to shift China to slower, more sustainable growth based on domestic consumption after a decade of explosive expansion driven by exports, investment and cheap credit. The ruling party's growth target this year is 7.5 percent, down by almost half from 2007's staggering 14.2 percent."The episode is arguably the strongest sign yet that the leadership is willing to suffer short-term economic pain if necessary to achieve more sustainable growth," said Capital Economics analyst Mark Williams in a report.A key goal appears to be to force banks to reduce their role in channeling money into unregulated, profitable and risky underground lending that is a pillar of support for entrepreneurs who cannot get formal loans from state banks.Money for informal lending came at first from individuals who wanted a better return on their savings but much of it now comes from state banks. They hid the lending from regulators, who worry they have taken on undisclosed risks in the event of defaults.Even before the credit squeeze, underground borrowers paid interest of up to 70 percent a year — more than 10 times the benchmark rate for formal loans. Estimates of outstanding loans run as high as 4 trillion yuan ($650 billion), or as much as 7 percent of China's total credit.Li, the entrepreneur in Wenzhou, said he borrowed from both state banks and informal lenders to expand his business. He said he paid 6 to 14 percent in annual interest for bank loans and up to 70 percent for underground loans."Is it possible to find any country whose interest rate is higher than China?" he said.Communist leaders allowed informal lending to grow over the past decade to support entrepreneurs. But regulators began to worry after the 2008 global crisis when they found banks were putting their own money into informal lending, taking on unreported higher risks.Money flowed to entrepreneurs to pay for equipment and raw materials but it also flooded into speculation in stocks and real estate. Regulators ordered banks to tighten lending standards but worried credit still was growing too fast.The squeeze on China's credit markets hit after banks that quickly expanded lending this year tried to replenish their resources by borrowing from institutions that had more cash.Analysts say bankers expected the People's Bank of China to inject extra money into that interbank market. But the central bank refused to play lender of last resort, causing a credit shortage. Interest paid by banks for an overnight loan spiked from the normal 2-3 percent to a record 13.4 percent. That ignited fears China might face a credit crisis and caused stock prices to tumble.Some analysts said the central bank is partly to blame because it failed to make clear how tough its stance would be.Its behavior was "extraordinarily reckless," said Williams in his report.On Monday, the central bank blamed commercial lenders and told them to do a better job of forecasting funding needs. The official Xinhua News Agency accused banks of taking on extra risk by diverting money into speculation and unreported lending."It is not that there is no money but that the money is being put in the wrong place," Xinhua said in a commentary.On Tuesday, the central bank eased off, promising "liquidity support" to banks that run short of cash.Still, the central bank told commercial lenders again to cut back on risky practices, which will mean less credit for borrowers outside the circle of politically favored state companies."Small and medium-size business will take the pressure of this credit crunch, that is for sure," said Yin Jianfeng, deputy director of the finance research center at the Chinese Academy of Social Sciences, a government think tank.Many Chinese entrepreneurs have learned to live without credit. That has made them flexible and resilient but reformers say it has held back growth of private industry Beijing needs to encourage if China's growth is to stay strong.Elsewhere in the financial system, regulators also are cracking down on other sources of financing.Rural credit cooperatives have been ordered to review use of promisory notes, which are meant for small transactions but are being used by banks to hide loans, Caixin said this month. It said lending using promisory notes, which don't count against a bank's government-imposed credit limit, quadrupled last year to 1.2 trillion yuan ($200 billion).The government is taking action in part because economic planners see diminishing returns from new investments.Bank lending surged in the first three months of the year even as economic growth decelerated. Analysts said that suggested a big share of lending went to pay off other loans or trading stocks, real estate and other assets instead of industrial investment.Total credit compared to annual economic output has risen by 50 percentage points to 210 percent since the 2008 global crisis, according to UBS economist Tao Wang.The underground lending industry was battered by the slump in global demand in 2010. That caused a wave of business failures and defaults, prompting protests in some areas and making savers wary of lending.Chinese leaders have promised repeatedly to have state banks lend more to the private sector. But most loans still go to state enterprises that have close ties with banks and influential officials. Entrepreneurs say it is no easier to get a loan.The promise of more lending "is only an aspiration," said Yin, the CASS researcher. "If nothing changes in the system, the difficulty of financing the private sector will remain unresolved."AP researchers Fu Ting in Shanghai and Flora Ji in Beijing contributed.
BEIJING — A former Chinese official at the center of a sex tape scandal was convicted of taking more than 3.1 million yuan ($500,000) in bribes and sentenced to 13 years in prison Friday, at a time when China's new generation of leadership has vowed to crack down on widespread graft.Lei Zhengfu, former party chief of a district in the south-central metropolis of Chongqing, did not say whether he would appeal the verdict by the city's No. 1 Intermediate Court, according to state media. His punishment also includes confiscation of personal assets of 300,000 yuan ($48,000).Lei's case has riveted the public since video clips went viral of the portly 55-year-old having sex with a 25-year-old woman hired by property developers, allegedly in an elaborate extortion scheme. As more lurid details emerged, the scandal has exposed the shady intertwining of sex, money and power.The sex extortion scheme has ensnarled at least 20 other party cadres, but Lei appears to have been singled out — partly because he has been especially vulnerable to public derision. Lei's receding hairline, pop eyes, bushy eyebrows and wide jowls provided a caricature for public corruption and moral degradation widely detested by the public.Beijing Institute of Technology law professor Xu Xin said the sentence was more severe than those in earlier corruption cases involving similar amounts of bribes."Maybe because of the case's social impact, the court has chosen to be on the harsh end with its sentence," he said.When blackmailed with the sex video, Lei asked another property developer who had benefited from his patronage to pay hush money of 3 million yuan. Lei argued that the money was a loan, but prosecutors said the money — which was not fully repaid — amounted to a bribe.Prosecutors also said Lei took two other bribes — one of $10,000 and another of 100,000 yuan ($16,000) — in return for favors granted through his government position, but it is Lei's sex scandal and the scheme behind it that have captivated member of the Chinese public, who are disgusted by what they see as the moral degradation of those in power.In a separate case, a district court on Friday afternoon sentenced Xiao Ye, the man convicted of masterminding the extortion scheme, to 10 years in prison.The woman in the sex tape, Zhao Hongxia, was given a two-year sentence that was suspended for two years and could eventually be reduced. The official People's Court Daily said Xiao plans to make an appeal but Zhao does not.
HONG KONG — The Chinese Ministry of National Defense accused the United States on Thursday of hypocrisy over cybersurveillance and said the disclosures made by Edward J. Snowden bolstered the case for China's security efforts on the Internet. These were the harshest public comments so far from the Chinese government about Mr. Snowden's revelations.Until now, the Chinese government's comments on the disclosures have come through the Foreign Ministry, which has used relatively muted words to answer reporters' questions about Mr. Snowden's allegations. Mr. Snowden, a former C.I.A. employee, has described the United States' monitoring of Chinese Internet sites and installations, and Prism, a National Security Agency program to mine Internet information.In recent days, Chinese state-run news media have amplified criticisms of the United States, and the remarks from the Defense Ministry spokesman, Col. Yang Yujun, struck a tougher tone. He did not refer explicitly to the United States, but he left no doubt about his target."The Prism-gate affair is itself just like a prism that reveals the true face and hypocritical conduct regarding Internet security of the country concerned," Colonel Yang said at a monthly news conference in Beijing. The comments from the briefing, which was open only to Chinese reporters, were reported on the Web site of the Defense Ministry."The Prism-gate affair again reminds us that we must attach even more importance to Internet and information security protection, and resolutely protect Internet security and national security," Colonel Yang said.His casting of China as the unblemished victim of Internet intrusions is unlikely to persuade the United States government. Washington has laid out evidence that it says points to heavy involvement of the People's Liberation Army in computer hacking and espionage.But the latest official remarks, together with a surge of commentary in state-run Chinese newspapers and television news, appear aimed at persuading Chinese citizens that their government holds the moral high ground in Internet issues. China heavily censors and monitors the Internet."To, on the one hand, abuse one's advantages in information technology for selfish ends, while on the other hand, making baseless accusations against other countries, shows double standards that will be of no help for peace and security in cyberspace," Colonel Yang said.Before he took flight to Moscow, Mr. Snowden hid in Hong Kong, a Chinese city and former British colony that has legal autonomy from the mainland. He considered seeking long-term sanctuary in Hong Kong, but the Chinese government was relieved when he left, analysts said. China's president, Xi Jinping, met President Obama in California this month, and Mr. Xi has repeatedly said he wants stable relations with the United States.The Chinese Communist Party has wobbled between that goal and its desire to maximize domestic advantage from Mr. Snowden's revelations, said Yang Hengjun, a former Chinese official and researcher who now divides his time among Hong Kong, mainland China and Australia. Mr. Snowden's departure from Hong Kong made it easier for China to speak more strongly on the issue, he said."Xi Jinping and, in step with him, the Foreign Ministry want to preserve the stability of Chinese-American relations," Mr. Yang said in a telephone interview from Sydney. "They don't want this affair to destroy their efforts. But the propaganda has had a countereffect. The pressure from public opinion was to keep Snowden and even have Beijing take him in."
BEIJING — In an effort to reshape rural Tibet, the Chinese government is pursuing a mass relocation project that since 2006 has moved more than two million farmers and other people from centuries-old villages into concrete, roadside settlements that often cut off inhabitants from their traditional sources of income, according to a study released Thursday by Human Rights Watch.Citing official figures, the report said that more than two-thirds of the region's 2.7 million people had been relocated to look-alike townships.The development project, called the New Socialist Countryside by planners in Beijing, is aimed at raising living standards and improving the economy in one of the poorest and most isolated corners of China. The program has provided as many as 2.1 million Tibetans with running water, electricity and access to better health care and schools.But researchers at Human Rights Watch say the program has had a devastating impact on traditional Tibetan society by fracturing families, forcing nomads to give up their livestock and requiring many residents to pay for some of the costs of relocation, leaving them with sizable debts."It's a tectonic shift that is radically altering the way of life for the vast majority of Tibetans who have no say in the design and implementation of these policies," said Nicholas Bequelin, a senior researcher in Hong Kong for Human Rights Watch who helped write the report, which is based on official documents and on interviews with local residents. "Many Tibetans do not know what hit them."Coupled with a crackdown on dissent and "stability maintenance" efforts that include stepped-up surveillance in communities across the Tibetan plateau, the study paints the portrait of a society increasingly shaped and managed by the state. Since its invasion by Chinese troops in 1950, the Tibetan Autonomous Region, as Tibet is officially known, has been transformed by generous investment from Beijing, but also by restrictions on religious life at Buddhist monasteries and educational policies that favor instruction in Mandarin over the Tibetan language in local schools.Many of those policies have intensified since 2008, when deadly ethnic rioting rocked Lhasa, the Tibetan capital. Since then, long-simmering grievances have found expression in a spate of self-immolations, with at least 120 monks, nuns and ordinary Tibetans setting fire to themselves in a protest campaign that has led to even greater restrictions.Beijing has sealed off large areas of the Tibetan plateau to outsiders, barring foreign journalists and limiting access by diplomats, Western tourists and non-Chinese researchers. Earlier this week, Gary F. Locke, the American ambassador to China, began a rare three-day visit to Tibet, the first time an ambassador from the United States had been given permission to visit the region since 2010, according to an embassy spokesman.Robert J. Barnett, the director of the modern Tibetan studies program at Columbia University, said the plan of mass relocations was created a decade ago in response to data suggesting an alarming income gap between rural and urban Tibetans. "Beijing wanted to bring up rural incomes to avoid unrest," he said. "They've been really successful in doing that, but they got the unrest anyway."Such Maoist-style social engineering is not new in China, but researchers say it has an especially detrimental effect on the Tibetan nomads who for centuries ranged across the high-altitude pastures spanning Tibet and parts of four adjoining provinces. According to the state media, over the past decade more than a million herders have been resettled in townships, a relocation effort that officials often describe as voluntary.But Mr. Barnett and other outside experts say the relocations, which are ostensibly designed to protect the ecologically fragile grasslands, are coercive, leaving nomads without the goats and yaks that sustained them. Unable to compete with ethnic Han Chinese migrant workers or educated Tibetans who speak Mandarin, many former herders survive off government subsidies and the odd construction job. Alcoholism is common, he and other experts say. "The cultural cost of disrupting this nomadic life is hard to measure but the price is high," he said.Zha Luo, an ethnic Tibetan and a rural development expert at the state-run Chinese Academy of Social Sciences, rejected the suggestion that government-run relocation programs were hurting Tibetan culture."It's not like they are relocated to Henan or mixed into other communities," he said, referring to a province in central China. "They still keep their calendar, holidays and customs."He added that most Tibetans were eager for the creature comforts of modernity. "I grew up in a herder family," he said. "It is miserable in the winter. When the bitter cold comes, the elderly have no hospital to go to and no medicine."The new housing does not come free. Despite glowing reports in the official media that feature appreciative Tibetans, Mr. Bequelin of Human Rights Watch said that residents were sometimes required to pay up to 75 percent of the cost of new homes that even government inspectors have found deficient. A 2009 report issued by the State Council, China's cabinet, noted that some of the developments lacked "a rational design" or had been built in areas prone to landslides.Still, the researchers found a degree of satisfaction among some Tibetans, especially those who had prospered from the housing boom. But many others worried about how they would survive once construction ended and government stipends ran out."They don't have any other skills than farming, and won't have any herds or land worth speaking of anymore," Tenzin Gyaltso, a villager from Gyama, told researchers. "How is the next generation to survive as Tibetans?"For Mr. Bequelin, the program has become another means for managing a population that has long resisted government control. Arrayed alongside major roads, the settlements make it more cost effective to provide utilities, he said, but also allow closer supervision by the authorities."Since the state couldn't reach the Tibetan countryside," he said, "they decided the Tibetan countryside should be moved to make it more accessible to the state."
BEIJING — A Chinese legislator has been expelled for "serious disciplinary violations" amid a crackdown on corruption ordered by President Xi Jinping, state media reported Sunday.The National People's Congress said it took the action against Zhou Wenbin on Saturday following an investigation, the Xinhua News Agency said. No details were given, although the charge of violating discipline is usually shorthand for bribery, embezzlement, the selling of offices or other forms of corruption.The official Xinhua News Agency reported Sunday that Zhou, 52, had been dismissed from his post as president of Nanchang University in the southern province of Guangxi on June 18.Xi has announced a series of measures to cut down on government waste and corruption since taking over as head of the Communist Party in November.While the party usually tightly controls information about specific cases, especially those involving high-level officials, state media have been unusually open about the case of a former district official in the city of Chongqing who was sentenced to 13 years in prison on Friday for taking more than 3.1 million yuan ($500,000) in bribes.Lei Zhengfu, former party chief of a district in the south-central metropolis of Chongqing, had been at the center of a sex tape scandal since video clips went viral of the portly 55-year-old having sex with a 25-year-old woman hired by property developers, allegedly in an elaborate extortion scheme.
BEIJING — Chinese paramilitary troops began round-the-clock patrols Sunday in the country's northwestern region of Xinjiang following a series of bloody clashes that have killed at least 56 people over the last several months.Police also released new details about a clash Wednesday that authorities said left 35 people dead, including 11 attackers, blaming it on a violent gang of Muslim extremists.The order for the patrols by the People's Armed Police was issued by the ruling Communist Party's top law enforcement official, Meng Jianzhu, at an emergency meeting late Saturday in Xinjiang's regional capital, Urumqi. The action came just days ahead of the July 5 anniversary of a 2009 riot between Xinjiang's native Uighur people and Han Chinese migrants in the city that left nearly 200 people dead.Troops must patrol in all weather conditions, "raise their visibility, maintain a deterrent threat and strengthen the public's sense of security," Meng said, according to a notice posted to the Public Security Ministry's website.Bordering Central Asia, Afghanistan and Pakistan, Xinjiang (shihn-jeeahng) has long been home to a simmering rebellion against Chinese rule among parts of the Uighur (WEE'-gur) population opposed to large-scale Han Chinese migration and angered by strict communist restrictions on Islam and their Turkic language and cultural institutions.However, recent incidents point to a growing level of violence and the apparently growing influence of radical Islam, in spite of a massive security presence spread across the vast region, which is more than twice the size of Texas.In Wednesday's incident, assailants attacked police and government offices in the town of Lukqun in the region's usually quiet east in one of the bloodiest incidents since the 2009 Urumqi rampage. Authorities searching for suspects have sealed off the area. Other independent reports put the death toll as high as 46.According to a police statement posted on the Xinjiang government's official website, the attackers belonged to a 17-member extremist Islamic cell formed in January by a man identified by the Chinese pronunciation of his Uighur name, Aihemaitiniyazi Sidike.The statement said the cell regularly listened to recordings promoting violence and terrorism and since mid-June had been raising funds, buying knives and gasoline, and casing various sites in preparation for an attack.On Tuesday, however, authorities captured one of the members, and fearing they would be discovered before they could act, Sidike ordered the gang to assemble before dawn Wednesday and attack, the statement said. It said their 24 victims included 16 Uighurs, eight Han and two women.Police wounded and captured four gang members and seized the last suspect on Sunday following a search.Following that incident, more than 100 knife-wielding people mounted motorbikes in an attempt to storm the police station Friday in Karakax county in southern Xinjiang's Hotan region, where the population is overwhelmingly Uighur. Elsewhere the same day, an armed mob staged an attack in the township of Hanairike, according to the Xinjiang regional government's news portal. Few details were given about the incidents and there was no official word on deaths, injuries or arrests.However, U.S. government-backed Radio Free Asia said at least two Uighurs were killed in the Karakax violence, which it said began after Friday prayers at a local mosque that had been raided the week before by police because its resident Imam had defied strict rules on sermon topics. The violence later spread to the city of Hotan, where groups of young men set fires along a major downtown road.The recent wave of violence began with a deadly clash on April 24 in western Xinjiang that left 21 people dead, including police officers and local government officials. The government said the violence broke out after neighborhood security inspectors uncovered a bomb-making ring that was planning a major attack in the city of Kashgar.In that and other incidents, the attackers were reportedly inspired by jihadist teachings and literature smuggled into the country or downloaded from the Internet. China has accused Uighur activists based overseas of orchestrating the 2009 violence in Urumqi and plotting other incidents, charges the groups have denied, saying they are merely advocating for Uighur civil and religious rights.One overseas group, the Washington, D.C.-based Uyghur American Association, which uses a different spelling of Uighur, has called for an independent investigation into Wednesday's incident in Lukqun and questioned the government's claim that it was an act of terrorism.While the loss of life was "extremely upsetting," China is worsening tensions by ratcheting up security and treating all Uighurs with hostility, the group's president, Alim Seytoff, said in a statement.State-run newspapers reported Sunday that Xinjiang was calm, and state broadcaster CCTV ran interviews with pro-government Muslim clerics and residents of Urumqi, both Chinese and Uighur, who denounced violence and expressed confidence in the government's ability to maintain security.China has also sought to enlist other countries in the region in the fight against violence in Xinjiang, and on Saturday the national legislature ratified a pair of agreements on anti-terrorism cooperation and joint drills under the Shanghai Cooperation Organization, a Chinese- and Russian-dominated grouping of Central Asian states.
BEIJING — More than a hundred people, riding motorbikes and wielding knives, attacked a police station in China's ethnically divided western region of Xinjiang, state media said on Saturday, in the latest unrest to hit the region in the past week.The attack in the remote desert city of Hotan, a heavily ethnic Uighur area, comes two days after the region's deadliest unrest in four years that resulted in the deaths of 35 people. China called the incident a "terrorist attack".Xinjiang is home to the mainly Muslim Uighur people who speak a Turkic language. Many of them chafe at what they call Chinese government restrictions on their culture, language and religion. China says it grants Uighurs wide-ranging freedoms and accuses extremists of separatism.The animosity between the majority Han Chinese and the Uighurs poses a major challenge for China's Communist Party leaders. President Xi Jinping, who took office in March, has called for the unity of all ethnic groups in China.In the latest incident, the Global Times - owned by Chinese Communist Party mouthpiece, the People's Daily - said "troublemakers" gathered at religious venues before riding on motorcycles to attack a police station in the city's Moyu county.Authorities are counting the number of casualties and searching for suspects, the Global Times said.In a separate incident, some 200 people attempted to "incite trouble" at a major shopping area in Hotan, the newspaper said. It said police defused the situation.Yu Zhengsheng, a member of the Politburo Standing Committee, the party's inner circle, pledged to step up "action to crack down upon terrorist groups and extremist organizations" at a meeting with government officials in the regional capital Urumqi, state news agency Xinhua said.Chinese authorities have increased security in Urumqi, the Global Times said.Photographs on Chinese microblogs showed dozens of military trucks with riot police patrolling the streets.The increased security comes almost a week before the fourth anniversary of the July 2009 riots in Xinjiang that pitted Uighurs against ethnic Chinese, resulting in nearly 200 people being killed.In a sign of the gravity of the situation, Xinjiang's top party chief Zhang Chunxian said: "We should be clearly aware of the complex and acute nature of the long-term struggle against separatism," according to the Xinjiang Daily, the official newspaper of the region."For those who dare to defy the law, the criminals who engage in violent terrorist activities have to be punished. We can't tolerate them, we have to hold no punches," the People's Daily said in a front-page editorial.
A tense and elaborate crime drama ending in a Peckinpah-style shootout. A classic tear-jerker about a woman doing menial labor to support her ungrateful son. A loopy, candy-colored musical. A warmhearted biopic about a national hero.It would take a lot of trips to the multiplex these days to see a collection of traditional Hollywood genre pictures like that, if you could find them among the comic-book and video-game adaptations and post-apocalyptic blockbusters.But there's another way — a one-stop-shopping opportunity for the moviegoer tired of summer's limited choices. Over the next two weeks the New York Asian Film Festival will offer a panoply of human-scaled, real-world films among its 59 features, many of them inventive takes on styles the American film industry has largely given up on.Among the specialty offerings are a selection of recent Filipino films, a salute to Taiwanese exploitation films from the early 1980s and a tribute to the South Korean actor Ryoo Seung-beom.But the primary value of the festival, which takes place at Lincoln Center, the Japan Society and Asia Society, lies in the opportunity to see a generous sampling of current and recent hits from the vital film cultures of countries like China, Japan and South Korea. And the best of this year's programs are a strong group, especially among the Chinese-language selections, where the familiar, heavy-handed mix of sentimentality and nationalism seems in abeyance.One of the best offerings has unlikely roots: "Ip Man: The Final Fight" is the fifth Chinese-language feature released since 2008 based on the life of the martial arts master Ip Man (often spelled Yip Man), whose students included Bruce Lee. The most prominent of those films, directed by Wilson Yip and starring Donnie Yen, have been solidly made but unremarkable for anything besides their fight choreography and anti-Japanese jingoism."Final Fight," a Hong Kong production directed by Herman Yau, is different. Covering Ip Man's autumn years in the 1950s and '60s in that region, where he tries to stay out of the spotlight while teaching wing chun kung fu to an assortment of proletarian types — union steward, prison guard, factory worker — it has a melancholy, jazzy vibe appropriate to the period. Loving re-creations of dim sum parlors and dance halls are as important to the feel of the film as the spectacular fights between rival martial arts schools, and the story moves with the rhythms of an old Hollywood musical.The film's biggest advantage, though, is the casting of the longtime Hong Kong performer Anthony Wong as Ip Man: while he's not the martial arts star that Mr. Yen is, he's a far better and more soulful actor. "Final Fight" spells out familiar themes about corruption (represented, in part, by a venal British police superintendent) and cultural heritage, but it does so relatively lightly. It's more interested in dispensing pleasure than in teaching lessons.Utterly different but equally enjoyable is the China-Hong Kong co-production "Drug War," directed by the action and crime master Johnnie To. Set in and around the northern port city of Tianjin, and largely taking place on brutally ugly expressways and country highways, it's a grim, complex, meticulously designed story about drug dealers and police officers from different jurisdictions who pursue them up and down the country.Like all of Mr. To's films, it's a celebration of motion, as cars weave through crowds, and cops and drug mules engage in a balletic chase across a crowded expressway, all against a bleak backdrop of toll stations and dark roadside encampments. The Chinese star Sun Honglei plays the most heroic of the officers, perilously going undercover as a gangster with a hyenalike laugh.Corruption is again the theme, along with the nobility of the underpaid civil servant, and those ideas are taken to a cartoonish extreme in the final half-hour, a long, bloody sequence of carnage right out of "The Wild Bunch" that ends only when there are, literally, no bullets left. By that point there aren't many cast members left standing, either.The violence is emotional in "Feng Shui" (China), directed by Wang Jing and starring Yan Bingyan in a juicy, self-aggrandizing and self-sacrificing role perfectly suited for the middle-aged Joan Crawford. It's all about bitterness and disappointment, as the shrewish, hypersensitive Baoli ruins her husband's life and then moves on to her son and mother-in-law. Ms. Yan's restrained performance helps blunt the story's melodramatic excesses, as does Mr. Wang's arm's-length, faintly documentary-style direction.A steamier domestic drama plays out in "A Muse," by the South Korean director Jung Ji-woo, about the triangle that develops among a famous poet, his young protégé and the high school girl who installs herself as the poet's housemaid and companion. A variation on the Cyrano de Bergerac story, exploring both artistic and sexual jealousy, it features the successful acting debut of Kim Go-eun, who won a number of best new actress awards for her performance as the girl.
HONG KONG — Violence erupted on Friday in China's volatile far western Xinjiang region, the second time in two days that tensions between the largely Muslim Uighur minority and Chinese security forces have brought bloodshed to the area.The latest clash occurred in Hotan Prefecture, in the southern part of Xinjiang, whose population is predominantly Uighur. The Uighurs are a Turkic-speaking group sharing many affinities with people across Central Asia, and most follow relatively moderate forms of Sunni Islam. Many Uighurs resent the growing number of Han Chinese people, who have been attracted to Xinjiang by jobs in farming, energy production and mining.A brief report issued by Tianshan Net, an official news Web site for Xinjiang, said that in Hanairike Township in Hotan, a crowd wielding weapons "assembled in a disturbance, and the public security authorities took emergency action and detained people taking part, rapidly quelling them."The report said that "during the handling of the incident, no members of the public were killed or injured," leaving it unclear whether any police officers or officials were hurt or even killed.Calls to Hotan government offices and a spokeswoman for the Xinjiang government were not answered.The clash on Friday is likely to alarm the Chinese government. It came just two days after a confrontation in Turpan Prefecture, another part of Xinjiang, left 35 people dead, according to the state-run news agency, Xinhua. In that episode, Xinhua said, a crowd attacked a township police station and government offices on Wednesday, and the police fired on the participants. Xinhua said rioters killed 24 people, and police officers fatally shot 11 rioters."We're seeing now violent instances becoming more frequent, unfortunately," said Alim A. Seytoff, the president of the Uyghur American Association, an exiled group based in Washington that campaigns for an independent Uighur homeland, which advocates call East Turkestan. "You can see from these instances of violence the intensification of Chinese repressive rule in the region."The clashes this week came just before the fourth anniversary of widespread bloodshed in Urumqi, the regional capital of Xinjiang. At least 197 people were killed on July 5, 2009, after the police broke up a protest by Uighurs and the confrontation gave way to attacks by rioters on Han people, who make up China's majority. Han Chinese protesters later marched on Uighur neighborhoods, some attacking homes with bricks and cleavers. The police never said how many died or were injured in those revenge riots.Yang Shu, a Chinese professor who studies unrest in Xinjiang, said the recent violence reflected Uighur grievances about social inequalities and dislocation driven by economic modernization, the spreading influence of militant currents of Islam and the deterioration of ethnic relations since 2009. In July 2011, 18 people died when rioters in Hotan stormed a police station."The July 5 incident is a major factor," Professor Yang, the director of the Institute for Central Asian Studies at Lanzhou University in northwest China, said in a telephone interview. "It was a watershed. Afterward, Uighur-Han relations have clearly deteriorated. We can't avoid this problem."The Xinjiang region's economy grew by 12 percent in 2012, compared to 2011, but many Uighurs complain that better-paying jobs, land and business opportunities are beyond their grasp. Uighurs account for a little under half of Xinjiang's 22 million civilian inhabitants; Han Chinese account for 40 percent, according to government data. The Hotan area has about two million inhabitants, nearly 97 percent of them Uighur, according to census data from 2010.Government restrictions on mosques and Muslim practices have also become a growing source of tension, especially with Uighurs attracted to more conservative forms of Islam. The latest violence occurred less than two weeks before the start of Ramadan, the Muslim holy month. Some local governments in Xinjiang have sought to discourage Uighurs from their usual fasting at that time.Xinjiang shares borders with Central Asian countries as well as Pakistan and a sliver of Afghanistan. It came under the control of Chinese Communist forces in 1949, and swaths are still controlled by quasi-military production organizations, which run huge farms for cotton, tomatoes and other crops.In April, 21 people in Xinjiang died in fighting between security forces and people the government called "gangsters" and said were Uighurs. In March, two courts convicted and sentenced 20 people accused of militant separatism in the region.The Chinese government has often placed blame for past violence in Xinjiang on militant groups seeking independence, especially the East Turkestan Islamic Movement. But advocates of Uighur self-determination say the violence is often a spontaneous local response to mass detentions and other harsh policing methods."These are not like the Chinese government often accuses or just states — terrorists," said Mr. Seytoff, the president of the Uyghur American Association. "The Chinese repressive policies have driven some ordinary Uighurs into the ultimate desperation."
HONG KONG — Rescue teams were searching the waters between Australia and New Zealand on Friday for a schooner carrying seven people after their boat went missing in stormy seas.Three passengers on the boat, the Dyche family from Florida — David A. Dyche, 58; his wife, Rosemary, 60; and their son, David — were on their last sailing trip as a family before David, 17, was to leave for college, according to the Web site of The Australian.The boat, named Nina, left New Zealand for Australia across the Tasman Sea on May 29, and the crew was last heard from on June 4, when one of the people on board, Evi Nemeth, 73, sent a text message to Bob McDavitt, a meteorologist in New Zealand, saying, "Any update 4 Nina? ... Evi." The message followed a call from Ms. Nemeth saying, "The weather's turned nasty, how do we get away from it?"On that day, the Tasman Sea was hit by 65 mile-per-hour winds and swells as high as 26 feet.Rescuers learned on June 14 that the boat was missing and a search began Wednesday, but there have been no signs of the schooner. No distress signal was received by rescue organizations.Mr. Dyche is an experienced sailor, and he and his family had been sailing around the globe for several years, home schooling their son during their travels. In addition to the three family members and Ms. Nemeth, the boat was carrying a 28-year-old man, an 18-year-old woman and a 35-year-old British man. Their identities were not known. Friends said the family, who lived in Panama City, Fla., often picked up others along the way for their sailing adventures.Neville Blakemore of the New Zealand Rescue Coordination Center told The Associated Press that the boat probably sank in the storm, but that rescue teams hoped that the crew had survived in a life raft or had somehow gotten to land. The search was centered off the coast of New Zealand near Three Kings Island.The News Herald of Panama City said that the Dyche family used the 85-year-old schooner in several races, and that they left Panama City five years ago to sail around the world, returning to Florida a few months ago to get a new engine for the boat and visit friends before going to sea again. David Dyche works for a marine transport company.The family maintained a Facebook page updating their sailing adventures. Mr. Dyche's last posting was May 29, and just the day before he posted: "The Tasman Sea is shooting gales out like a machine gun, living up to its reputation. We are shooting at leaving out after the first one this week. No doubt we will be dancing with one or two of them."
HONG KONG — Lei Zhengfu, a Chinese official who became a symbol of corruption, was convicted of taking bribes and sentenced to 13 years in prison on Friday in a scandal that exposed the sordid deal-making in Communist Party politics.The conviction of Mr. Lei was the culmination of a fall that began when video images spread on the Internet in November showing him with an 18-year-old woman. The images, and ensuing accusations of graft and extortion, made him a much-mocked exhibit in the newly appointed Communist Party leadership's efforts to persuade citizens that it was stamping out official graft and depravity, which have stoked deepening public ire.Mr. Lei was sentenced days after President Xi Jinping made a new call to halt bureaucratic corruption and bribe-taking. A court in Chongqing, the municipality in southwest China where Mr. Lei once worked, dismissed his argument that a payoff of $488,000, or 3 million renminbi, he had arranged through an associate was a legitimate loan, not hush money to keep secret the video showing him with the young woman.The court said the money amounted to a bribe."The sums involved were massive, and the effects were malign," said the verdict read to Mr. Lei in the courtroom, according to Xinhua, China's state-run news agency. "This should be sternly punished according to the law."China's leaders have vowed to get rid of corrupt officials, however low or high. Before his dismissal in November, Mr. Lei was the party secretary of Beibei, a district of Chongqing. Critics said the spectacle of his trial did not make up for Mr. Xi's failure thus far to take down senior officials, despite widespread speculation about corruption investigations in the government and the military involving powerful figures and large amounts of money."Lei Zhengfu was not a high-level official," Zhu Ruifeng, the muckraking blogger who first publicized the lurid images of Mr. Lei, said in a telephone interview from Beijing. "I don't see much hope of the party and government really taking on corruption."Each generation of leaders vows to do that, but the results are plain to see. We don't hold much hope."The verdict drew avid interest from the Chinese news media and on Web sites. On Friday, another court in Chongqing convicted Xiao Ye, the businessman who had orchestrated the "honey trap" and threatened to expose video from 2008 that showed Mr. Lei, now 55, and the young woman having sex. Mr. Xiao was sentenced to 10 years in prison on extortion charges, and the woman, Zhao Hongxia, received a sentence of two years.On the Internet in China, some voiced wry sympathy for Mr. Lei. "Lei Zhengfu was given a sentence of 13 years. He was in bed for 12 seconds, which makes one year for each second, with a year to spare," said one of many similar jests on Sina.com's Weibo, China's most popular equivalent of Twitter.After his sentence was announced, Mr. Lei did not say whether he would appeal, said Xinhua. China's party-run courts rarely decide in favor of defendants, especially in politically charged cases like this one, and appeals courts overturn guilty verdicts even less.Mr. Xi, who is the party chief, has started a "rectification" drive intended to clean up official ranks. During a recent meeting that lasted four days, he and other leaders denounced "hedonism, extravagance" and other bureaucratic sins, and took turns chastising themselves and others, state news media reported."Strictly manage your own families and personal staff," Mr. Xi said. "Don't abuse power for selfish gain, don't seek special privileges."Mr. Lei was among the first of a succession of party officials whose misdeeds were exposed on the Internet, leading to their downfalls, after Mr. Xi became the party leader in November. The hunger for exposing wayward officials has encouraged an underground trade of extortionists who concoct pictures of lurid encounters. But Mr. Zhu, the blogger, said the party authorities in recent months have tightened restrictions on using the Internet to publicize accusations of corruption."At the time of the leadership handover, when we exposed Lei Zhengfu, the censorship was not so tough, but now it is again," Mr. Zhu said. "Our working environment is worsening."
BEIJING — The deadliest unrest in years in China's western region of Xinjiang was carried out by a gang engaged in "religious extremist activities", state media reported, saying the group had been busy buying weapons and raising money.Beijing initially called last week's incident in which 35 people were killed a "terrorist attack".Xinjiang is home to the mainly Muslim Uighur people who speak a Turkic language. Many deeply resent what they call Chinese government restrictions on their culture, language and religion. Beijing accuses extremists of separatism.The animosity between the majority Han Chinese and the Uighurs poses a major challenge for China's Communist Party leaders. President Xi Jinping, who took office in March, has called for the unity of all ethnic groups in China.According to reports on the government website of Xinjiang and the state news agency Xinhua, last week's attacks occurred after police arrested a member of the gang.The next day the same gang went on a rampage in the remote township of Lukqun, about 200 km (120 miles) southeast of Xinjiang's capital of Urumqi.The group attacked a police station, shops and a construction site. Twenty-four civilians, both Uighur and Han Chinese, and police were killed, along with 11 gang members."Since February, Ahmatniyaz Siddiq and others were engaged in religious extremist activities, listening to violent terrorist recordings," said the reports."They formed a violent terrorist group of 17 members, and since mid-June were raising money, and buying knives, gasoline and other tools for crime."Last week's killings marked the deadliest unrest since July 2009, when nearly 200 people were killed in riots pitting Uighurs against ethnic Chinese in the region's capital Urumqi."Terrorist organizations should be aware that the Chinese nation and its people are determined to safeguard the country's territorial integrity and national unity against all enemies," Xinhua said in a separate commentary on Sunday."Any attempt to sabotage will eventually fail."Two days after the deadly attack, more than a hundred people, riding motorbikes and wielding knives, attacked a police station in Xinjiang, state media reported.
For nearly a decade, thousands of peasants from this rural speck in southern China's Guangxi Autonomous Region borrowed heavily before boarding flights for Ghana, Africa's second-largest gold producer, with glinting ambitions and no backup plan.The Chinese found their gold, though trouble soon found them, in the form of crooked police officers and armed bandits who prowled the mining camps. Then, this month, the Ghanaian authorities declared the mines illegal and arrested more than 200 Chinese miners, accusing them of polluting the land and abusing local workers. Countless others fled as local residents armed with guns and machetes attacked the camps, robbing miners of their possessions and killing some who fought back.After the crackdown, images of violent deaths and vandalized mining camps blazed across Chinese social media, fueling national anger and soul searching. But here in Shanglin, a mountainous county of 470,000 in one of China's poorest regions, it is despair over financial ruin that is most pronounced."My son might be killed in Ghana, but if he comes back he's dead anyway," said Shen Aiquan, 65, whose family borrowed 3 million renminbi, or $489,000, to build a mining operation, though from whom exactly she did not know. All she could do was wait for her son, and the debt collectors who would surely follow.The crisis in Ghana has revealed the perils of a high-stakes economic gamble, in which countless people have taken part in overseas investment projects endorsed by the Chinese government but have been left to fend for themselves when things go wrong.Some of the problems facing residents here stem from the informal lending practices common among the rural poor. Lacking the hard assets banks usually require, many people leverage "guanxi" — the social collateral binding business and personal relationships in China — to secure loans from relatives and friends.Based on trust and often little else, guanxi financing has devastated the villages and townships of Shanglin, whose residents are now bound not just by blood and sweat but by bankruptcy as well.And the trust is sometimes misplaced. Early this month, a Chinese man in Ghana disappeared with millions of dollars that miners had given him to wire home. Ms. Shen's son was one of the victims. Another was one of her neighbors, Yang Baofa, 52, who returned from Ghana two weeks ago with barely enough money to travel to his village. "We trusted him because he was Chinese," he said of the missing man.On the day Mr. Yang arrived, several of the men who had accompanied him back to China were stuck in the southern city of Guangzhou working construction jobs to earn the $40 needed to buy a long-distance bus ticket home.The miners who have been trickling back to Shanglin since the violence began insist that they broke no Ghanaian laws. Taking a break from playing basketball across from his concrete house, Wu Jian, 34, a former mine owner, said he had made sure to get all the necessary paperwork in Ghana, including land deeds and a mining license. "The local people said as long as we had money we could do anything we want," he said.Last month, he fled, leaving behind an operation that he said was worth about $326,000. The money, he said glumly, was borrowed from friends, relatives and loan sharks."I went there because that's what everyone else did," he said. Despite his debts, he had no regrets about leaving Ghana. "Coming back wasn't the right decision; it was the only option."Shanglin's connection to the African gold mining project is widespread. "Everyone has a relative or friend in Ghana," said Lan Xiongwen, 45, as he slurped some fish stew at a restaurant in the county seat.When relatives took his son to the Ghanaian mines two years ago, Mr. Lan's family invested $489,000 in excavating machines, paid for by plundering savings and getting bank loans. Su Zhenyu , secretary general of the Chinese Mining Association in Ghana, said 24 tons of gold are transported to China from Chinese-run mines in Ghana each year, but many residents had heard greatly inflated export figures. Mr. Lan said they figured it would be only a matter of time before they realized their dream: after paying off the loans, they would build a house and buy a car.
HONG KONG — China's Communist Party leadership has started a security crackdown in the far western region, Xinjiang, vowing to apply "high pressure" methods after two outbursts of violence there in recent days pitted members of the Uighur ethnic minority against police forces, state television reported Saturday.China's president, Xi Jinping, and other members of the Politburo Standing Committee — the seven-member inner circle of power — met Friday to discuss the violence in Xinjiang, the television report said. They demanded a tough response to what the Chinese government calls separatist terrorism, and they used words that underscored their jitters about Xinjiang, days ahead of the anniversary of deadly ethnic violence four years ago.The party leaders acknowledged entrenched problems in Xinjiang, according to the report. But their immediate emphasis was on tighter security.Despite rapid economic growth in Xinjiang, the leaders said, "ethnic separatist forces at home and abroad continue to intensify their activities, and deep-seated problems harming social stability in Xinjiang remain fundamentally unsolved," according to the report, citing a summary given by Yu Zhengsheng, the central leader in charge of dealing with ethnic minorities. "Recently, there has been a succession of cases of violent terror attacks planned and carried out by a small number of criminals."Members of the Uighur minority in Xinjiang complain that their Muslim beliefs, Turkic culture and economic prospects are threatened by intrusive Chinese controls and an inflow of workers from China's Han majority. And proponents of Uighur self-determination and many human rights advocates say that China's accusations of orchestrated terrorism are greatly exaggerated and ignore the local roots of Uighur discontent, especially poor job prospects and harsh policing.Mr. Yu flew to Xinjiang, and called together regional officials to demand tougher policing and security checks, the report said. "We must maintain a high-pressure attack against violent terrorist crimes," Mr. Yu told the officials on Saturday. "Form a powerful deterrent."The Chinese government's worries about Xinjiang deepened after a riot by Uighurs on Wednesday in Turpan Prefecture left 35 people dead, according to state news media. Rioters killed 24 people, and police officers fatally shot 11 rioters, the reports said.On Friday, another violent confrontation broke out in Hotan Prefecture, in southern Xinjiang. Reports about that clash were sparse; a bulletin from the region's news agency said no members of the public were killed or injured. The English-language edition of Global Times, a Chinese newspaper, said more than 100 people wielding knives attacked a police station. The reports could not be verified; calls to local government offices went unanswered.Most Uighurs adhere to relatively moderate forms of Sunni Islam, although some have embraced stricter forms. They account for a little under half of Xinjiang's 22 million civilian residents, and Han Chinese for 40 percent, according to government data.The ripples of unrest in Xinjiang have come days before the fourth anniversary of widespread bloodshed in Urumqi, the regional capital of Xinjiang, on July 5, 2009. In that case, the police broke up a protest by Uighurs, and then Uighur rioters attacked Han Chinese residents on streets and buses. At least 197 people were killed. Han Chinese protesters later used cleavers and rocks to attack Uighur neighborhoods.The 2009 bloodshed also led to sweeping arrests of Uighur men, and deeply scarred ethnic relations in Xinjiang. Mr. Yu, the party leader, suggested that pervasive security could prevent a repeat. Human rights groups have said heavy-handed security measures merely serve to further alienate many Uighurs."As soon as any criminal acts of fighting, smashing, looting or arson occur, they must be sternly punished according to the law," Mr. Yu told the officials in Xinjiang. "Overall protection and control of society must be comprehensively strengthened."
HONG KONG — Tens of thousands braved typhoon rains in Hong Kong on Monday to demand China live up to its promise to allow fully democratic elections there in 2017 amid mounting fears of increased meddling by Beijing's Communist Party leaders.The former British colony returned to Chinese rule on July 1, 1997, with the promise of universal suffrage as an "ultimate aim" in its mini-constitution, making it potentially the first place on Chinese soil to enjoy fully democratic elections.Protesters marched and chanted, undeterred by the lashing rain as the march began, some carrying British colonial Hong Kong flags and pro-democracy banners along with umbrellas.Organizers of the protest said 430,000 people turned up, while police gave an estimate of 66,000.Younger activists have become increasingly politicized. Surveys show they identify themselves more as Hong Kong citizens than Chinese nationals - a trend that alarms Beijing, which is eager for the city to show more "patriotism" to the motherland.Despite China's pledge to allow a direct poll for the city's leader in 2017, recent signs from senior Chinese officials have raised concern Beijing may somehow try to rig the rules to screen out opposition candidates from taking part."I'm very pessimistic about universal suffrage in 2017," said Brian Tam, a 21-year-old student waving a Union Jack."The Chinese government says they will select candidates, which is not really the true definition of universal suffrage".Qiao Xiaoyang, the chairman of the law committee of China's parliament, said in March that any candidates for the 2017 election must love Hong Kong and that those who confronted Beijing would not be acceptable, in remarks seen to be targeting the city's opposition pro-democracy politicians.Even before thousands massed in a downtown park for Monday's rally, there were unusual signs of tension elsewhere.Executives of the popular Apple Daily, known for its anti-China, pro-democracy stance, said tens of thousands of copies of two editions of the newspaper had been torched in recent days by masked men targeting distribution points.The home of the paper's owner, Jimmy Lai, was rammed by a car. The assailants left a machete, an axe and a threatening message in the driveway. Lai's group has offered a HK$1 million ($128,000) reward for tracking down those responsible.Activist lawmaker Leung Kwok-hung said he was threatened by an anonymous phone caller on Saturday who told him to avoid the march or "face the consequences", but he still joined the protest, shouting: "Universal suffrage now."The march is held every year, but this year's event is being seen as a forerunner to a wider campaign of choreographed civil disobedience over the next year.The Occupy Central movement is demanding firm government proposals towards 2017 and is planning to shut down Hong Kong's financial district with a mass rally on July 1 next year - threats sparking alarm in Beijing."We can see for sure that people are committed," said Benny Tai, one of the organizers of Occupy Central.The march, which also saw thousands rally for a medley of other social causes including poverty alleviation and press freedom, took place with pro-Beijing leader Leung Chun-ying battling slumping popularity ratings and a series of scandals involving his cabinet.A poll on Friday showed nearly half of Hong Kong residents had no confidence his performance would improve in the coming year.Leung said Hong Kong would begin consultations on deciding the exact scope of the 2017 elections "at an appropriate time"."Working to implement universal suffrage in the 2017 chief executive election is key to the current government," he said.The director of Beijing's Liaison office in Hong Kong, Zhang Xiaoming, said Hong Kong needed to be "harmonious and rational" but said the protests were a sign that Hong Kong still enjoyed "full freedoms and rights".
BEIJING — Mothers and fathers aren't the only ones urging adult children to visit their parents. China's lawbooks are now issuing the same imperative.New wording in the law requiring people to visit or keep in touch with their elderly parents or risk being sued and facing penalties came into force Monday, as China faces increasing difficulty in caring for its aging population.It remains to be seen how much the amended law changes the status quo, however. Elderly parents in China already have been suing their adult children for emotional support, and the new wording does not specify how often people must visit or clarify penalties for those who do not.In the first ruling since the new wording, a court in the eastern Chinese city of Wuxi ordered a couple to visit the woman's mother or face possible fines — and even detention.One of the drafters, Xiao Jinming, a law professor at Shandong University, said the new law was primarily aimed at raising awareness."It is mainly to stress the right of elderly people to ask for emotional support. ... We want to emphasize there is such a need," he said.Cleaning lady Wang Yi, 57, who lives alone in Shanghai, said the new law is "better than nothing." Her two sons work several hundred kilometers (miles) away in southern Guangdong province and she sees them only at an annual family reunion."It is too little, for sure. I think twice a year would be good," she said. "We Chinese people raise children to take care of us when we are old."Later Monday, the court in Wuxi ruled that a woman and her husband must visit her 77-year-old mother — who lives 40 kilometers (25 miles) away — at least once every two months in addition to mandatory holiday visits, or face possible fines and detention, according to the state-run People's Court Daily.China's legislature amended the law in December following frequent reports of elderly parents neglected by their children. It says offspring of parents older than 60 should see that their daily, financial and spiritual needs are met.Although respect for the elderly is deeply engrained in Chinese society, three decades of market reforms have accelerated the breakup of China's traditional extended family, and there are few affordable alternatives, such as retirement homes.Xiao said even before the Law of Protection of Rights and Interests of the Aged was amended, there were several cases of elderly parents suing their children for emotional support. Court officials generally settle such cases by working out an arrangement for sons or daughters to agree to visit more frequently. Typically, no money is involved.The number of people aged 60 and above in China is expected to jump from the current 185 million to 487 million, or 35 percent of the population, by 2053, according to figures from the China National Committee On Aging. The expanding ratio is due both an increase in life expectancy — from 41 to 73 over five decades — and by family planning policies that limit most urban families to a single child.Rapid aging poses serious threats to the country's social and economic stability, as the burden of supporting the growing number of elderly passes to a proportionately shrinking working population and the social safety net remains weak.Zhang Ye, a 36-year-old university lecturer from eastern Jiangsu Province, said the amended law was "unreasonable" and put too much pressure on people who migrate away from home in search of work or independence."For young people who are abroad or work really far away from their parents, it is just too hard and too expensive to visit their parents," she said. "I often go to visit my parents and call them ... (but) if a young person doesn't want to, I doubt such a law will work."AP researchers Flora Ji in Beijing and Fu Ting in Shanghai contributed to this report.
HONG KONG — The police in the volatile far-western Chinese region of Xinjiang on Sunday said a deadly confrontation with members of the Uighur ethnic minority days before was set off by religious extremists who attacked the police after one of their group was arrested, the state media reported.China's Communist Party leadership has demanded an unyielding security response in Xinjiang after two violent clashes with Uighurs, on Wednesday and Friday. Those episodes have kindled fears of a repeat of the events of July 5, 2009, when protests in Xinjiang's regional capital, Urumqi, grew into street attacks that left at least 197 residents dead, many of them Han Chinese, by far the country's biggest ethnic group.Over the weekend, the government mounted an intimidating display of force in Urumqi, where convoys of People's Armed Police patrolled the streets. And the report that the police had swiftly identified all the suspects involved in the violence on Wednesday also appeared to be part of that show of strength.Advocates of Uighur self-determination and international human rights groups, however, say China's heavy-handed security policies in Xinjiang are exacerbating tensions with Uighurs, a Turkic-speaking people, nearly all of whom adhere to Islam. Many of those critics are also likely be skeptical of the government's account of the bloodshed that broke out in Lukqun, a town in Turpan Prefecture, which left a total of 35 people dead.According to that account, published by China's state-run Xinhua news agency, the attack was mounted by a group of religious extremists who in February formed a "violent terrorist gang." The report did not identify their religion, although their Uighur names left scant doubt that they were Muslims.Fifteen members of the group attacked the Lukqun town police station, government offices and shops after the police arrested one of the members, Xinhua said. Their attack left 24 people dead, 16 of them Uighur."They burned and destroyed vehicles, and wielded knives, madly slashing and killing police and innocent members of the public," the Xinhua report said. The police shot dead 11 of the rioters, and four were wounded and captured, said the report. On Sunday, the police caught the last gang member who was on the run, it said.Human rights groups have said that China uses sweeping accusations of terrorism and religious extremism to describe outbursts of Uighur discontent, and ignores the role of its own harsh policies in creating discontent. Dilxat Raxit, a spokesman for the World Uyghur Congress, a group of exiled Uighurs who advocate for the region's independence, has said that the bloodshed was stoked by indiscriminate detentions of Uighurs in the area. (Uyghur is an alternative spelling of Uighur.)On Friday, a violent confrontation also broke out in Hotan Prefecture, in southern Xinjiang. Reports about that clash have been sparse; a bulletin from the region's news agency said no members of the public were killed or injured.
- As leader of the most populous country on earth, Xi took up his post as president in 2013 in the second planned, orderly transition since the Communist revolution in 1949. As the chosen heir to his predecessor, Hu Jintao, Xi assumed the title of Communist Party chief - where real power lies - in November 2012.- In contrast to the stiff and formal Hu, Xi has crafted a more relaxed, sometimes bluff political style. He has complained of officials' speeches and writings being clogged with party jargon and demanded more plain speaking.- Xi is the son of reformist former vice premier and parliament vice-chairman Xi Zhongxun, making him a "princeling" - one of the privileged sons and daughters of China's incumbent, retired or late leaders. He grew up among the party elite and then watched his father purged from power before the 1966-76 Cultural Revolution, when Xi himself spent years in the poverty-stricken countryside before going to university. He studied chemical engineering at Tsinghua University in Beijing, an elite school where Hu also studied. Xi later gained a degree in Marxist theory from Tsinghua and a doctorate in law.- Xi shot to fame in the early 1980s as party boss of a rural county in Hebei province, which surrounds Beijing. He had rare access to then national party chief Hu Yaobang in the leadership compound, Zhongnanhai, west of the Forbidden City. A native of the remote, inland province of Shaanxi, home of the terracotta warriors, Xi was promoted to governor of the southeastern province of Fujian in August 1999 after a string of provincial officials were caught up in a graft dragnet. In March 2007, the tall and portly Xi secured the top job in China's commercial capital, Shanghai, when his predecessor, Chen Liangyu, was caught up in another huge corruption case. Seven months later, Xi was promoted to the party's Standing Committee - the ruling inner-circle.- Married to famous singer Peng Liyuan, Xi has waged a campaign against corruption and excess since assuming office, responding to widespread public anger that party members are both above the law and wasteful. He has warned the party's very existence is under threat from pervasive graft.
BEIJING — Drugs worth more than 2.5 billion yuan ($400 million) have been seized in a two-month multinational operation targeting crime along the Mekong River, China's drug enforcement chief said Tuesday.From late April to late June, authorities from China, Laos, Myanmar and Thailand shared intelligence and hunted for drug lords and fugitives, resulting in the detention of 2,534 suspects and the seizure of almost 10 tons of drugs and more than $3.6 million in drug-related assets, according to Liu Yuejin, director general of the Narcotics Control Bureau of the Ministry of Public Security.The four countries began joint security patrols along the Mekong River in late 2011 after the grisly murders of 13 Chinese sailors on a section of the river that flows through the Golden Triangle region, notorious for drug production and trafficking as well as extortion gangs. In March of this year, China executed the accused ringleader, Myanmar citizen Naw Kham, and three accomplices who were found guilty of the murders.Liu told a news conference also attended by representatives from Laos, Myanmar and Thailand that following the trial and execution of Naw Kham, they had seen a "dramatic decline" in the activities of drug rings and criminals operating in the Mekong region and Golden Triangle. Their success has been seen in tighter supplies and higher prices for drugs in China and Thailand, he said."This shows that the demand for drugs has far exceeded the supply of drugs. This is because criminal rings and individuals during that time were afraid of carrying out high-profile activities," he said.Liu said 60 to 70 percent of the drugs in China come from the Golden Triangle, where methamphetamine production is surging even as that of opium and heroin has been suppressed through enforcement efforts.Liu said that in the future, the four countries would work toward poppy eradication in the Golden Triangle, northern Laos and northern Myanmar and promote the growing of substitution crops.
SHANGHAI — Text message solicitations began arriving on the mobile phones of many of China's wealthy last month, promising access to lucrative wealth management products with yields far above the government's benchmark savings rate.One message read: "China Merchants Bank will issue a high interest financing product starting from June 28th to 30th. The product will be 90 days with a 5.5% interest rate. Please call us now."A day later came another. "Warm reminder: The interest rate of yesterday's product has been raised to 6%. (Product duration is 90 days). There is limited access to this product. First come first served."The offers are not coming from fly-by-night operators but some of China's biggest banks. They are raising huge pools of cash to finance a relatively new and highly profitable sideline business: lending outside the scrutiny of bank regulators.The complex way they go about making off-the-balance-sheet loans is at the heart of China's $6 trillion shadow banking industry, which the government is now trying to tame. Efforts to rein in the dodgy lending practices rattled stock markets worldwide in late June.China's regulators — and a fair number of economists, policy makers and investors — worry that legitimate banks are using lightly regulated wealth management products to repackage old loans and prop up risky companies and projects that might not otherwise be able to borrow money.Analysts warn that shadow banking is helping drive the rapid growth of credit in a weakening economy, which could lead to — in the worst situation — a series of bank failures. "This is the biggest uncertainty I've seen in my 18 years following the China market," Dong Tao, an economist at Credit Suisse, said of shadow banking. "You don't know how banks are deploying capital. And you don't know the credit risks."What banks are doing, analysts say, is pressing customers to shift money from the old, regulated part of their operations — savings deposits — into the new, less regulated part consisting of high-yielding wealth management products that can circumvent government interest rate controls and be used to finance high-interest loans to desperate customers.China's leaders are so worried about credit risk that last month the country's central bank tightened credit in the interbank market, where banks typically go to borrow money from other banks.The move sent short-term interest rates soaring, and for a day at least, created a debilitating credit squeeze.The stock markets in China calmed down last week. But financial institutions are hinting that cash is still hard to come by. Some banks temporarily suspended lending in order to preserve cash, according to Caixin, the Chinese business magazine.Other banks are raising cash by offering a new slate of wealth management products. Nearly every major Chinese bank sold a short-term wealth management product that had to be completed by the end of June, according to a telephone survey. China Merchants Bank did not respond to requests for an interview.Many of the investments pay 6 percent annual interest, which is far above the highest savings deposit rate set by bank regulators: 3.3 percent.Consumers withdraw money from their regular savings account and put it into a wealth management product that promises a much higher rate. "Usually banks will have higher-yielding products at the end of each quarter," said Wang Yanan, a 24-year-old accountant who works in Shanghai. "If I happen to have money at those moments, I'll buy some."Though the products are popular, their disclosure is often poor. Bank employees insist the principal is guaranteed, but contracts for wealth management products are usually vague, simply noting there could be risk. Most offer little detail about where the money will be invested.Much of the money, analysts say, is lent to property developers and local government financing vehicles, areas that have government officials worried because of an explosion in property development and soaring housing prices. Regulated banks will not make the loans because the borrowers are too risky.
Robert A. Iger will remain chief executive of the Walt Disney Company until July 2016, an extension of 15 months beyond his previously announced retirement date, the entertainment conglomerate said on Monday.Under the terms of Mr. Iger's contract, signed in 2011, he was to step down as chief executive in March 2015 and remain as executive chairman until the middle of the following year. But Disney's board, which was eager to retain a leader with a highly successful track record for as long as possible, last week asked him to stay on as both chief executive and chairman until June 30, 2016.Mr. Iger's compensation will not change. In 2012 he received $37.1 million, according to figures compiled for The New York Times by Equilar, an executive compensation data firm."Now Disney will continue to have the full benefit of Mr. Iger's leadership," Orin C. Smith, the independent lead director of Disney's board, said in a statement. Mr. Smith cited Mr. Iger's ability to "consistently deliver against a strategy of producing high-quality branded content, technology innovation and international expansion."Big media companies, notably News Corporation and Viacom, have a spotty track record when it comes to succession-planning, and Mr. Iger himself took over Disney in 2005 after a period of turbulence following a bitter dispute between Michael Eisner and Roy E. Disney.But keeping Mr. Iger in place does not signal that Disney needs more time to groom a successor. Disney has a deep bench of chief executive candidates, including James A. Rasulo, chief financial officer; Thomas O. Staggs, chairman of Disney's theme park division; and Anne Sweeney, co-chairwoman of Disney Media Networks.Rather, retaining Mr. Iger's services reflects an if-it's-not-broken-don't-fix-it strategy. Disney has suffered the occasional setback — a movie flop, for instance, like "John Carter" last year — and has continued to struggle in video games, but over all the company has been soaring. Its shares closed Monday at $63.93, a 32 percent increase compared with one year ago.Disney reported profit of $5.68 billion last year, an 18 percent increase from a year earlier, on $42.28 billion in revenue.By remaining at Disney's helm, Mr. Iger will be able to see to fruition the high-stakes opening of Shanghai Disneyland, a sprawling resort on a par with Walt Disney World in Orlando, Fla. The Shanghai entertainment and vacation complex, Disney's first major outpost in China, is expected to open in late 2015.Disney is still working to integrate its latest acquisition, Lucasfilm, and restart the Star Wars franchise. ABC, now owned by Disney, also is under pressure to introduce a hit this fall.Mr. Iger, 62, started his entertainment career at ABC in 1974 and took over as chief executive of Disney in 2005. He will be 65 upon his departure; Disney's mandatory retirement age for board members is 74.Since chief executives typically leave their corner offices reluctantly, attention has focused on what Mr. Iger has planned for his long-term future. There has been speculation that he has political ambitions. He has steadfastly declined to comment on his life beyond Disney.
SHANGHAI — The British pharmaceutical giant GlaxoSmithKline said on Monday that the authorities here were investigating whether senior managers working for the company in China were involved in "economic crimes."A spokesman in London said that GlaxoSmithKline was unaware of the nature of the investigation but that the company's executives were cooperating.Two weeks ago, the company fired the head of its research and development staff in Shanghai for misrepresenting data in a scientific paper he helped to write.Also two weeks ago, The Wall Street Journal reported that a whistle-blower had sent information to GlaxoSmithKline's board claiming that for years the sales staff in China had engaged in the "widespread bribery of doctors to prescribe drugs."The company said on Monday that it had thoroughly investigated the accusations made by the whistle-blower and concluded this year that there was no evidence of bribery or corruption.Glaxo has said in regulatory filings that the Justice Department and the Securities and Exchange Commission contacted it as early as 2010 about possible violations of the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act in its overseas operations, including China. The company referred to the contacts as "discussions," rather than an investigation, and said on Monday that they were continuing.The troubles at the company, also known as GSK, are the latest example of a growing number of multinational corporations coping with bribery and corruption accusations in China, where offering cash bribes and kickbacks is widespread. Several American companies have been prosecuted in recent years in the United States under the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act, which forbids bribing foreign government officials.The Chinese police made their announcement over the weekend. The public security bureau in the city of Changsha, in central China's Hunan province, posted a brief statement online announcing an investigation into senior managers at GSK China for economic crimes."It is still unclear what is the precise nature of their investigation," Simon Steel, a company spokesman, said on Monday. "We will cooperate."Over the weekend, the Chinese police also detained GlaxoSmithKline managers in Shanghai, Beijing and Changsha, according to Monday's edition of The South China Morning Post, which is published in Hong Kong.Glaxo is one of the world's biggest drug companies. It has both manufacturing and research and development facilities in China, with about 5,000 employees.Although China accounts for a small share of the company's global revenue, it is one of the fastest-growing markets. In 2012, the company's revenue in China rose 17 percent, to nearly $1.2 billion, from 2011, according to the company's annual report.
HONG KONG — Activity in China's manufacturing sector continued to slow in June, two surveys showed Monday, underscoring concerns that the Chinese economy is likely to keep losing steam in the coming months.The Chinese statistics bureau released an index that showed factory activity had barely expanded in June, a month that was overshadowed by a credit crunch in the banking system.The official purchasing managers' index came in at 50.1 points — just above the 50-point mark that separates expansion from contraction, and markedly below the May reading of 50.8.A separate P.M.I. survey published by the British bank HSBC produced a reading of 48.3, likewise showing a marked decline from May, when it was 49.2. The June figure was the lowest in nine months, and represented a slight downward revision from a preliminary reading released on June 20.Together, the surveys showed that a gradual slowdown that began to materialize earlier this year is continuing as the Chinese authorities — eager to wean the economy off excessive credit growth — refrain from adding stimulus.Policy makers have made it clear in recent months that they are prepared to tolerate slower growth as they seek to shift the economy away from the headlong expansion of the past few decades and toward higher-quality and more sustainable growth.A cash crunch in the commercial banking sector last month further underscored this, as Beijing took a tough stance on lending in a bid to foster more prudent banking activity.The central bank last month allowed bank-to-bank lending rates to spike to record highs, sending a stern message to the banking industry that it needs to step up risk controls and improve cash management.Although analysts said the move could be positive in the long term if it helps to instill more lending discipline, the crunch led to a big sell-off in the stock market as investors fretted about the impact that more restrictive lending could have on the already cooling economy.Lending rates have retreated somewhat over the past week, and continued to do so on Monday. The benchmark Shanghai composite index of stocks, which fell 14 percent in June, has calmed over the past few days and rose 0.8 percent on Monday.Still, the manufacturing surveys reinforced concerns that growth in China remains fragile and that this, in turn, will weigh on other emerging Asian economies.Purchasing managers' indexes for several other Asian countries, also released by HSBC on Monday, underscored this point: The readings for Indonesia and South Korea fell in June, while the India and Taiwan indexes edged higher but remained lackluster.The recent cash crunch in China's interbank market is likely to slow expansion of off-balance sheet lending, further exacerbating funding conditions for small and medium-size enterprises, Qu Hongbin, the chief China economist at HSBC, wrote in a commentary accompanying the release of the purchasing managers' index."As Beijing refrains from using stimulus, the ongoing growth slowdown is likely to continue in the coming months," he added.
BEIJING — The Miami Heat's Dwyane Wade visited China on Wednesday for the first time since signing a multi-million dollar contract with Chinese sportswear company Li Ning last year, but the sneakers that bear his name are in short supply.Chinese stores are slowly being re-stocked with the "Way of Wade" shoes, but they won't be widely available on U.S. markets for some time.With hundreds of fans cheering at a promotional event in Beijing, the six foot-four inch tall Wade chest-thumped the diminutive Chinese host on stage and towered over Olympic gymnast Li Ning, the founder of the company that bears his name."Li Ning is what I believe in, it's my style," the NBA superstar said, wearing a T-shirt emblazoned with his face and the signature gold and black Wade sneakers.But Li Ning has left customers on both sides of the Pacific wanting for the Wade shoes, unable even to profit from the Heat being crowned NBA champions last month. Wade's teammate LeBron James's Nike sneakers recorded the highest U.S. sales of any NBA player last year, drawing $300 million.It's not known how many pairs of Wade sneakers have been made and sold so far but it's only in the region of a few thousand. Most basketball fans scouring stores and the Internet for the shoes outside China are coming up empty-handed.In China, some stores have been given stocks since the beginning of the month.Li Ning, backed by Singapore sovereign fund GIC and U.S. private equity firm TPG Capital, lured Wade from rival Nike last year in a sponsorship deal worth an estimated $100 million over 10 years.The company is cagey about its strategy and divulged no details of manufacturing capacity or projected sales for the Wade sneakers."Making revenue with this was a secondary consideration for us," executive vice chairman Jin-Goon Kim told reporters."We're trying very hard to increase capacity," he said, citing the limited number of factories that can manufacture Wade's shoes."One of the things that really made it more difficult to scale up is Wade is so meticulous. These shoes are really complicated," said Kim.The company, which is refocusing efforts on China after posting a $318.8 million loss last year, is struggling even on its home turf, with few resources to spare for other markets.But it may be getting its act together. Besides the start of the re-stocking, the NBA superstar will visit Shanghai and Guangdong to promote the shoes.However, overseas markets, including the United States, will come only later."We have to first serve our Chinese consumers because there is so much demand here that we cannot fulfill," said Kim.Franklin Yao, managing partner of Shanghai-based strategy consulting firm SmithStreetSolutions, said the sneakers were aimed at the Chinese market since there was no distribution in the United States and the shoes were only available in specialty websites or on e-bay."They are obviously missing out on potential sales in the U.S., given the buzz that the shoes have generated, but building out U.S. distribution may not be as quick as the opportunity to sign Dwyane Wade was," Yao said."The U.S. market itself is just not a focus for Li Ning right now - China is," said James Roy, senior analyst at Shanghai-based China Market Research."They don't have any stores in the U.S. and their e-commerce presence has been shut down. This is almost completely about the Chinese market," Roy said.
TAIPEI, Taiwan — A celebrated Taiwanese film director apologized for letting an award-winning Chinese photographer use false papers to visit a Taiwanese naval base while scouting sights for a new feature film.Niu Chen-zer apologized for his "negligence" in not paying attention to government regulations barring mainland Chinese from entering sensitive military establishments, according to a statement by Atom Cinema, the producer of Niu's "Military Paradise" which is scheduled to begin shooting next month."I might have gone overboard in order to make a better film," Niu said on his Facebook page.The photographer, Cao Yu, visited the Tsoying Naval Base with a local film crew on June 1, carrying the identity card of a Taiwanese man, according to the Apple Daily newspaper.Niu did not provide details Wednesday on how Cao gained access to the base.Taiwan and China split amid civil war in 1949. While relations have improved dramatically under the China-friendly government of Taiwanese President Ma Ying-jeou, China still threatens the use of force against the democratic island, and the Taiwanese military remains committed to maintaining strong defenses against a possible Chinese attack.Cao twice won photography awards from Taiwan's Golden Horse movie festival, underscoring the close cinematic ties between Taiwan and the mainland.Taiwan's military originally agreed to assist in the filming of "Military Paradise," which tells the story of a group of Taiwanese soldiers stationed in the offshore island of Quemoy during the protracted 1958 Chinese bombing campaign against that isolated target. The film stars Taiwan heartthrob Ethan Juan.But that appears to be changing.On Wednesday military spokesman Yan Chen-kuo told Taiwanese TV stations the navy would back off from its earlier promise to provide sailors to assist in the filming of "Military Paradise."
BEIJING — China has launched an investigation into alleged price fixing by some foreign makers of infant formula, including Danone and Nestle SA, the country's top economic planning agency confirmed Wednesday.The state-run People's Daily reported Tuesday that companies also including U.S.-based Abbott Laboratories and Mead Johnson Nutrition Co., as well as Dutch-based FrieslandCampina, are under investigation for allegedly violating anti-monopoly laws by charging high prices and limiting competition.A spokesman for the National Development and Reform Commission, the investigating body, confirmed the report and said the probe was continuing. He refused to give his name, as is common with Chinese officials.Chinese demand for foreign milk formula has risen in the wake of scandals that have left many parents wary about domestically produced infant formula. In 2004, fake Chinese milk powder caused malnutrition deaths in at least a dozen babies. That was followed by a melamine-tainted milk scandal in 2008 that killed at least six babies and sickened nearly 300,000 others.Nestle spokeswoman Melanie Kohli said that the company's Wyeth Nutrition unit has been actively cooperating with the commission's review of the industry, but that it wasn't appropriate for the company to comment on the details of the review at this time.Katherine Huang, Shanghai-based spokeswoman for FrieslandCampina, said the company was cooperating with Chinese authorities "to comply with pricing policies and regulations."Mead Johnson said in a statement that it is committed to providing high-quality, safe products to its consumers, and that it is fully cooperating with the review.Abbott spokeswoman Kelly Morrison said that the company is aware of the inquiry and is cooperating with the commission.In May, Chinese Premier Li Keqiang told a meeting of Cabinet officials that the quality of infant formula should be tested with the same standards used for medicines and that each step of the production process must be monitored.
BEIJING — They are exemplars from folklore who are familiar to Chinese schoolchildren. There is the Confucian disciple who subsisted on wild grass while traveling with sacks of rice to give to his parents. There is the man who worshiped wooden effigies of his parents.But Chinese officials apparently think it is not enough these days to count on tales and parental admonitions to teach children the importance of filial piety, arguably the most treasured of traditional virtues in Chinese society.The government enacted a law on Monday aimed at compelling adult children to visit their aging parents. The law, called "Protection of the Rights and Interests of Elderly People," has nine clauses that lay out the duties of children and their obligation to tend to the "spiritual needs of the elderly."Children should go home "often" to visit their parents, the law said, and occasionally send them greetings. Companies and work units should give employees enough time off so they can make parental visits.The law was passed in December by the standing committee of the National People's Congress. It does not stipulate any punishments for people who neglect their parents. Nevertheless, that officials felt the need to make filial duty a legal matter is a reflection of the monumental changes taking place throughout Chinese society.Many aging parents in China, as in other industrialized nations, complain these days about not seeing their children enough. And the children say the stresses of daily life, especially in the rapidly expanding cities, prevent them from carving out time for their parents."China's economy is flourishing, and lots of young people have moved away to the cities and away from their aging parents in villages," Dang Janwu, vice director of the China Research Center on Aging, said in a telephone interview on Tuesday. "This is one of the consequences of China's urbanization. The social welfare system can answer to material needs of the elders, but when it comes to the spiritual needs, a law like this becomes very necessary."Mr. Dang said the law had already been successful in prompting significant discussion of the issue.Others have been more skeptical. On Monday, Guo Cheng, a novelist, told the 1.3-million followers of his microblog: "Kinship is part of human nature; it is ridiculous to make it into a law. It is like requiring couples who have gotten married to have a harmonious sex life."Nevertheless, the issue of abandoned aging parents is a real one across China. In 2011, Xinhua, the state news agency, ran an article that said nearly half of the 185 million people age 60 and older live apart from their children. People residing in a different city from their parents, including legions of migrant workers, usually find time to go home only during the Lunar New Year holiday.On the same day the new law went into effect, a court in the eastern city of Wuxi ruled that a young couple had to visit the wife's 77-year-old mother — who had sued her daughter and son-in-law for neglect — at least once every two months to tend to her "spiritual needs," as well as pay her compensation, Chinese news organizations reported."Mental support is an important aspect in the protection of old people's rights and interests," said the head of the court, Yuan Ting, according to Xinhua.The classic text that has been used for six centuries to teach the importance of respecting and pampering one's parents has been "The 24 Paragons of Filial Piety," a collection of folk tales written by Guo Jujing. Last August, the Chinese government issued a new version, supposedly updated for modern times, so today's youth would find it relevant. The new text told children to buy health insurance for their parents and to teach them how to use the Internet.Guangzhou Daily, an official newspaper, ran an article in October about a 26-year-old man who pushed his disabled mother for 93 days in a wheelchair to a popular tropical tourist destination in Yunnan Province. The article called it "by far the best example of filial piety" in years.
BEIJING — They are exemplars from folklore who are familiar to Chinese schoolchildren. There is the Confucian disciple who subsisted on wild grass while traveling with sacks of rice to give to his parents. There is the man who worshiped wooden effigies of his parents.But Chinese officials apparently think it is not enough these days to count on tales and parental admonitions to teach children the importance of filial piety, arguably the most treasured of traditional virtues in Chinese society.The government enacted a law on Monday aimed at compelling adult children to visit their aging parents. The law, called "Protection of the Rights and Interests of Elderly People," has nine clauses that lay out the duties of children and their obligation to tend to the "spiritual needs of the elderly."Children should go home "often" to visit their parents, the law said, and occasionally send them greetings. Companies and work units should give employees enough time off so they can make parental visits.The law was passed in December by the standing committee of the National People's Congress. It does not stipulate any punishments for people who neglect their parents. Nevertheless, that officials felt the need to make filial duty a legal matter is a reflection of the monumental changes taking place throughout Chinese society.Many aging parents in China, as in other industrialized nations, complain these days about not seeing their children enough. And the children say the stresses of daily life, especially in the rapidly expanding cities, prevent them from carving out time for their parents."China's economy is flourishing, and lots of young people have moved away to the cities and away from their aging parents in villages," Dang Janwu, vice director of the China Research Center on Aging, said in a telephone interview on Tuesday. "This is one of the consequences of China's urbanization. The social welfare system can answer to material needs of the elders, but when it comes to the spiritual needs, a law like this becomes very necessary."Mr. Dang said the law had already been successful in prompting significant discussion of the issue.Others have been more skeptical. On Monday, Guo Cheng, a novelist, told the 1.3-million followers of his microblog: "Kinship is part of human nature; it is ridiculous to make it into a law. It is like requiring couples who have gotten married to have a harmonious sex life."Nevertheless, the issue of abandoned aging parents is a real one across China. In 2011, Xinhua, the state news agency, ran an article that said nearly half of the 185 million people age 60 and older live apart from their children. People residing in a different city from their parents, including legions of migrant workers, usually find time to go home only during the Lunar New Year holiday.On the same day the new law went into effect, a court in the eastern city of Wuxi ruled that a young couple had to visit the wife's 77-year-old mother — who had sued her daughter and son-in-law for neglect — at least once every two months to tend to her "spiritual needs," as well as pay her compensation, Chinese news organizations reported."Mental support is an important aspect in the protection of old people's rights and interests," said the head of the court, Yuan Ting, according to Xinhua.The classic text that has been used for six centuries to teach the importance of respecting and pampering one's parents has been "The 24 Paragons of Filial Piety," a collection of folk tales written by Guo Jujing. Last August, the Chinese government issued a new version, supposedly updated for modern times, so today's youth would find it relevant. The new text told children to buy health insurance for their parents and to teach them how to use the Internet.Guangzhou Daily, an official newspaper, ran an article in October about a 26-year-old man who pushed his disabled mother for 93 days in a wheelchair to a popular tropical tourist destination in Yunnan Province. The article called it "by far the best example of filial piety" in years.
HONG KONG — A Hong Kong jury found the lover of the late billionaire tycoon Nina Wang guilty on Thursday of forging a will naming him the sole beneficiary of her estimated $4 billion estate.After more than 20 hours of deliberations, the jury voted 6 to 2 in the High Court to convict Peter Chan, formerly known as Tony Chan, on a charge of forgery. Chan had pleaded not guilty to a number of charges, including forgery and using a forged document.The proceedings had transfixed Hong Kong with revelations of adultery and bizarre rituals associated with "feng shui", a Chinese philosophy meaning "wind-water", aimed at creating harmonious surroundings and harnessing natural energies.Wang, known as "Little Sweetie", was one of Asia's wealthiest women, with a business empire including the Chinachem Group, Hong Kong's largest private property developer. She died of cancer in 2007, aged 69.The verdict is the latest setback for the married Chan, who in March was ordered to pay HK$340 million ($43.8 million) in tax arrears, and has been hit by the lengthy and costly legal battle for Wang's estate that he lost in 2011.Chan changed his name from Tony after that ruling and converted to Christianity this year.After Thursday's verdict, Chan appeared flushed and lowered his head in the witness box, but showed no outward emotion."Without the lawsuits, I would not have gone to church and would not have experienced God," Chan told the South China Morning Post in an earlier interview. "I have no regrets."In 2011, the High Court upheld a previous judgment that a 2006 will leaving Wang's entire $4 billion estate, one of Asia's largest fortunes, to her former lover and feng shui master was a forgery. Instead, it upheld an earlier will bequeathing her fortune to a charitable foundation.The jury had earlier been asked by Justice Andrew Macrae to put aside personal feelings in making their judgment, the South China Morning Post reported, amid extensive media coverage.The judge is expected to issue a sentence on Friday morning.
BEIJING — A Chinese grandmother died while shielding her 15-month-old granddaughter from being crushed by a landslide that toppled their house around them, state media reported Thursday.State broadcaster CCTV played footage of rescuers in southwestern China's Sichuan province retrieving the child from the rubble of her home after being trapped for seven hours.Rescuers described how the child's grandmother, Pan Guofen, apparently used her body to protect the child against a large concrete slab, forming an arch by kneeling on all fours, her hands clenched into fists.The child was safely ensconced under the arch but her grandmother's head was crushed by a brick and did not survive, the reports said.Torrential rain has triggered floods and landslides in Sichuan and other parts of China in recent days.
TAIPEI, Taiwan — A celebrated Taiwanese director could face criminal charges over a ruse that let an award-winning Chinese cinematographer use false papers to visit a Taiwanese naval base to scout sights for a new feature film.Niu Chen-zer has apologized for his "negligence" in not paying attention to the law barring mainland Chinese from entering sensitive military establishments.In August, Niu is set to begin shooting "Military Paradise," which tells the story of a group of Taiwanese soldiers stationed in the offshore island of Quemoy during the protracted 1958 Chinese bombing campaign against that isolated target."I might have gone overboard in order to make a better film," Niu said on his Facebook page.On Thursday, the Defense Ministry said Niu risked endangering military security by violating the law against "unauthorized entry into military establishments," and affirmed it will hand over the case to prosecutors to consider bringing charges.The ministry said it expected prosecutors to charge cinematographer Cao Yu as well. Violating the law carries a maximum five years in jail.A Defense Ministry statement said it regretted the director had misused the military's good intentions to support the movie industry.Atom Cinema, which is to produce "Military Paradise," refused to comment on the fate of the feature film if Niu is charged. China's Huayi Brothers is a main financier of the $8.3 million movie.Cao visited the Tsoying Naval Base with a local film crew on June 1, carrying the identity card of a Taiwanese man, according to the Apple Daily newspaper.Niu did not provide details on how Cao gained access to the base. The ministry said it had rejected a request for Cao to visit in May but he did so subsequently using false papers.Taiwan and China split amid civil war in 1949. While relations have improved dramatically under the China-friendly government of Taiwanese President Ma Ying-jeou, China still threatens the use of force against the democratic island, and the Taiwanese military remains committed to maintaining strong defenses against a possible Chinese attack.Cao twice won photography awards from Taiwan's Golden Horse movie festival, where Chinese success has underscored the close cinematic ties between Taiwan and the mainland.It's unclear if he was to be the main cinematographer for "Military Paradise," which stars Taiwanese actor Ethan Juan."Military Paradise" was to be filmed on the base, and the military had agreed to assist the filmmakers, but spokesman Yan Chen-kuo told Taiwanese media the navy would back off its promise to provide sailors to assist in the filming.
TOKYO — Prime Minister Shinzo Abe's Liberal Democratic Party (LDP) and its junior coalition partner appear on track to win a majority in a July 21 election for parliament's upper house, cementing the Japanese leader's grip on power and ending a parliamentary deadlock that has foiled policy implementation since 2007.Abe, 58, returned to office for a rare second term after the LDP won a December election for the more powerful lower house.Attention will be focused on whether the LDP can win a majority on its own in the 242-seat upper house chamber, where half the seats are being contested. The LDP and parties in favor of revising the pacifist constitution are also looking to win the two-thirds majority necessary to submit revisions to a national referendum.The LDP holds 50 of the seats that are not up for re-election and needs to win 72 out of the 121 seats being contested to obtain a majority. The LDP and other pro-constitutional revision parties need to win 99 seats out of 121 being contested to obtain a two-thirds majority of 162.Here are key facts about Japan's political parties:The LDP returned to power after a three-year hiatus. Until the 2009 election, the party, which has nurtured close ties with business and the bureaucracy, had been in power alone or in coalitions almost non-stop since it was founded in 1955.Support for Abe and the LDP has remained high on hopes for his "Abenomics" prescription to end decades of economic stagnation with a combination of hyper-easy monetary policy, fiscal spending and "Third Arrow" structural reforms, including deregulation. However, doubts simmer about whether the LDP will really follow through with bold reform steps.While public opinion favors phasing out nuclear energy after the 2011 Fukushima disaster, the LDP has adopted a pro-nuclear energy policy, promising in its platform to make efforts to win local support to restart reactors taken offline after the world's worst atomic disaster since Chernobyl.The hawkish Abe wants to revise Japan's U.S.-drafted, post-war pacifist constitution, part of a conservative agenda that aims to restore traditional values and revive national pride.Initially seen as a hardliner in a row with China over disputed isles, Abe has stressed his door is open for dialogue.Abe ended his first 2006-07 term as premier by quitting abruptly after a year marred by cabinet scandals, public outrage over lost pension records, a huge upper house election defeat and ill health.The party, founded by members of the Soka Gakkai Buddhist sect, was a junior partner in LDP-led governments for 10 years until the ruling camp's rout in a 2009 lower house election. It returned to power with the LDP in December and the two parties hold a two-thirds majority in the lower house.Some in the LDP would like eventually to end the alliance, given policy differences, but cutting ties would not be easy as the two parties have cooperated closely in election districts, with the LDP relying on the Komeito's solid vote machine to provide support for many of its own candidates.The New Komeito focuses on economic policies for the less well-off and is more moderate on security issues than the LDP, being cautious about revising the pacifist constitution.Formed in a merger of several opposition parties, the DPJ swept to power in 2009 to end more than half a century of almost unbroken LDP rule. But disillusioned voters shunned the party in the December poll, in which it won less than a fifth of the seats in 2009, when it promised to pay more heed to consumers than companies and pry control of policies from bureaucrats.The Democrats' support slumped over what voters saw as broken promises, a confused response to the 2011 tsunami and nuclear crisis and its embrace of unpopular causes such as a sales tax hike and the restart of nuclear reactors. The party split over the planned tax rise in 2012, with defectors led by former party leader Ichiro Ozawa setting up a new party, the People's Life Party.The Democrats are now fighting for their political life. Some experts wonder whether the party can survive another big election loss, while others say it has a chance to regain support if "Abenomics" fails to cure Japan's economic ills.In contrast to Abe's stress on hyper-easy monetary policy, the Democrats want to boost disposable income to increase domestic demand and beef up social security to ease anxiety about the future that depresses spending. The DPJ also targets giving up atomic energy by the 2030s.Populist Osaka Mayor Toru Hashimoto, 44, launched the right-leaning party last September to woo voters fed up with the two main parties. His core policies include shrinking the role of the central government, more market competition and cuts in corporate and income taxes.The party then merged with a few conservative lawmakers led by nationalist former Tokyo Governor Shintaro Ishihara, 80, in a bid to build an influential "third force".The party has been seen as a possible ally for Abe's push to revise the constitution but its fortunes faltered after Hashimoto's comments appearing to try to justify Japan's wartime military brothels, where many Asian women were forced to work.A centre-right party founded by former LDP lawmaker Yoshimi Watanabe, the party favors small government and free market-oriented economic policies including deregulation.It also agrees with the LDP on the need to lower hurdles to revising the constitution, but does not place top priority on the contentious changes.The party wants to freeze a planned rise in the 5 percent sales tax from 2014 and aims to exit nuclear power in the 2020s.Other parties running candidates include the Japan Communist Party, the People's Life Party, the Green Wind Party and the Social Democratic Party. All want to give up nuclear power and oppose the sales tax rise and Japan's entry into talks on the U.S.-led Trans-Pacific Partnership free trade pact.
BEIJING — Courts in the western Chinese city of Xi'an sentenced 12 people Friday to up to 10 years in prison for attacks on Japanese-brand vehicles and a driver during a wave of anti-Japanese violence in September.The attacks came amid public anger over the Japanese government's purchase of a tiny uninhabited East China Sea island group north of Taiwan that China claims as its territory. Angry demonstrations broke out in a number of Chinese cities, although those in Xi'an were by far the most violent, with Japanese department stores and restaurants in the downtown area smashed, looted and burned.In the most serious case, Cai Yang was sentenced to 10 years and fined $42,000 for bashing the driver of a Toyota Corolla on the head repeatedly with a bicycle lock when he attempted to prevent Cai from smashing the vehicle. The driver was hospitalized with severe injuries and his vehicle badly damaged, while Cai went into hiding.Others were sentenced by three separate district courts to less than two years for scuffling with riot police and smashing Japanese-brand cars, almost all of which were made in China by Chinese working for government-owned joint venture enterprises.Ten months after the violence, China-Japan relations remain in a deep freeze and tensions over the islands are high. Although no clashes have been reported, Chinese and Japanese patrol vessels regularly confront each other in waters surrounding the archipelago, known as Diaoyu in China and Senkaku in Japan.
HONG KONG — A Hong Kong judge on Friday jailed a former lover of late billionaire tycoon Nina Wang for 12 years for forging a will naming him the sole heir to one of Asia's largest fortunes, estimated at $4 billion.Justice Andrew Macrae delivered the sentence on Peter Chan, formerly known as Tony Chan, in the city's High Court a day after a jury found him guilty on charges of forgery and using a forged document. Chan had pleaded not guilty to the charges.Sentencing Chan to 12 years on each charge, to be served concurrently, Macrae highlighted the "shameless and unparalleled greed" at the heart of a "well-executed and planned" crime, that saw Chan exploit his relationship with Wang to obtain large amounts of her money in her final years."Never once ... have you shown the slightest remorse for your conduct," the judge said. "You took full advantage of her sadness, loneliness and tragic life."As the sentence was handed down, Chan, dressed in dark suit and white shirt and flanked by three guards in the dock, stared solemnly at his wife in the public gallery, and nodded slowly.His wife had sobbed throughout the hearing, covering her mouth with a small handkerchief.The judge also ordered Chan to pay more than HK$2 million ($257,900) for legal costs the prosecution incurred in a preliminary inquiry the latter had requested.Chan's lawyer and wife made no immediate reply to queries whether he would appeal against the judgment.The proceedings had transfixed Hong Kong with revelations of adultery and bizarre rituals associated with "feng shui", a Chinese philosophy meaning "wind-water", aimed at creating harmonious surroundings and harnessing natural energies.The 53-year-old father of three also described in court how he had enjoyed a passionate sexual relationship with the billionaire heiress, who was more than 20 years his senior.Judge Macrae said Chan was tarnishing Wang's good name and reputation by making himself her sole beneficiary and diverting the money from her charitable foundation to himself.Chan managed to get 30 million sterling from Wang when she was sick and fragile in the last two days of her life, the judge said, calling his behavior "shameless" and "wicked"."This shows that no matter how long we take, the Hong Kong judicial system will ensure that any culprit will be subject to the great hand of justice," Ho Pak-ling, an official of the Commercial Crime Bureau, told reporters outside the court.Known as "Little Sweetie" after a favorite Japanese manga cartoon character, Wang was one of Asia's wealthiest women, with a business empire including the Chinachem Group, Hong Kong's largest private property developer. She died of cancer in 2007, aged 69.The petite Wang, known for her braided pig-tails, mini-skirts and beloved pet dogs that she took to boardroom meetings, inherited most of her wealth from her husband, Teddy, who was kidnapped in 1990 and never seen alive again, despite the payment of a $33-million ransom.The sentence is the latest setback for Chan, who was ordered in March to pay HK$340 million ($43.8 million) in tax arrears, and has been hit by the long, costly legal battle for Wang's estate that he lost in 2011.Chan, a former bartender and feng shui master, who once lived in a cramped public housing flat, changed his name from Tony after that ruling and converted to Christianity this year.In 2011, the High Court upheld a previous judgment that a 2006 will leaving Wang's entire estate to Chan was a forgery, and upheld an earlier will bequeathing her fortune to a charitable foundation run by her family.
HONG KONG — The Swiss food company Nestlé and its French rival, Danone, say they are cutting their prices of infant formula in China after Beijing began an investigation into possible price-fixing and anticompetitive behavior in the sale of milk powder.Wyeth Nutrition, which Nestlé bought last year, said this week that it had been cooperating with the investigation by the National Development and Reform Commission of China and was responding by cutting prices and improving sales and marketing practices.Danone, which has also acknowledged that its Dumex unit was cooperating with the Chinese commission, said in an e-mail statement that it was preparing a price cut proposal with details to be disclosed later.Both companies, along with Mead Johnson Nutrition and Abbott Laboratories, said earlier this week that they were being investigated by the Chinese commission.In a statement, Wyeth Nutrition said it "decided to implement a price reduction" of products from July 8 through 2014. "The average reduction will be at 11 percent, with the biggest single product price reduction at 20 percent."The company said it would not raise prices on any new products over the next year. Wyeth did not give any further details.Analysts said the investigation could result in fines and tougher rules governing imports into an infant milk market expected to grow to $25 billion by 2017. The firms could face fines ranging from 1 percent to 10 percent of their annual sales, the state-run Xinhua news agency quoted experts as saying.Some analysts see the inquiry as possibly part of a broader Chinese plan to increase consumption of local infant-milk products. Mothers turned away from Chinese milk powder in 2008 when infant formula tainted with the industrial compound melamine killed at least six babies and made thousands sick with kidney stones.China has since made efforts to crack down on persistent food safety problems that have included chemical-laced pork and infant milk contaminated with cancer-causing agents.Some Chinese producers of infant formulas have started forming partnerships with foreign companies to try to increase brand recognition and gain technical expertise.Foreign brands may also soon have to rely on their Chinese partners if they want greater access to the Chinese market. The Chinese government has expressed an interest in bringing the supply chain under the control of Chinese firms as part of its goal of reducing the number of local infant formula producers to 10 from more than 200 within two years.
BEIJING — Residents and water plants along a river in southern China that is used as a drinking source have been warned not to use the river's water after authorities detected excessive amounts of two dangerous chemicals.Tests by authorities detected the chemicals thallium and cadmium in a section of the Hejiang River in Guangdong province after dead fish turned up in the water, the official Xinhua News Agency said Saturday.The Fengkai county government warned downstream water plants and residents against using the water or eating anything from the river, Xinhua said. Cadmium is considered an environmental hazard, and thallium is extremely toxic. No illnesses have been reported.Xinhua said the pollutants were believed to have come from upstream, and later reports said excessive amounts of the chemicals were detected in the upstream Guangxi region. The reports didn't say how the pollutants got into the stream.Hejiang is a major tributary of the Xijiang River, which serves as the primary water source for Macau and the city of Zhuhai.Water pollution is a serious problem in China due to unscrupulous industrial waste disposal.
CHABCHA COUNTY, China — The streets of Chabcha county in western Qinghai province were quiet on Saturday as Tibetan monks marked the Dalai Lama's birthday in their homes, wary that any public celebration could endanger a tentative softening by Chinese authorities.Tibetans in China have always had to steer clear of public ceremonies revering their 78-year-old exiled spiritual leader who Beijing has denounced as a "wolf in monk's robes".But in the run-up to this year's anniversary, authorities in Qinghai had discussed proposals to ease restrictions including allowing Tibetans to openly display photographs of the Dalai Lama, the International Campaign for Tibet said.On Saturday, however, there was no sign of any celebration with many ordinary Tibetans not even aware it was his birthday.At the Kumbum monastery close to Qinghai's capital, Xining, monks prayed in a room next to another that was built as a shrine to the Dalai Lama, whose photograph was displayed."We'll celebrate his birthday at our homes privately but we'll never do it in the open," said Khedroob, 40, a monk at the Kumbum monastery."But we don't have to wait for a special day to celebrate, we celebrate him everyday."Khedroob said he had received a text message on his mobile phone that authorities in Qinghai have discussed allowing Tibetans to display images of the Dalai Lama, but added he didn't know whether to believe it.Officials had also discussed the possibility of ending the practice of forcing Tibetans to denounce the Dalai Lama and to reduce the police presence at monasteries, the International Campaign for Tibet said last week.The report triggered speculation that the authorities are contemplating looser religious restrictions in the Tibetan regions of China.The speculation has been fueled in part by an essay written by a scholar from the Central Party School, who said that China could take some steps toward resuming talks with the Dalai Lama's representatives, which broke down in 2010. That essay has given hope to observers looking for signs of change from Chinese President Xi Jinping, who took office in March.China's State Administration of Religious Affairs denied that the government is changing its policy towards the Dalai Lama. In a faxed reply to Reuters, the agency said the Dalai Lama has to give up his stance on independence for Tibet.Beijing considers the Dalai Lama, who fled China in 1959 after an abortive uprising against Chinese rule, a violent separatist. The Dalai Lama, who is based in India, says he is merely seeking greater autonomy for his Himalayan homeland.Still, the timing of these possible policy shifts suggests that the Chinese Communist Party hopes to defuse tensions that have mounted since 2008, after riots that broke out in the Tibet Autonomous Region and the Tibetan parts of China led to a government crackdown.If China was to allow grassroots worship of the Dalai Lama in Qinghai and neighboring Sichuan, it would mark a reversion to the norm before 2008, according to Robbie Barnett, director of modern Tibet studies at Columbia University.It is unclear whether these adjustments were mandated by Beijing, but there are signs that the new leadership is becoming more pragmatic when it comes to policy on Tibet, Barnett said."Under (former President) Hu Jintao, the pragmatists kept quiet or convinced themselves to accept the Hu Jintao hardliner approach," Barnett said. "Now they are shifting and indicating that was a failure.""But whether they can overcome internal resistance to change, and how far any change could go, that is the big question."Tibetans, however, were unsure if things had changed. A monk in the Ganzi monastery in Sichuan told Reuters by telephone that he had received a text message in Chinese that Tibetans were allowed to display photographs of the Dalai Lama."We are still too afraid to do so even though we have received these messages," he said. "We can't confirm whether it is true, since we haven't been informed by the government."Elliot Sperling, a professor of Sino-Tibetan relations from Indiana University, said the Chinese government is taking a "utilitarian" position in attempting to engage with the Dalai Lama as it contemplates the thorny issue of his succession."None of this reflects a desire on the part of the government to change policy because it runs counter to human rights norms or because it is unjust."Many Tibetans fear that Beijing will simply appoint its own replacement to the Dalai Lama -- a scenario that will almost certainly cause violent protests in Tibet.The Dalai Lama has suggested that his incarnation might be found outside of Chinese-controlled territory, and has said that the succession process could break with tradition -- either by being hand-picked by him or through democratic elections.Ultimately, it does not matter whether Tibetans are allowed to display photos of the Dalai Lama, Pema Rinchen, the abbot of Guangfa monastery in Sichuan province, said by telephone."Because in our hearts, we worship him, and that's enough."
SHANGHAI — Chinese officials are investigating the Swiss food packaging giant Tetra Pak for "abusing its market dominance" in China, the latest in a growing number of multinational companies to come under regulatory scrutiny.China's State Administration of Industry and Commerce said on its Web site Friday that it had started an investigation, but it offered few details about why it was looking into Tetra Pak, which makes food and beverage packages.Christopher Huntley, a Tetra Pak spokesman, said Friday that this was the first time the government had formally investigated the company on antitrust grounds. Company executives were questioned several years ago about the matter and responded, he said. In 2005, a statement on the commerce agency's Web site complained about Tetra Pak's "monopoly" in the Chinese market and said it could take action.Days earlier, the National Development and Reform Commission, the powerful state planning agency, said it was investigating international producers of infant milk formula sold in China on suspicion of price-fixing and anticompetitive behavior.The commission also said that it was reviewing the production and import costs of scores of Chinese and international drug makers operating in China, including some of the world's biggest pharmaceutical companies. The review includes joint ventures set up by global drug companies like GlaxoSmithKline, Merck and Novartis."It is mandatory for pharmaceutical companies in China to report to the government pricing data as part of a routine process," a spokesman for Sandoz China, a division of Novartis, said in a statement on Friday. "Sandoz China will cooperate with the authority to provide required information."Analysts say it is not unusual for the government to investigate the pricing practices of Chinese and international companies. Although most prices in China are set by market forces, the government maintains control over large parts of the economy, including energy and telecommunications prices.The government closely monitors health care costs, including the prices of certain types of drugs. With costs skyrocketing, the price of infant milk formula has recently become a growing concern in China, partly because of worries about the quality and safety of domestic brands.In response to the government investigation, several international brands, including Nestlé and Danone, have announced price cuts — as much as 20 percent — on infant milk formula sold in China.Separately, the police in the central Chinese city of Changsha said this week that they were investigating executives at the British pharmaceutical giant GlaxoSmithKline on suspicion of "economic crimes." A report in The Wall Street Journal last month said a whistle-blower had sent information to the company's board claiming that for years the China sales staff at GlaxoSmithKline had engaged in "widespread bribery of doctors to prescribe drugs."A spokesman for Glaxo said the company had conducted an internal investigation and found no evidence of bribery or corruption in the China operation.
BEIJING — In what has become an annual summer scourge, the coastal Chinese city of Qingdao has been hit by a near-record algae bloom that has left its popular beaches fouled with a green, stringy muck.The State Oceanic Administration said an area larger than Connecticut had been affected by the mat of "sea lettuce," as it is known in Chinese, which is generally harmless to humans but chokes off marine life and invariably chases away tourists as it begins to rot.Some beachgoers appeared to be amused by the outbreak, at least according to the Chinese news media, which in recent days have featured images of swimmers lounging on bright green beds of algae, tossing it around with glee or piling it atop of one another as if it were sand.Local officials, however, are less enthusiastic. Last month, they declared a "large-scale algae disaster," sending hundreds of boats and bulldozers to clean up the waters off Qingdao, a former German concession in Shandong Province that is famous for its beer and beaches. As of Monday, about 19,800 tons of the algae had been cleared, the Qingdao government said. While valued for its nutrition — or as an ingredient in fertilizers and biomass energy production — algae in large quantities can prove dangerous as it decomposes, producing toxic hydrogen sulfide gas. It also smells like rotten eggs.The green tide, spread over 7,500 square miles, is thought to be twice the size of an outbreak in 2008 that threatened sailing events during the Beijing Olympics, which took place near Qingdao. Officials deployed boats, helicopters and 10,000 workers to keep the waters clear for the competition.The cleanup costs were later estimated at more than $30 million. Abalone, clam and sea cucumber farms suffered more than $100 million in damage, according to a 2011 study by researchers from the Chinese Academy of Fishery Sciences. A 2009 outbreak was bigger.Although biologists are at a loss to explain the most recent algae bloom, scientists suspect it is connected to pollution and increased seaweed farming in the province just south of Shandong. While similar green tides have been reported around the world, the annual bloom in the Yellow Sea is considered the largest, growing to an estimated million tons of biomass each year.The green tides were first reported in Qingdao in 2007. A central factor is the high supply of nutrients from agricultural runoff and wastewater. But those pollutants have been in the Yellow Sea for decades, leading scientists to look for new triggers.A group of researchers believe that the algae that washes up around Qingdao originates farther south in seaweed farms along the coast of Jiangsu Province. The farms grow porphyra, known as nori in Japanese cuisine, on large rafts in coastal waters. The rafts attract a kind of algae called Ulva prolifera, and when the farmers clean them off each spring they spread the algae out into the Yellow Sea, where it finds nutrients and warm conditions ideal for blooming."It feeds off those nutrients and grows bigger and bigger, and eventually you can see it from satellites," said John Keesing, a scientist at the Csiro Division of Marine and Atmospheric Research in Australia who is studying the green tide with Chinese researchers. "The currents gently move the algae in a northeastern direction out into the center of the Yellow Sea. You get a huge amount, and eventually it starts to wash on shore."While farmers have long grown seaweed along the Jiangsu coast, the rafts expanded much farther offshore starting in 2006, which may have contributed to the recent blooms, according to an article published by Dr. Keesing and his colleagues. The answer to curtailing the blooms may lie in disposing of the algae that clogs the nori rafts on land."We haven't suggested people stop growing porphyra, but proper husbandry methods to prevent much of the waste algae from going into sea, that's probably the only preventive measure that could be deployed," he said.
BEIJING — China's former railways minister Liu Zhijun was given a suspended death sentence Monday that will likely be commuted to life imprisonment for bribery and abuse of power in one of the country's highest-profile corruption cases in years.Liu's sentence is seen as lenient in a country where the death penalty is meted out even for economic crimes like tax evasion, and likely reflects the Communist Party leadership's desire to not antagonize ruling party factions that might face similar charges.The official Xinhua News Agency said Liu was sentenced to death with a two-year reprieve by Beijing No. 2 Intermediate People's Court. After two years, such sentences typically are commuted to life in prison if the inmate shows good behavior."If they were to sentence Liu Zhijun to death now, that generates expectations in the minds of officials and the people that officials of similar seniority will have to be executed," said Willy Lam, a professor at Chinese University of Hong Kong. "The party leadership is reluctant to set up these kinds of expectations because there are so many corrupt officials who might have really sterling, good political connections."Liu, 60, who oversaw the ministry's high-profile bullet train development, was accused of taking massive bribes and steering lucrative projects to associates.New Chinese leader Xi Jinping has made fighting corruption a hallmark campaign of his term in office so far. Though Liu was arrested and investigated before Xi came to power, the public is still likely to view his sentence as undermining Xi's pledge to treat both high- and low-level corrupt officials with equal severity.It also feeds public perception of a judicial system that protects those with powerful political connections while severely punishing ordinary people."The public reaction is going to be one of strong resentment, because some cases are very clear, when ordinary people commit minor economic crimes, they get heavy sentences," said Zhang Ming, a China politics expert at Renmin University in Beijing. "When you compare this to those cases, you can see that justice is unfair.""They might as well abolish the death penalty. If they don't do that but they only sentence ordinary people to it and never high-level officials, then there is a problem," Zhang said.The court found Liu guilty of using his position of influence to help about 11 business associates win promotions and project contracts and accepting 64.6 million Chinese yuan ($10.5 million) in unspecified bribes between 1986 and 2011.State broadcaster CCTV showed footage of Liu, a thin, bespectacled man in a grey, zippered jacket and matching pants, standing with his hands at his side in a courtroom during the sentencing, his face void of expression.The court sentenced Liu to 10 years' imprisonment for the crime of abuse of power and also ordered the confiscation of all of Liu's personal property, Xinhua reported.Liu's lawyer Qian Lieyang said his client would likely not appeal the sentence. Qian refused comment further on the case.Xinhua said Liu should have been given the death penalty for the crime of bribery, "which violated the integrity of a state official's duty behavior and undermined the state functionary's reputation" but that the court granted him a reprieve because he admitted guilt and showed repentance.The report quoted the judge who ruled in the case, Bai Shanyun, as saying that Liu had cooperated with the investigations, told the truth about crimes that he committed, offered information on cases that the authorities had not known about and helped recover a large part of the misused funds, the report said.Liu was ousted in February 2011 for unspecified discipline violations. Months later, a high-speed train crash killed 40 people near the eastern Chinese city of Wenzhou.Earlier this year, Beijing dismantled the Ministry of Railways and separated its regulatory and commercial arms in a bid to reduce bureaucracy and boost efficiency.
BEIJING — China gave former railways minister Liu Zhijun a suspended death sentence for corruption, state media said on Monday, in a case seen as a test of President Xi Jinping's resolve to crack down on pervasive graft.Liu got the "death penalty with a two-year reprieve," for "bribery and abuse of power" from the Beijing No.2 Intermediate People's Court, China's official Xinhua news agency said, a sentence that typically amounts to life in prison.Since becoming Communist Party boss in November, and president in March, Xi has made battling rampant corruption a key objective of his administration, warning that the problem is so severe it could threaten the party's survival.Liu is the highest-ranking official sentenced since Xi took office, although the case predates his watch. The new president has said anti-corruption efforts should target low-ranking "flies" as well as powerful "tigers", but few high-level violators have been probed yet.Liu was formally charged in April with abuse of power, taking bribes and malpractice, conduct that led to "huge losses" of public assets, state media said when his trial began at a Beijing courthouse under heavy security in early June.He was sacked in February last year and later expelled from the Communist Party. Liu had successfully resisted a merger with the Ministry of Transport six years ago, but the government announced in March the two ministries would be joined.Xinhua has said Liu took advantage of his position and helped 11 people to either get promotions or win contracts, in return accepting 64.6 million yuan ($10.53 million) in bribes between 1986 and 2011.China's railway system has faced numerous problems in the past few years, including heavy debts from funding new high-speed lines, waste and fraud. The government has pledged to open the rail industry to private investment in a big way.The ministry suffered a major blow to its image when 40 people were killed in a crash between two high-speed trains in 2011.Liu's case drew a lot of attention when it first broke, but has been overshadowed by the much more sensational case of the former party chief of Chongqing, the ambitious Bo Xilai.Bo's downfall last year, amid lurid accusations of murder and diplomatic intrigue, caused division and uncertainty as the party prepared to transfer power to a new generation of leaders.The government has yet to announce a trial date for Bo, or the charges he will face.
TAIPEI, Taiwan — A giant panda, one of a pair presented by China four years ago to mark warming ties with Taiwan, has given birth to a female cub at a Taipei zoo, officials said Sunday.The 9-year-old Yuan Yuan delivered the cub Saturday night, following artificial insemination given in March, the zoo announced.It was the seventh such attempt on Yuan Yuan in three years, they said. Natural pregnancy among pandas is relatively rare.The zoo showed a picture of Yuan Yuan holding the pink, palm-sized cub.China sent the pandas to Taiwan in December 2008. The two sides split amid civil war in 1949.China named the animals Tuan Tuan and Yuan Yuan, which together means "reunion." Opposition politicians and other Taiwanese skeptics have warned China could use the pandas to advance its unification agenda with self-governed Taiwan.But the pair has remained the most adored animals at the zoo. Yuan Yuan's anticipated pregnancy has been closely followed by the media.Zoo official Chao Ming-chieh said China has agreed to allow Taiwan to keep the cub on the island.Beijing has loaned its giant pandas to many countries but cubs born abroad are to be returned to China.
WASHINGTON — U.S. and Chinese officials began formal discussions on cybersecurity Monday, kicking off four days of talks to build cooperation and broach issues that divide the two world powers.Washington is increasingly concerned about the Chinese theft of American intellectual property, but has put been on the defensive by the revelations about U.S. surveillance by NSA leaker Edward Snowden.A bilateral working group on cyber issues that was announced in April held its first meeting Monday at the State Department, with both civilians and military taking part. The U.S. side was led by coordinator for cyber issues, Christopher Painter; China's by senior Foreign Ministry official, Dai Bing.It's a prelude to annual, ministerial-level talks on security and the economy that start Wednesday, a month after a path-finding summit in California between President Barack Obama and new Chinese leader Xi Jinping that aimed to improve collaboration between the powers whose strategic rivalry belies deep economic inter-dependence.This year's edition of the dialogue at least begins in less fraught circumstances than last year's in Beijing, which was overshadowed by the escape of dissident lawyer Chen Guangcheng from house arrest to the U.S. Embassy in the Chinese capital. Chen later moved to the U.S. where he's proved a staunch critic of Beijing.But the weeks since Obama-Xi summit have brought a new complication in the relationship. Authorities in the semi-autonomous Chinese territory of Hong Kong refused to extradite Snowden — a move which U.S. officials implied that Beijing had a hand in.Officials are likely to play down those differences in this week's talks, but cybersecurity is front and center. The Obama administration says resolving it is key to the future of ties between the world's two largest economies, and U.S. businesses are also speaking out."The U.S. in the cyber arena is trying to drawing a bright red line," Brookings Institution scholar, Kenneth Lieberthal, wrote in a commentary. "Effectively, the U.S. position is everyone conducts espionage; we don't object to Chinese espionage, they should not object to ours. But, the U.S. does not do commercial espionage to benefit our own firms competitive position, the Chinese side does and we insist that they stop."Administration officials said the two sides discussed Monday international law and norms in cyber space, and both made practical proposals to increase cooperation and transparency, but the officials gave no details. The U.S side said it raised cyber-enabled theft of intellectual property, trade secrets and confidential business information for economic gain. On Tuesday, officials will also discuss maritime security, missile defense and nuclear policy.Chinese Ambassador to the U.S., Cui Tiankai, on Sunday rejected allegations of Chinese hacking. He told Chinese journalists that Washington has failed to present hard evidence to prove it, state news agency Xinhua reported. He referred to Snowden's revelations about U.S. cyber surveillance and spying against China and other countries and said it demonstrated cyber security is a global problem faced by most countries.The ambassador proposed creating common rules for cyber space through the United Nations, Xinhua said.
BEIJING — The son of a well-known Chinese general was indicted Monday on charges of taking part in a gang rape in a case certain to fuel public anger at abuses by the wealthy and privileged.Seventeen-year-old Li Tianyi and four others face trial over the incident that allegedly took place at a Beijing hotel in February, according to the website of the official People's Daily newspaper and other state media.It appears Li is being charged as an adult, although calls to the prosecutors' office in Beijing's Haidian district rang unanswered. If convicted, he could serve from three to 10 years, although the law allows for harsher punishment if the case is considered especially serious.The baby-faced, slightly pudgy Li is the son of Li Shuangjiang, 72, a general famed for crooning patriotic anthems for the People's Liberation Army and a star of numerous television galas.The rape charges aren't the younger Li's first brush with the law. He was sentenced to a year in detention in 2011 as a 15-year-old for attacking a couple over a minor traffic dispute and threatening onlookers, in a case that attracted widespread condemnation online.Li, who was allegedly illegally driving a souped-up BMW at the time, was ridiculed in the media as a spoiled brat and his father was forced to make a public apology for failing to check his son's bad behavior.Amid anger over corruption and a widening wealth gap, many Chinese have become increasingly impatient with the antics of the "wealthy second generation" seen as using their parents' money and connections to avoid repercussions for illegal or outrageous behavior.
HONG KONG — A court in Beijing on Monday gave a former Chinese minister of railways, Liu Zhijun, a suspended death sentence after finding him guilty of taking bribes and abusing his powers, state-run media reported. It was the final act in Mr. Liu's downfall, which exposed graft and cronyism at the heart of China's rail expansion.The sentence, reported by Xinhua, China's state-run news agency, means Mr. Liu is likely to face life in prison if, as is usually the case, the death sentence is commuted after two years of good behavior. In handing down the sentence, the court presented Mr. Liu as a case study in the corrupt self-enrichment among officials that China's Communist Party leader, Xi Jinping, has said he will stamp out.Mr. Liu diverted railway construction and freight projects to a businesswoman, Ding Yuxin, also known as Ding Shumiao, and other associates, in return taking bribes worth a total of 64.6 million renminbi, or about $10.5 million, the court found, according to Xinhua. The verdict followed a trial in June."He brought massive economic gains for Ding Yuxin and her relatives, sustaining major losses to public finances," the court said. "He tarnished the reputation of public servants."Chinese media reports on Mr. Liu's downfall have also dwelled on allegations that he used his corrupt earnings to maintain as many as 18 mistresses.Mr. Liu, 60, was minister of railways from 2003 until 2011, and under him the ministry championed a high-speed train rollout. A train crash that killed 40 people in July 2011, five months after Mr. Liu was fired from office, fanned criticisms that the high-speed expansion had been hasty and ill-managed.This year, the Chinese government broke up the Ministry of Railways, putting its administrative arm under the Ministry of Transportation and separating its business operations into a new corporation.Mr. Liu's lawyer submitted a guilty plea at the trial and asked the court to take into account Mr. Liu's contrition and confessions, and the court gave that as a reason for not ordering his execution."Whether I live or die, I won't appeal," Mr. Liu earlier told his lawyer, according to a report on the Web site of the People's Daily newspaper.In another case that has prompted widespread discussion in China, prosecutors announced that they have indicted on rape charges Li Tianyi, the teenage son of Li Shuangjiang, a People's Liberation Army celebrity singer, Xinhua reported. The report gave no date for a trial.The younger Mr. Li's politically privileged background prompted accusations that he was being protected from the charges that arose from an alleged gang sexual assault of a girl in a hotel room in February. But others have said that Mr. Li, whom news reports have said is 17 years old, and other teenage suspects in the case have not been given the protections and anonymity that Chinese law grants them.Li Tianyi already gained notoriety in 2011 for assaulting a couple after a collision with a BMW car that he was driving without a license, an episode that in the eyes of Chinese people exemplified the privileged, reckless lifestyles of many offspring of senior officials. He served one year in a "re-education" facility for minors for that offense.
BEIJING — China's environment minister said his ministry ranked among the world's "four major embarrassing departments" but defended the agency, saying it was hampered by overlapping functions in government, state media said on Tuesday.The comments by Zhou Shengxian are the latest in a string of blunt admissions by Chinese leaders that the country still has a long way to go in tackling pollution.Public anger over smog that blanketed many northern cities in January has spread to online appeals for Beijing to clean up water supplies, especially after the rotting corpses of thousands of pigs were found in March in a river that supplies Shanghai's water.Social unrest spurred by environmental complaints is becoming common across the country, to the government's alarm."I've heard that there are four major embarrassing departments in the world and that China's ministry of environmental protection is one of them," state news agency Xinhua's official microblog account quoted Zhou as saying."Our environmental work involves many departments. Many of the functions are overlapping," Zhou said, adding that water, land and carbon output were all managed by different ministries.Despite Xinhua later removing a reference to Zhou's remarks describing the agency as an embarrassment, his comments spread widely on China's other state media microblogs.Zhou, a two-term environment minister, has presided over China's worst pollution in recent memory.He received among the fewest votes from China's lawmakers in the race for the cabinet at this year's meeting of the National People's Congress, a largely rubberstamp parliament body.Zhou said he was worried about the public health impact of dire pollution contaminating the air, soil and water, Xinhua said."The current challenge facing the environmental (authorities) is how to properly deal with the environmental problems caused by economic development," Zhou said.China routinely vows resolve in cleaning up pollution, but little is ever done, mainly for lack of enforcement in the face of a drive for corporate profits.Chinese microbloggers mocked Zhou's comments, underscoring how far the agency has fallen in public esteem."Of course it's an embarrassment. What is originally a department for environmental protection has become an environmental protection department that conceals!" a microblogger wrote on Sina Weibo, China's version of Twitter.Many Chinese have expressed disquiet over the scarcity of available information about the environment. The environment ministry denied a lawyer access to soil pollution data because it was a "state secret".Air pollution is shortening the lives of people in northern China by about 5.5 years compared to those in the south, the disastrous legacy of a policy to provide free heating coal in the north, an international study showed.
BEIJING — Three people were pulled from a raging river but six others remained missing following a bridge collapse Tuesday in mountainous western China amid heavy flooding that has forced thousands to evacuate their homes.The official Xinhua News Agency said one sedan, three minivans and one SUV fell into the torrent when the more than 40-year-old Qinglian bridge broke apart just before noon in the city of Jiangyou in the western province of Sichuan.The local government said in a statement posted to its official website that an earlier report that a pair of passenger buses had plunged into the river was incorrect.The two-lane bridge was completed in 1969, according to Xinhua, and a replacement span is under construction. China has been pouring resources into building infrastructure, but many older bridges and dams are of poor quality and urgently need repairs or replacement.China's Civil Affairs Ministry announced Tuesday that flooding in Sichuan since Sunday has affected an area that is home to 360,000 people, damaging or destroying 300 homes, and forcing 6,100 to evacuate.
BEIJING — A Chinese journalist said Tuesday that he has been conditionally released from detention after five weeks in which he was asked about his book on the 1989 Tiananmen crackdown and a film he made about labor camp abuses.Beijing-based video and photojournalist Du Bin said by phone that state security officials released him Monday evening from the Fengtai District detention center and told him that for the next 12 months, he is restricted from leaving the city without informing the authorities ahead of time, even for domestic travel.Officials questioned him about a 600-page book he recently published in Hong Kong about the 1989 military crackdown on pro-democracy protesters in Beijing and a film he made about torture at a Chinese labor camp, he said.The authorities were questioning him to learn if the work he did amounted to the crime of "causing a disturbance," Du said. He was not formally charged, however."From the time I was taken in until I was released, I never felt like I had committed any crime," Du said. "What I want to do is to reflect the era that we live in, tell the stories of China's ordinary people, of when they die abnormal deaths and their joys and sorrows. I'm concerned with humanity."Du said he was treated with respect by detention center officials and was never beaten and that he enjoyed his interactions with other detainees. He said, however, that police had seized his work computer, mobile phone and other and have not returned them to him.Du's detention had come amid a broader crackdown on China's small, beleaguered community of rights activists and dissidents launched under new Communist Party chief Xi Jinping. The campaign has dashed hopes that the new leadership might ease controls on civil society.
CHONGQING, China — Dave Schoch has one of the toughest jobs at Ford Motor Co.: catching the competition in the world's biggest car market.When Schoch (pronounced Shock) arrived in China 13 years ago, the government was building eight-lane freeways in major cities, but bicyclists and pedestrians still filled the streets. The Chinese were buying fewer than 2 million cars and trucks each year, a fraction of the 14.4 million sold in 2000 in the U.S.When he returned to China last year, Schoch was stunned. The freeways were choked with cars, from inexpensive, Chinese-made Wuling minivans to Mercedes-Benz sedans. The red-hot Chinese economy had more than doubled annual wages, giving millions of people the money to buy a first vehicle or move up to a luxury brand."Things turned upside-down," says Schoch, who was named head of Ford's Asia Pacific operations in the fall. "You have to be here and experience it to believe what has happened in the last decade."Last year, Chinese consumers bought 19 million cars and trucks — 5 million more than consumers in the U.S. Ford's share of those sales was just 3 percent. Years of corporate chaos and financial trouble slowed Ford's entry into China as its rivals gained a foothold. Together, General Motors and Volkswagen control a third of China's market.But the race is far from over. China is still a country where just 58 out of every 1,000 people own cars. In the U.S., that number is closer to 800.Every year, tens of millions of Chinese are reaching the income threshold they need to buy a car, Schoch says. Many analysts predict annual sales in China of 30 million by 2020, almost double the U.S. forecast of 17 million. It's up to Schoch to ensure Ford gets a big chunk of that phenomenal growth."I go home each night thinking, 'Have I really tried to move the needle? Are we moving the organization fast enough to take advantage of this? Because I really think we have a golden opportunity here," he says.Ford wants to double its Chinese market share to 6 percent by 2015. To make that happen, the company is launching six new vehicles in China this year, including two small SUVs called the Kuga and the EcoSport, the Mondeo midsize sedan and the Explorer SUV, which is exported from Chicago. The Lincoln luxury brand will arrive next year.To meet its goals, the company has undertaken its most ambitious growth since Ford went on a post-war building spree in Michigan 60 years ago.Ford is spending $5 billion to build five plants — including three assembly plants, an engine plant and a transmission plant — that will more than double its Chinese production capacity to 1.7 million vehicles by 2015."They used to be laggard, cautious. But now they're all in," says Michael Dunne, president of the automotive consulting group Dunne and Co. in Hong Kong. "They are saying, 'We have confidence in the China market. We have confidence in our products. We can win here.'"Ford sold a company record 407,721 vehicles in China in the first six months of this year. But that was only a quarter of the vehicles GM sold. Volkswagen has six brands aimed at every type of buyer in the vast Chinese market, from the cheap Skoda to the ultra-luxury Bentley. Until Lincoln arrives, Ford has just one.There are other obstacles. Ford cars are expensive. In a market where 70 percent of vehicles sold cost less than $14,500, Ford's cheapest car is the Fiesta, which starts at $13,300. The Explorer starts around $80,000 thanks to a 25 percent import duty and other taxes.Ford's development costs are also steep compared with competitors' because it still does much of the research and design for Chinese vehicles at its headquarters in Dearborn, Michigan, where costs are relatively high. Ford hopes to double its technical workforce in Nanjing to 1,500 people by 2015; GM already employs more than 2,000 people at its technical center in Shanghai.Another complication is the unpredictable Chinese government, which could scramble expansion plans at any time. The government requires foreign automakers to partner with local companies and decides where they can build their plants.But Ford can't keep relying on Europe and North America, where it sells 73 percent of its vehicles. The company lost $1.75 billion in Europe last year as sales plummeted in a recessionary economy, and it expects to lose $2 billion there this year. Profits in Asia would have cushioned those losses, but Ford's Asian operations lost $77 million because of the big investments in new plants and vehicles.One hundred years ago, Ford was the company with a head start in China. It started selling the Model T there in 1913, and founder Henry Ford explored opening a plant in China in the 1920s. But Ford quickly cooled on the idea because of China's poor roads and low wages. The country's only Ford dealership, in Shanghai, closed at the outbreak of World War II, and its car industry was cut off to foreigners for several decades after that.Ford re-entered China in 1997, around the same time as GM. But Ford focused on the commercial van market, which was limited. GM and its Chinese partners — SAIC and Wuling — grew quickly by selling Wuling minivans and Buicks to the mass market.Ford's attention was elsewhere. SUV sales were booming at home. The company was buying up luxury brands like Jaguar and Volvo with the profits. No one at headquarters anticipated that the Chinese market was about to take off."If I had gone to management in Dearborn and tried to convince them that China would be 20 million units in 2013, they would have really started to worry about me," Schoch says with a laugh.The company soon realized its error. It formed a partnership with Chinese automaker Changan Automotive in 2001 and began building the Fiesta in China two years later. But with its new luxury brands, high labor costs and bloated bureaucracy, it had a limited amount to invest.In 2006, Ford named a new CEO, Alan Mulally, to help stem its billion-dollar losses and end executive infighting. A few months after Mulally's arrival, Ford borrowed $23.6 billion and used it to close plants, cut its workforce, improve key products and meld global operations. Mulally sold or discontinued every brand but Ford and Lincoln. By 2009, Ford was profitable again, and turned its sights on China.Schoch says Mulally asked him in 2011 if he would return to China. Schoch's only question was whether Ford was committed to the country. Mulally didn't hesitate."Yes, from the board of directors on down," he said, according to Schoch. It was a defining moment for Schoch.Last month, Mulally visited China for the third time in less than a year. He was there to open a $500 million engine plant in Chongqing (chong-CHING'), an industrial city of 30 million in southwestern China, where suburban industrial parks are rapidly filling with carmakers and auto suppliers. Chongqing is now Ford's largest manufacturing base outside Michigan.Mulally was also in Chongqing last August, to break ground on Ford's third assembly plant there, a $600 million facility that will be completed in 2014.During that trip, hundreds of uniformed workers — many of whom are former soldiers — stood in precise rows as Mulally warmly praised local leaders for their "pro-business" policies. Chongqing's government was the first in China to offer subsidies to residents who buy locally made vehicles, which has boosted Ford's sales in the region. At the end of the ceremony, confetti rained down and rainbow-colored smoke shot into the air, adding another layer of haze to the city's thick, yellowish sky.A few days later, the executives touched down amid the rice fields and large, neo-Victorian houses of the wealthy southern city of Hangzhou. Ford is building one of its assembly plants there, in an immaculate new office park on the outskirts of the city. The $760 million plant is expected to produce 250,000 vehicles per year when it's completed in 2015.In Hangzhou, Mulally and the others were greeted by Chinese women in traditional silk gowns — blue and white, like Ford's logo — and quickly ducked into an air-conditioned tent to meet with local politicians. Later, the executives scooped up dirt with red-ribboned shovels. When the ceremony ended, rainbow smoke once again shot into the sky, accompanied by booming golden cannons.On the wall of his office in Dearborn, Mulally has a copy of an ad that Henry Ford published in the Saturday Evening Post in 1925. The ad was titled "Opening the Highways to All Mankind," and reflected Ford's wish to make vehicles available to everyone. Schoch says he's living Henry's dream.Schoch, 61, joined Ford in 1977 as a financial analyst. His career includes stints as chief financial officer for Europe and operations manager for Canada, Mexico and South America. Despite his long international career, the thoughtful, down-to-earth Schoch doesn't seem jaded. He spends many weekends dropping in on dealerships near the home he shares with his wife in Shanghai. He's giddy when he sees first-time Chinese buyers, surrounded by family members, getting their first set of keys."Take yourself back to when you were a teenager and you got your first vehicle, and what it felt like, and you can see what it means for the Chinese customer," Schoch says.Ford hopes its manufacturing base in Chongqing, far from China's crowded eastern coast, will help it attract rural buyers in the still largely untapped markets in western China. For those buyers, Ford is developing a low-cost car to compete with the $9,500 Chevrolet Sail.Ford will use Lincoln to make a play for China's booming luxury market, which is dominated by German brands like Audi and BMW. Lincoln used to be the best-selling luxury brand in the U.S. but fell behind when Ford started focusing on other luxury brands. Ford's effort to revive the brand began this year with the launch of the Lincoln MKZ sedan in the U.S."Chinese consumers buy on image and prestige and the message that they project to their family and co-workers and friends," Dunne said. "With a luxury brand like Lincoln, it gives them a chance to say, 'Hey, see my American luxury car that I drive? Do you have one of these?'"Chinese buyers also appreciate a brand's history. That's why Ford introduced Chinese reporters to the MKZ at a historic temple in Beijing last summer, surrounded by vintage Lincoln posters. GM's Buick brand — which used to ferry Chinese royalty — is a huge seller with cachet in China even though it struggles in the U.S. GM sold 401,327 Buicks in China in the first quarter of this year, four times more than it sold in the U.S.Ford, GM and others also have been helped by a backlash against Japanese automakers in China because of disputes between Japan and China over ownership of islands in the East China Sea. Toyota's sales fell 6 percent in the first six months of this year.Su Xiaoling, a sales manager in a Beijing real estate company, said he expects Ford's share of the Chinese market to climb because it offers newer styles and updates them often."I think Ford cars are safe. The material they use is good and thick, not like the Japanese cars," he said. "But the price is pretty expensive."Schoch's goal, he says, is to build Ford's reputation and convince buyers like Su that Ford's offerings are worth the price."Share and profits are important, but they're a fallout to how our customers perceive Ford," he says. "This is not a sprint in my mind. This is part of a very, very long journey."Associated Press writer Fu Ting in Beijing contributed to this report.
WASHINGTON — U.S. lawmakers influential on trade policy urged the Obama administration on Tuesday to press China in talks this week to halt the theft of intellectual property and curb practices that discriminate against American companies.The letter to Obama cabinet officials on the eve of the annual U.S.-China Strategic and Economic Dialogue contained a laundry list of complaints, from software piracy to market and regulatory barriers and forced technology transfer."We remain very concerned that China has halted - and in many cases reversed - its market reforms," the lawmakers said in the letter to Secretary of State John Kerry, Treasury Secretary Jack Lew, Commerce Secretary Penny Pritzker and U.S. Trade Representative Michael Froman."China must move away from an economic model dominated by state-owned enterprises, trade-distorting subsidies, and economic protectionism," the bipartisan group wrote."The theft of proprietary information threatens to undermine our economic relationship, is unacceptable, and must stop," they said, noting that much of the theft was done by cyber means.The lawmakers voiced support for the five-year-old Strategic and Economic Dialogue process between the world's two biggest economies, but said China has been "woefully inadequate and incomplete" in implementing past agreements and called for more U.S. scrutiny.The letter was signed by House Ways and Means Committee Chairman Dave Camp, a Republican; Senate Finance Committee Chairman Max Baucus, a Democrat; House Ways and Means Committee ranking Democrat Sandy Levin; and Senate Finance Committee ranking Republican Orrin Hatch.The Obama administration must "use meaningful metrics to measure progress and to be aggressive in ensuring that China is fully implementing its commitments and doing so in a commercially meaningful way," said the letter.Among the Chinese practices the lawmakers said required more U.S. pressure to change were "indigenous innovation" policies that require foreigners to transfer technology to China in order to sell into the market, unscientific barriers to beef and other farm goods and favoritism to China's state sector.They also repeated longstanding concerns that China deliberately keeps it currency undervalued to make its exports more competitive in international markets."China must stop intervening massively and in one direction in the foreign exchange markets, and move more rapidly towards allowing the renminbi exchange rate to be set by market forces," wrote the lawmakers.There was no immediate response to the letter, but U.S. officials outlining Washington's priorities for the July 10-11 talks in Washington outlined a similar agenda."We'll continue to, of course, push on exchange rates and to try to push forward on the market determination of both exchange rates and interest rates," a senior Obama administration official told reporters on Monday.The official said the U.S. delegation would also raise regulatory and financial favoritism toward Chinese state-owned enterprises and other policies "putting them at a competitive advantage and our companies at a disadvantage."Beyond specific trade and financial issues, U.S. officials say they want to use this week's talks to learn more about economic reform plans circulating in Beijing under President Xi Jinping, who took office in March.Kerry and Lew will host a Chinese delegation led by State Councilor Yang Jiechi and Vice Premier Wang Yang.Lew, who visited Beijing shortly after Xi and a new cabinet led by Premier Li Keqiang took office, said he detected signs that some changes advocated by the United States were gaining traction in Beijing."If I had to guess, we're going to see the direction of change be clear, that the moves toward more market-oriented reforms will be clear," Lew told CNN, according to a transcript of an interview conducted on Monday."But the pace will probably be slower than we would like, or, frankly, than would be good for the Chinese people," he said.China has concerns of its own about U.S. policy.Beijing has long demanded that Washington ease Cold War-era controls on the export of high technology and clarify the approval process for Chinese acquisitions of America companies. Chinese investments in U.S. assets sometimes draw opposition from U.S. lawmakers.
BEIJING — A Chinese journalist and documentary filmmaker whose work has been harshly critical of life in China was released on bail Monday after spending five weeks in a Beijing jail.The journalist, Du Bin, said in an interview hours after his release that he could still face trial for "picking quarrels and making trouble," accusations he said stemmed from his recent film about a Chinese labor camp and a book about the crackdown on Tiananmen Square protesters. The charges against him carry a maximum five-year prison term.Over the coming year, he said, the authorities could still try him on those charges, adding that his movements would be largely restricted during that period. "It all depends on whether the police are unhappy with me," he said, speaking from the home of his girlfriend.His lawyer, Pu Zhiqiang, said the terms of Mr. Du's release on bail were not entirely clear, which he said was most likely intentional, perhaps as a way to constrain his behavior.Mr. Du, 41, who has worked as a freelance photographer for The New York Times, has published a number of books outside mainland China in recent years that have been pointedly critical of the Chinese Communist Party. They include a history of the famine caused by Mao Zedong's disastrous Great Leap Forward of the 1950s, and another that included graphic accounts of the torture endured by members of Falun Gong, the banned spiritual movement.It was his most recent two works that drew the most attention of the authorities: an hourlong documentary about conditions at the notorious Masanjia "re-education through labor" camp in northeast China and a book that compiled firsthand accounts describing the military's violent suppression of the 1989 pro-democracy protests. The book, "Tiananmen Massacre," was published in late May by Mirror Books, which has offices in New York and Hong Kong.Mr. Du said the police seemed particularly interested in how much money he had received from the book, perhaps because they sought to charge him with economic crimes. "They were disappointed when I told them I hadn't made a cent," he said.Mr. Du said his 37 days in detention were unpleasant – especially during his initial 20 hours of interrogation — but that his jailers did not mistreat him. He said he shared a cell with nearly two dozen other inmates, most of them arrested over petty crimes. Over the five weeks of detention, he said, he lost a considerable amount of weight.Despite the uncertainty of whether he would be formally arrested and tried, Mr. Du said he felt at ease during most of his time at the Fengtai District detention center. "I was relaxed because I knew I hadn't committed any crime," he said. "I did what everyone should be doing, which is to tell the truth."He said he was surprised that the police did not warn him before setting him free against talking to the media about his experience, an admonishment often given to political dissidents upon their release. "This," he said, "is progress for China."
BEIJING — Floodwaters surging through Himalayan foothills in western China have swept bridges, houses and hillsides into roiling brown torrents, leaving at least 31 people dead and 166 missing Thursday, as heavy rains buffeted many parts of the country.Flooding in the western province of Sichuan was the worst in 50 years for some areas, with more than 220,000 people forced to evacuate.Nationwide, at least 46 people have died due to the violent weather since Sunday, according to figures from the Ministry of Civil Affairs and the official Xinhua News Agency. Thousands of homes have been destroyed or damaged and transportation has come to a virtual standstill in hard-hit areas.Many of the casualties in Sichuan were from a massive landslide that struck a scenic resort outside the city of Dujiangyan, killing 18 people and leaving 107 missing. An entire hillside collapsed onto clusters of holiday cottages where city dwellers escape summer heat, a survivor told Xinhua."The noise was like thunder and went on for two or three minutes. My first thought was that I too would be buried," Gao Quanshi, 47, was quoted as saying. Phone lines were cut, so villagers had to trek to nearby government offices to call for help, he said.Images from the scene showed a valley filled with mud and rocks, with only the tops of trees sticking through. Drenched rescuers wearing helmets and life jackets worked mostly with hand tools to prevent harming any survivors still trapped beneath.A total of 352 tourists had been rescued from the area as of Wednesday night, Xinhua said. Overall in Sichuan, there were at least 31 people dead and 166 missing, said the provincial department of civil affairs.A mudslide in Sichuan's Aba prefecture left three people dead and 12 others missing, Xinhua said.Mudslides and flooding are common in China's mountainous areas, killing hundreds of people every year, but in some areas the current floods are already the worst in half a century. Reports said the 94 centimeters (37 inches) of rainfall that fell on Dujiangyan over 40 hours beginning Monday was the heaviest since records began being kept in 1954.Also in the west, more than 2,000 people were rescued after being trapped for several hours Wednesday in a highway tunnel between Dujiangyan and Wenchuan — the epicenter of the Sichuan earthquake five years ago that left 90,000 people dead or missing.Bridges have been closed and train service suspended in some parts of the province.In nearby Beichuan county, flooding destroyed buildings and wrecked exhibits at a memorial for earthquake victims.The flooding also caused the collapse of an almost 50-year-old bridge in a neighboring county, sending six vehicles into the raging waters and leaving 12 people missing.The region lies in the foothills of the Tibetan Plateau, where mountains rise sharply from the densely populated Sichuan basin. Fast-running rivers quickly overflowed their banks, flooding scores of towns and parts of the provincial capital of Chengdu, where the waters rose to the second floor and covered the tops of cars.In Chengdu, stone bridges and brick houses along river banks were swept away, including one in which the residents were taking shelter, while others crumbled into the saturated earth already rent with fissures from the magnitude-8.9 2008 earthquake.In the northern province of Shanxi, at least 12 workers were killed Tuesday when a violent rainstorm caused the collapse of an unfinished coal mine workshop they were building.Another three people were drowned in a car in Hebei province outside the capital, while an additional 11 people were reported dead or missing in Yunnan province, Beijing, Inner Mongolia and Gansu province.
HONG KONG — Chinese trade data for June came in much weaker than expected on Wednesday, offering up the latest evidence that the Chinese economy has lost much of its previous vigor.Exports fell 3.1 percent from a year earlier — the first drop since early 2012 — the customs department reported, and imports decreased 0.7 percent, falling for the second month in a row. Both figures were far below the expectations of analysts, who had projected a 4 percent rise in exports and an 8 percent climb in imports.The weak import data underlined slack demand within China. The export slump reflected weak overseas demand, but analysts said it was also partly attributable to a recent government crackdown on false export reporting by companies that had been seeking to bypass currency controls and move money into the country as a way to place a bet on further appreciation of the currency, the renminbi. The strengthening currency and rising wages in China have helped erode the country's competitiveness at a time when demand from export markets like the United States remains lackluster.Growth in China has been cooling for many months as the new leadership in Beijing seeks to shift the economy away from a credit-driven and increasingly outdated growth model. For years, China has relied on heavy manufacturing, state-sponsored investment and exports to power growth. Aware of the limits of these growth drivers, China is now seeking to foster more domestic demand and raise productivity.Policy makers have also been seeking to rein in the rapid credit growth that has built up in recent years.
BEIJING — Chinese police officers opened fire on a crowd of unarmed Tibetans who were celebrating the birthday of the Dalai Lama in a volatile area of Sichuan Province, injuring nine people, two of them critically, rights advocates reported this week. The shootings took place on Saturday, but government restrictions on communications in the region prevented the news from immediately reaching outsiders.The violence occurred as more than 500 people gathered for a picnic on the slopes of a mountain in the town of Tawu, or Daofu in Chinese, that is considered sacred by local residents.According to the International Campaign for Tibet, Radio Free Asia and other groups, the crowd included Buddhist monks and nuns from nearby monasteries but also scores of laypeople who were celebrating the 78th birthday of the Dalai Lama, an event that has traditionally been banned by the authorities. Despite the prohibition on such gatherings, rights advocates say the police often look the other way as celebrants burn incense or hang prayer flags to mark the occasion.The weekend violence, coupled with recent statements by senior Chinese officials, suggests that Beijing has no intention of loosening the restrictions in Tibetan areas that many rights advocates say are inciting a wave of self-immolations. On Tuesday, China's top official in charge of ethnic minorities vowed to continue the Communist Party's emphasis on social stability, which includes demonizing the Dalai Lama.The statement, published by the official Xinhua news agency, seemed aimed at quashing recent speculation among some Tibetan exiles that the authorities were preparing to experiment with a more relaxed approach to governance in the region, including allowing the open display of the exiled Tibetan leader's photograph."Only when the Dalai Lama publicly announces that Tibet is an inalienable part of China since ancient time, gives up the stance of 'Tibet independence' and stops his secessionist activities can his relations with the C.P.C. Central Committee possibly be improved," Xinhua quoted the official, Yu Zhengsheng, as saying.The Dalai Lama does not advocate an independent Tibet, but has been seeking what he describes as meaningful autonomy for China's 5.4 million Tibetans.The violence in Tawu began after dozens of police officers arrived at the scene of the birthday celebration and ordered participants to leave. After religious leaders tried to reason with the officers, witnesses said, there was a brief standoff that quickly escalated. "They smashed doors and windows of our vehicles and started beating Tibetans gathered in the area and dispersed the Tibetans and started shooting at the crowd," one local resident told Radio Free Asia.Exile groups say the two most critically injured are monks from the Nyitso Monastery in Tawu. The men were taken to a hospital in Chengdu, the provincial capital, with gunshot wounds to the head. One of them, Ugyen Tashi, may have been shot as many as eight times, according to the Tibetan Center for Human Rights and Democracy.At least 20 people remain in police custody in Tawu, according to the International Campaign for Tibet.Reached by phone on Tuesday, a government official in Ganzi Prefecture, which includes Tawu, declined to comment. Calls to the local public security bureau went unanswered.The prefecture, known in Tibetan as Kardze, is at the heart of a continuing protest campaign against Chinese rule that since 2008 has included at least 120 self-immolations. Seven have taken place in Kardze, whose residents are known for their strong Tibetan identity and a fierce devotion to the Dalai Lama. Several times in recent years, the police have used lethal force to break up what they deemed to be illegal gatherings. In January 2012, as many as three people were killed and at least 31 injured when the police opened fire on a protest in the town of Draggo, which is called Luhuo in Chinese.Tensions have been particularly high in Tawu, the scene of five self-immolations, including that of a Buddhist nun who killed herself last month during a religious debate festival that drew 3,000 monks from across the region. Since then, exile groups say, security has been especially tight in and around the Nyatso Monastery, where the 10-day event took place.Mandie McKeown, a coordinator for the International Campaign for Tibet, said the violence on Saturday was bound to fuel more opposition to Chinese rule. "Given how incredibly volatile things are, using lethal force doesn't accomplish anything," she said in an interview. "It just aggravates the complaints of Tibetans and exacerbates the situation."
HONG KONG — Inflation data from China on Tuesday offered the latest evidence of weakness in the Chinese economy, as producer prices sagged in June amid lackluster demand and excess capacity.The average price of goods as they left the factory gate was 2.7 percent lower in June than during the same month last year — the 16th month in a row that the producer prices fell – highlighting that producers are struggling to lift prices in an economy that has been cooling for many months.Prices as seen from the perspective of the consumer edged up slightly, by 2.7 percent from a year earlier, the country's statistics bureau also reported. That was slightly higher than economists had expected and above the 2.1 percent increase recorded in May. But it still represented a slow rate of increase compared to mid-2011, when consumer price inflation had spiked to more than 6 percent.Since then, consumer price inflation has remained tame, in part because of the gradual slowdown in China's overall economy. The low rate of increase in consumer prices is a welcome development for policy makers in Beijing, who are highly sensitive to any rises in food prices, as these still make up a large share of household spending.The deflation in producer prices, however, worries many analysts as it underlines that domestic demand in China's economy remains sluggish.The latest producer price reading, analysts at ANZ wrote in a note on Tuesday, indicated that "firms have little power to raise prices due to the lack of demand."A manufacturing-sector survey released on July 1 made a similar point. Factory activity barely expanded in June, an index compiled by the statistics bureau showed.Gross domestic product figures for the second quarter of 2013, due out next Monday, are expected to show that China's economy expanded 7.5 percent from a year earlier. That would represent a slowdown from the first quarter, when growth came in at 7.7 percent.
BEIJING — China will invest 260 billion yuan, or about $42 billion, to revive a long-stalled plan to build the world's longest undersea tunnel across the Bohai Strait linking the country's eastern and northeastern regions, state media said on Thursday.The 123-km (76.4-mile) tunnel will run from the port city of Dalian in northeastern Liaoning province to Yantai city in eastern Shandong, the China Economic Net website said.The report did not say when the project will be completed.China announced plans in 1994 to build the tunnel, at a cost of $10 billion, and set to be completed before 2010. But more than 20 years on, the project remains stuck in the planning stage, the website said, without elaborating.At the time, state media said the tunnel would shorten the travelling distance between the two regions by 620 miles.The costs could be recouped in 12 years, said Wang Mengshu, a member of the Chinese Academy of Engineering, who estimated annual revenues from the tunnel at around 20 billion yuan, the website said. "Freight is very profitable," Wang said.The report comes nearly a month after Nicaraguan lawmakers gave a Chinese company a 50-year concession to design, build and manage a shipping channel across the Central American nation that would compete with the Panama Canal.Japan has the world's longest undersea tunnel. The 54-km Seikan tunnel links Honshu and Hokkaido islands and started operating in 1988 after more than two decades of construction.The Channel tunnel between England and France is about 51 km long.
BEIJING — More Chinese cities may restrict vehicle purchases in a bid to fight air pollution and traffic congestion, state media reported.With more than 13 million cars sold in China last year, motor vehicles and their emissions have emerged as the chief culprit for the air pollution in large cities.Beijing, Shanghai and two other cities already curb the purchase of vehicles for private use, through lotteries and auctions of a limited number of license plates.Shi Jianhua, the deputy secretary general of the government-backed China Association of Automobile Manufacturers, was quoted Thursday as saying that eight more cities are likely to announce similar policies. The eight include the port city Tianjin, near Beijing, the metropolis Chongqing in the southwest and industrial powerhouse Shenzhen, not far from Hong Kong.Such restrictions might cut vehicle sales by 400,000 units, or 2 percent of total domestic sales, and have a "certain impact" on the country's economic growth, the China Daily newspaper quoted Shi as saying.The automakers' group, which consults with local governments and makes recommendations on vehicle policies, declined to offer details when called.China's increasingly informed and vocal citizens have successfully pushed the government to be more transparent about how bad the air in their cities is, but, as they get richer, their desire for cleaner air conflicts with their growing dependence on cars. While China is the biggest car market in the world by number of vehicles sold, there is still plenty of room for growth as the country still lags far behind developed markets in terms of the ratio of cars to people.The number of vehicles in Beijing has increased to 5.18 million from 3.13 million in early 2008, Xinhua reported earlier this year. Since the beginning of last year, prospective buyers have had to enter a monthly draw to win a license plate. Each month, 20,000 lucky winners are chosen. The number of people in the draw had reached almost 1.53 million by last month.Zhao Jian, a transport expert at Beijing's Jiaotong University's School of Economics and Management, said extending restriction-on-ownership policies to other cities was unlikely to have much effect on pollution because there were already too many cars on the roads."The restrictions on car ownership in Beijing failed to achieve what the government wanted to see because the restrictions only slowed the growth in the number of cars. They didn't reduce the numbers of cars," Zhao said."Even with proper enforcement, the policy still won't solve the air pollution problem, neither will similar measures in other cities," Zhao said.Vehicle emissions are compounded by a lack of effective public transportation, low emission standards and the slow development of energy-saving and clean automobile technologies, the Asian Development Bank said in its 2012 environmental analysis of China.
BEIJING — China's police ministry accused executives of pharmaceutical supplier GlaxoSmithKline on Thursday of conducting a large, long-running bribery campaign to persuade doctors to prescribe drugs.GSK employees are accused of paying "large bribes" laundered through travel agencies to doctors, hospitals and others to "to open new sales channels and increase drug revenues," said a Public Security Ministry announcement. It said the scheme "lasted a long time" but gave no details.They also are suspected of tax offenses involving collusion with travel agencies to issue false invoices, the ministry said. It identified the employees only as "high officials" of Britain-based GSK and gave no details of the size of payments or who received them."After questioning, the suspects confessed to the crime," the statement said.GSK said that it would cooperate with the authorities but said Thursday's announcement was the first official communication it has received about the investigation."Corruption has no place in our business," said a company statement. "If evidence of such activity is provided we would of course act swiftly on it."An employee of the police ministry press office who would give only her surname, Wang, said she could not release the GSK employees' names or other details because they have not been charged with a crime.Police in the central city of Changsha announced two weeks ago that GSK employees had been detained for questioning about unspecified "economic crimes." Thursday's statement said the investigation also took place in Shanghai and the central city of Zhengzhou.GlaxoSmithKline said in June that it had investigated an accusation that its salespeople in China bribed doctors and found no evidence of wrongdoing. The company has said the police investigation might be based on information from the same anonymous source.GlaxoSmithKline PLC is headquartered in Britain but has a presence in the United States, which could make it liable to penalties under U.S. anti-bribery laws.Last week, state media reported the government was investigating production costs for 60 foreign and domestic drug companies in a possible first step toward changing state-set maximum prices. The announcement gave no indication any companies were suspected of wrongdoing.
BEIJING — An armada of Chinese and Russian warships sailed in ceremonial formation in the Sea of Japan, off the port of Vladivostok, on Wednesday in what was the high point of joint naval exercises intended to show the growing unity between two countries with a historically uneasy relationship.China hailed the exercises as its military's largest deployment for maneuvers with a foreign country. State-run news media gave widespread coverage to the action, which included live firing drills.The commander of the Chinese fleet, Maj. Gen. Yang Junfei, told Chinese reporters that the goal was to strengthen "strategic trust" and improve coordination between the two navies.From Beijing's point of view, there was a message for Washington, too: As China rapidly builds its maritime power and the United States begins to deploy more of its naval and air assets back to the Pacific Ocean as part of its new focus on Asia, China will not stand alone.The Obama administration's decision to send more military power to Asia is widely interpreted in China as a containment policy, leading in part, some Chinese analysts say, to China's seeking stronger military and economic relations with Russia, a country it has long regarded with suspicion."This shows unprecedented good relations between China and Russia," said Professor Wang Ning, director of the Center for Russian Studies at the Shanghai International Studies University. "It shows that the two countries will support each other on the global stage."Both countries want a more multipolar world in which the United States is less dominant, he said.After being named China's president in March, Xi Jinping made his first foreign visit to Russia, where he held talks that culminated in the announcement last month of a $270 billion deal for Rosneft, the Russian state-owned oil company, to double oil supplies to China.For the exercises in the Japan Sea, China sent seven warships, including a guided-missile destroyer with Aegis-type radars that track and guide weapons to destroy enemy targets, and missile frigates with antisubmarine abilities, the Chinese Navy said. The Russian lineup included the flagship of its Pacific fleet, the guided-missile cruiser Varyag, and a Kilo-class submarine."This is our strongest lineup ever in a joint naval drill," General Yang said. "Our forces come from two fleets — the North Sea Fleet and the South Sea Fleet — and include seven ships, three helicopters and one special warfare unit."The diversity of vessels and the more sophisticated exercises illustrated a sudden deepening of the military cooperation between Russia and China, said Nan Li, associate professor in the strategic research department at the United States Naval War College in Newport, R.I.In a joint naval exercise last year between the two countries, maneuvers were restricted to counterterrorism and piracy, he said. This time the exercises included fleet air defense, antisubmarine warfare and surface warfare.But there are limitations on how close the two countries are militarily, Mr. Li said. The planning for the joint exercise seemed to be ad hoc, he said. Russia and China are well short of being formal allies and would not come to the help of the other in a "real contingency," Mr. Li said.Still, he said, the exercise off Vladivostok was comparable in number and size of ships to naval exercises the United States conducts with countries that are not allies.The drills by the Russian and Chinese warships were watched closely by Japan, a treaty ally of the United States now in a serious maritime and political dispute with China over the sovereignty of islands known as the Diaoyu in China and Senkaku in Japan.Indeed, undermining the United States' alliance with Japan was one of the goals of the joint exercise, according to the Russian-language version of a news portal, China.org, that is run by China's State Council Information Office."We can assume that they are an attempt to resist the ongoing U.S.-Japan alliance," a report on the news portal said last week before the exercises began. "Strictly speaking, most of the forces of the Russian Pacific Fleet are aimed at blocking the U.S.-Japanese island chain of primary defense."China had a similar aim, the report said. But because neither China nor Russia is strong enough on their its to break the U.S.-Japan alliance, they had chosen to intensify a "deep strategic cooperation" toward that goal.Last month, the United States Navy and Marine Corps held joint amphibious exercises with Japan's Self Defense Force off the coast of Southern California, maneuvers that were treated with skepticism in the Chinese news media.
BEIJING — Five years ago this month, a precious cargo of muddy bamboo strips arrived at the Old Library at Tsinghua University in Beijing, donated by a graduate who had acquired them in the Hong Kong art market."When we opened the box it had a bad smell. Moldy. Many were broken," said Li Xueqin, an eminent historian and paleographer at the university. Underneath the hard, impacted mud was something stunning: ancient literary texts, written on the bamboo strips in pure, stable ink. For three months, Mr. Li's team cleaned the slender strips, a difficult job because the very cells of the bamboo were saturated with water, making them as soft as cooked noodles.Inscribed with some of the earliest known texts of the Chinese classics and believed to have been illegally excavated from the tomb of a historian who lived in the state of Chu during the Warring States period, around 300 B.C., the bamboo strips are revolutionizing our understanding of ancient thought and raising issues rooted in the past that feel stunningly contemporary: Is there such a thing as fixed meaning? Is what we think of as truth actually true? Exhortations to cleave to orthodoxy — "Love the Communist Party" and "Study the Classics" — are common in China and often linked, but what, in fact, are the classics?The Tsinghua texts — totaling about 2,500 bamboo strips, including fragments, which are up to 46 centimeters, or 18 inches, long — also challenge Chinese culture as the country seeks to present itself as different from the West, said Sarah Allan, a scholar of ancient China at Dartmouth College in New Hampshire."Today, China wants to reclaim its own tradition as a counter to Western influence, but what is the nature of that tradition?" Ms. Allan said by e-mail."These manuscripts provide much entirely new information about the formative period of Chinese thought just at a time of renewed interest in what it means to be Chinese," she wrote.In a gauge of the excitement in scholarly and cultural circles, Francesco Sisci, a Beijing-based Italian journalist and classically trained scholar, compared the discovery of the manuscripts, and two other similar finds here since 1993, to the rediscovery in Europe of the pre-Christian cultures and values of Greece and Rome. It was this embrace of the classical world that prompted "the fire of Enlightenment" and "helped to free European minds from the fetters of dogmatism, justified by a superficial reading of the Bible, and launched Europe on the path to developing the modern world," Mr. Sisci wrote.The Tsinghua manuscripts and the two other collections, also dated from around 300 B.C. (one excavated from the historical Chu state area of Hubei Province, while the other was bought on the Hong Kong art market), together include: The earliest known copy of the "I Ching," the ancient book of divination; hitherto unknown poems from "The Book of Songs"; texts attributed to Confucius that are not found in later renditions of "The Analects"; the oldest version of Laozi's "Dao De Jing," or "The Taoist Book of the Way" (with many differences from later editions); and previously unknown chapters of "The Book of Documents," the Confucian history classic of speeches about good governance by model kings, which carried great political significance. This work would become a target for destruction by later rulers.It's simply extraordinary in its implications, said Mr. Li."It would be like finding the original Bible or the 'original' classics," he said in an interview at Tsinghua, as the inscribed bamboo strips lay in boxes of distilled water in a cool room on a floor above us. "It enables us to look at the classics before they were turned into 'classics.' The questions now include, what were they in the beginning, and how did they become what they became?" he asked.It's important to know that about 100 years after the texts were buried, the first Qin emperor conducted a "literary holocaust" in China, Ms. Allan said. He ordered books burned and banned private libraries, shaping the intellectual tradition for thousands of years by standardizing the written Chinese language. That required all texts to be rewritten, during which unwelcome theories were discarded.As Mr. Li, 80, said, his eyes twinkling: "The classics are all political."By predating that censorship, the bamboo strips show us the true core of China's philosophical, literary and historical thought, Ms. Allan said."The particular significance of these three groups of manuscripts lies in the date at which they were buried," she wrote in an e-mail."300 B.C. was the height of China's Axial Age, that is, it was in the middle of the period in which the core ideas of the Chinese intellectual tradition took form," she wrote. "These manuscripts speak directly to the core issues of the Chinese intellectual tradition and were recorded at the height of the formative period."They include a description of a popular, alternative political system to the dynastic rule that dominated for thousands of years — the "abdication of the good to the good as the best means of political succession," Ms. Allan wrote. A ruler would retire from office and hand power to a deserving person, who could in theory be anyone."This idea of abdication as a means of political succession was too threatening to later dynasties to survive," she wrote.Could the strips be fakes? The complex way in which the content connects to existing texts, the historical detail and physical condition rule that out, according to experts who include some of China's leading paleographers and intellectual historians. Mr. Li's team at Tsinghua carbon-dated them to 305 B.C., plus or minus 30 years."They were so saturated with water, to 400 percent, when we got them," said Liu Guozhong, a member of the Tsinghua team. Offering a homely analogy, he said, "It's like boiling noodles. You can't make over-boiled noodles without spending the time boiling them."
BEIJING — Rainstorms that are said to be the worst in five decades have flooded large areas of southwest China, washing out bridges, setting off a landslide that buried dozens of people and destroying a memorial to victims of the 2008 earthquake in Sichuan Province that flattened large parts of the same area.The state news media reported Wednesday that heavy rains, which began last weekend, have killed more than 50 people across China and disrupted two million lives.The worst flooding, in mountainous areas of Sichuan that include some of China's most spectacular scenery, highlights the challenges of encouraging construction in places that are prone to heavy downpours and seismic activity. Some experts, citing frequent earthquakes and soil erosion caused by deforestation, have argued against the continued development of towns and cities along the Min, Fu and Jian Rivers, which snake through the steep canyons of the region.The worst damage appeared to be in the city of Dujiangyan, where a rain-soaked mountainside gave way on Wednesday, burying 11 homes and as many as 40 people. Xinhua, the state news agency, said rescue workers and sniffer dogs from Chengdu, the provincial capital, were rushing to the area, which only recently recovered from the 2008 earthquake. The earthquake left 87,000 dead or missing.On Tuesday, a bridge across the Tongkou River collapsed, sending six vehicles into the water, the state news media reported. At least 12 people were still missing and presumed dead.Flooding submerged Qushan, the former county seat of Beichuan, once a city of 20,000 that was destroyed by the earthquake. The state news media said 23 feet of water had inundated a recently opened museum commemorating earthquake victims. Survivors have long since been moved to a new town center, and officials set aside about 10 square miles as a memorial.The Oriental Morning Post, a newspaper based in Shanghai, urged the government to better protect the memorial area, which contains the remains of hundreds of people whose bodies were never recovered from the rubble."If we don't take effective measures," the editorial said, "in another 10 or 20 years the ruins might not be there at all."To the north, in Shanxi Province, 12 workers were killed Tuesday night when a violent rainstorm caused the collapse of an unfinished coal mine workshop they were building, People's Daily reported, citing a statement from the city government of Jinzhong, where the accident occurred.
HONG KONG — Chinese trade data for June came in much weaker than expected on Wednesday, offering the latest evidence that China has lost much of its economic vigor as Beijing seeks to steer the economy toward steadier, but slower, expansion.Exports fell 3.1 percent from the same period a year earlier — the first drop since early 2012 — the customs department reported, and imports decreased 0.7 percent, falling for the second month in a row. Both figures were far below the expectations of analysts, who had projected a 4 percent increase in exports and an 8 percent climb in imports, according to Reuters.The weak import growth reflected slack domestic demand within China, where a cash crunch engineered by the central authorities last month has weighed on bank lending.The slump in exports in recent months, meanwhile, is partly attributable to a government crackdown on false export reporting by companies that had been seeking to bypass currency controls and move money into the country as a way to place a bet on further appreciation of the renminbi, analysts said.But while that effect may now have been largely squeezed out of the data, several other factors are likely to continue to weigh on Chinese exports in the longer term.Demand from markets like the United States and Europe remains lackluster, for example, while rising wages and a gradual increase in the value of the renminbi mean China is no longer as competitive as it once was. The renminbi has risen more than 10 percent against the U.S. dollar since mid-2010, when the authorities allowed the currency to fluctuate more widely against the dollar.The weakness in the trade data, some analysts said Wednesday, could prompt Beijing to stop the renminbi from rising much further. Yao Wei, China economist at Société Générale in Hong Kong, said she expected the renminbi to weaken slightly, to 6.17 per dollar by the end of this year, from about 6.13 now.Over all, however, the new leadership in Beijing appears ready to tolerate some economic pain while it pursues the longer-term gain of a more balanced economy. Growth in China has been cooling for many months as the authorities seek to shift the economy away from a credit-driven and increasingly outdated growth model. For years, China has relied on heavy manufacturing, state-sponsored investment and exports to power growth. Aware of the limits of those growth drivers, Beijing is now seeking to foster more domestic demand and to raise productivity.Policy makers have also been seeking to rein in a big expansion in credit, which has generated concerns about asset price bubbles and possible loan defaults. Last month's cash crunch within the banking sector, for example, appeared aimed at getting lenders to adopt more prudent lending practices.The cost of the overhaul is slower growth, however, and a growing number of analysts say that China will struggle to meet its growth targets this year.China is unlikely to achieve its target for this year of 8 percent growth in trade, Liu Li-Gang, a China economist at Australia & New Zealand Banking in Hong Kong, wrote in a note. "This will not only bring about downside risk to the G.D.P. growth for this year but also place severe pressure on employment," Mr. Liu wrote, referring to gross domestic product.So far, however, Beijing appears comfortable with the economy's performance and is unlikely to revert to stimulating growth again unless the job market deteriorates sharply, Ms. Yao of Société Générale said. "They seem pretty determined right now. The key thing to watch is the labor market, but this is still looking O.K."Comments from the prime minister, Li Keqiang, at a meeting in southern China on Tuesday reinforced the view that Beijing appeared prepared to press ahead with its economic overhaul."This year, economic activity has in general stayed stable, and the main indicators are still within reasonable bounds for the annual forecasts," Mr. Li said, according to the state-run Xinhua news agency."But economic conditions have become more complex and changeable," he added. "There are both favorable and unfavorable factors, and the economy has both momentum for growth and downward pressures."China must maintain steady growth while also carrying out adjustments needed to ensure healthy development in the long-term, he said. "Macro adjustment must be both grounded in the present and take a long-term view, so that economic activity is within reasonable bounds, and the rate of economic growth and employment levels do not slip below the lower limit."
BEIJING — Typhoon Soulik has been downgraded to a storm after forcing the evacuation of hundreds of thousands of people in southeast China and killed at least two in Taiwan.China's National Meteorological Center said it was downgraded to a tropical storm by late Saturday, and by early Sunday morning after moving inland from Fujian province, it had further weakened to a tropical low pressure.The typhoon had disrupted transportation and commerce across Taiwan, cutting power to 520,000 homes around Taipei before hitting coastal Fujian on Saturday afternoon, where about 300,000 people were evacuated from their homes, according to the official Xinhua News Agency.Earlier, Soulik had buffeted large areas of northern and central Taiwan with torrential rains, forcing authorities to close schools and businesses throughout northern Taiwan.A falling brick killed a 50-year-old policeman in the Taipei suburb of Tanshui, while in Miaoli, a 54-year-old women died after falling from her roof. One man in the central city of Taichung was listed as missing after being swept into a raging river.Throughout Taiwan, the National Fire Agency reported there were at least 104 injuries.
SHANGHAI — Chinese investigators said Thursday that executives from GlaxoSmithKline, the British drug giant, had admitted to using bribes, kickbacks and other fraudulent means to bolster drug sales in China.The Ministry of Public Security said people working for the drug maker had bribed doctors, hospitals and government officials and funneled illicit payoffs through travel agencies, pharmaceutical industry associations and project financing.The government did not name any executives or detailed figures. But it said the case involved "huge amounts of money."The investigation appears to be part of a broad government crackdown on fraud and corruption involving foreign companies.The announcement came about a week after the authorities raided offices and detained people working for GlaxoSmithKline in three different cities, including Shanghai, according to the state-run news media.The government findings released Thursday were unexpected because executives at GlaxoSmithKline had said just last week that an internal investigation of its China operations found no evidence of bribery or corrupt activities.A spokesman for the company said last week that the company had initiated its own investigation after a whistle-blower at the company came forward this year with accusations of wrongdoing in the China operation.On Thursday, a spokesman for GlaxoSmithKline said that the company was willing to cooperate with the investigation and that the Chinese announcement represented the first details of the case the company had been informed about.The company also released a statement saying: "We take all allegations of bribery and corruption seriously. We continuously monitor our businesses to ensure they meet our strict compliance procedures. We have done this in China and found no evidence of bribery or corruption of doctors or government officials. However, if evidence of such activity is provided we will act swiftly on it."Like many other large pharmaceutical companies, Glaxo has been investing significantly in China and other emerging markets, seeking to capitalize on a growing middle class that can increasingly afford to pay for prescription drugs.Although China still accounts for a small fraction of Glaxo's business, sales in the country grew 17 percent in 2012, to $1.2 billion.Sales in emerging markets accounted for about a quarter of the company's business in 2012.Earlier this year, The Wall Street Journal reported that a whistle-blower had shared some information with the newspaper and claimed that executives at the company had bribed doctors and hospitals.It is unclear whether the investigation by the Ministry of Public Security is linked to the whistle-blower.Regulators in China are reviewing the prices and production costs of major Chinese and global drug companies in what appears to be an effort to lower drug prices.Feng Zhanchun, who specializes in public health at Huazhong University of Science and Technology in Wuhan, China, said that the Chinese pharmaceutical market was struggling to adapt to market forces."Economic crimes, including commercial bribery and kickbacks, are one of the negative results generated in the transitional period in China," he said in a telephone interview. "In the midst of a transition from a planned economy to a market economy, laws and regulations are not fully in place, and medical institutions have no perfect operational mechanisms."China is one of the world's fastest-growing markets for pharmaceutical products, but the government has long held tight control over pricing of certain drugs.Still, in a country where kickbacks are common and the sales channels for many products are swayed by bribery, travel vouchers and payoffs, it is not unusual for major corporations to come under scrutiny from Chinese or Western regulators.
BEIJING — Authorities in a southern Chinese city on Saturday scrapped a plan to build a uranium-processing plant, one day after hundreds of local residents protested against it because of safety concerns.The city government of Heshan in Guangdong province said in an online statement that it would halt the 37 billion yuan ($6 billion) project by China National Nuclear Corp., which would have built facilities for uranium conversion and enrichment, and the manufacturing of nuclear fuel equipment."The people's government of the city of Heshan has decided to respect the public opinion and will not consider CNNC's Longwan industrial park project," read the one-line announcement.CNNC could not be immediately reached for comment, but its plans are part of national efforts to reduce China's reliance on coal and to boost the use of clean energy.In March, the corporation signed agreements with the Heshan government regarding both land use and investment for the industrial park, according to state media.Saturday's announcement by the Heshan government came after hundreds of protesters paraded through the streets of Jiangmen on Friday, holding banners and wearing T-shirts with phrases opposing the project while chanting slogans. "Give us back our rural homes. We are against nuclear radiation," they shouted in scenes seen in television video.Heshan is part of the greater Jiangmen area. The protest was in response to a risk evaluation report of the planned project, which was released July 4 with a 10-day public comment period. Critics say those reports usually are a formality designed to facilitate approval.Local officials initially responded by extending the consultation period by another 10 days, but by Saturday morning they said the plan was scrapped.Increasingly aware of environmental safety, members of the Chinese public have been taking to the streets to oppose environmentally risky projects, and local governments have yielded under public pressure in some cases — by scrapping the projects, postponing them or relocating them.Those unsanctioned protests — which can turn violent — have become a major source of social unrest in China and pose a challenge to local governments that must balance between maintaining social order and boosting economic growth.The Jiangshan incident also shows that environmental disputes usually get solved in streets instead of town halls. Environmentalists have long called on local governments to take steps allowing for greater transparency and better public involvement when introducing projects that may be environmentally risky.
Metta World Peace , better known in his youth as Ron Artest of Queensbridge, could return home to finish his N.B.A. career if the stars align this weekend.Waived by the Los Angeles Lakers on Friday, World Peace could be a free agent by late Sunday afternoon. The Knicks have interest, and a dire need for frontcourt muscle. A homecoming is possible. But it depends on several unpredictable factors, not the least of which is World Peace himself.On Friday, World Peace told two Los Angeles reporters that he has no desire to play in the N.B.A. next season."I don't really want to play for anybody," he said, according to ESPN Los Angeles. "I don't want to go anywhere. I want to go to China, or coach or play arena football."World Peace said he had spoken with Yao Ming, his former Houston Rockets teammate, about playing for the Shanghai Sharks, which Yao owns.Given his reputation, there is no telling whether World Peace was being serious or whimsical, or perhaps just trying to scare off teams in the waiver process. He was just as cagey on Twitter, declaring, "I'm retiring and playing hockey."The Lakers cut World Peace under the N.B.A.'s amnesty provision, which comes with distinct waiver procedures. Teams with salary-cap room have 48 hours to bid on his services. If no bids are submitted by 5 p.m. Sunday, then he will be free to sign with any team.As of Friday, only five teams had enough cap room to make a bid: the Atlanta Hawks, Charlotte Bobcats, Cleveland Cavaliers, Philadelphia 76ers and Utah Jazz. Of that group, only the Cavaliers — who just signed Andrew Bynum and are pushing to make the playoffs — seem to make sense as a potential suitor. The others are in various states of rebuilding and would hardly seem to need a 33-year-old enforcer with an eccentric reputation.The Knicks are far over the cap and cannot make an amnesty bid. If World Peace reaches free agency, they could offer him the veteran's minimum, about $1.4 million. Other teams could potentially offer more. In any case, World Peace will still collect the $7.7 million the Lakers owed him.Despite his flaky reputation and his age, World Peace is still a tough, savvy defender who can hit the corner 3-pointer and is regarded as a great teammate. He has talked often about his desire to play for his hometown team, although he dismissed the notion on Friday."I wanted to play in New York when I was in my prime and I was young, fierce, lockdown," he said. "Madison Square Garden, that would have been sick. But right now, China is way more adventurous for me."For now, the Knicks can only wait and watch and hope that, if the circumstances are right, they can give World Peace a chance — to come home.
BEIJING — Five days of torrential rain in China's southwest has killed 31 people and left more than 160 others missing, the state news media reported on Friday. Most of those affected are in a mountainous stretch of Sichuan Province that only recently recovered from the 2008 earthquake that left 87,000 people dead or missing.The storms have inundated a memorial to earthquake victims in the city of Beichuan, washed away several bridges and forced the relocation of 220,000 people across the region, according to Xinhua, the state news agency. On Wednesday, it said more than 2,000 people had been rescued from inside a highway tunnel after they spent the night trapped by a landslide.At least 18 others died after a road-soaked hillside gave way above a resort in the city of Dujiangyan, the authorities said, with 110 others were still missing. Meteorologists said 37 inches of rain had fallen there since Monday. Forecasts called for more rain next week.
BEIJING — Hundreds of people took to the streets of a city in China's southern Guangdong Province on Friday to protest a proposed uranium processing plant that would be the nation's largest when completed.Participants said that as many as 1,000 residents "took a walk" through Jiangmen, a city less than 60 miles from Hong Kong, to express their opposition to the plant, which officials say could enrich enough nuclear fuel to provide roughly half of China's atomic energy needs by 2020.Unsanctioned public gatherings are prohibited in China, but marchers said the police had largely held back as the crowd moved through the city carrying banners that read "Yes to Children, No to Nukes" and "Fight Nukes or Die!"Organized through social media and billed as an innocent stroll through the streets of Jiangmen, the demonstration was the latest example of urban Chinese willing to defy the authorities over environmental concerns. The government would not be likely to tolerate a similar gathering to demand political reform or an easing of news media restrictions.Reached by phone, several residents said they were outraged to learn about the plant only last week when the government announced the project and then gave the public 10 days to submit comments. "They didn't even let us know about it until it was almost started," one man, Liang Naihe, said in an interview.The authorities apparently worked hard to head off the protest by deleting posts on Sina Weibo, China's version of Twitter, but some participants said they had learned about it through WeChat, an increasingly popular walkie-talkie-like app that is harder to censor.A 26-year-old accountant who joined the protest said that most of the marchers had ben tech-savvy college graduates in their 20s and 30s, but that there had also been a large number of factory workers who had been given time off by their supervisors so they could join. He said the protesters were planning to return to the streets on Sunday if the government refused to cancel the $6.5 billion project."Even though the government claims that this plant is harmless and 100 percent safe, we just don't trust them," said the accountant, who gave his name as Ah Ding. "We're already scared to drink the water. Maybe it will be O.K. for this generation, but what about the next?"Local officials, seemingly startled by the size of the protest, responded by holding a news conference in which the mayor promised to extend the public comment period by 10 days.Critics said they were most bothered by the lack of transparency and their inability to play any role in determining where the plant would be built. The Jiangmen City Development and Reform Bureau has so far offered scant detail about the production process, how the spent nuclear fuel would be handled and where it would be stored."The main concerns are not about an accident but about leaks and safety," said Prentice Koo, a senior campaigner at Greenpeace in Hong Kong. "Right now the information provided to the public is not really enough to assess the risks."Seeking to calm nerves, the local government posted a question-and-answer section on its Web site, although many of the answers were decidedly lacking in substance. One questioner asked about the potential dangers should the plant be bombed during a hypothetical war with the United States.The answer: "Given that it is a civilian nuclear facility, the plant is protected by international law and could not be attacked during wartime."Many people were not convinced. Some, including Chen Guanming, took to Weibo to express their displeasure. Mr. Chen said that if there was no stopping the plant, he had just one request: "All municipal leaders and their families should live near the plant. Let them enjoy their great achievement at closest range, and then we won't have anything more to say."
BEIJING — A group of Vietnamese tourists who became trapped by a landslide in northwest China amid weeklong storms that have killed at least 89 people have reached a major town, Chinese state media reported Sunday.At least 100 tourists, including the 38 Vietnamese, became trapped Friday night in Gansu province after a landslide cut off traffic, the official Xinhua News Agency said. They were en route to a nature reserve in Sichuan province, which has been hit the hardest by the storms, and had reached accommodation by later that night following road repair work to free them.They finally arrived in the central city of Xi'an on Sunday morning, but have canceled their travel plans, Xinhua said, citing local authorities. A man on duty at the Xi'an city government office said Sunday that he had no information to share. The whereabouts of the remaining tourists was unknown.Meanwhile, a collapsed dam triggered a flood at a scenic spot in the southern province of Guangxi on Sunday afternoon, killing eight tourists and injuring five others, Xinhua reported. Authorities were searching for an unknown number of missing. It was unclear whether the dam collapsed as a result of the storms.Sichuan has reported at least 48 storm-related deaths over the past week. A massive mudslide that struck a scenic resort outside the city of Dujiangyan in Sichuan on Wednesday killed 43 people.Flooding in Sichuan was the worst in 50 years for some areas, with more than 220,000 people forced to evacuate. Mudslides and flooding are common in China's mountainous areas, killing hundreds of people every year.In the northwest province of Shaanxi, 26 people died in landslides or house collapses. At least 12 workers were killed in the northern province of Shanxi when a violent rainstorm collapsed an unfinished coal mine workshop. Another three people were drowned in a car in Hebei province outside Beijing.
BEIJING — In an unusually vigorous rebuttal to Japan 's latest accusations that China is using aggressive tactics to expand its maritime reach, the Chinese Defense Ministry said Japan was undermining stability in the region with its claims to disputed islands known as the Diaoyu in China and the Senkakus in Japan.The Defense Ministry, which issued its statement on Friday, rarely mentions another country by name, Chinese experts said.The Chinese military is "strongly discontented and resolutely against" the accusations in a Japanese white paper, an annual assessment of the country's military situation, a spokesman for China's Defense Ministry, Geng Yansheng, said in a statement.The heated exchange, which started after the Japanese government issued its defense paper last week, underlined the intensifying distrust between the two nations, both of which dispatch ships and planes to patrol the islands in the East China Sea. Japan has administered the islands for decades.Experts said the strongly worded statements on both sides may be a precursor to worsening dynamics between the two countries as each tries to outmaneuver the other in the region and talk each other down in diplomatic settings. The enmity is partly historical, driven by grievances from imperial Japan's land grabs in the late 1800s and early 1900s, and from World War II.Japan's purchase of some of the uninhabited islands in September stirred outrage in China, where many see them as Chinese territory that remains in Japan's hands from its foray into empire-building. Japan says China started showing interest in the islands only in recent decades, after scientists found evidence of nearby undersea oil and natural gas deposits.The latest battle of words comes as China says it has gained ground in its claims to the islands with almost continuous maritime patrols since September.In Japan, Prime Minister Shinzo Abe's conservative party appears headed for an electoral victory in upper-house elections this month that would enable the nationalistic leader, if he chooses, to try to alter the antiwar Constitution so that Japan could maintain a regular army rather than a self-defense force. That would incense China and drastically alter the regional security architecture that is already shifting under the weight of China's growing military strength.Whether Mr. Abe decides to aim for such far-reaching change or not, China is watching closely as the Japanese leader forms new defense guidelines that will almost certainly result in a more robust posture by the Japanese military.The Abe government has already announced a 0.8 increase in military spending, the first rise in 11 years, but still a small fraction of the gains by the Chinese military over the past decade.The Japanese white paper was the "toughest" ever on China, and reflected the intense concern about China's military gains, particularly by the rapidly modernizing navy, said Prof. Hu Lingyuan, the deputy director of the Center for Japanese Studies at Fudan University in Shanghai."Abe let it all out," Professor Hu said of the white paper. "Traditionally, the Japanese are more ambiguous, but this time it was quite direct."The report said the Chinese had repeatedly intruded into Japan's territorial waters and violated Japan's airspace. It added that China resorted to "highhanded" tactics that were inconsistent with international law, and had taken "dangerous actions that could lead to unintended consequences."Underlining the unease in Japan about China's military spending and technical progress, the report said the Chinese held a vast advantage in sheer numbers of vessels and planes. It estimated that China had 970 ships and 2,580 aircraft; Japan had 141 ships and 410 aircraft.But China's numerical superiority does not translate into operational superiority, said Prof. Bernard D. Cole of the National War College in Washington. The Japan Maritime Self-Defense Force remained ahead in technology, and the experience and expertise of its personnel were far better, Professor Cole said.Although the Japan Air Self-Defense Force was outmatched in the number of aircraft by China's air force, Japanese pilots were more experienced and flew many more hours than the Chinese, he said. Still, the Chinese air force flew more advanced aircraft than the Japanese, he said.For the first time, Professor Cole said, the Japanese white paper reflected Tokyo's shift in defense security concerns from the north, where the Soviet Union was the threat during the cold war, to the southwest, focusing on China.Which country would prevail in a clash between Japanese and Chinese vessels in the East China Sea was hard to predict, Professor Cole said."It would depend on many factors, including location, weather and whether the incident was preplanned by one side," he said. "That said, the Japanese maritime self-defense force remains superior to the People's Liberation Army Navy."But that edge is fading, experts say. The International Institute for Strategic Studies in London said in "The Military Balance 2013," its annual report on militaries around the world, that China was quickly reinforcing its paramilitary naval forces as part of its overall naval power-projection effort.The China Marine Surveillance force, which conducts most of the patrols around the disputed islands, would receive 36 new vessels over the next five years, as well as a number of old navy ships, the report said.The modernization of China's navy, and the political emphasis placed on maritime strength by the new Chinese government, made the Japanese "very nervous," said Professor Hu, of Fudan University.He said, however, that Japan was overreacting. "Japan is overly sensitive," Professor Hu said. "China developing its naval strength or military strength is not necessarily directed at Japan."
HONG KONG — One day after a rare public protest, Chinese authorities said Saturday that they were abandoning plans to construct a uranium processing plant in southeastern China, where residents raised concerns about its safety and potential environmental impact.The decision not to proceed with the plant in Guangdong Province, less than 60 miles from Hong Kong, came after hundreds of people turned out on Friday and "took a walk" through the city of Jiangmen carrying banners showing their opposition to the proposed plant, which would have been capable of processing half the fuel needed for China's nuclear power needs. Unsanctioned gatherings are banned in China, but participants said the police did not intervene to stop the protest.The Jiangmen City government Web site said Saturday that the project had been "canceled," and Southern Daily, the official newspaper of the Communist Party in Guangdong, said the decision was made "out of respect for public opinion."The protest in Jiangmen was the latest display of growing public disquiet about environmental hazards, which could frustrate China's ambitious plans for nuclear power and technology. The catastrophic failures at nuclear power plants in Fukushima, Japan, in 2011, also kindled anxiety in China about its expansion of nuclear power.That expansion is a major part of China's plans to decrease the reliance on coal, and the government has indicated that by 2020 it wants nuclear reactors to provide about 5 percent or more of the country's power, up from about 2 percent now.The government has also faced a widespread public outcry over the air pollution enshrouding Beijing and many other major Chinese cities, forcing officials to begin instituting a series of measures to try to control emissions.Word of the planned protest against the proposed Guangdong plant had spread rapidly in recent days on Chinese social media despite government efforts to censor the discussion on Sina Weibo, China's version of Twitter. Opponents were also planning another protest for Sunday.Some opponents were outraged the public was given only 10 days to comment on the plans, while others said they were upset that the public had no apparent role in deciding where the plant would be located.
BEIJING — More than a quarter of Chinese children with disabilities don't get to go to school, while many of those who do are blocked from mainstream institutions or taught by untrained teachers, a human rights group said.The report released Tuesday by New York-based Human Rights Watch said Chinese students with disabilities are denied access to regular schools unless they can prove they can adapt to the schools' physical and learning environment, and that accommodations for such students are "little to none."In one example, the group said a mother went to school several times a day to carry her child up and down stairs because the restroom was on a different floor from the classroom.The report sheds light on how China's burgeoning problem of social inequality — even in education — applies to people with disabilities. In China, there is only a nascent public awareness of the issues that people with disabilities face.Prejudice and social stigma run high in this deeply competitive society, driving many parents to abandon children with disabilities to China's chronically underfunded state orphanage system.Just days before the Human Rights Watch report was released, China's Education Ministry issued its own report on the same topic.The ministry's report said that 28 percent of Chinese children with disabilities are not enrolled in China's compulsory nine-year education. But it said the 72 percent enrollment rate represented a jump of nearly 10 percentage points from 2008, and that an increasing number of disabled students were in regular schools with proper accommodations.Maya Wang, a researcher for the rights group, said the ministry's report failed to show how it was making mainstream schools more accessible to disabled students, as the government is obligated to do under an international treaty on the rights of disabled people that Beijing ratified in 2008.Yang Zhanqing, an independent advocate for people with disabilities, said the HRW report is "quite objective" but that the picture would be worse if interviewees from remote, mountainous regions were included in the research.Another activist had harsher words on the overall situation."No Chinese student with disabilities has his or her rights fully protected," said Cheng Yuan of the non-governmental agency Ganzhilu, which helps people with disabilities.In its report, the Education Ministry said both central and local governments have pumped funding into special education. Of all 378,800 students with disabilities in Chinese schools, more than half are in regular schools with necessary accommodations, including home tutoring, the ministry said.It said schools in at least three major eastern cities are banned from turning away any student with disabilities.However, Human Rights Watch said the reality was different. Despite government policies ensuring access for children with disabilities, many of them have in practice been denied admission to mainstream schools or pressured to leave, the report said. Often, teachers have received little training to adjust to the needs of children with disabilities, it said.Human Rights Watch also said those who are bright enough for higher education are often denied admission under guidelines set up by the government. The guidelines advise universities of the types of "physiological defects" and "illnesses" that make a person "unable to take care of themselves or complete their studies."The ministry said school programs take into account the students' physical capabilities as well as market needs.Human Rights Watch said its report was based on more than 60 interviews with children and young people with disabilities and their parents.
BEIJING — China has failed to provide equal access to education for children with disabilities, leaving nearly 40 percent of its disabled population illiterate, a U.S.-based human rights watchdog said on Tuesday.Interviews with more than 60 disabled children and their parents show that schools in China deny such students admission, pressure them to leave and provide no appropriate classroom accommodation to help overcome their disabilities, Human Rights Watch said in a report."Children with disabilities have the right to attend regular schools like all other children, and are entitled to support for their particular learning needs," said Sophie Richardson, China director at Human Rights Watch.China, which has at least 83 million people with disabilities, is working on a draft regulation to give sufferers the right to an education. Attitudes to the disabled are slowly changing, especially after China hosted the Paralympic Games in 2008.But people with disabilities still suffer from discrimination, in part because of the social stigma engendered by a government that once barred people with physical or mental disabilities from marrying or giving birth in some provinces.China has guidelines advising higher education institutes to bar students with what are referred to as certain physical and mental "defects", Human Rights Watch said.About 28 percent of China's disabled children do not receive compulsory basic education, the group says.Cheng Yuan, a disability rights activist in Nanjing, told Reuters that 70 percent of children with disabilities were forced to attend mainstream schools."Even if they are sitting in the classroom, they are not getting the education they deserve," Cheng said."The government has claimed that every five years, there will be a development program for people with disabilities. But according to the previous outlines, they've never been implemented."
BEIJING — A woman who became a symbol for the groundswell of opposition to China's labor camp system scored a rare victory Monday in an appeal for compensation in a case that generated a huge public outcry.The Hunan Provincial People's High Court ruled in favor of Tang Hui, who last year was sentenced to 18 months in a labor camp for petitioning for harsher penalties for the men who abducted, raped and prostituted her 11-year-old daughter.At the time, Tang's case drew massive public opposition and she was released within days.The labor camp — or "re-education through labor" — system was established to punish early critics of the Communist Party but now is used by local officials to deal with people challenging their authority on issues including land rights and corruption. Cases like Tang's last year have galvanized critics, many of them within the government, and public expectations for reform have grown.In January, Tang sued the labor commission of the city of Yongzhou for an apology and compensation but the lawsuit was rejected four months later. She then appealed to the provincial court.On Monday, the court ordered the labor commission to pay Tang 2,941 yuan ($500) for violating her personal freedom and causing mental damage, Tang's lawyers said.Tang could not immediately be reached for comment as calls to her mobile phone rang unanswered. One of her lawyers, Xu Liping, said Tang has accepted the ruling and that to a large extent, it offered comfort to her."To Tang Hui, this is a relatively big turning point for her. Now she can start to regain a normal life," Xu said.Tang's other lawyer, Pu Zhiqiang, said the lawsuit's significance was limited because it was focused on obtaining compensation rather than questioning the legality of the labor camp sentence she had been given."The court ruling is a result of a compromise between the various forces that are exerting influence over the case. Of course it's not as though real justice or fairness has been achieved," Pu said.Pu said Tang had been pressured by local authorities not to file an appeal against the labor camp sentence itself and so her only avenue for redress later was to seek financial compensation."From the perspective of compensation, this ruling has been based on evidence and should be welcomed," Pu said. "I personally feel that the court has done to the greatest extent what it can do under the present circumstances."The ruling also came across as the court's tacit acknowledgment that Tang's case was particularly egregious, said Zhang Ming, a China politics professor at Renmin University."For people like Tang Hui, it is totally unfair. Her daughter had been through a horrible experience, and you send her to labor camp? It can't be justified," Zhang said.The court, however, ruled that Tang's request for a written apology from the Yongzhou labor commission could not be granted because there was no legal basis for it.This could be a strategy for the authorities to avoid acknowledging wrongdoing, Zhang said. "Even if the labor committee lost this lawsuit, it doesn't mean they're admitting that they were wrong," he said.Associated Press researcher Flora Ji contributed to this report.
HONG KONG — While there are plenty of academic institutions looking to enter China , the University of Macau is taking a more radical approach: It is abandoning its current campus and relocating entirely to Zhuhai, just across the mainland Chinese border.That means moving 10,000 students and faculty, 650,000 books and about 60 laboratories. But what is most striking is that the new campus will be governed by the laws of Macau, not Beijing, despite its location.Macau, like Hong Kong, is a former European colony that returned to Chinese rule in the 1990s, but is governed semiautonomously. The two cities have their own currencies, passports and border control, as well as freedoms like uncensored Internet access.When classes start in September, the University of Macau's new campus — still under construction on about a square kilometer, or roughly 250 acres, on Hengqin Island in southern Guangdong Province — will be "handed over" to Macau governance in accordance with a 2009 bill by the National People's Congress in Beijing.Students, most of whom will be from Macau, will gain access to the new campus via an underwater tunnel without the usual immigration checks. Concrete barriers will cut it off from the rest of China. The setup is one reason the campus will have its own fire and police stations.It will also have an online hookup — including 3,800 WiFi hotspots — exempt from the restrictions commonly known as the Great Firewall of China."As the new campus will be under the jurisdiction of Macau, Internet and telecommunications services will continue to be provided by Macau providers," said Wei Zhao, the University of Macau's rector. "What students can access in the current campus will be accessible in the new campus, YouTube and Facebook included," he said, referring to two popular Web sites blocked on the mainland.China has made exceptions to Internet censorship before, during the 2008 Beijing Olympics, for example. And in terms of governance, there are some gray areas along the Hong Kong and Macau borders, mostly at customs checkpoints.But experts interviewed for this article said there was no recent precedence for a chunk of Chinese land being passed to another legal jurisdiction in this manner, and certainly not for the sake of academic freedom.While many professors and students in China find ways to jump the firewall, no other mainland campus has its own officially uncensored Internet connection.Jorge A.F. Godinho, an associate professor at the University of Macau's law faculty, called it a "curious situation.""This piece of land is not legally an enlargement of Macau, but in practice, it is," he said. "There won't be a border or Internet censorship or anything."But he added that in historic terms, "it's an interesting twist." "If there's a crime committed, Macau law applies and Macau courts will rule on it," he said.The Macau government has paid 1.2 billion Macau patacas, or about $150 million, for a 40-year lease. It is also funding the new 9.8 billion-pataca construction.What is also curious is the temporary nature of the agreement — as if laws can be turned on and off, for a given time frame, for a given price."It's not permanent. It's a rental — and Macau is paying" Dr. Godinho said.The lease expires in 2049, the same year that the "one country, two systems" agreement giving Macau semi-autonomous governance ends.Foreign universities have long been interested in entering the Chinese market, despite bureaucratic hurdles and concerns about academic freedom.Johns Hopkins University in Baltimore and Nanjing University opened a Center for Chinese and American Studies in 1986 in Nanjing.In 2004, the University of Nottingham Ningbo, a collaboration with a British institution, became the country's first official Chinese-foreign university campus.New York University's new Shanghai campus is opening in September. But it came under criticism when Chen Guangcheng — a dissident who first found refuge in the U.S. Embassy in Beijing and later at N.Y.U.'s main U.S. campus — said in June that he was forced out because the N.Y.U. administration was worried about its relations with China, a claim the university denied.The Juilliard School in New York, an elite performing arts academy, is planning to open its first overseas branch in Tianjin, a city outside Beijing, in 2016, though its China branch will not grant degrees. Duke University in North Carolina is scheduled to open Duke Kunshan University in a city outside Shanghai.Other institutions have opted for research outposts. The Harvard Center Shanghai and the University of Chicago Center in Beijing opened in 2010, followed by the Stanford Center at Peking University in 2012. In the same vein, the University of Pennsylvania is planning a Penn Wharton China Center in Beijing.They should not hold their breath if they are looking for an exemption from Chinese law.Fu Hualing, a constitutional scholar at the University of Hong Kong and an expert on Chinese cross-border legal relations, said that in terms of governance, the University of Macau case was "not the same as China renting a place to a foreign university."
MACAU — Natalie Chan collected bets, dealt cards and calculated payoffs. She was not a croupier working in a casino — in fact, at 20, she was not even old enough to be on the gambling floor at the glitzy casinos just a short walk from campus.But she is learning the tricks of the trade through a program meant to train Macau residents to run the hotels and casinos that have made this city Asia's answer to Las Vegas.Last summer, Ms. Chan completed a dealer training course on a mock casino floor, in a room equipped with roulette wheels, blackjack tables and slot machines run by the Macao Polytechnic Institute's Gaming Teaching and Research Center."It wasn't as easy as I expected it to be," said Ms. Chan, who learned how to play blackjack and baccarat. "At the end of the training, we had an assessment and I had to perform several calculations while dealing the cards. It was challenging."Ms. Chan is a third-year student at the University of Macau's Hospitality and Gaming Management program, which grooms students for managerial and executive positions in the booming gambling and hospitality industry. Casino floor training is just one part of the course."Besides learning about the games, the training allowed me to experience what the dealers go through, the stressful environment that they have to work in, as well as what makes them tired," Ms. Chan explained. "It gave me an idea of the things I need to be aware of when managing dealers in future."Macau opened its doors to major U.S. investors like Sands and Wynn Resorts when it liberalized its casino industry in 2002. It now has at least 35 casinos employing more than 81,000 staff. Its gambling revenue, which outpaces that of the Las Vegas Strip, is aided by the fact that casino gambling is illegal in mainland China, which sends more than 20 million visitors to the city each year.But the sudden boom, combined with a lack of good local training, meant that many top-level positions were filled by expatriates from the West or other Asian cities like Hong Kong.Amy So, coordinator for the Hospitality and Gaming Management program, said there were almost no education options in the field when the program opened in 2003."Before we started this program, Macau wanted to develop the hospitality and gaming industry, but at that time there were not a lot of people working in this profession and there were no such degrees offered," she said.Admission is competitive, with only 72 spots for 360 applicants last year, though Dr. So said the program might be expanded in the future.In recent years, it has evolved to cater to the emergence of huge family-friendly entertainment complexes, as opposed to the narrowly gambling-focused casinos that existed a decade ago. "I think the trend of this industry is moving toward developing integrated resorts where all the departments — including hotel, gaming, retail, conventions and exhibitions — work together," Dr. So said.The university's courses also cover business, marketing, technology, events management, and food and beverage operations. Students have the choice of specializing in one of two streams: gambling management or convention and hospitality management.Third-year students can join a two-week field trip to Las Vegas and Hawaii. They take morning courses at the University of Nevada, Las Vegas, which offers degrees in hospitality management and hotel administration, and spend afternoons at casinos and hotels.Kitty Kuong, 23, went on the trip last year. She said that Macau had room for improvement in comparison with the United States, where travel agents, hotels and the government work together. She will be among the first batch of students to graduate from the University of Macau's convention and hospitality management stream this year."I can learn both the gaming aspects and also the hospitality aspects of the integrated resorts," she said. "Also, some of the lecturers are from the industry. It is a good way for us to be in touch."
BEIJING — Beijing's top representative in Hong Kong met Tuesday with local lawmakers to ease tensions between the mainland and its special administrative region, though he warned against a planned protest and said Hong Kongers will never get to nominate their own leadership candidates without central government approval.The working lunch marked the first meeting between the head of the central government's liaison office and the full membership of Hong Kong's Legislative Council since the former British colony returned to Chinese rule in 1997.Not all lawmakers attended, however, and Beijing's representative Zhang Xiaoming seemed to dampen the mood further by flatly ruling out the right of Hong Kong residents to nominate their own candidates in future elections for chief executive, Hong Kong's top local leader.Lee Cheuk-yan Lee, a member of the council's pan-democratic camp, told reporters after the meeting that Zhang's out-and-out rejection calls into question Beijing's commitment to the substance of democracy, and not just its superficial appearance."So again, the talk on universal suffrage is actually suggesting that there is not going to be a genuine one," Lee said.When China regained Hong Kong, it agreed to allow the special administrative region to keep its own political system and Western-style civil liberties such as freedom of speech until 2047. Beijing has pledged to let Hong Kongers pick their chief executive no earlier than 2017 and the entire legislature by 2020, but residents of the city are frustrated that there have been few signs of progress.Anxiety that Hong Kong will be denied full democracy has grown in recent months after Beijing officials said the city's next leader must be acceptable to the central government.Many residents fear the rights and freedoms they enjoy will be eaten away by mainland China's growing influence. Further complicating the relationship: City residents are increasingly irritated by a flood of mainland visitors to Hong Kong — 35 million last year alone.Tuesday's meeting came after tens of thousands of Hong Kongers took to the streets July 1 to demand promised democratic reforms, along with the resignation of their widely-disliked. Beijing-backed leader, Leung Chun-ying, who has been beset by one controversy after another since he took office a year ago.Zhang said the central government is serious about eventually allowing all Hong Kongers to vote for the chief executive, who is now selected by a small, Beijing-controlled body. But he echoed Beijing's insistence that all candidates must be deemed acceptable by the mainland government.He also criticized a proposal calling for at least 10,000 people to peacefully block roads in Hong Kong's central business district in July 2014 if the government fails to outline a plan for full democracy."No matter how nicely the initiator of the movement put his words, no matter how he packaged the idea or beautified it, illegal is illegal," Zhang said.Pro-Beijing lawmakers were upbeat about the meeting, with one, Tam Yiu-chung, calling Zhang's remarks "very positive."Political scientist Sonny Lo of the Hong Kong Institute of Education said the meeting was intended to demonstrate that Beijing is responding to concerns and to tamp down some of the outrage behind this month's massive pro-democracy rally.Beijing wishes to "demonstrate to the pan-democrats and people of Hong Kong that the central government is heeding the voice of the public," Lo said.
BEIJING — Three Chinese activists agitating for officials to disclose their assets will be put on trial, their lawyers said on Tuesday, in a coordinated crackdown that underscores the limits of an anti-corruption push by the new government.China has detained at least 15 activists in recent months who were involved in a campaign pushing for officials to publicly disclose their wealth in what rights groups describe as the first major crackdown by the new government on activists.The move to put the anti-corruption activists on trial has raised fears that an official campaign of reprisals has begun.Liu Ping, Li Sihua and Wei Zhongping were detained in late April in Xinyu in the southern province of Jiangxi, and accused of illegal assembly. They face a maximum of five years in prison, if convicted.Officials in Xinyu could not be reached for comment.The ascendancy of Xi Jinping as Communist Party chief in a once-in-a-decade generational leadership transition last November had given many Chinese hope for political reform, spurring citizens to push officials to disclose their wealth in several movements throughout the country.But the charges against the activists are a strong indication that the Communist Party will not tolerate any open challenge to its rule under Xi, even as it claims more transparency.Xi, who became president in March, has called for a crackdown on graft, warning, as many have before him, that the problem is so severe it could threaten the party's survival.Encouraged by Xi's calls for more transparency, the activists took photographs of themselves holding banners and placards that said: "Strongly urge officials to disclose their assets" and "Xi Jinping, immediately end dictatorship".Li Sihua's lawyer, Pang Kun, said he expected authorities to set a date for the trial soon and it could come as early as next week. A hearing was initially set for Thursday but postponed by the authorities without explanation."Their actions were very simple - a few people gathered to eat a meal and then they took a photograph," Pang told Reuters by telephone. "This doesn't constitute an assembly."Lawyers said the charge of illegal assembly requires police officers or government officials to disperse the group, which did not happen in the activists' case."Xi Jinping isn't the emperor, he's just a president, a head of state," Zheng said. "Is it a crime to mention Xi Jinping's name in an appeal, in a citizen's expression of her aspirations? This is a feudal society."There have been a few pilot schemes for low-level officials in China's southern Guangdong province to disclose their assets, but the efforts have made little progress and discussion of the wealth of senior leaders like Xi remain firmly off limits.Authorities first accused Liu of "gathering to disturb social order", then "inciting subversion of state power", and later "illegal assembly" - proof the government's move against the activists was out of retaliation, Zheng said.A third lawyer involved in the case, who declined to be identified for fear of retribution, said the move to try the activists was "unconstitutional"."There is no legal basis for it," the lawyer said. "This case is a sensitive one, the central government is paying close attention to it. If we tell you more, we will come under a lot of pressure."
TAIPEI, Taiwan — Taiwanese President Ma Ying-jeou refused to accept the defense minister's resignation over an army recruit who died of heat stroke while being punished for bringing a cellphone on base.Defense Minister Kao Hao-chu apologized Monday night for the death of Hung Chung-chiu on July 3 and offered to step down. Hung, 24, had been forced to perform a vigorous regime of sit-ups, push-ups, jumping jacks and squats in sweltering heat.The military has punished 37 officers in connection with the incident, including 15 who face criminal prosecution.Ma said Tuesday that a resignation by Kao was not justified under the circumstances.Recruits are banned from bringing camera-equipped cell phones onto Taiwanese military bases for security reasons.Hung was several days away from completing his 20-month military obligation when he died.Taiwan is transitioning from a conscripted military force to an all-volunteer army. Its goal of completing the transition by 2015 appears unlikely from initial indications because of continuing difficulties in attracting requisite numbers of recruits.
Myanmar's president promised Monday that all remaining political prisoners would be freed by year's end. It was an unusual guarantee as well as an acknowledgment that the country still incarcerated people based on their beliefs in the two years since his civilian government ended the military's repressive monopoly on power.The president, U Thein Sein, also said he would show "zero tolerance" for ethnically driven violence in Myanmar, and he expressed hope that in coming weeks he would complete a cease-fire pact with the last of the major armed groups that have left the country in varying states of internal war for decades.The president made the assertions in a speech while visiting Britain, Myanmar's former colonial power, where he met with Prime Minister David Cameron as part of a broader effort to stimulate trade and investment in his country, also known as Burma.In the speech at Chatham House in London, a prominent international political research institution, Mr. Thein Sein said "thousands of prisoners" already had been freed. He did not specify how many were still imprisoned but said a special committee, which includes former prisoners, was reviewing the remaining cases."I guarantee to you that by the end of this year there will be no prisoners of conscience in Myanmar," he said.Under Mr. Thein Sein, Myanmar has been slowly emerging from a prolonged era of isolation and repression, with new freedoms of expression, a new Constitution and elections. But there has been little talk of the political dissidents who once populated Myanmar's prisons or how many remain incarcerated. Nor have there been discussions of retribution or any formalized judicial process that would call to account the former military generals responsible.The country's most famous former political prisoner, Daw Aung San Suu Kyi, a Nobel Peace Prize winner, spent a total of 15 years under house arrest before she was released in 2010. She is now a leader of the political opposition in Parliament and recently expressed her desire to run for president.Myanmar's evolution toward a more open political system has undergone new convulsions in recent months over violent ethnic rifts, most notably deadly extremist attacks by the Buddhist majority against the Muslim minority, in particular a stateless Muslim group, the Rohingya.Mr. Cameron discussed Myanmar's treatment of Rohingya Muslims with Mr. Thein Sein, joining other international leaders who have criticized the Myanmar authorities for failing to protect the sect from killings and other violence incited by hate. Mr. Cameron said he was "very keen to see greater action in terms of promoting human rights and dealing with regional conflicts," the BBC quoted him as saying in welcoming Mr. Thein Sein.Last week the secretary general of the United Nations, Ban Ki-moon, warned that Myanmar was confronting a "dangerous polarization" between Buddhists and Muslims.In his Chatham House speech, Mr. Thein Sein acknowledged Myanmar's ethnic strife but said overcoming it would require time and patience. "The recent communal violence has rightly concerned the world," he said. "I promise you that we will take a zero-tolerance approach to any renewed violence and against those who fuel ethnic hatreds."Mr. Thein Sein also sought to emphasize in his speech that Myanmar had been riven by fighting since independence from Britain in 1948. "It is the longest-running set of armed conflicts anywhere in the world," he said.But over the past two years, Mr. Thein Sein said, his government has negotiated cease-fires with all but one of the major armed groups in Myanmar, an insurgent organization seeking independence for Myanmar's northernmost state of Kachin in the Himalayan foothills adjoining China."I believe we will turn a corner soon," he said. "Very possibly, over the coming weeks, we will have a nationwide cease-fire and the guns will go silent everywhere in Myanmar for the very first time in over 60 years."
BEIJING — As compensation for an official act of injustice, the $429 a Chinese court awarded the mother of a rape victim on Monday was relatively paltry. Symbolically, the money carried a wallop.That is because the award, issued by a high court in Hunan Province in southern China, was an explicit acknowledgment that the mother, Tang Hui, had been wrongly sentenced to a labor camp last year after she publicly demanded that some of the men convicted of kidnapping, raping and prostituting her 11-year-old daughter be more harshly punished.Two of the men were sentenced to death; five others were given long jail terms. But Ms. Tang, who was largely responsible for rescuing her daughter after the local police bungled the case, demanded that all those involved in the crime be executed.As part of the court's decision on Monday, the local police chief who meted out Ms. Tang's original 18-month sentence offered her an apology.The ruling, which overturned a lower court decision, was another public blow to re-education through labor, a widely reviled system of punishment that allows the police to send away minor offenders for up to four years without trial, and with little chance for appeal.For some legal experts, the ruling provided further evidence that the ruling Communist Party is preparing to modify a Mao-era extralegal judicial system that has become increasingly untenable, both to international bodies like the United Nations and among the Chinese public.The case of Ms. Tang, popularly known as the "petitioning mama," has been widely covered in the domestic news media. On Monday, even People's Daily, the mouthpiece of the Chinese Communist Party, hailed the decision and demanded an end to re-education through labor. "All of society should remember the misfortune and hardship endured by a mother and, more importantly, the duty of the judicial system, which is to let the people experience justice and fairness," it said.Although the system is mostly used to punish drug addicts, prostitutes and petty thieves, the authorities in recent years have found it to be a convenient tool for corralling members of banned religious groups, political dissidents and "abnormal petitioners," which was how the government in Yongzhou, Ms. Tang's hometown, viewed her activities.Ms. Tang spent hours kneeling outside the provincial high court in Changsha, and traveled to Beijing to file appeals with the central government. Annoyed and embarrassed, the local authorities in Yongzhou decided in August to send her away, saying her behavior disturbed social order and was "exerting a negative impact on society."When word spread through social media, public outrage was so severe that the provincial authorities took the rare step of ordering her set free. Not satisfied, Ms. Tang turned around and sued the committee responsible for her original labor-camp sentence.Reached by phone on Monday, Ms. Tang said she had mixed feelings about the decision, which included a spoken apology from the police chief of Yongzhou, not the written one she had demanded in her lawsuit. "At this point, I want to let bygones be bygones," she said softly. "I want to spend more time with my daughter and to wipe all those bad things from my memory. I just want some peace and to have a good rest."In the months since the Chinese government issued a cryptic statement through the state news media, saying it would "advance reforms" of re-education through labor, legal experts have seen increasing signs that the system is on the way out. Several provinces have stopped issuing new sentences, and the media have been given relatively wide latitude to discuss the issue. In recent weeks, one of the country's most notorious camps, Masanjia, in China's northeast Liaoning Province, has been steadily releasing its remaining inmates, according to several former prisoners.But some legal advocates are unsure whether the government will abolish the system or simply create a more publicly palatable creature that accomplishes the same goal. They note that the police are already funneling prostitutes and drug addicts to compulsory "rehabilitation centers" that provide little opportunity for appeal. Given the government's determination to keep its plans under wraps, many experts have been left to speculate.John Kamm, whose organization, Dui Hua Foundation, advocates for a criminal justice overhaul in China, said the decision by the Hunan court to recognize the injustice suffered by Ms. Tang was largely a concession to popular anger. "It's public relations," he said.Like many legal experts, he has been encouraged by the signs of change, but said that without a comprehensive overhaul, China's criminal justice system would continue to serve the government's insistence on social stability. "If they want to get rid of R.T.L., they can have trials and, with 99 percent conviction rates, put people away for two to three years," he said, using the initials for re-education through labor. "Even dissidents will tell you they prefer trials to R.T.L., but let's not get carried away and celebrate yet."
SHANGHAI — Earlier this year, the authorities here began looking into suspicious activity involving a Shanghai travel agency that was rumored to have huge revenue but few bookings.What they uncovered, they said Monday, was a conspiracy involving tens of millions of dollars, directed by senior executives at the British drug giant GlaxoSmithKline.Investigators said that for years, high-ranking executives at the company's China operations used travel agencies as money-laundering shops to funnel bribes to doctors, hospitals, medical associations, foundations and government officials.The payoffs, investigators said, helped bolster drug sales and allowed GlaxoSmithKline, also known as GSK, to sell its products for higher prices in China.At a news conference in Beijing on Monday, the authorities accused senior executives at the company's China operations of organizing fictitious conferences, overbilling for training sessions and in various other ways filing sham expenses for which the cooperating travel agencies would issue bogus receipts. That enabled the GSK executives to get reimbursed by their company with money they could use for bribes, investigators said, while the travel agencies skimmed off shares of the money for themselves.The practice is said to be so common a form of money laundering, and so lucrative for travel agencies, that they would compete for the chance to take part. Sometimes they would induce GSK executives to throw the business their way by offering cash, luxury travel or even by hiring young women to engage in sexual activities — or "sexual bribery" — with GSK managers, Chinese officials said."It's like a criminal organization — there's always a boss," Gao Feng, head of the economic crime unit of the Chinese Ministry of Public Security, said at the news conference."And in this case," he said, "GSK is the boss."The revelations came just days after the police announced that several GSK executives had confessed to engaging in bribery and tax fraud.The possible punishments or fines for GSK are unclear, experts said, but the investigation is almost certain to cause concern among the ranks of major multinational companies operating in China.In recent weeks, regulators in China have stepped up their scrutiny of multinationals. After dairy producers were accused of price-fixing, for instance, several of them announced price cuts.GSK is one of the world's leading pharmaceutical companies. Last year, it recorded nearly $40 billion in revenue worldwide by selling popular drugs like the antidepressant Paxil, the diabetes treatment Avandia and the ulcer medicine Zantac.Although China still accounts for but a small portion of GSK's revenue — about $1.2 billion last year, out of nearly $40 billion over all — it is one of the company's fastest-growing markets and home to 6,000 employees as well as large manufacturing and research and development facilities.On Monday, the government said four senior executives from GSK's China offices were being detained, including the head of the drug maker's legal department, the head of business development and two vice presidents. The four held are all Chinese nationals, the police said.Mark Reilly, head of GSK's operations in China, a British national, recently left the country, the police said, shortly after investigators raided the company's offices in late June."This is a very serious allegation," Mr. Gao, one of the lead investigators, said at the news conference, while noting that the head of the company's China operations had left the country.The investigation is a huge embarrassment for GSK, which recently fired the head of its research and development department in Shanghai for misrepresenting data in a paper he co-wrote in 2010.The company also said that it had conducted an internal investigation into its China operations this year after a whistle-blower claimed that bribery was used to bolster drug sales. The company said it found no evidence of wrongdoing or bribery in the China operation.But on Monday, GSK released a lengthy statement that expressed its frustration.
HONG KONG — China's new tough-love approach to overhauling its giant economy showed through in lackluster economic data released on Monday, underlining just how rapidly growth in the once-sizzling economy has cooled.China's economy grew 7.5 percent in the second quarter of this year, compared with the same period a year earlier, the National Bureau of Statistics reported. The figure was in line with economists' expectations, but represented a progressive slowdown from 7.7 percent gross domestic product growth in the first quarter and 7.9 percent in the final three months of 2012.Industrial output data for June, also released Monday, came in weaker than forecast, with an increase of 8.9 percent from a year earlier — down from 9.2 percent in May. The growth in fixed asset investment in urban areas, another key measure of economic activity, also slowed slightly during the first six months of the year.On the upside, however, retail sales came in better than expected, rising 13.3 percent in June from a year earlier. The May reading was 12.9 percent.The slowdown in the world's second-largest economy after the United States has left some analysts concerned that China could lose yet more steam in the coming quarters, denting the ravenous demand for goods that has been a key support to global growth at a time when Europe and the United States are struggling to grow.Xianfang Ren, an economist at IHS Global Insight in Beijing, wrote in a research note on Monday that China's growth was "at risk of stalling," and that "the downside risk for growth has become much more elevated now than a few months ago."Increasing signs that China is faltering have prompted a number of economists to downgrade their forecasts for the country. Zhang Zhiwei, China economist at Nomura, lowered his growth forecast for 2014 from 7.5 percent to 6.9 percent following Monday's data release (he continues to project 7.5 percent growth for this year).Officials in Beijing, however, continued to signal on Monday that they were comfortable with the slowdown, which comes as the country is preparing for a major structural overhaul designed to put future expansion on a more sustainable and balanced footing albeit at the price of more moderate growth.Sheng Laiyun, the spokesman for the statistics bureau, said on Monday that the latest data were within the bounds of official expectations, though he acknowledged headwinds were buffeting the economy."Viewed over all, national economic performance in the first half of the year was generally stable, and the main indicators remain within the reasonable bounds for the annual forecast," Mr. Sheng said during a news conference broadcast live on Chinese television. "But economic conditions are still complex and changeable."To a large degree, China's recent cooling has been engineered by the authorities in Beijing, who are trying to steer the economy from an increasingly outdated growth model toward expansion that is more productive and sustainable.While this slowdown has been happening for more than two years, a flood of comments from policy makers in recent months has made it increasingly clear that the new leadership that took the helm in March is serious about tolerating significantly slower growth for the foreseeable future in return for the longer-term gains of a more balanced economy.Evidence of China's cooling could prompt some limited policy shifts aimed at supporting especially pressured parts of the economy, analysts said. On Monday, for example, the governor of China's central bank, Zhou Xiaochuan, and other officials said the government would extend more support to small businesses as part of its efforts to ignite new sources of growth.Speaking at a conference about small business policy, Mr. Zhou outlined the challenges confronting policy makers."Currently, domestic and external economic conditions are unusually complicated, there are quite a number of destabilizing and uncertain factors, and the downward pressures on the economy are quite considerable," Mr. Zhou said, according to a transcript of his comments on the Chinese government's main Web site.Still, few analysts expect the government to revert to heavy-hitting stimulus measures of the kind implemented after the financial crisis.
BEIJING — The abrupt cancellation of a $6.5 billion uranium processing project in southern China has left Beijing with a headache as it tries to secure the fuel required to sustain an ambitious nuclear reactor building program.China has been buying stakes in uranium mines in Asia and Africa, but without the capacity to enrich and process the ore it will still be dependent on foreign firms to turn it into useable fuel.The project, set to be built in the city of Heshan in heavily populated Guangdong province, where many of China's existing reactors are stationed, was called off at the weekend following protests, with the sector still struggling to convince the public that nuclear power is safe.The two biggest state-owned reactor builders, the China General Nuclear Power Corporation (CGNPC) and the China National Nuclear Corporation (CNNC), are now scouting for new sites."China's processing capacity is undersized compared to the plants under construction, and so is its uranium and fuel supply, and that's why the companies are busy revving things up," said Li Ning, a specialist on nuclear power and dean of the School of Energy Research at China's Xiamen University.China currently has 15 reactors with an aggregate installed capacity of 12.57 gigawatts (GW), but another 30 plants are under construction and due to go into operation between now and 2016, adding another 29 GW to the total.Gaining more control over the global fuel supply chain is crucial to China's plans to increase total nuclear capacity to 58 GW by 2020, and will require not only overseas acquisitions but also more enrichment capacity.The plant in Guangdong was expected to cost 40 billion yuan ($6.5 billion) and would have provided a "one-stop shop" for uranium enrichment and the fabrication of fuel rods for Chinese reactors. It was expected to begin manufacturing nuclear fuel by 2020, with annual capacity eventually set to reach 1,000 tonnes.The China Youth Daily newspaper said it would have provided half of the country's total nuclear fuel by the time it was completed.Steve Kidd, senior partner at East Cliff Consulting, a British firm that advises on nuclear issues, said he was surprised the authorities backed down so quickly."This seemed to be a major new facility with uranium conversion and enrichment as well as fuel fabrication," he said. "One imagines they will have to increase capacity elsewhere."While Beijing's 2020 target for the amount of power to be generated from nuclear sources was scaled back after the Fukushima disaster in Japan, its 2030 target of around 200 GW remained intact. Analysts expect annual primary uranium demand to rise tenfold over the period to around 40,000 tonnes.To meet that demand, CNNC and CGNPC have been exploring domestic uranium deposits, but a surge in imports is inevitable, and is expected to put pressure on global supplies.The two firms have acquired stakes in deposits in Namibia, Niger and Kazakhstan, but without the processing capacity they would still have to buy enriched fuel from suppliers such as France's Areva and U.S.-based Westinghouse, owned by Japan's Toshiba."If China doesn't have the processing capacity then it has to import the fuel directly," said Xiamen University's Li. "Even if CGNPC's mines are running they have to supply stocks to the fuel suppliers."The scrapped Heshan plant would have improved China's ability to process foreign uranium, and also provided a cheaper option than importing ready-to-use nuclear fuel, especially if prices rise as expected.China's existing facilities in the western regions of Sichuan, Inner Mongolia, Shaanxi and Gansu are well-placed to handle stocks imported from Kazakhstan, but as Beijing seeks to diversify sources, buying stocks from Africa, Australia and the Americas, a new processing facility on the coast could be vital.The Heshan project cancellation was a serious setback, but industry voices say China and its big nuclear firms will do their utmost to find an alternative as soon as they can."My sense is that if the government decides they are going to need a certain amount of nuclear power, which I think they have, they will build it and something like the protests that we saw a few days ago won't stop that," said Fletcher Newton, a uranium industry consultant.
BEIJING — There is a moment in the play "Our Vaginas, Ourselves" — a frank and funny exploration of feminism with Chinese characteristics — when the audience freezes in embarrassment. It is right after the actress Xiao Meili asks, "Do you masturbate?""It's so hard getting people to answer that question!" Ms. Xiao, a 20-something with a razor-sharp black bob, exclaimed in an interview. "A lot of the time I had to answer myself," she said of her scene, in which she plays a teacher.During a recent performance in Beijing, Ms. Xiao paced in front of a white board demanding answers of her "students" — in reality a standing-room-only crowd of college-age women, some older women and several men. "A former professor of mine who attended told me she was terrified I'd ask her," she said.Yet at one performance, "a woman yelled 'Yes, it's relaxing!"' Ms. Xiao said, relishing the moment. "Totally spontaneous!"Inspired by Eve Ensler's "The Vagina Monologues," with an English title that makes reference to the feminist classic "Our Bodies, Ourselves" — its Chinese title translates as "The Way of the Vagina" — the taboo-busting "Our Vaginas, Ourselves" was first staged in January at an L.G.B.T. center in Beijing before an audience of 50, said its producer, Ji Hang.Written by four women, it is based on the life experiences of about a dozen contributors who gathered last autumn at Yiyuan Gongshe, a nongovernmental organization in Beijing, where they sat on cushions in a circle and talked."Writing this play was really just getting it down," said Ai Ke, 29, one of the writers, who by day works for the publishing house of a major social science research institute.It has been a hit. Since January, the amateur actresses and playwrights have performed it about 10 times in Beijing, Tianjin and Xiamen, to enthusiastic audiences numbering up to 150, who squeeze into small venues, sharing chairs and fanning themselves, as on a recent evening in the MOMA arts district of Beijing.But their performances have been limited in scale. The play has only been staged in unofficial venues because it was unlikely to get the necessary script approval from the authorities to show in official theaters, said Ms. Ji, the producer."We really want to enter the mainstream theater scene, but it's impossible because the scripts would have to be censored," she said. The subject matter is far too edgy to pass, she said.While the play clearly owes a debt to Western feminism, what is striking — and exciting for the actresses and their audiences — is how thoroughly localized it is, with uniquely Chinese stories and a fast-paced style that at times recalls the xiangsheng, or crosstalk, of traditional Beijing humor, and rich, pun-laden language. Localization was crucial to the artists."It's so important to us I can't even find the words to say it," Ms. Ai said. "From the beginning we knew that was what we wanted."The goal? Nothing less than to bring live, theatrical feminism — with its truths and relevance for hundreds of millions of people — to China. And to create an opportunity for personal transformation."It was important to us as a consciousness-raising exercise," Ms. Ai said. "The personal transformation was No. 1."The localization is spelled out in the very first scene."I'll say it: vagina!" two actresses, called A and B, say in Mandarin, on a stage with minimal props."I'll say it in the Shanxi dialect: vagina," B says. "In the Wenzhou dialect: vagina," A says.Then it's the Hubei dialect, and so on until they have uttered the word in 10 dialects, the audience reacting with delight to the shock of the familiar, yet rarely heard word, spoken in their hometown tongues.Of the play's 11 scenes, eight consist of original material, while two are Chinese translations of excerpts from Ms. Ensler's "The Vagina Monologues," and one is from an earlier Chinese play inspired by the American play, Ms. Ji said.Humor figures highly, as in Ms. Xiao's scene and another called "The First Night." Six women identified by the letters A to F chat about how they lost their virginity."After we got a room," sighs E, using a Chinese euphemism for having sex, "he got a receipt," indicating that the man planned to make the encounter tax-deductible. The audience erupted in laughter.But there is also real tension, notably in scenes that focus on rape, health and abortion.In the final scene, "I Am an Intern in an OB-GYN Ward," a medical student recounts her experiences at a hospital: An elderly woman embodying the Chinese cultural ideal of the selfless grandmother — who will not seek medical treatment for a gynecological problem — says, "Son, don't spend the money on me. Spend it on my grandson to go to university."The student also describes helping at births; the horror of aborting fetuses because they are female; and young women coming for routine abortions, sometimes several a year.China has a high abortion rate, and as I gazed around the audience, all their laughter gone, I reflected that quite a few women there probably knew precisely what she was talking about.
BEIJING — China announced a crackdown Wednesday on misconduct in its drug market, stepping up pressure on the problem-prone industry while it pursues a bribery investigation of GlaxoSmithKline.The six-month crackdown is aimed at stamping out unauthorized drug production, improper online drug retailing and sales of fake traditional Chinese medicines, the State Food and Drug Administration said."We must resolutely punish illegal acts, resolutely close illegal enterprises and firmly recall problematic products," a deputy director of the agency, Wu Zhen, said in a statement on its website.The announcement came two days after Chinese police accused GSK employees of conducting a multimillion-dollar bribery campaign to encourage doctors to prescribe its medications. The statement did not mention the British drug manufacturer.The new Chinese leadership that took power in November has promised to improve China's health system and reining in surging costs of medicine and medical care that are fueling public frustration.China has suffered repeated scandals over fake or shoddy medications, some of which caused deaths and injuries. Regulators have launched repeated crackdowns on false advertising and other violations, but with limited success.From July through December, investigators will examine manufacturers, markets, clinics and online stores, the agency said.The police ministry said this week that GSK employees paid bribes to doctors and officials of hospitals, medical associations and the government to encourage use of its medications.According to Chinese news reports, police say the employees funneled as much as 3 billion yuan ($490 million) through travel agencies and consulting firms to hide the source of bribes. Police said four employees including a vice president of GSK's China unit have been detained.The official Xinhua News Agency said the scheme appeared to be aimed at evading GSK's internal controls meant to prevent bribery.On Tuesday, state television showed one of the detained GSK employees describing how he paid bribes to government officials to win support for use of the company's medications.Also Wednesday, a Commerce Ministry spokesman warned that misconduct by drug manufacturers would be punished."Whether they are domestic or foreign-invested enterprises, if they violate Chinese law, they will be subject to legal sanctions and bear responsibility," said spokesman Shen Danyang at a news briefing.Meanwhile, the Cabinet's planning agency is investigating production costs at 60 Chinese and foreign pharmaceutical manufacturers, according to state media, possible as a prelude to revising state-imposed price caps on key medications.The government also is investigating possible price-fixing by foreign milk suppliers.
BEIJING — Chinese state-run oil companies hope to develop seven new gas fields in the East China Sea, possibly siphoning gas from the seabed beneath waters claimed by Japan, a move that could further inflame tensions with Tokyo over the disputed area.Beijing had slowed exploration in the energy-rich East China Sea, one of Asia's biggest security risks due to competing territorial claims, but is now rapidly expanding its hunt for gas, a cheaper and cleaner energy to coal and oil imports.State-run Chinese oil and gas firm CNOOC Ltd will soon submit for state approval a plan to develop Huangyan phase II and Pingbei, totalling seven new fields, two industry officials with direct knowledge of the projects told Reuters.The approval would bring the total number of fields in what is called the Huangyan project to nine.China is already working on Huangyan I which has two fields approved. The Huangyan project is expected to cost more than 30 billion yuan ($4.9 billion), including 11 production platforms now under construction at Chinese shipyards.If approved, the seven new gas fields would not see a big jump in China's total gas output, supplying only a fraction of last year's 106 billion cubic metres (bcm) and dwarfed by operations in the disputed South China Sea and Bohai Bay off north China. Chinese geologists said gas deposits in the East China Sea region were much smaller and more scattered.The greater issue is the political risk if Beijing approves the new gas fields. Tensions over the East China Sea have escalated this year, with Beijing and Tokyo scrambling fighter jets and ordering patrol ships to shadow each other, raising the fear that a miscalculation could lead to a broader clash."It's a sign of impatience on the side of the Chinese, stemming from a lack of movement on the Japanese side on the gas fields issue," said Koichi Nakano, associate professor of political science at Sophia University in Tokyo.China and Japan in 2008 agreed to jointly develop hydrocarbons in the area, but Tokyo wishes to settle the issue of maritime boundaries before developing the gas fields."The question is what will be Japan's response and whether they would be able to talk China out of a unilateral move," said Nakano. "But escalation of tensions leading to a war? I don't think so. The Americans will be watching this situation with grave concern and may play a role of a mediator here."A spokesman for Japanese Prime Minister Shinzo Abe said: "Our understanding is that Japan and China should continue to have dialogue on the issue of joint exploitation of this area, so any unilateral action should not be accepted".Even if the National Development Reform Commission gives approval for the new gas fields, the pace of the development could be determined by China's Foreign Ministry which requests oil companies to seek its approval before every drilling. Such permission may be influenced by tensions with Japan at the time.China and Japan disagree on where the maritime boundary between them lies in the East China Sea. Beijing says its activities are in the Chinese territories, while Tokyo is worried the Chinese drilling near the disputed median line would tap into geological structures in its waters.Japan lodged a protest early this month after detecting well construction works at Huangyan I about 26 kms (16 miles) west of the disputed median line. China's foreign ministry rejected the protest as a baseless, saying Beijing had the right to drill in its sovereign waters.U.S. Energy Information Administration estimated in 2012 that the East China Sea has between 1 and 2 trillion cubic feet (28-57 bcm) of proven and probable natural gas reserves, a modest gauge versus estimates by Chinese sources at up to 250 tcf in undiscovered gas resource.If approved, the new gas fields would supply China's manufacturing hub of Zhejiang province, about 400 km (249 miles) away on the east coast, with production slated to start in the fourth quarter of 2015, said the officials.The fields would have a combined annual production capacity of nearly 4 bcm, up from the region's current output of less than 1 bcm, and would account for about 2 percent of China's estimated gas output by the end of 2016.CNOOC and partner Sinopec Corp are already developing Huangyan I, which was officially approved by the National Development & Reform Commission in June 2012 and is due to start producing gas in September next year. Also on the planning board is Pingbei II, expected to come on line in 2016.CNOOC media officials declined to comment on the new developments and industry sources quoted for the story declined to be identified due to the sensitive nature of the topic.China, the world's top energy user, is on a fast track to boost the use of natural gas, with demand for gas forecast to grow more than four fold by 2030 from the 147 bcm last year. China is the world's fourth biggest gas consumer.China first started pumping gas in early 2006 from the Chunxiao field, part of the massive Xihu trough, but territorial disputes have hindered an industry keen to explore and develop the region, Chinese industry experts said."China has made compromise, having slowed down the works quite a few years," said a state oil official, "The cards are in the hands of Chinese, as companies are capable of developing (this area) after all the explorations done over the years."China's plan to expand East China Sea operations comes after a near six-year lull in investment in the area, since the 2008 agreement to jointly develop hydrocarbons in the area."Since 2008 when the two nations reached a consensus for joint development, Japan has barely made any sincere diplomatic moves towards that direction...It seems that Japan wants to settle the boundaries first before moving to cooperations, which is totally unrealistic," said Liu Junhong, research fellow at China Institutes of Contemporary International Relations.Under the proposed expansion plan, Huangyan II, which is adjacent to the disputed maritime border, would consist of two gas fields. Huangyan I has two fields.Pingbei, an uncontested area located in the western side of the Xihu trough, would have three fields under phase I and another two under phase II.
BEIJING — Director Roland Emmerich says although Hollywood may be benefiting by adding Chinese elements to its films, it won't be making wholesale changes to the way it tells stories on the screen just to cater to China's massive audience."There will be cooperations, there will be all kinds of stuff, but will it affect the movie so much? I don't think so, because China doesn't also want to only see movies about China, they want to see movies about other things in the world," said Emmerich, who was in China to promote his action film "White House Down."The nation of 1.3 billion people is now the world's second-biggest movie market. But China limits the number of foreign films that play here, and its censors reject movies or edit them if they show China in a bad light or are too explicit.Earlier this year, some Chinese moviegoers were left confused because of awkward cuts to the James Bond feature "Skyfall" that included unflattering references to the sex trade in the Chinese territory of Macau. Then "Cloud Atlas" was shown in Chinese cinemas minus 38 minutes that included gay and straight love scenes.China is even getting American studios to sanction alternative versions of films specially tailored for Chinese audiences, such as "Iron Man 3." The Chinese version features local heartthrob Fan Bingbing — absent from the version shown abroad — and lengthy clips of Chinese scenery."The China element is sometimes important, but it has to make sense for the story, you cannot kind of just prop a Chinese element in and think, 'Oh, this movie will work great in China' — you have to still come up with a story that makes sense," Emmerich said in an interview Wednesday with The Associated Press.The German director's "2012" movie was a hit in China with a plot that was gold for patriotic Chinese audiences: As the Earth's core overheats, world leaders build an ark in the mountains of central China to house people and animals that can repopulate the planet. Scenes from the nearly three-hour movie feature a U.S. military officer saying that only the Chinese could build an ark of such a scale so quickly.It was seen in China as a refreshing change for audiences after decades of unflattering portrayals of the communist nation in Hollywood movies.Emmerich said he didn't make "2012" specifically to appeal to Chinese."It was not to please China," he said. "Perhaps the very first idea I had about '2012' was this image that water comes over the Himalayas. For me that was something so strong that I thought the whole movie has to be based on that, and so China had to play a part in this."His latest action-packed film, "White House Down," which opens in China on Monday, stars Jamie Foxx as president of the United States and Channing Tatum as a Capitol police officer who becomes his impromptu bodyguard.The 57-year-old filmmaker said censors didn't have a problem with the movie, which depicts "mainly an American crisis."China's authoritarian government strictly controls print media, television, radio and the Internet. Movie censors have political sensitivities, but also need to judge whether movies are suitable for the whole family, as China has no age classification system.China has become the second-biggest movie market behind the U.S., with sales of $2.7 billion last year, according to the Motion Picture Association of America.The government allows in only 34 foreign films per year for national distribution. At least 14 of them have to be made in 3-D or for the big-screen Imax format.
BEIJING — China has detained a key campaigner for officials to reveal their wealth, a close friend of the activist said on Wednesday, as the new government escalates a crackdown that underscores the limits of its fight on corruption.The detention of Xu Zhiyong, who has pushed for greater civil rights, could lead to a trial and trigger a global outcry over Beijing's tightening grip of a fledgling movement for officials to disclose assets.China has detained 16 activists in the disclosure campaign, in what rights groups say is the new leadership's first crackdown targeting graft campaigners."It's possible more people will gradually be caught," said Teng Biao, a close friend of Xu, the best known of the activists and the founder of the "New Citizens' Movement".Xu has been held under house arrest for three months, with no reason given by the authorities, Teng, a former human rights lawyer, told Reuters by telephone, adding that there was a high possibility Xu could face trial.Beijing police detained Xu late on Tuesday night on a charge of "suspicion of gathering a mob to disturb order in a public place", a copy of Xu's detention notice obtained by Reuters says.But the police declined to confirm the detention to Reuters. Xu's mobile phone was turned off on Wednesday. His wife, Cui Zheng, declined to be interviewed.Xu's detention is likely to draw the attention of Western governments, which have sparred with China over human rights. The news came as China prepares to put on trial three activists agitating for officials to disclose assets.Xi Jinping's appointment as Communist Party chief in a once-in-a-decade leadership change last November had inspired many Chinese with hope for political reform, spurring citizens nationwide to push for the asset disclosures.But the detentions signal the Communist Party will not tolerate any open challenge to its rule, despite the claims of greater transparency."This crackdown not only flies in the face of Xi's rhetoric, it also undermines Xi's legitimacy," said Maya Wang, a researcher at Human Rights Watch. "The right thing to do would be for the government to release the activists."Xu has been a thorn in the government's side. In 2009, he was briefly arrested on tax evasion charges his defenders said were trumped up in a bid to stifle his work. The charges were dropped after a public furore.In May, Xu told Reuters he was under house arrest. "It could be due to my campaign to push for asset disclosure," he wrote in an e-mail message.
LIMA — Peru's top court on Tuesday ordered the government to pay 40-year-old land reform bonds at their current value and with interest, terms that will likely lead to a payment worth several billion dollars.The government has six months to pass a decree with further details on how to appraise the bonds and carry out the payments, two years to recognize the debt and eight years to pay it off, the court's president Oscar Urviola said.The payments don't have to be in cash and could be made in the form of land or by issuing new bonds, he told local news station RPP.Peru's President Ollanta Humala's administration has previously said it would comply with the long-awaited decision, which aims to clear up a bitter chapter in Peruvian history.The bonds were issued as compensation for land confiscated and redistributed to the poor in the 1970s.The resolution said the president of Peru's Constitutional Tribunal ruled in favour of bondholders after members were split 3-3 on whether to force the government to pay off the debt.Conservative estimates put the value of land-reform bonds at between $1 billion (661 million pounds) and $3 billion. Other estimates say the liability is far larger, between $4.6 billion and $8 billion, or about 4 percent of Peru's gross domestic product.Previous Peruvian presidents have resisted honouring the bonds, saying they lacked the cash, even after the court ruled 12 years ago that the government should pay up.Paying off the bonds will officially put their value on the government's books, though resolving the outstanding debt might also boost Peru's credit ratings.Last week Humala asked the court to abstain from ruling on "sensitive" topics such as the land bonds until Congress named new members to the court - suggesting the court's decision would lack legitimacy.Humala was elected in 2011 after pledging to make sure the poor benefited from Peru's decade-long economic boom.Bond payments could further anger critics who say Humala has favoured the rich, as public sector doctors strike for wage increases and civil servants and universities protest performance-based reforms.Much of the land-reform debt has been bought by local and foreign creditors over the years."I voted against resolving the debt because I don't believe ownership of the bonds is legitimate," court member Fernando Calle said on RPP television.The agricultural bonds were issued as compensation for land lost in the 1970s under a redistribution program started by leftist dictator General Juan Velasco, who sought to create a more equal society and redress the legacies of Spanish colonialism.Many middle-class farmers and workers were ensnared in the program, which caused Peru's agricultural output to collapse when 5,000 farms were seized between 1969 and 1981.Since the 1990s, Peru has shed Velasco's left-wing economic model and become one of the region's fastest-growing economies, with free-trade agreements from China to Europe and investment-grade credit ratings.
Four local officials are being investigated for "dereliction of duty" in two coal mine blasts that killed 53 people last spring, according to a report on Tuesday by Xinhua, the state news agency. The double blasts, in Jilin Province of northeast China, were among the worst recent coal mine accidents. The Xinhua report named the officials as Li Shijun and Zhang Yuzhong, both former officials with the Work Safety Bureau in Baishan City, and Xu Shengxue and Wang Yuxi, former officials with the Baishan branch of the provincial Bureau of Coal Mine Safety.
ZHENGZHOU, China — The hottest nightclub in this factory town is a neon-encrusted dive down the road from the industrial park where iPhones are made 24 hours a day. Tucked behind an open construction site, Through the Summer, as the nightspot is known, had it all on a recent Saturday night — plastic whistles, fruit plates, a toddler with a mohawk, counterfeit light sabers and a bawdy comedian who imbibed beer through his nose.Liang Yulong, 19, who tests iPhone motherboards at the Foxconn Zhengzhou Technology Park, arrived at the club with a single goal in mind: to obliterate his dreary daytime reality on the spring-loaded dance floor. "Dancing lets me vent my anger and stress," he said, cigarette in hand. "When I'm here, I forget everything else."Here on the gritty outskirts of Zhengzhou, the capital of central Henan Province, the nocturnal menagerie reveals a little-explored aspect of the global supply chain, the off-hour escapes that give the masses of workers the motivation to return to the assembly line.The hands that make the world's electronics belong almost entirely to young people with dreams of their own, and a lifetime of contented industrial drudgery is not among them. Their precious time off is a rare chance to enjoy the present as they strive for a better future."Everyone gets psyched for the weekend," said Bai Sihai, 24, as he navigated open potholes on the way back to his dorm after work one afternoon. His plan? A video-game binge session at an Internet cafe followed by a long-distance phone call to his girlfriend.The captains of industry are beginning to see the merits of off-hours leisure. In recent years, a wave of riots and suicides in Henan Province have drawn attention to working conditions. In April and May, two workers and a prospective employee jumped to their deaths from dormitories that cater to workers at the Zhengzhou plant, which is owned by Foxconn, the Taiwan-based manufacturing giant that produces electronics for Apple, Microsoft and other companies. Foxconn maintains that the suicides were unconnected to work at the factory. Also in May, a worker committed suicide at a Samsung plant in the southern province of Guangdong, where labor rights organizations had documented a string of violations like forced overtime and under-age workers.The industry has responded with carrots and sticks to save both the lives of their workers and their own corporate reputations. Under pressure, Foxconn has raised wages and cut overtime hours. At the Shanghai plant run by Quanta, which makes hardware for companies including Apple, Toshiba and Asus, workers can pay for yoga and tae kwon do classes.After the latest suicides at the Zhengzhou dormitories, the company instituted "silent mode," which banned all talk about nonwork tasks on the factory floor. Although Foxconn later announced that it had rescinded the policy after a public outcry, workers say it remains in effect.In the high-tech Olympus of Silicon Valley, employees in ergonomically luxuriant offices can get subsidized massages and haircuts, scale rock-climbing walls, play foosball, meditate and do Pilates — all in the name of promoting creative innovation.The work environment is considerably more bare-bones here. Unlike Apple's modernistic new campus in Cupertino, Calif., which will be surrounded by apricot trees, the Zhengzhou factory has all the charm of a penal colony. Employees, who must wear matching uniforms, say supervisors routinely curse and yell. In the residential compounds, rows of brick dormitories house up to eight workers in rooms filled with metal bunk beds, a combination shower-toilet, and not much else.Perhaps that is why the world beyond the factory gates resembles a gigantic street fair. As dusk fell one night recently in Zhengzhou, Mandarin pop music blared from hair salons and couples strolled past stalls selling pirated DVDs, sliced watermelon and roses covered in silver glitter. A flatbed truck piled high with oversize stuffed animals drew a mob of young women like sharks to blood. "I want the green teddy bear," cooed a teenage girl to her boyfriend, who dutifully handed over 10 renminbi, or $1.60.This article has been revised to reflect the following correction: A picture caption with an earlier version of this article incorrectly described the electronics manufacturing district of Zhengzhou, China. The district is not nicknamed Apple City. This article has been revised to reflect the following correction: An earlier version of this article referred incorrectly to three suicides in Henan Province. Two were Foxconn workers and one was a prospective employee; not all three were employees. All jumped to their deaths from dormitories catering to Foxconn workers, not from the Foxconn plant. And two suicides were in April; they were not all in May. The article also omitted Foxconn's contention that the deaths had no connection to work at the plant.
Multinational drug companies now employ more sales agents in China than they do in the United States, their largest market. Several, including Merck and GlaxoSmithKline, are making huge scientific investments in the country, including building research and development centers. Within the next few years, China is poised to surpass Japan as the world's second-largest pharmaceutical market.The booming Chinese demand for drugs could not come at a better time for Western manufacturers, whose sales have been slumping because of patent expirations in the United States and stringent price controls in Europe.But selling pharmaceuticals and other health care products in China is increasingly fraught with peril, as shown by accusations in China this week that GlaxoSmithKline funneled payments through travel agents to doctors, hospitals and government officials to bolster drug sales in the country.Chinese officials have compared the company's operations to organized crime and have detained four Chinese executives for questioning. Shortly after government investigators raided the Shanghai offices of Glaxo last month, the British executive in charge of the company's Chinese operations left the country. He has not been back since.Earlier this month, the top manufacturers of infant formula, including Abbott and Nestlé, lowered their prices in China under government pressure, and Chinese officials have said they are investigating the pricing policies of up to 60 foreign and domestic drug companies.The rash of investigations is one measure of how critical the health care market has become to global companies — and to the Chinese government. The Chinese have made no secret of their goal of pushing the country's domestic drug industry into more direct competition with the world's top manufacturers.As a result, global companies can expect more scrutiny, said Tarun Khanna, a professor at Harvard Business School who has studied foreign investment in China. "Practices that may have been O.K. some time back may be more scrutinized by foreigners now," he said, especially as the government seeks to shift from an export-based economy to one that is also focused on selling to Chinese consumers. "They're trying to get more balance back."Several factors are contributing to the boom in China, experts said. China's growing economy has given rise to a middle class that is increasingly able to afford expensive Western drugs, and to treat conditions — like depression and respiratory illnesses — that may have otherwise gone undiagnosed or unmedicated.And under a new health care program, China has expanded insurance coverage to hundreds of millions of new patients — 95 percent of the population had insurance in 2011, compared with 43 percent in 2006, according to a recent report by the consulting firm McKinsey & Company. By 2020, China's total spending on health care is expected to grow to $1 trillion, from $357 billion in 2011, according to McKinsey.Even as foreign companies raise their investment, the Chinese are also looking to capitalize on the booming health care market. The government identified the medical industry as one of seven major areas for development in its most recent five-year economic plan, and the country's medical sector invested $160 billion in research and development in 2012, nearly surpassing Japan, according to a recent report by the Boston-based Lux Research."China is interested in building a very strong, homegrown industry," said Kevin Pang, a research director at Lux.But some believe Western companies will have an edge because consumers may be willing to pay more for brands that are known for high-quality ingredients."There are so many drugs that are poor quality in China, so the ability to differentiate yourself is important," said Craig A. Wheeler, the chief executive of the American generic drug maker Momenta Pharmaceuticals. His company is developing complex drugs known as biosimilars through a business deal with Baxter, which has an established presence in China.Mr. Wheeler said the recent crackdowns were to be expected. "These markets are maturing, and these markets are going to be therefore more highly regulated," he said.GlaxoSmithKline has been struggling to rebuild its image after a $3 billion fine in the United States last year, in which the company admitted to improperly promoting its antidepressants and failing to report safety data about the diabetes drug Avandia. Andrew Witty, who took over as chief executive in 2008, has repeatedly pitched the company as a global leader in ethical practices and said it had moved on from its previous lapses.Chinese investigators told a different story on Monday, however. At a news conference in Beijing, they said senior executives had organized fake conferences, overbilled for training sessions and paid kickbacks in cash and luxury travel. The illegal activity was funneled through travel agencies, authorities said, some of whom even hired young women to engage in "sexual bribery," or activities, with Glaxo managers to win long-term contracts with the company.
BEIJING — Drug manufacturer GlaxoSmithKline, under investigation on suspicion its employees bribed Chinese doctors, said Thursday the finance director for its local unit has been barred from leaving China.The executive, Steve Nechelput, has not been questioned or arrested and is free to travel within China, the British company said in a statement. It said it had been aware of the travel restrictions since the end of June. Nechelput continues to work in his role as finance director for the company's China unit.Chinese police announced this week they have detained four GSK employees on suspicion of paying bribes to doctors, hospitals and others to encourage them to prescribe the company's medications.Police say the employees funneled as much as 3 billion yuan ($490 million) through travel agencies and consulting firms to hide the source of bribes, according to Chinese news reports. Investigators have not made clear how much of that money was paid as bribes.The official Xinhua News Agency said the scheme appeared to be aimed at evading GSK's internal controls meant to prevent bribery.GSK has said it opposes bribery and was cooperating with the investigation.On Wednesday, the Chinese drug regulator launched a crackdown on misconduct in its pharmaceutical market, though it gave no indication it was linked to the GlaxoSmithKline probe.The State Food and Drug Administration said the campaign is aimed at stamping out unauthorized drug production, improper online drug retailing and sales of fake traditional Chinese medicines.The new Chinese leadership that took power in November has promised to improve China's health system and rein in surging costs of medicine and medical care that are fueling public frustration.China has suffered repeated scandals over fake or shoddy medications, some of which caused deaths and injuries. Regulators have launched repeated crackdowns on false advertising and other violations, but with limited success.Also Wednesday, a Commerce Ministry spokesman warned that Chinese and foreign drug manufacturers would face "legal sanctions" for misconduct.Meanwhile, the Cabinet's planning agency is investigating production costs at 60 Chinese and foreign pharmaceutical manufacturers, according to state media, possibly a prelude to revising state-imposed price caps on key medications.
BEIJING — Foreign direct investment in China in June jumped 20.12 percent from the same period a year earlier, the Commerce Ministry said Wednesday, the quickest gain since March 2011.China drew $14.4 billion in foreign direct investment in June, the ministry said, while in the first half, that investment totaled $62 billion, up 4.9 percent from the same period of 2012.Foreign direct investment, or F.D.I., is an important gauge of the health of the external economy, toward which China's vast factory sector is oriented, but it is a small contributor to overall capital flows compared with exports, which were worth about $2 trillion in 2012.The June investment data show that "overseas investors are still optimistic on the outlook of China's economy in the medium and long term thanks to China's recent efforts to move the economy up the value chain and its strong domestic consumption," said Li Wei, China economist at Standard Chartered Bank in Shanghai. "We expect stronger F.D.I. in the second half compared to the first, as we believe China can achieve a 7.5 percent" target for gross domestic product growth for 2013 based on recent messages from policy makers.Shen Danyang, a Commerce Ministry spokesman, said Wednesday that investment inflows reflected a gradual rebound in the first half of this year, even though a single month's figure would not signal a recovery in foreign investment."We believe the F.D.I. inflows will still keep relatively stable in the second half of this year," Mr. Shen told reporters.The ministry's data also showed that investment from the United States had risen 12.3 percent, to $1.8 billion, in the first half from the same period a year earlier, while investment from Europe rose 14.7 percent.Investment from Japan was up 14.4 percent in the first six months from the same period a year earlier, to $4.7 billion, while inflows from 10 Asian nations rose 5.3 percent in the first half from the same period a year earlier, to $53.8 billion, including $39.7 billion from Hong Kong.The foreign investment figures followed economic growth data released Monday that showed that annual growth in G.D.P. had slowed to 7.5 percent in the period from April to June, the 9th quarter in the last 10 in which expansion has weakened.Doubts over whether China can still meet its full-year economic growth target have increased. But the Chinese prime minister, Li Keqiang, said Tuesday that the annual economic growth target of 7.5 percent remained achievable.
HONG KONG — The police in Beijing have detained one of China's most prominent rights advocates, the latest in a series of arrests that critics said showed the Communist Party's determination to silence campaigners who have challenged the party to act on its vows to expose official corruption and respect rule of law.The rights advocate, Xu Zhiyong, was held by the public transportation police on Tuesday on charges of "assembling a crowd to disrupt order in a public place," although he has been under informal house arrest for more than three months, his wife, Cui Zheng, confirmed by telephone on Wednesday. Liu Weiguo, a lawyer whom Mr. Xu had earlier asked to represent him, said he was baffled that Mr. Xu, a legal scholar accustomed to police pressure, could be accused of thwarting his guards and starting a public ruckus."As I understand it, he's been under house arrest for 70 or 80 days or longer, so how could it be possible for him to engage in so-called disruption of public order? It's mystifying," Mr. Liu said. He said he hoped to meet Mr. Xu on Thursday to clarify the accusations, which, if taken to trial, can bring a maximum penalty of five years in prison. "Many of his friends feel shocked that someone as mild, restrained and softly spoken as him can't be tolerated," Mr. Liu said.If Mr. Xu is held for long, supporters said that his case was likely to attract wider attention as a test of China's beleaguered "rights defense" movement, which he helped build. That loose network of lawyers, scholars and advocates has sought to use litigation, publicity and petitions to secure political and social rights. Recently, Mr. Xu has promoted a "New Citizens' Movement" demanding that officials disclose their wealth; other participants in that campaign have been arrested and some may soon stand trial."To arrest someone like him will have a big social impact and impose a heavy price on the authorities, especially if he's tried and convicted, and that seems possible," said Guo Yushan, a longtime friend of Mr. Xu, and an early collaborator in his rights efforts."He's been a moderate, arguing for opportunities to work for change within the system," said Mr. Guo, the head of the Transition Institute, a research group in Beijing that advocates political and economic liberalization. "But it looks like the authorities are determined to act, despite the price. We can all feel the pressure. I've also been under house arrest for the past two weeks."Mr. Xu's supporters said his detention was reprisal for his role in the campaign demanding that officials disclose their wealth, an idea that some officials have also endorsed, albeit in more cautious terms. The Chinese authorities have now detained 16 people involved in the campaign, including Mr. Xu, said Maya Wang, a researcher on Asia for Human Rights Watch, an advocacy group with headquarters in New York. Three of them could soon stand trial in Jiangxi Province in southern China, she said, citing earlier court notices."Civic groups are enduring another round of repression, but still more and more obedient vassals are awakening as citizens," Mr. Xu wrote in an assessment of his career of activism, which he published on his blog in May.Since his appointment as Communist Party leader in November, Xi Jinping has repeatedly said that the party must eradicate brazen corruption, which has stirred deepening public anger. But Ms. Wang, the rights researcher, said the detentions have demonstrated the limits of changes under Mr. Xi."When the activists are saying the same thing as Xi Jinping says, they are punished," she said. "The fact that they have been going onto the streets and across the country to spread that message, that probably makes the authorities very nervous."Officials at the detention center in Beijing where Mr. Xu was held would not answer questions. Questions sent to the propaganda office of the Beijing Public Security Bureau also were not answered.Mr. Xu, 40, came to national prominence in 2003 as an advocate for Sun Zhigang, a young man whose death caused an uproar after he was fatally beaten in a detention center for vagrants and rural migrants without the right official documents. The government abolished those centers, giving a boost to Mr. Xu's ideas of combining litigation and publicity to press for wider rights.Mr. Xu, who has worked as a law lecturer in Beijing, in 2003 won a term as an independent delegate on a district People's Congress in Beijing, a rare victory in a body dominated by party-appointed officials. In 2009 he was arrested on tax-evasion allegations that he rejected as an effort to stifle his advocacy. He was released on bail and never brought to trial on that charge.More recently, he has helped organize citizens' raids on "black jails" used to detain petitioners coming to Beijing to present grievances, and has helped parents campaigning against discriminatory barriers that prevent children from the countryside from enjoying the same schools and chances for advancement as established urban residents.Mr. Liu, the lawyer, said that the authorities had refused to give Mr. Xu a license to practice as a lawyer, cramping his efforts to use litigation to force reforms."Many lawyers will come forward to defend him for the public good and for rule of law," Mr. Liu said. "In China, we say that the best lawyers are the ones who can't obtain a license."
HONG KONG — The American consul general here had some pointed words on Thursday for Hong Kong and the Chinese authorities, saying that their decision to let the former United States intelligence contractor Edward J. Snowden flee to Moscow last month had "damaged the very high level of trust" between Hong Kong and the United States, and that repairing the relationship would take time.The consul general, Stephen M. Young, who will leave his post as the top American representative here by the end of the month, said in departing remarks to reporters that the Snowden case raised serious questions about the legal autonomy Hong Kong is supposed to hold under the agreement by which Britain handed its former colony over to mainland China in 1997."There was a China factor here," he said in suggesting that the Chinese government steered Hong Kong into letting Mr. Snowden flee to Russia on June 23. "China let us down."During an hourlong news conference, Mr. Young occasionally directed pointed words at Beijing's influence here, and at one point upbraided a reporter from a mainland Chinese newspaper, saying, "I wish you would be more objective," adding, "but you have your masters in Beijing."Until the Snowden episode, Hong Kong had warm relations with the United States and cooperated closely on local law enforcement matters. But Mr. Young said that trust had been eroded by Mr. Snowden's departure, noting that American presidents and secretaries of state are not normally focused on ties with Hong Kong, and that this sequence of events had probably left a negative imprint in their minds."It will take some time to repair the damage there," he said. "We were frankly disappointed by the way our colleagues here in Hong Kong" handled the situation.Mr. Snowden fled Hong Kong after the United States asked the local authorities to detain and send him to the United States on charges that he illegally disclosed classified documents about global American surveillance programs. He has been staying in the transit zone of Sheremetyevo Airport in Moscow, awaiting a decision from the Russian authorities on his request for temporary asylum.While citing recent cases of what he called mainland Chinese intimidation of Hong Kong media outlets, Mr. Young nevertheless expressed confidence in the "one country, two systems" governance of Hong Kong, in which Beijing exercises control over the territory's defense and foreign policy while ceding autonomy on other matters."The U.S. has long had an interest in the success of the one country, two systems model," he said.Mr. Young, who will retire from the Foreign Service, is being replaced as consul general by Ford Hart, who is the United States special envoy to the six-party talks on North Korea, which have stalled amid tensions over Pyongyang's nuclear program.
Medical workers and policemen at Beijing International Airport on Saturday, after a man set off a homemade bomb.BEIJING — A man in a wheelchair who was airing grievances set off a homemade bomb in a crowded terminal at Beijing's main airport on Saturday evening, injuring himself but no one else, Chinese state media and witnesses said.Order was quickly restored and no flights were affected by the explosion at the airport's main international terminal, state-run China Central Television said on its microblog.The official Xinhua News Agency said a wheel-chaired Chinese man set off the device outside the arrivals exit of Terminal 3 at Beijing Capital International Airport at around 6:24 p.m. It said the man was being treated for injuries, but that no one else was hurt in the explosion."The explosion sound was loud," said a witness who gave only his family name, Chen. He said he was only 25 meters (27 yards) away from the explosion when it occurred.Chen said there was only one explosion, and that the terminal was crowded with people. "Since there was no second explosion, many people took out their phones and gathered near the explosion spot to take photos," he said.He said police responded to the explosion immediately.Another witness, who gave only his last name, Qing, said there was no one around the man when he set off the bomb."It sounded like the sound of big firecrackers," said Qing, who was about 60 meters (66 yards) away from the explosion. "We couldn't see really what happened afterward. There was a lot of smoke and the police arrived very fast."CCTV identified the man in the wheelchair as Ji Zhongxing, born in 1979 and from the eastern province of Shandong.It was not immediately clear why the man allegedly set off the bomb, but Xinhua said he was stopped from handing out leaflets airing his complaints before setting off the bomb. Xinhua, which cited an initial police investigation, did not say what his complaints were.In an online blog entry from 2006, a writer who provides the same name, the same year of birth and the same hometown in Shandong province as Ji complained of his disabilities resulting from cruel beatings by security personnel in the southern province of Guangdong. He said he had been seeking justice and compensation, but to no avail."Because we are peasants and we are poor, no one is willing to help us," the author wrote in the entry, which was the latest one in the blog.The blog, which was available immediately after the explosion, was removed within hours, and it was not possible to verify its authenticity.Photos posted by CCTV on its microblog showed the area near the arrivals exit empty and filled with smoke. One photo showed medical staff and police officers gathering at one spot, with a wheelchair sitting on its side a few steps away.Reached by phone, the airport's news office said it was not aware of the explosion, and airport police declined to answer questions.Terminal 3, which opened in 2008 just ahead of the Beijing Olympics, is the airport's hub for international flights. United Airlines and American Airlines are among the carriers that operate out of the terminal.United Airlines spokeswoman Karen May in Chicago said the explosion did not affect its operations. American Airlines could not be reached immediately for comment.Associated Press TV producer Aritz Parra contributed to this report.
BEIJING — Police in south-central China detained six urban management officers Saturday on suspicion of intentionally harming others and their supervisors were fired after a watermelon grower died in a conflict with authorities when he tried to sell fruit in their county, state media reported.The death of Deng Zhengjia earlier in the week has infuriated the public, who have long resented the heavy-handed tactics of the urban management officers, known as "chengguan." Though they have no legal authority to use force, they are often accused of beating people who commit minor infractions in shows of power that have fueled social tension, triggered riots and aggravated public discontent against the government.A man from the Linwu county police confirmed the detentions, which were reported by the official Xinhua News Agency. The man declined to give his name, which is common among low-ranking Chinese bureaucrats.Xinhua also reported that the men's supervisors — the party chief and a deputy party chief of the urban management bureau — were dismissed from their posts Saturday and placed under investigation."The public expect to know the truth of the incident and to have the case properly handled, but they also are calling for reflection on what is the root of violent enforcement," Xinhua said in a Friday editorial. "Let's hope the tragedy of a watermelon grower's death can be the end of violent enforcement by chengguan."The Communist Party-run People's Daily also opined in its Twitter-like account in the wake of Deng's death. "Maintaining social order with force is no different from fighting fire with wood," it said.The detentions and firings came amid mounting public anger at the handling of the case by local authorities in Linwu county, which is in Hunan province. While eyewitness accounts in state media indicated Deng was most likely beaten to death, the county government said Deng died suddenly, but did not offer a clear cause. An ensuing episode in which the government reportedly took Deng's corpse by force from family members had the public complain of a possible cover-up to eschew responsibility.Set up in 1997, the urban management bureaus around China are tasked with enforcing non-criminal city codes covering issues such as street vending, noise control, sanitation and parking, but they have gained a reputation for highhandedness, unfairness and violence.Many Chinese use the term "chengguan" as shorthand for brute force as a cure-all for any problem, and critics say the power abuses are symptomatic of an authoritarian government's lack of checks and balances.There have been frequent reports of violence by urban management officers throughout China, and some have resulted in large protests and confrontations between residents and government officials.In June, video footage of urban code enforcers punching and kicking a shopkeeper, and even jumping on his head after he was shoveled onto the ground, in the city of Ya'an enraged the Chinese public and resulted in 11 officers being punished.Deng, the watermelon grower, and his wife, Huang Xixi, had traveled from their rural village of Liantang and set up a street-side watermelon stand in Linwu on Wednesday morning when they were told they could not do so.Media reports say Linwu's urban code enforcers accused Deng of selling his goods without a license and fined him 100 yuan ($16). Later, Deng and his wife moved their melon stand to another venue, but the enforcers arrived and a quarrel ensued.Eyewitnesses told state media that the enforcers beat Deng and his wife and that later Deng was seen lying on the ground, motionless.In a written statement, Linwu county said Deng and Huang were selling watermelons in an area that was not designated for that and were uncooperative when the city code enforcers told the couple to move their stand to a designated area. It said the enforcers confiscated four watermelons and left the scene.But when the patrolling enforcers encountered the couple at the new venue later, Deng and Huang swore at them, and the officers felt compelled to argue, the county statement said."The argument between the two sides developed into physical confrontations, and during the process, Deng Zhengjia suddenly fell and died," the statement said.Eyewitnesses said an enforcer hit Deng in the head with a scale weight, but the county government denied it, as reported by Xinhua. The news agency reported that local authorities had collected body samples from Deng — who had an autopsy before his Friday burial — and sent them to another province to help determine the cause of death.
BEIJING — What is the quickest way for a professional athlete in Taiwan to get a sponsorship deal? Perhaps by threatening to shift her allegiance to China .A Taiwanese tennis champion tapped into her homeland's deep political insecurities after word spread that she was willing to become a citizen of China. That is, if she gets the right endorsement contract.Taiwan is a self-governing island, but China regards it as a breakaway province.The player, Hsieh Su-wei, 27, this month became the first person from Taiwan to win a Grand Slam title, claiming the women's doubles championship at Wimbledon with Shuai Peng of China. When Hsieh returned to Taiwan, fans showered her with garlands of flowers.The victory celebration, however, was subdued by Hsieh's father, who said that a Chinese liquor company had offered her 10 million renminbi a year, or $1.63 million, to represent the western province of Qinghai in China's national sports competition. That would require her to renounce her Taiwanese citizenship, he said.Of course, it could have been a bluff — pressing a geopolitical hot button to drum up support. Either way, it effectively got Taiwan's attention."Su-wei might have to become a mainlander to play in the National Games, but we prefer that doesn't happen," her father, Hsieh Tzu-lung, said in a telephone interview this week.China and Taiwan have been archrivals since 1949, when the Communists prevailed in a bloody civil war and the Nationalists retreated to the island.Although the foes have warmed to each other as China's economic power has grown in recent years, Beijing has vowed to retake Taiwan by force if necessary if it officially declares independence. The political stalemate reaches into the realm of sports, where Taiwan must enter international competitions as Chinese Taipei.Sports and patriotism are familiar teammates. So Hsieh's possible defection has stoked further unease among the Taiwanese, who fear that their political and cultural identities will be swallowed up by China.Taiwan's government has mobilized domestic companies to come to the rescue. These include the state-owned Taiwan Tobacco & Liquor Company, which has agreed to pay Hsieh about $167,700 to endorse Taiwan Beer."Our priority is that Su-wei can stay in Taiwan and play tennis with peace of mind," a company spokesman, Su K'uei-yang, said in a phone interview. The deal, which the company hopes to finalize later this summer, would not prohibit her from signing with a Chinese company.For all the political intrigue, Hsieh's father says the potential nationality swap is primarily a matter of paying for coaches, doctors and airfare."My biggest concern right now is money," he said. "I have three children playing pro tennis right now, and we don't have enough funds."Yet many are wondering if the controversy is merely a ploy aimed at gaining endorsements by tugging political heartstrings.The family has refused to identify the Chinese liquor company offering a sponsorship deal. New doubts arose last week, when the vice director of the Qinghai provincial sports bureau denied that such an offer was on the table, according to China's state media.Hsieh has said she is not interested in becoming a Chinese citizen, although amid the current controversy, what she wants seems to be beside the point."My best guess is this is a publicity stunt to make the Taiwanese people feel a sense of crisis in order to obtain more funding for the family," said Hu Jianyi, who covers tennis for Sports Illustrated China.This is not the first time that a pursuit of a professional tennis career has led to diplomatic tangles. In 1982, a Chinese tennis star named Hu Na defected to the United States during a tournament in California, later applying for political asylum.At the time, China prohibited athletes from going pro because of previous international sporting rules that allowed only amateurs to participate in international competitions.When Hu's request for asylum was granted in 1983, the embarrassed Chinese government suspended some cultural exchanges in an effort to punish the United States. Hu later moved to Taiwan, where she set up a tennis training center that eventually counted Hsieh as a student.In recent years, sports have strengthened ties between China and Taiwan as athletes have trained together and played side by side in matches around the world. With tennis becoming more popular among China's growing middle class, Hu has returned to the mainland many times to build support for the sport and to visit her family.Hu thinks the flare-up involving Hsieh will not have a long-term impact, regardless of the outcome."The reality is Taiwan doesn't put enough value on sports, and sponsorships for pro athletes are very limited, so the Taiwanese public will understand," Hu said.
SHANGHAI — China stepped up its effort to restructure its weakening economy on Friday by lifting some controls over bank lending rates.It was one of the strongest signs yet that the government intends to change the way banks operate and let market forces play a larger role in China, which has the world's fastest-growing major economy.The move was also part of a broader strategy to restructure the economy away from investment-fueled growth and reduce the role of the state in the economy, freeing up banks to lend to private entrepreneurs in the hopes of encouraging innovation. The central bank said in an announcement late Friday that beginning Saturday, the government would no longer set a minimum interest rate for corporate loans. That move could allow banks to lower rates and more fiercely compete for customers.The government, though, chose not to lift its cap on lending rates, nor did it alter the ceiling it places on the rates banks pay to depositors, either of which economists say would have had more far-reaching effects.Dong Tao, an economist at Credit Suisse, said on Friday that Beijing was showing a stronger determination to reform the financial system. "This is the beginning of China's rate liberalization," he said in an e-mail. "Removing the lending rate floor is less meaningful than removing the deposit rate ceiling, but I think the latter will come too in the coming months."China's president, Xi Jinping, and Prime Minister Li Keqiang are pushing bold reforms, even as the economy shows signs of weakening. Economists have been increasingly concerned that in recent years banks in China have done a poor job allocating capital and evaluating risk. Because the government sets caps on the rates paid to depositors and sets minimum and maximum lending rates, Chinese banks benefit from big interest rate spreads far larger than most Western banks. Analysts say this system has also encouraged lax lending standards and may have fed asset bubbles.A few weeks ago, the government created a credit squeeze that made it difficult for banks to conduct short-term borrowing. The government said its decision to pull back credit from the overnight lending market was meant to force banks and financial institutions to improve lending standards and better guard against risk. Beijing's new leadership team, which took office in March, has also promised to make the national currency, the renminbi, more freely convertible and to open up the nation's capital account, and liberalizing interest rates is believed to be a necessary step before making those changes.Whether the move on Friday would immediately lower borrowing costs is unclear, since most banks already lend at higher rates than the floor set by the central bank, experts say. But over time the move could help establish more flexible lending and borrowing rates and create a more efficient banking system."It means banks could charge rates freely according to their own risk assessments," said Wang Tao, an economist at UBS who is based in Hong Kong.The central bank, known as the People's Bank of China, did not alter the floor it sets on mortgage rates because of worries about property speculation. The central bank also said it was not ready to scrap the ceiling on deposit rates because of the risks involved."The central bank will work with other departments to improve the fundamental conditions to liberalize deposit rates steadily and orderly," the bank said in its statement on Friday.
BEIJING — Results of a wide-ranging survey of Chinese family wealth and living habits released this week by Peking University show a wide gap in income between the nation's top earners and those at the bottom, and a vast difference between earners in top-tier coastal cities and those in interior provinces.The survey found that in 2012, the households in the top 5 percent income bracket earned 23 percent of China's total household income. The households in the lowest 5 percent accounted for just 0.1 percent of total income.Average annual income for a family in 2012 was 13,000 renminbi, or about $2,100. When broken down by geography, the survey results showed that the average amount in Shanghai, a huge coastal city, was just over 29,000 renminbi, or $4,700, while the average in Gansu Province, far from the coast in northwest China, was 11,400 renminbi, or just under $2,000. Average family income in urban areas was about $2,600, while it was $1,600 in rural areas.The survey results underscore some of the economic challenges confronting the Communist Party as a result of the growth policies that party leaders have pushed over the decades. The policies have lifted millions from poverty, but have resulted in an uneven distribution of wealth, which was one of the glaring problems of early-20th-century China and contributed to the success of the Communist revolution. Ordinary Chinese are increasingly resentful of wealth being accumulated by a select few — and in particular by people connected to party officials — and government censors often try to limit discussion in public venues of the personal wealth of the richest Chinese and of the families of China's leaders.The survey was conducted by the Chinese Family Panel Studies, a research program based at a social science institute of Peking University, one of China's leading universities. According to Chinese news reports and a news release from the program, the survey's findings were based on 73,000 hours of interviews with 14,960 households in five province-level areas, and on questionnaires filled out by 57,155 people.The survey gave a wide range for the unemployment rate in China: anywhere from 4.4 percent to 9.2 percent. It estimated China's Gini coefficient to be 0.49 in 2012, less than the 0.51 in 2010. The Gini coefficient is an approximate measure of the scale of the wealth gap in a society, with a coefficient of zero representing perfect equality. The Chinese government avoided releasing an official number for several years. Then in January 2013, the head of the National Bureau of Statistics, Ma Jiantang, said the Gini coefficient was 0.474 in 2012, down from a peak of 0.491 in 2008.In March 2012, Bo Xilai, a top party official who was trying to create a populist image for himself and was later purged, said at a news conference that the Gini coefficient had reached an alarming 0.46. His willingness to announce the number came as a surprise to many observers.The survey showed that more than 87 percent of Chinese families owned or partially owned property in 2012, and more than one-tenth of Chinese families have more than one property. The Chinese government has recently enacted policies to try to discourage the purchase of second properties for speculation, to try to slow down the sharp rise of real estate prices in urban areas. The average size of property for a Chinese family was 100 square meters, the survey said.The survey also found a drastic change in the cohabitation rate of couples before marriage: It was 1.8 percent in 1970, in the middle of the Cultural Revolution, but had risen to 32.6 percent by 2000.The survey was not available online, but its main results were released on Wednesday in a news release on the institute's Web site. The numbers did not draw wide attention, but some Chinese commented on the results on microblogs. One wrote, "One millionaire for every nine paupers."
HONG KONG — Customs officials in Hong Kong on Friday announced one of the largest seizures of smuggled ivory ever made in the city — and their fifth since October — highlighting the pervasiveness of a trade that conservationists describe as an all-out crisis for elephant populations in Africa.The shipment, consisting of 1,148 tusks weighing in at 2,183 kilograms, about 4,800 pounds, was worth an estimated $2.25 million, according to a customs department statement.The tusks were concealed in a container coming from the West African nation of Togo.Rising affluence in Asia has caused demand for ivory and many other wildlife products to soar in recent years, putting many animal and plant species under severe pressure.Despite rising awareness and warnings that poaching has pushed some species to the brink of extinction, enforcement and penalties often remain weak, and represent an insufficient deterrent to poachers and smugglers, wildlife experts say.In the case of ivory, the demand stems mainly from China, where it is highly prized for its use in ornaments and sells for hundreds of American dollars per kilogram on the black market.Tens of thousands of elephants have been killed for their tusks in recent years in Africa, where the revenues from the poached ivory are believed to be fueling conflicts across the continent.The fact that the number of large-scale shipments has been on the increase also is indicative of organized criminal involvement, say experts at Traffic, a group that monitors the trade in endangered wildlife.Two other seizures made in Hong Kong in the past nine months weighed in at just over nearly 2,900 pounds, while a shipment intercepted last October weighed more than 8,300 pounds. All originated in Africa.Hong Kong, Malaysia, Vietnam and the Philippines are the main transit points within Asia for large ivory consignments arriving from Africa, Richard Thomas, a spokesman for Traffic, said in an e-mail on Friday.
BEIJING — A strong earthquake struck a rural part of western China on Monday morning, killing at least 20 people and injuring 296, according to the local government.The quake hit near the city of Dingxi in Gansu province, a region of mountains, desert and pastureland with a population of 26 million. That makes it one of China's more lightly populated provinces, although the New Jersey-sized Dingxi area has a greater concentration of farms and towns with a total population of about 2.7 million.The deaths and injuries were reported in Min County and other rural southern parts of the municipality, Dingxi Mayor Tang Xiaoming told state broadcaster CCTV. Tang said damage was worst in the counties of Zhang and Min, where scores of homes were damaged and telephone and electricity services knocked out.Residents described shaking windows and swinging lights but little major damage and little panic. Shaking was felt in the provincial capital of Lanzhou 177 kilometers (110 miles) north, and as far away as Xi'an, 400 kilometers (250 miles) to the east."You could see the chandeliers wobble and the windows vibrating and making noise, but there aren't any cracks in the walls. Shop assistants all poured out onto the streets when the shaking began," said a front desk clerk at the Wuyang Hotel in the Zhang County seat about 40 kilometers (25 miles) from the epicenter. The clerk surnamed Bao refrained from identifying herself further, as is common among ordinary Chinese.The government's earthquake monitoring center said the initial quake at 7:45 a.m. (2345 GMT Sunday) was magnitude-6.6 and subsequent tremors included a magnitude-5.6.The quake was shallow, which can be more destructive. The center said it struck about 20 kilometers (12.4 miles) beneath the surface, while the Gansu provincial earthquake administration said it was just 6 kilometers (3.7 miles) deep.The U.S. Geological Survey measured the magnitude of the initial quake as 5.9 and the depth at 10 kilometers (6 miles).Initial measurements of an earthquake can vary widely, especially if different monitoring equipment is used.Dingxi is about 1,233 kilometers (766 miles) west of Beijing.China's worst earthquake in recent years was a 7.9-magnitude temblor that struck the southwestern province of Sichuan in 2008, leaving 90,000 people dead or missing.
BEIJING — Flooding in China this year has left at least 337 people dead and 213 missing, due mainly to unusually wet summer weather, the government said Sunday.Floods this year have struck across 30 provinces and municipalities and affected more than 47 million people, according to the Office of State Flood Control and Drought Relief Headquarters.The headquarters said landslides have accounted for 202, or about 60 percent, of the confirmed deaths.China saw an average of 165.4 millimeters (6.51 inches) of rain between June 1 and July 15. That was 5 percent more than usual and the most during that period in five years. Central China has been hardest hit, receiving 40.1 percent more rain than usual during that six-week period.China's worst floods in recent history were in 1998, when 4,150 people died, most along the Yangtze River, China's mightiest.The Three Gorges Dam, the world's largest hydropower project, was intended to control renewed flooding along the river. But water levels in the massive reservoir behind the dam stood at more than 149 meters (489 feet) on Sunday, 4 meters (13 feet) above the flood warning mark.
BEIJING — A disabled man who was reportedly protesting past mistreatment by security officials set off a homemade bomb inside Beijing Capital International Airport on Saturday evening, injuring only himself but causing a brief panic, according to witnesses.The man, Ji Zhongxing, who was in a wheelchair, detonated a small bomb at 6:24 p.m. just outside the international arrivals area of Terminal 3, the state-run Xinhua news agency reported.Xinhua said Mr. Ji, 34, from China's eastern Shandong Province, had been handing out leaflets shortly before the explosion, which was reportedly ignited by gunpowder he had collected from fireworks. The news agency's brief dispatch ended by saying that Mr. Ji's injuries were not life threatening and that the terminal had quickly resumed normal operations.It did not take long for Chinese Internet users to uncover the reason that Mr. Ji had chosen to stage a very public act of desperation at China's busiest airport, one of the country's architectural landmarks.According to documents posted on the Internet, Mr. Ji, who had earned his living transporting people on a motorcycle, was paralyzed from the waist down in 2005 after security officers in the southern city of Dongguan beat him for operating an unlicensed transport service. In a petition letter detailing his plight, Mr. Ji said he had been left with $16,000 in medical bills. "Almost without hope, petition road endless," he wrote at one point.It was not possible to immediately confirm the details of his story, but police brutality and justice denied are familiar themes in China. With a court system often weighted in the state's favor, many Chinese turn to petitioning to appeal to higher authorities. Their hope, rooted in a tradition that dates back centuries, is that enlightened officials might resolve their complaint if only they knew the injustice that the petitioners had endured.In recent years, scores of petitioners have turned to violence after they found themselves stymied by a system that sometimes seeks to silence them through stints in illegal "black" jails or labor camps.Last month, a 59-year-old man, despondent over the denial of social security benefits, set fire to a bus in the coastal city of Xiamen, killing 47 people and himself. In 2011, a farmer reportedly seeking revenge for the demolition of his home to make way for a highway bombed government buildings in eastern Jiangxi Province, killing himself and two others.Still, when pushed to the brink, most petitioners will choose to harm just themselves, sometimes by drinking pesticide, attempting self-immolation or jumping to their death.According to an interview that Mr. Ji gave to Philanthropy Times in 2005, he had found two lawyers to take his case, but it went nowhere. Because he was unable to work, he said, his entire family fell into debt, and he became increasingly disillusioned."We beseech the heavens, and the heavens do not answer," Mr. Ji wrote on his blog. "We beseech the earth, and the earth is silent. So much injustice, and we have nowhere to be heard."On Saturday, witnesses said that Mr. Ji had been trying to hand out leaflets at the airport but that there had been little interest from passers-by. At one point he waved his hands in the air; at least one person said Mr. Ji had told people to move away from him. Then he detonated the package he was holding in his left hand.Smoke filled the area, and photographs taken by those at the scene and posted online showed his wheelchair flung on its side and several police officers and medical workers around him.In an interview outside the terminal, one witness said that there had been some blood on the ground but that airport employees had quickly cleaned the area after Mr. Ji was taken away. "The place is spotless clean," the witness said.According to several news media reports, doctors treating Mr. Ji had to amputate one of his arms.
BEIJING — It started Wednesday morning as a squabble between an unlicensed watermelon vendor and the widely despised urban management agents who prowl China 's streets looking for scofflaws. Words were exchanged, blows were landed and in the end, the vendor, Deng Zhengjia, 56, lay dead on the pavement in Linwu, a city in central Hunan Province, as angry bystanders photographed his body with their cellphones.The Linwu police say Mr. Deng "unexpectedly fell to the ground and died." Witnesses assert that an officer struck Mr. Deng in the head with a weight from his hand-held scale. Hours later, when the police tried to take away his body, a crowd violently fought back, producing images of bloodied faces and generating another wave of outrage.Mr. Deng's death has once again drawn national attention to China's army of urban management officials, known as chengguan, who occupy an awkward and ill-defined place in the government's apparatus to maintain stability. More powerful than private security guards but lacking the authority to make arrests or carry weapons, chengguan have for many Chinese become the most visible face of the government's authoritarian impulses.Responsible for dealing with sanitation complaints, unlicensed construction and illegal peddling, they often seize goods with impunity, beat those who resist and issue what critics describe as arbitrary fines. Between July 2010 and March 2012, the Chinese news media reported 150 cases of abuse by chengguan, according to a recent report by Human Rights Watch.Although Mr. Deng's death was not the first time a citizen had met a violent end resisting their efforts, it has provoked an unusually loud outcry, with some Chinese commentators likening the case to that of Mohamed Bouazizi, the Tunisian fruit seller whose self-immolation two years ago after his cart was confiscated set off the rioting that toppled Tunisia's president and inspired the Arab Spring revolts.On Friday, hackers took over the Linwu government Web site, inserting the message "What is unjust is doomed to destruction, we will take back our country!" One of China's most popular bloggers, Li Chengpeng, said the authorities' response to Mr. Deng's death — and their efforts to remove his body forcibly — symbolized China's heavy-handed governing style run amok."This is in fact a metaphor for today's China, where the state is seizing property everywhere through a variety of means," Mr. Li wrote. "Businessmen lose their enterprises and are thrown into prison; an anonymous vendor loses his watermelons. Sometimes it's the urban management officers that seize the property. Sometimes it's the court, or the bank, or the unpredictable policies."The ruling Communist Party's expansive security system is well equipped to ensure that such episodes do not set off wider unrest. But the popular outrage can only complicate President Xi Jinping's efforts to reduce the animosity that many Chinese feel toward party functionaries and law enforcement officials.The centerpiece of that effort has been a push for officials to mix with the masses and gain a firsthand appreciation of their hopes and grievances. Known as the "mass line campaign," it seeks to address extravagance and corruption among party officials and reduce behavior that "divorces the party from the masses," according to the state news media. "Winning or losing public support is an issue that concerns the Chinese Communist Party's survival or extinction," Mr. Xi said last month, according to the official Xinhua news agency.So far, the government's handling of the episode has produced even greater cynicism. Two Hunan television reporters who went to the scene were beaten by police officers and told they "would die" if they continued filming, according to the newspaper The Beijing News. Several officers then smashed the windows of the reporters' car and confiscated one of their cellphones.Mr. Deng's daughter, Deng Yanlin, then took to Sina Weibo, China's version of Twitter, and angrily condemned the authorities, but a short time later, the postings disappeared. They were replaced by a suspiciously conciliatory note thanking local officials and asking "outsiders" to stop compounding their anguish. "Now the government has satisfactorily comforted and placated our family," she wrote.As with previous instances of chengguan violence, in this case the state-run news media have tried to manage public ire by allowing relatively untrammeled coverage of the episode and running commentaries that castigate those involved in the violence, although they stop short of calling for a substantial overhaul of the system. "Condemn Violence, Not Chengguan System," said a headline in Global Times, a populist tabloid owned by the party-run People's Daily.The outcry appears to have made an impression on local officials in Linwu, who said Friday that they had detained six officers said to be involved in the episode. Officials also conducted an autopsy in the presence of family members, The Beijing News reported, but the results will not be available for at least two weeks.Deng Yongcai, the younger brother of the vendor who died, told the paper that he was not optimistic the results would be objective. The family, he said, "wouldn't dare go up against the government."
BEIJING — For eight years, motorcycle taxi driver Ji Zhongxing sought justice for what he said was a beating by city guards that left him paralyzed. It was his frustration, his brother said, that led Ji to push his wheelchair through a crowded terminal at Beijing's main airport and detonate a homemade bomb.Ji injured no one but himself, but Saturday's incident has raised questions in China about whether the country can adequately address the grievances of increasingly marginalized members of its society and cast a spotlight on the failures of the country's legal system to provide a sense of fairness.Ji, 33, from the eastern city of Heze, had been petitioning Chinese authorities for years after the 2005 attack, which left him paralyzed from the waist down and more than $16,000 in debt, his elder brother Ji Zhongji said."They beat him up for no reason. My brother was wronged," Ji Zhongji said by phone Monday. "If even one person had stood up and said a word of fairness to my brother about his case, he would not possibly have ended up where he is today."In an era of burgeoning gaps in income and social status, China's courts — controlled by the Communist Party's local political and legal affairs committees — are widely perceived as being corrupt or more likely to protect the interests of local officials than exercise justice.People like Ji, migrant workers with little education and zero political connections, make up Chinese society's lowest rung. When the legal system fails them, they turn to petitioning — a centuries-old system of sending appeals to government officials in Beijing in the hope of gaining redress.But those appeals rarely work and frustration among petitioners can mount and boil over into violence. In the prosperous port city of Xiamen in June, authorities have blamed a fire on a bus that killed 47 people on a disgruntled man named Chen Shuizong who apparently was destitute and had been pleading with local officials for eligibility for social security payments.While condemning such attacks as a new kind of "terrorism," a commentary by the Xinhua Daily Telegraph, a newspaper published by the official Xinhua News Agency, also urged that a higher priority be made of ensuring that people feel they are treated justly."Every person who feels like they have been wronged could be a time bomb," the commentary said.Ji apparently started a blog in 2006 to seek public support for his cause, writing in a final post that year: "We pleaded to the heavens but the heavens would not respond. We called out to the earth and the earth was silent."The elder Ji said his brother had been driving a motorcycle taxi in the southern city of Dongguan when he was allegedly beaten up by security guards in a 2005 attack. Ji Zhongji, who is working in Inner Mongolia, said he did not know what led to his brother's action on Saturday, but that he knew that his brother had been frustrated by his efforts to find justice.After Saturday's blast, Ji was sent to hospital where he underwent surgery to amputate his left arm, state media have reported. His status was not immediately clear. Beijing police did not respond to a faxed list of questions. The Dongguan city government said an investigation had been re-opened into Ji's case though it defended the authorities' handling of his petitions. It confirmed in a posting on its official microblog account that Ji had been seeking about 330,000 yuan ($50,000) in compensation for medical bills and wages lost from not being able to work.Liu Xiaoyuan, a rights attorney who has tried to seek justice on behalf of many petitioners, said Ji's case showed how ineffective the system is in helping people with grievances. Petitioners are a symbol of China's failure to build a justice system that ordinary citizens consider fair, he said."This case reflects what happens if the system does not provide ways for petitioners to be treated reasonably," Liu said by phone. "Sometimes it will force them to take up extreme measures, because they think that unless they do that, no one will listen."Petitioners are often met with violence when they attempt to take their cases to Beijing, with local governments sending "interceptors" to stop them — with force — and keep them in informal "black jails" until they can be sent home.The case takes place as China's new leadership has called on the judicial system to provide fairness for all. Social commentators have cited Saturday's blast as a reason for the authorities to examine inequalities in the system and the apathy with which the poor are often treated.Shi Shusi, a commentator for the Workers' Daily newspaper, wrote: "In some areas, citizens' legitimate demands are being ignored and public power rides above the law. ... This completely blocks the ability of people at the lowest levels to defend their rights."Citing the "black sound of the explosion," Shi asked, "For whom has the alarm sounded?"
BEIJING — GlaxoSmithKline, target of a bribery probe in China, said Monday some executives may have broken the law, while rival drug maker AstraZeneca said police are investigating one of its sales representatives.GSK said its president for Asia-Pacific and emerging markets met with Chinese police officials who are investigating whether GSK employees bribed doctors and hospital administrators to prescribe its drugs."Certain senior executives of GSK China who know our systems well appear to have acted outside of our processes and controls, which breaches Chinese law," the executive, Abbas Hussain, said in a statement.Four employees of GSK China, including a vice president, have been detained, according to police. The company says its China finance director is barred from leaving the country but is not detained.Also Monday, AstraZeneca said police in Shanghai visited its office there "regarding a local police matter focused on a sales representative.""We believe that this investigation relates to an individual case," the company said in a statement. "We have no reason to believe it's related to any other investigations."AstraZeneca "does not tolerate any illegal or unethical conduct," the company statement said."We have a strict global policy on ethical interactions, which all our employees and third parties acting on our behalf must follow," it said. "All AstraZeneca China employees and third parties on AstraZeneca's behalf are required to strictly comply with these guidelines in the conduct of business."The new Chinese leadership that took power in November has promised to improve China's health system and rein in surging costs of medicine and medical care that are fueling public frustration.Police cited by state media have said bribery by Glaxo employees might have pushed up the cost of medication for patients.Police say the Glaxo employees funneled as much as 3 billion yuan ($490 million) through travel agencies and consulting firms to hide the source of bribes, according to Chinese news reports. Investigators have not made clear how much of that money was paid as bribes.The official Xinhua News Agency said last week the employees appeared to have used that strategy to evade GlaxoSmithKline PLC's internal anti-bribery controls.Hussain's statement gave no additional details of the investigation."I want to make it very clear that we share the desire of the Chinese authorities to root out corruption wherever it exists," said Hussain in the statement."We fully support the efforts of the Chinese authorities in their reforms of the medical sector and stand ready to work with them to make the changes for the benefit of patients in China," Hussain said. "We will actively look at our business model to ensure we make a significant contribution to meeting the economic, health care and environmental needs of China and its citizens."Also Monday, The Financial Times newspaper reported Shanghai police have detained an anti-fraud investigator who worked for GSK. The newspaper identified him as Stephen Humphrey, a British national who operates a firm in Hong Kong.The British Embassy in Beijing confirmed that a British national was detained July 10 in Shanghai but said it could give no other details. A Shanghai police spokesman, who would give only his surname, Xu, said he had no information on any detention of a Briton.Last week, China's drug regulator launched a crackdown on misconduct in its pharmaceutical market, though it gave no indication it was linked to the GlaxoSmithKline probe.The State Food and Drug Administration said the campaign is aimed at stamping out unauthorized drug production, improper online drug retailing and sales of fake traditional Chinese medicines.Meanwhile, the Cabinet's planning agency is investigating production costs at 60 Chinese and foreign pharmaceutical manufacturers, according to state media, possibly a prelude to revising state-imposed price caps on key medications.
BEIJING — Rescuers with shovels and sniffer dogs chipped away at collapsed hillsides Tuesday as the death toll rose to 94 from a strong earthquake in a farming region of northwest China.Just one person was listed as missing and 1,001 as injured in Monday morning's quake near the city of Dingxi in Gansu province.About 123,000 people were affected by the quake, with 31,600 moved to temporary shelters, the provincial earthquake administration said on its website. Almost 2,000 homes were completely destroyed, and about 22,500 damaged, the administration said.The quake toppled brick walls and telephone lines, shattered mud-and-tile-roofed houses and sent cascades of dirt and rock down hillsides, blocking roads and slowing rescue efforts by crews trying to reach remote areas.Hospitals set up aid stations in parking lots to accommodate the injured, while hundreds of paramilitary People's Armed Police fanned out to search for victims in the region of terraced farmland where the quake struck about 1,200 kilometers (760 miles) west of Beijing.Min county in Dingxi's rural south accounted for almost all the deaths and the worst damage.Urban areas where buildings are more solid were spared major damage, unlike the traditional mud and brick homes in the countryside.Tremors were felt in the provincial capital of Lanzhou 177 kilometers (110 miles) north, and as far away as Xi'an, 400 kilometers (250 miles) to the east.The government's earthquake monitoring center said the quake was magnitude-6.6, while the U.S. Geological Survey said it was 5.9. Measurements can often vary, especially if different monitoring equipment is used.The Chinese Red Cross said it was shipping 200 tents, 1,000 sets of household items, and 2,000 jackets to the area. Other supplies were being shipped in by the army and paramilitary police, which dispatched around 6,000 personnel and two helicopters to aid in rescue efforts.But heavy rain is expected later in the week, raising the need for shelter and increasing the chance of further landslides.Gansu, with a population of 26 million, is one of China's more lightly populated provinces, although the New Jersey-sized area of Dingxi has a greater concentration of farms in rolling hills terraced for crops and fruit trees. Dingxi has a population of about 2.7 million.China's worst earthquake in recent years was a 7.9-magnitude temblor that struck the southwestern province of Sichuan in 2008, leaving 90,000 people dead or missing.
BEIJING — The death toll from two earthquakes in China's western Gansu province has climbed to 89, with more than 500 people severely injured, after 1,200 buildings collapsed and tens of thousands more were badly damaged, said the official Xinhua news agency.The quakes hit eight towns in the remote and mountainous Minxian and Zhangxian counties, about 170 km (105 miles) southeast of the provincial capital of Lanzhou, from 7:45 a.m. on Monday, Xinhua said.The U.S. Geological Survey reported two earthquakes, the first at a 5.9 magnitude and a strong aftershock about an hour and a half later at a 5.6 magnitude. Chinese authorities reported the first quake was a 6.6 magnitude.Xinhua said that by Monday evening 422 aftershocks had been recorded, with the strongest measuring 5.6 in magnitude, citing Chang Zhengguo, a spokesman for the Gansu provincial government."Many have been injured by collapsed houses," said a Minxian county doctor surnamed Du. "Many villagers have gone to local hospitals along the roads." More than 1,200 houses had collapsed and another 21,000 severely damaged, said Xinhua.On Monday the government of the city of Dingxi, the worst-affected area, said more than 27,000 people were left homeless.Photos posted on Chinese social media showed roads on the sides of riverbanks had subsided and farmhouses reduced to piles of red bricks. There were also power outages and cell phone and Internet coverage was disrupted.Xinhua said about 3,000 police and rescue personnel have been sent to the quake-hit region, though landslides and flooding have hampered their efforts, and officials said they were concerned more rain could exacerbate the need for shelter.Gansu abuts Sichuan province, where a 6.6 quake in April killed 164 people and injured more than 6,700, China's worst quake in three years. That quake hit close to where a devastating 7.9 temblor killed some 70,000 people in May 2008.
HONG KONG — A series of earthquakes shook mountainous areas of Gansu Province in western China on Monday morning, triggering landslides across a wide area. State news media initially said that 22 people had been confirmed dead and that more casualties were still being counted.The official Xinhua news agency attributed the deaths to an earthquake that the Gansu Provincial Seismological Bureau had estimated at a magnitude of 6.6. The United States Geological Survey listed three fairly strong earthquakes in Gansu Province on Monday morning, with magnitudes of 5.9, 5.6 and 4.7.Xinhua reported that most of the townships in Minxian county in Gansu Province had suffered damage from the quake.The China Earthquake Administration said that it was sending disaster-relief teams to the area. Xinhua reported that the People's Armed Police had already sent 500 people to the area, including 120 rescue workers, and that military units in the area were being prepared to help in relief work.Communications were disrupted across a wide area, and mudslides were a continuing problem even after the initial earthquakes. The weather service in nearby Lanzhou, the provincial capital, also warned of extremely heavy rainstorms on Monday.Initial estimates for the death tolls for earthquakes in western China have often tended to be far less than the final total, because of the difficulty in reaching communities that may initially be cut off if the temblor triggers rock slides that block roads.The 2008 earthquake in Sichuan Province, south of Gansu, was initially reported as having killed a half-dozen people, but the final figure reached 87,000. That earthquake was far more powerful, however, with a magnitude of 7.9, indicating that the Sichuan earthquake had 100 times the force of the initial American estimate for the most powerful of the three earthquakes on Monday.One of the biggest issues after the 2008 earthquake lay in the substandard construction of many schools and other buildings that collapsed; there were allegations that developers had cut corners in collusion with local officials. Gansu Province is one of the poorest in China, with many older buildings of simple construction.
TAIPEI, Taiwan — During his eight years as Taiwan's president, Chen Shui-bian developed a reputation as a speaker impossible to ignore. Holding forth at campaign rallies and before visiting reporters, he vexed Beijing with his advocacy of Taiwanese independence and riveted Washington, which saw him both as democratic pioneer and mercurial troublemaker.Now four years into a 20-year prison term for corruption, the words do not come so easily for the 62-year-old former lawyer, the first and only opposition figure to ever win the presidency here. He stutters, pauses and has a hard time coming up with the names of simple things like fruits and body parts. "He knows it's for eating, but it took him 25 seconds to say 'banana,' " said Chen Shun-sheng, a neurologist and supporter, as he reviewed video of a speech test that called on the former president to identify images on flashcards. "He couldn't name the nose."Always divisive in office, Chen Shui-bian is now a center of controversy in prison, as an emotional debate unfolds on this self-governing island over whether he should be granted medical parole. It is a question that provokes sharp reactions, reflecting lingering divisions over Mr. Chen's tarnished legacy as the activist lawyer who was jailed by Taiwan's old authoritarian government — and then went on in 2000 to unseat the Nationalist Party that had governed the island since the end of World War II.A hero to some and a fool to others for championing Taiwanese independence in the face of threats from China, Mr. Chen spent the final years of his presidency fending off corruption allegations. After he lost presidential immunity when his second term ended and the Nationalists returned to power, prosecutors convicted him of money laundering and accepting bribes worth about $17 million. He still faces additional charges.From the start, Mr. Chen's defenders presented him as a victim of his political enemies, raising questions about the fairness of his trial and criticizing conditions in prison, where at first he was held in a small cell without a bed and permitted only an hour of exercise per day. In the face of extensive evidence, though, much of the public has been persuaded of Mr. Chen's guilt. Still, how the former president should be punished remains a subject of contention.Mr. Chen's family and supporters say his incarceration has led to a marked physical decline. On June 2, he attempted to hang himself with a towel in a shower in prison, according to Ministry of Justice officials. A guard intervened before he suffered any serious injury."He's steadily getting worse and worse," said Chen Chih-chung, his son. "He tried to kill himself because his condition was deteriorating."Chen Chiao-chicy, a psychiatrist who met regularly with the former president during a hospital stay this year, said Mr. Chen was suffering from severe depression and had spoken previously of suicide. "He feels hopeless," said Dr. Chen, who is not related to the former president. "He said if I kill myself this will be a big event, this can promote judicial justice for Taiwan, the democracy of Taiwan and Taiwan independence."Such statements tend to raise the hackles of the former president's critics, some of whom have never trusted him. When Mr. Chen was shot while campaigning for re-election in 2004, many of them concluded — despite any concrete evidence — that he staged the shooting. Now they wonder if his health is really all that bad."Whenever I hear what Chen Shui-bian says, what Chen Shui-bian wants to do, I always have my doubts," said Huang Kwei-bo, an associate professor of diplomacy at National Chengchi University who served on the campaign of Mr. Chen's nemesis and successor, Ma Ying-jeou. "Even though I think Chen Shui-bian is acting, I'm not denying that his health condition might be getting a little bit worse. That part I don't doubt, but over all, I have doubts."Mr. Chen's request for medical parole has put both the government and the opposition in an awkward position. If Mr. Ma shows any leniency, he would anger Mr. Chen's old opponents in the governing party. But doing nothing has left him looking heartless and vulnerable to continuing criticism.Many in the opposition Democratic Progressive Party, meanwhile, would like to put Mr. Chen, its longtime leader, in the past. "He made contributions to the party and the country, but the damage he did was far greater than his contribution," said Lin Cho-shui, a former party legislator.Mr. Ma has refused to consider a pardon while the remaining charges against Mr. Chen are being prosecuted. (Mr. Chen's wife, Wu Shu-chen, who was also sentenced to 20 years in prison for corruption, was granted medical parole in 2011 because of health concerns.)Mr. Chen was hospitalized last fall and received a diagnosis of mild brain atrophy, severe depression and Parkinsonism, a condition similar to Parkinson's disease, according to doctors at the Taipei Veterans General Hospital. His symptoms included stuttering, trembling hands and an unsteady gait, but the Ministry of Justice decided the conditions were not severe enough to warrant medical parole and sent him in April to a prison in Taichung.Corrections officials say they have gone out of their way to care for Mr. Chen because of his status as a former president. His "garden-style medical treatment quarter," as the government describes it, includes a 320-square-foot bedroom, an activity room, a private bathroom and a garden.Still, Jerome A. Cohen, a New York University law professor who met with Mr. Chen in December, said he could benefit from being sent to a hospital in Kaohsiung, his family home. "I don't have any sympathy for Chen and his wife. I think their behavior was shocking and tragic and terrible. On the other hand, I do have an interest to make sure he's treated fairly," he said.At least one prominent Nationalist politician, Hau Lung-bin, the mayor of Taipei, supports granting Mr. Chen medical parole. He said improved treatment for Mr. Chen might help repair the deep rift between Taiwan's political camps."I believe he broke the law, but he was a popularly elected president, and he was the very first president to force the shift of political power in Taiwan's history. In previous elections, he won the support of more than six million Taiwanese people," Mr. Hau said. He added: "I personally feel that even though he's guilty, as a former president, Chen Shui-bian deserves better treatment."
SHANGHAI — A few weeks ago, when Chinese investigators raided a small travel agency in this fast-growing city, they came upon something startling.The agency appeared to be using fake contracts and travel invoices to help executives at the British pharmaceutical giant GlaxoSmithKline bribe doctors, hospitals, foundations and government officials, Chinese authorities said.Soon after, the police shut Shanghai Linjiang International Travel Agency and detained its boss, Weng Jianyong. Four Chinese-born Glaxo executives were also held on suspicions of bribery and tax fraud.But documents obtained by The New York Times show that in the last three years at least six other global pharmaceutical companies, including Merck, Novartis, Roche and Sanofi, used the same travel agency to make arrangements for events and conferences.The records included invoices for hotel bookings, travel visas and airline tickets to Chinese cities, and to Australia, Italy, Japan, Korea and the United States. One of the drug companies appears to have used the travel agency to make a $2,500 grant to the Cancer Foundation of China.The documents contain no indication of wrongdoing. But they suggest that big drug makers other than Glaxo could come under scrutiny as the Chinese government widens its investigation into fraud and corruption in the nation's fast-growing market for pharmaceutical products. Chinese authorities did not respond to requests for interviews.Over the weekend, Merck and Roche acknowledged using Shanghai Linjiang International Travel Agency. But they gave few other details about the nature of the relationship.A spokeswoman in China for Merck would say only that the American company stopped using the travel agency in 2011, when Merck introduced a new procurement system.Roche said it had worked with various agencies in China for business travel or organizing events, including Shanghai Linjiang International Travel Agency."Once allegations of illegal behavior by this agency on behalf of other parties were made public, we made an internal decision to immediately stop working with this agency, and we have begun to review the documentation of our previous interactions with them," Roche said in a statement on Saturday. "This review is currently ongoing."A spokesman for Novartis said by e-mail that the company could not confirm or deny whether it had used the agency. Sanofi did not respond to repeated requests for an interview.The scandal has battered the reputation of GlaxoSmithKline, which is also known as GSK. At a news conference last week, investigators likened the British drug maker to a boss in a criminal organization. They said it used the travel agency to bribe officials in hopes of illegally increasing drug sales and raising the prices of its products in China.GlaxoSmithKline has said that what the government says its staff engaged in was "shameful," and at odds with its policies. It pledged to cooperate with investigators. Over the weekend, the company's chief executive, Andrew Witty, who is based in London, dispatched three top executives to China to deal with the scandal. On Sunday, one of the Glaxo executives met with investigators and apologized, according to Xinhua, the state-run news agency.Meanwhile, the company's China finance chief, Steve Nechelput, a British national, has been barred by Chinese authorities from leaving the country, though a person familiar with his case says he is not a target of the investigation.According to the authorities, Glaxo has used 700 travel and consulting firms and spent nearly $500 million on conferences since 2007. Some travel agencies helped Glaxo executives commit fraud, the government asserts. But investigators have named just one: Shanghai Linjiang International Travel Agency.The government said the Linjiang agency did very little booking on its own and mostly acted as a "money platform" that allowed Glaxo to create a huge slush fund.According to the government, the travel agency was handling about $16 million worth of Glaxo business a year, but seemed to be doing very little work. The government also said Mr. Weng had said that several other foreign drug companies were also "involved" in such actions, though he did not elaborate.
TOKYO — Japanese voters handed a landslide victory to the governing Liberal Democrats in parliamentary elections on Sunday, strengthening the grip of a party that promises accelerated changes to Japan's economy and a shift away from its postwar pacifism.By securing control of both houses of Parliament for up to three years, the win offers Prime Minister Shinzo Abe — an outspoken nationalist who promises to revitalize Japan's deflationary economy and strengthen its military — the chance to be the most transformative leader in a decade. Although a lackluster turnout indicated that Mr. Abe might not have as much of a mandate as his supporters hoped, the margin of victory was large enough to suggest he has an opportunity to also bring stability to the country's leadership after years of short-lived and ineffective prime ministers.The win comes at a time when many Japanese seem more open than ever to change, after years of failed efforts to end their nation's economic slump, and as an intensifying territorial challenge by China has nudged this long pacifist nation toward accepting a more robust military.Unlike some of Japan's previous colorless leaders, Mr. Abe, 58, seems eager to become an agent of change. He campaigned on this being Japan's last chance to regain its economic stature as the country has been eclipsed by China, with Sunday's victory apparently largely because of the early successes of his bold economic plan, called Abenomics. But his party's calls to stand up to the Chinese by rewriting Japan's antiwar Constitution to allow a full-fledged military rather than self-defense forces have raised fears he will go too far and further isolate Japan in the region.A week before the election, he became the first prime minister to visit a tropical island near the group of uninhabited islets at the heart of the dispute with China. He had earlier raised eyebrows by riding in a tank and climbing into a fighter jet in front of cameras. "Abe has a pragmatic side and a strongly nationalistic side," said Hiroshi Shiratori, a professor of political science at Hosei University in Tokyo. "This election could free him up to do more of the latter, which is what he really wants."It remains unclear how far the Japanese people will let him go. While Sunday's results gave his governing coalition a comfortable majority in the upper house, the voters failed to deliver the two-thirds majority that the conservative Liberal Democrats and other similarly minded parties had hoped for to easily revise the Constitution, something that has not happened since it was crafted by American occupiers after World War II. And the sparse turnout — at 52 percent the third-lowest showing in postwar history — suggests less popular support than the results implied.By early morning on Monday, officials said the Liberal Democrats had won 65 of the 121 seats being contested. When combined with the 11 seats secured by its junior partner, a small Buddhist party, the Liberal Democrat-led coalition had taken enough seats to gain a majority in the 242-seat chamber.The largest opposition group, the Democratic Party, suffered a humbling setback, the party's worst since its creation in 1998. The Democrats secured just 17 seats from voters who still blame it for failing to deliver on promised reforms after a landmark election four years ago that ousted the Liberal Democrats in what had seemed to herald the advent of a vibrant two-party democracy. Before the vote on Sunday, one weekly tabloid criticized the impending return of the Liberal Democrats' effective monopoly as "a return to the ways of our ancestors."So long as the Liberal Democratic Party's coalition holds together, it will not face new elections for three years. That could free Mr. Abe to follow his early economic stimulus initiatives with the type of structural reforms that will challenge powerful vested interests. While Mr. Abe has been somewhat vague about these plans, he has already pushed the country to join trade negotiations that could loosen small farmers' grip on agriculture. The party has also called for nurturing Japan's weak entrepreneurial culture and making it easier to hire and fire workers.
HONG KONG — Disgraced former senior Chinese leader Bo Xilai will soon face public trial on charges of bribery, embezzlement and abuse of power, a Hong Kong newspaper reported on Wednesday.Bo's wife Gu Kailai and his former police chief, Wang Lijun, have both been jailed over China's biggest political scandal in decades, which stems from the murder of British businessman Neil Heywood in November 2011.The government in September last year accused Bo of corruption and of bending the law to hush up that murder.China's prosecutors and courts come under party control and are most unlikely to challenge the party's accusations, though formal charges have yet to be publicly announced.Hong Kong's South China Morning Post, citing unnamed sources, said details of the charges against Bo had been read out at meetings of government officials in his former power base of Chongqing and other cities.No timetable for the trial was given, but it would happen soon in the eastern city of Jinan, the daily said.Bo was ousted from his post as Communist Party chief in the southwestern city of Chongqing last year after Heywood's murder.Before that, Bo had been widely tipped to be promoted to the party's elite inner core.His downfall came after his estranged police chief Wang fled briefly to a U.S. consulate in the neighboring city of Chengdu last February and accused Bo's wife of poisoning Heywood.Bo, a former commerce minister, used his post as Communist Party chief of Chongqing from 2007 to 2012 to cast the sprawling, haze-covered municipality into a showcase for his mix of populist policies and bold spending plans that won support from leftists yearning for a charismatic leader.Rumors have swirled in China about Bo's fate, but the government has given no definitive word on progress into the investigation against him since late last year.Another Hong Kong newspaper, the Beijing-backed Ta Kung Pao, reported in January that Bo was about to be tried in the southern city of Guiyang, which sent dozens of reporters flocking to the courthouse.The report turned out to be untrue.
BEIJING — China's influential ex-President Jiang Zemin has resurfaced in the public eye, praising China's new leader to Henry Kissinger in a move that appears to be a show of unity while the country faces mounting challenges including slowing growth and ethnic unrest.Chinese media reported Tuesday that Jiang, 86, hosted a "family-like" meeting and banquet for the visiting former U.S. secretary of state in Shanghai on July 3, during which Jiang extolled the virtues of the new head of the Communist Party, Xi Jinping."Xi Jinping is an extremely capable and wise state leader," Jiang was described as saying in an official announcement about the meeting issued by the Foreign Ministry on Monday. Though the ministry did not explain why the announcement came three weeks after the meeting, such delays are not unusual for the government's propaganda system.
Executives at the British drug maker GlaxoSmithKline were warned nearly two years ago about critical problems with the way the company conducted research at its drug development center in China, exposing it to potential financial risk and regulatory action, an internal audit found.The confidential document from November 2011, obtained by The New York Times, suggests that Glaxo's problems may go beyond the sales practices that are currently at the center of a bribery and corruption scandal in China. They may extend to its Shanghai research and development center, which develops neurology drugs for Glaxo.The failings, some experts said, underscore the problems that can arise when major drug companies export their scientific development to emerging markets like China.Since 2006, 13 of the top 20 global drug makers have set up research and development centers in China, according to a report by McKinsey & Company. "It's cheaper to do research there," said Eric G. Campbell, a professor of health care policy at Harvard Medical School. However, "I have absolutely no doubt that with cheaper research comes greater risk."Auditors found that researchers did not report the results of animal studies in a drug that was already being tested in humans, a breach that one medical ethicist described as a "mortal sin" in the world of drug research. They also concluded that workers at the research center did not properly monitor clinical trials and paid hospitals in ways that could be seen as bribery.Last year, Glaxo said, a more favorable audit found the concerns had been addressed. But several outside experts said the problems outlined in the initial audit were grave and painted a picture of an organization that failed to keep tabs on a crucial research center as it expanded both in size and scope. And it indicates that the problems there were more extensive than were reported in June, when the company fired the head of research and development in China after discovering that an article he helped write in the journal Nature Medicine contained misrepresented data.In a statement, Glaxo said it was committed to conducting "robust" audits of its business practices, and in this instance, "the process worked exactly as intended." It added, "Patient safety is paramount and the audit reports do not show that this was compromised."Glaxo's research and development center opened in 2007 with lofty ambitions not only to help the company's drugs get approved in China, but also to serve as one of its primary research hubs. The center grew quickly, expanding from one employee in 2007 to 460 in 2011, according to the audit. But as it grew, supervisors did not always ensure that the work done there was of high quality, auditors found.One of the most troubling lapses — a problem the report labeled "critical" — involved a drug known as ozanezumab, which was being developed to treat patients with multiple sclerosis and Lou Gehrig's disease.The report revealed that the drug's project leader belatedly learned the results of three studies of ozanezumab in mice. During their investigation, auditors came across six studies whose results had not been reported, even though early trials in humans were already under way.Reporting such information is crucial, ethicists said, because animal studies can identify safety risks and are among the main factors drug companies use to decide whether to pursue human trials."If that's true, it's a mortal sin in research requirements," said Arthur L. Caplan, the head of the division of medical ethics at NYU Langone Medical Center. He served as the chairman of an advisory committee on bioethics at Glaxo from 2005 to 2008. "No one could approve human trials without having that information available, scientifically or ethically. That's kind of a Rock-of-Gibraltar-sized ethics violation."The auditors said the results did not affect patient safety, but warned of the high stakes involved, saying participants could be exposed "to unnecessary risk or no benefit to the disease state."Glaxo said that "when the full range of data from all the studies was reviewed, GSK determined that the efficacy would not be strong enough to continue," and it terminated a trial of ozanezumab in multiple sclerosis patients. It is still studying the drug in people with Lou Gehrig's disease, or amyotrophic lateral sclerosis, according to the company.In the follow-up audit, auditors said senior managers at the Chinese research unit had "embedded a compliance culture that was not evident during the prior audit," and did not find any issues of concern, according to an executive summary of the report that was provided by Glaxo.Outside ethics experts said the report raised questions about whether patient safety was adequately protected.Auditors found that Glaxo employees failed to record whether research participants had signed new consent forms during the course of clinical trials. They also did not document whether participants were taking the planned dosage of drugs, or whether they followed up when they learned that participants were not following a clinical trial's protocol.
SHANGHAI — The British pharmaceutical giant GlaxoSmithKline said Monday that some of its executives might have broken the law in China, the company's strongest statement yet on a bribery and corruption scandal that has engulfed its China operations.The statement, released after three top Glaxo executives met with Chinese investigators, came amid signs that other drug makers could also come under scrutiny from the Chinese authorities.On Monday, the British-Swedish drug company AstraZeneca said one of its employees had been questioned by the police in Shanghai. The company released a statement saying that the police had visited the company and had questions about a sales representative."We believe that this investigation relates to an individual case and while we have not yet received an update from the Public Security Bureau, we have no reason to believe it's related to any other investigations," the statement added.Over the weekend, the drug makers Merck and Roche acknowledged that they had used the same small Shanghai travel agency that investigators say worked with Glaxo to bribe doctors, hospitals and government officials.Glaxo has been under intense scrutiny for the past few weeks after investigators raided offices in China and detained four senior executives on suspicion of bribery and tax fraud.In the statement Monday, Abbas Hussain, a Glaxo executive, said: "Certain senior executives of GSK China who know our systems well appear to have acted outside of our processes and controls, which breaches Chinese law. We have zero tolerance for any behavior of this nature."His statement, which came after a meeting with China's Ministry of Public Security, or national police, continued: "I want to make it very clear that we share the desire of the Chinese authorities to root out corruption wherever it exists. We will continue to work together with the MPS and we will take all necessary actions required as this investigation progresses."Andrew Witty, the company's chief executive, sent three top executives to China last weekend to meet with the government. They included Mr. Hussain, who apologized in a meeting with an official from the Ministry of Public Security.The apology and statement that its executives may have broken the law is a sharp reversal for the company. A few weeks ago, executives at Glaxo said that this year they conducted an internal investigation into allegations of bribery and fraud in the China operations and found no evidence of wrongdoing.The police in Shanghai have also detained Peter Humphrey, a British fraud investigator who had done some contract work for Glaxo, according to a person familiar with his case. But it was unclear whether the police were holding him in connection with the investigation into Glaxo or on a separate matter.
HONG KONG — A series of earthquakes in Gansu Province in northwestern China set off landslides and building collapses in an impoverished mountainous region Monday, killing at least 89 people, injuring more than 600, damaging tens of thousands of homes and prompting President Xi Jinping to order "all-out rescue efforts."The Gansu Provincial Seismological Bureau estimated the magnitude of the main earthquake at 6.6. The United States Geological Survey listed three fairly strong earthquakes in Gansu Province on Monday morning but none quite that powerful, with preliminary magnitudes of 5.9, 5.6 and 4.7.The quakes took place along the border between Minxian County and Zhangxian County, both in the south of Gansu Province. Most of the deaths and injuries occurred in Minxian County, and all of the missing were there.At the Lee Yuan Hotel in Minxian County, a woman who identified herself as Ms. Zhao said she had been terrified when the building shook and the ceiling lights swayed. She reached her mother by phone in their home village later in the morning, and was relieved to learn that she had survived unscathed."She and all our neighbors ran out of their homes right away when they felt the first quake hit — a lot of the village homes were destroyed by the earthquakes," Ms. Zhao said by telephone.Stung by criticisms that they responded too slowly in 2008 to a massive earthquake in adjacent Sichuan Province and to several nearby earthquakes after that, Chinese officials and government organizations made a point of rushing to Gansu Province. The seismological bureau said in the late afternoon that both of the province's top officials — the Communist Party chief, Wang Yun, and Gov. Liu Weiping — had arrived in the disaster area, as had 35,000 police officers, firefighters and rescue workers. An additional 8,500 workers were sent to repair and reopen roads and highways.The earthquake-affected area lies about 140 miles south of Lanzhou, which is not only the provincial capital but also the headquarters of an important Chinese regional military command. That command sent 1,322 active-duty soldiers and 1,428 members of militia and reserve units, the provincial seismological bureau said in a statement on its Web site.In addition to President Xi's authorization of all-out rescue efforts, Prime Minister Li Keqiang authorized emergency response measures and sent rescue teams, Xinhua reported.The participation of both leaders was significant. One criticism in China in 2008 was that when Prime Minister Wen Jiabao rushed to Sichuan and saw the extent of the damage, he was unable to approve the immediate mobilization of nearby military units because, unlike President Hu Jintao then and Mr. Xi now, he did not run the Central Military Commission, which oversees the People's Liberation Army.Provincial weather officials were forecasting thunderstorms and nearly certain rain in the area Monday evening, conditions that could complicate the rescue of survivors.The 2008 earthquake in Sichuan Province was initially reported as having killed a half-dozen people, but the final figure reached 87,000. That earthquake was far more powerful, however, with a magnitude of 7.9, meaning that the Sichuan earthquake had 100 times the force of the initial United States estimate for the most powerful of the three earthquakes Monday.One of the biggest issues after the 2008 earthquake lay in the substandard construction of many schools and other buildings that collapsed, and there were allegations that developers had cut corners in collusion with local officials. Gansu is one of the poorest provinces in China, with many older buildings of simple construction.
SHANGHAI — Bribery is the lubricant that helps keep China's public hospitals running, and the health system would struggle to function without illegal payments to poorly paid doctors and administrators, say medical practitioners and industry experts.They say government policies are partly to blame for a system in which doctors and other staff expect to be paid extra fees to perform operations and take kickbacks from pharmaceutical firms and medical-equipment suppliers.The profession's ugly underbelly was exposed last week when police accused British drugmaker GlaxoSmithKline of bribing officials and doctors for six years to boost sales and the price of its medicines. GSK has called the developments "shameful" and on Monday said some of its Chinese executives appeared to have broken the law.China is an appealing market for pharmaceutical firms and medical-equipment makers, with spending in the industry expected to nearly triple to $1 trillion by 2020 from $357 billion in 2011, according to consulting firm McKinsey.The corruption stems largely from doctors' low base salaries, which are set in line with a pay scale for government workers. Hospitals can pay bonuses but, given public hospitals are strapped for cash, compensation is usually low, say doctors and industry experts.A doctor fresh out of medical school in Beijing earns about 3,000 yuan ($490) a month including bonuses -- roughly the same as a taxi driver. A doctor with 10 years experience makes around 10,000 yuan a month, according to Peter Chen, chief executive of privately run Oasis International Hospital in Beijing."Without the grey income, doctors would not have the incentive to practice," said Yanzhong Huang, a senior fellow for global health at the Council on Foreign Relations in New York.Over the past 30 years the Chinese government has made its healthcare sector more market-oriented. That means the country's 13,500 public hospitals have to balance their own books.Medical services accounted for just over 50 percent of public hospital revenue in 2011, according to Health Ministry data. About 40 percent came from prescribing drugs while the rest was from other income as well as government subsidies, which have fallen steadily since the 1980s.Hospital administrators can set fees for in-patient care, nursing and laboratory tests. But the state fixes the cost of operations to make surgery affordable to ordinary Chinese. And it effectively caps the cost of many prescribed medicines by setting a suggested price.That leaves hospitals little room to top up wages.One Chinese doctor who used to hold a senior position at a prominent hospital in Beijing said 80 percent of his income came from bribes. Without it, he would have earned less than $600 a month, said the doctor, who left China five years ago to live in Britain where he continues practicing medicine."These sums (bribes) are essential. You cannot survive on your salary," said the 50-year-old physician, who spoke on condition of anonymity due to the sensitivity of the issue.An industry executive who has worked in China's medical sector for more than 15 years said bribery and corruption permeated every level of a public hospital."They are seen as necessities in the current healthcare system," said the executive, who also declined to be identified.The Health Ministry did not respond to a request for comment. Officials at the National Development and Reform Commission, which sets the prices of prescribed medicines, also declined to comment.Low base salaries are a legacy of China's planned economy, said Jia Xijin, associate professor at the School of Public Policy and Management at Tsinghua University in Beijing, explaining the dilemma faced by the government.China has also committed to making health care affordable for its 1.37 billion people. The government has spent 2.2 trillion yuan ($358 billion) on the system since 2009, of which more than 680 billion yuan was to provide universal health insurance coverage, state media quoted the Finance Ministry as saying earlier this year.Public hospitals say recruiting new doctors is getting harder as many physicians are turned off by the wages at a time when patient numbers are growing. Health Ministry data showed the overall number of doctors rose 13 percent from 2008 to 2011, while patient visits jumped 28 percent."There will be no doctors left to treat the current doctors when they retire," said the accounting director at a Shanghai hospital who declined to be identified because she was not authorized to speak to the media.Low salaries have also spawned a system of under-the-table payments from patients. The payments are known as "hongbao" -- a reference to the cash-filled red envelopes given as presents during Lunar New Year festivities -- and cover various services from jumping the queue for appointments to extra surgical fees.Bob Wang, a 35-year-old businessman in Beijing, said he gave the main surgeon who operated on his aunt's femur bone transplant last year 5,000 yuan in "hongbao" on top of the 100,000 yuan he paid to the hospital because he was worried the doctor would not take the operation seriously otherwise.There was unstated "hongbao" guidance for each type of surgery, he said."If my family or myself get sick ... we won't just go to the hospital. Everything will take forever -- from registration to waiting for a bed, to getting seen by a doctor to queuing for surgery," he said.According to the doctor now living in Britain, patients and their families could sometimes spend two to three times more than the actual fee in "hongbao".Critics doubt that an anti-corruption campaign by President Xi Jinping will have much impact.Indeed, a former doctor at a major heart hospital in Beijing said eradicating corruption would be nearly impossible."It would be easy to find out who was taking money if the government wanted to," said the cardiologist, who has been working in the United States since 2009."But everyone would be found guilty. How could the hospitals survive?" ($1 = 6.1413 Chinese yuan)
BEIJING — The Associated Press has named veteran Asia-based journalist and video producer Miles Edelsten to the new position of news director for Greater China.The appointment was announced Wednesday by John Daniszewski, senior managing editor for international news; Sandy MacIntyre, AP's director of global video news; and Santiago Lyon, AP's global director of photography."China is undergoing dramatic economic growth while facing development challenges that affect not only its people and region, but the entire world," Daniszewski said. "Edelsten's deep commitment to telling the stories of Asia, his sharp and unerring news judgment and his hands-on leadership style make him a great choice to lead one of the AP's most important bureaus."Previously AP's video news editor for China, Edelsten will manage AP's coverage in text, photos and video for China, Taiwan and Hong Kong. The appointment is part of a move to better integrate how AP manages the various media formats in its bureaus in Asia and around the world. He will report to Brian Carovillano, the Asia-Pacific news director based in Bangkok, and manage three deputies responsible for coverage in text, photos and video."Edelsten is a vastly experienced journalist whose leadership of video teams across Asia on some of the biggest stories of the last decade makes him an ideal choice for this role," MacIntyre said. "He is a born storyteller. Leading our text, photo and video operation in an area which is rich in visually stimulating stories is a challenge he will rise to with aplomb."Edelsten joined AP Television News in 1998 as a newsroom producer in London. The following year he became AP's senior producer in Tokyo, where he coordinated coverage of every major story in Japan over the next 13 years, including the 2002 World Cup and the 2011 earthquake, tsunami and nuclear crisis. In 2012, Edelsten transferred to Beijing to lead AP's video coverage of China, including the new Chinese leadership and the controversy over cyber-hacking.Edelsten has also has traveled widely to cover big stories, including the Kosovo war, the SARS epidemic in China, the Iraq War, the 2008 Mumbai terrorist attacks, the 2004 tsunami in Asia and the 2008 U.S. presidential election.A pivotal moment came on March 11, 2011, with the magnitude 9.0 earthquake off northeast Japan. Images he shot while the Tokyo bureau was still rocking were the first pictures of the disaster seen by many people around the world. He subsequently managed a large team of journalists covering the triple disaster that unfolded over the following weeks, and venturing into the exclusion zone around the Fukushima nuclear plant himself to shoot video of the Robinson Crusoe-like existence of a farmer who had refused to leave.He was also involved in setting up AP's first video news bureau in Pyongyang, North Korea, in 2006, and has regularly visited on assignment since then."Edelsten's talent for compelling storytelling and his experience leading teams on major news events have prepared him well for this important role," Lyon said.Edelsten began his career as an Asia researcher for a news program on Britain's Channel 4 before going on to study Japanese in Tokyo and join Nippon TV as a producer covering Europe and Africa.Edelsten, 45, is from Dorset, England. He holds a bachelor's degree from Bristol University and a Masters in the Politics of Asia from The London School of Oriental and African Studies.
BEIJING — Disgraced Chinese politician Bo Xilai was indicted Thursday on charges of corruption, accepting bribes and abuse of power, state media reported, moving China's biggest political scandal in years toward closure.The indictment paves the way for a trial, about 16 months after Bo dropped from sight in one of China's biggest-ever political scandals.The Xinhua News Agency said the indictment was handed over Thursday by prosecutors in the eastern city of Jinan to the city's intermediate court. That indicates the trial will take place in the city soon, although the report did not say when."The accused Bo Xilai, as a civil servant, took advantage of the privileges of his office to gain benefits for others and illegally received money and items in extremely large amounts," Xinhua quoted the indictment as saying.It said Bo also "embezzled an extremely large amount of public funds and abused his powers of office, causing heavy losses to the interests of the nation and the people in an extremely serious way."Calls to the court and prosecutors in Jinan rang busy or went unanswered.Bo, the former party boss of the southwestern megacity of Chongqing, was expelled from the party in September and accused of massive corruption, illicit sexual affairs and abetting the cover-up of a murder by his wife.His ouster in the spring of last year and the investigation into his family presented the Communist Party leadership with its ugliest public scandal in nearly two decades. It exposed the bare-knuckled infighting that the secretive leadership prefers to hide and affirmed an already skeptical public's dim view about corrupt dealings in the party.At the time, Bo had been one of China's most flamboyant and high-profile politicians, and was considered a contender for one of the seven seats on the party's all-powerful Politburo Standing Committee.The son of a prominent communist elder, Bo had been commerce minister prior to his assignment to Chongqing. The posting was seen by many as an attempt by rivals to shift him from the spotlight, but Bo turned it into a national stage on which to promote his brand through a combination of economic revival projects, a crackdown on organized crime and a controversial campaign to revival Mao-era communist songs and slogans.The allegations leveled against Bo in September dated back more than a decade and include improper relations with several women — banned by the party because they are considered an inducement to corruption.Bo was also accused of helping to conceal that his wife killed a British businessman — the crime that ultimately triggered his downfall.Last year, a trusted aide to Bo fled to a U.S. consulate and disclosed the murder, setting off lurid rumors and revelations that held China and its media spellbound for months.Bo was dismissed as party chief of Chongqing; his wife, Gu Kailai, was given a suspended death sentence after confessing to the murder; and the aide, Chongqing police chief Wang Lijun, received a 15-year prison term for initially covering up the murder and other misdeeds.Bo's downfall prompted much speculation over whether the party would risk embarrassment by putting one of its most prominent members on public trial. Under the Chinese system, officials are first investigated by the party's disciplinary body through a process that is notoriously secretive and opaque.However, top leaders said from the start that Bo would not receive special treatment and an editorial issued Thursday by the official China News Service reinforced the message that no official was above the law.Bo's indictment "shows the Chinese Communist Party's resolute will and clear stand against corruption," the editorial said."It also tells the whole party and the entire society that in a country ruled by law, no matter who you are, no matter how high your ranking is, you will be seriously investigated and severely punished if you violate party discipline and state law."The charges against Bo carry a wide range of penalties depending on the severity and the willingness of the accused to cooperate with prosecutors. However, the use of the terms "extremely large amounts" and "extremely serious" in the indictment appear to portend a heavy sentence.While no figures were given for the amount of illicit money Bo is accused of taking, a Communist Party-backed Hong Kong newspaper, the Ta Kung Pao, said Wednesday that Bo was accused of bribery and embezzlement amounting to 25 million yuan ($4 million).
LONDON — UK pharmaceutical company GlaxoSmithKline distanced itself Wednesday from the scandal engulfing its operations in China, saying that four employees suspected of paying bribes were acting outside of company controls.GSK's CEO Andrew Witty refused to offer detail on the criminal investigation, but portrayed the company as being a victim of people "acting outside of our processes." He insisted that "99.9" percent of GSK's employees play by the rules.Chinese police allege that four employees of GSK China are suspected of paying bribes to doctors and hospitals to encourage them to prescribe medications."We have zero tolerance for this kind of behavior," Witty said during a conference call on its second-quarter earnings.Describing it as "shameful," Witty added that the company had reached out to regulators in both the U.S. and Britain and is cooperating with all of the relevant authorities. He said it was too early in the investigation to know whether criminal charges might be laid against the company by Chinese authorities.In his comments to investors, Witty said that while the company was likely to see some impact on their performance in China as result of the current investigation, it was too early to quantify the extent and cost.Since news of the arrests in China, GSK has said that its China finance director has been barred since June from leaving the country. The Financial Times reported that a British anti-fraud investigator who worked for the company also has been detained.Police in China allege the detained employees obtained money to pay the bribes by arranging to receive phony invoices or rebates from travel agencies. The official Xinhua News Agency has cited a police investigator who said the employees did this to avoid GSK's internal anti-bribery controls.Witty spoke during a conference call following the release of a second-quarter earnings. GSK said net profit was 1.04 billion pounds ($1.6 billion,), down nearly 16 percent from a year earlier while revenue rose 2 percent to 6.6 billion pounds.But the call was totally overshadowed by questions about the probe. Though Witty sidestepped queries about whether he would hand back any bonus he might receive because of the investigation, he insisted the company itself did not know about the fraud."It appears some individuals have let us down," he said.Witty said that while he was willing to go to China to lead the company's response, he had other responsibilities and no plans to go at the moment.His remarks come only days after the British company said its president for Asia-Pacific and emerging markets met with Chinese police officials examining whether GSK employees bribed medical personnel to prescribe its drugs. The executive, Abbas Hussain, said in a statement that the actions breached Chinese law.The Chinese probe is not the first time GSK has fallen afoul of authorities.In the U.S. last year, the company paid $3 billion and pleaded guilty to promoting two popular drugs for unapproved uses and failing to disclose important safety information on a third in the country's largest health care fraud settlement.The criminal case was accompanied by a civil settlement in which the government said the company's improper marketing included providing doctors with expensive resort vacations, European hunting trips, high-paid speaking tours and even tickets to a Madonna concert.At the time, GSK expressed regret and said they have learned "from the mistakes that were made."Meanwhile in the UK, the company is under investigation for paying off competitors to delay launches of their own versions of GSK's best-selling antidepressant, Seroxat.
BEIJING — Police have detained an activist singer who wrote that she wanted to blow up a government agency seen as inept, a friend said Wednesday. The singer's supporters said she would never have carried out the threat and is being targeted for her critical views.Wu Hongfei was detained Monday by Beijing police on the charge of "causing trouble," likely because of a post on her microblog, said Hu Jia, an activist who is friends with Wu.Last weekend, Wu wrote on her microblog that she would like to blow up government housing commission offices. In the post since removed by censors, Wu berated those who work for the agency.She did not explain the reason for her post, but in an era when many young Chinese adults are complaining about difficulty buying homes, such agencies are widely perceived as being ineffective in ensuring the supply of affordable homes.The post was made shortly after a man set off a bomb at Beijing's airport, a blast that injured no one but the accused bomber.Beijing police did not respond to a request to verify Wu's detention.Chinese authorities have been known to arrest, convict and jail those who make bomb threats on charges of spreading terrorist rumors.New York-based Human Rights Watch said it is likely Wu's detention was political retribution for her past criticisms of the government."The Chinese government has frequently used criminal charges to punish and intimidate individuals for expressing opinions critical of the government. Wu has been very outspoken in the past, and it is hard not to suspect that her criminal detention is the result of political retribution," said Maya Wang, a researcher for the group.Hu said Wu has been targeted because the authorities want to deter further discussions of Ji Zhongxing, the 33-year-old man accused of setting off the homemade bomb at Beijing Capital International Airport on Saturday. Ji's brother says the man suffered a beating in 2005 that left him paralyzed from the waist down and had grown frustrated after years of unsuccessfully trying to seek redress.Since the blast, police have also detained two men who threatened to blow up the airport and a video arcade respectively.Hu said authorities have singled out the singer, Wu, partly because she has been outspoken against social ills in the past. She has a relatively strong following on social media with nearly 120,000 followers on her microblog hosted by Sina Weibo, a Twitter-like service.Also on her microblog, Wu had written that she hoped Ji can live on with dignity."If he is a thug, I wish this government would foot the bill for this thug. It is not that I encourage violence, but I extremely detest the system that pushes innocent people to violence. Justice is everyone's reasonable appeal," Wu wrote.
BEIJING — China's vice president will visit North Korea this week for Korean War commemorations following a period of strained relations between the communist neighbors.Vice President Li Yuanchao will be the highest ranking Chinese official to visit North Korea since Kim Jong Un took over as leader of the impoverished hard-line communist state upon his father's death in December 2011.The trip lasting Thursday through Sunday affirms a warming trend in relations between a deeply isolated Pyongyang and Beijing, its only real ally and key source of economic assistance.The statement posted Wednesday on the Chinese Foreign Ministry's website said Li will visit for 60th anniversary commemorations of the end of the 1950-53 Korean War, in which China fought on the North's side against U.N. forces led by the United States.That shared history, in which troops sent by Mao Zedong likely saved the North Korean regime from annihilation, has been the default fallback for the sides through periods of ambivalence bordering on animosity.Most recently, Beijing was deeply offended by Pyongyang's actions following Kim's ascension, including conducting rocket launches, a nuclear test and other saber-rattling that spiked tensions with South Korea and the U.S.Beijing considered the moves an affront to its interests in regional stability and showed its displeasure by joining with the U.S. to back U.N. sanctions and cut off dealings with North Korea's Foreign Trade Bank.North Korea also frustrated Beijing by refusing to agree to high-level meetings and incensed the Chinese public after a Chinese fishing crew was detained.The bad blood led to an unusual half-year gap in high-level contacts that ended in May when Pyongyang dispatched one of Kim's close allies to Beijing to reaffirm to close traditional ties and commit North Korea to eventually rejoining six-nation nuclear disarmament talks hosted by Beijing.Despite the improvement in ties, policy toward the North remains one of the most debated issues among the Chinese foreign relations establishment, with some scholars going so far as calling for Beijing to end its economic and diplomatic support for Pyongyang.Yet North Korea remains a crucial buffer between China and the 28,000 U.S. troops based in South Korea, and Beijing wins credit internationally by exercising what influence it has over the regime to moderate its behavior.That means China will retain its support for Pyongyang, even while becoming more critical of some of its actions, wrote Ren Xiao, director of the Center for the Study of Chinese Foreign Policy at Fudan University in Shanghai."China is bound to adjust its North Korean policies, but it doesn't mean Beijing will side with the U.S., Japan, and South Korea. Rather, it will respond to the North's extreme moves that offend China's interests and will make the North correct those moves," Ren wrote in a recent essay for the Washington-based Center for Strategic and International Studies.Although the Foreign Ministry gave no details, Li is almost certain to meet with Kim and other top North Korean readers, since to not do so would almost certainly be taken as a snub.Those discussions are likely to focus on Beijing's much cherished goal of coaxing Pyongyang back to the nuclear talks that also involve the United States, South Korea, Russia and Japan.There has been no significant progress toward resuming the long-stalled discussions since the North Korean envoy's visit to Beijing, while the North has devoted its attention instead to bilateral talks on restoring exchanges with South Korea.North Korea walked away from the six-party nuclear disarmament talks in 2009 over disagreements on how to verify steps it was meant to take to end its nuclear programs.Since its third nuclear test in February, North Korea has said any future diplomatic talks would have to recognize it as a nuclear power.Washington has said it won't accept that and demands that talks be based on past commitments by the North to abandon its nuclear programs.
BEIJING — The trial of disgraced Chinese politician Bo Xilai could begin this week, a source with direct knowledge of the matter said on Wednesday, marking the beginning of the end of China's most sensational scandal in decades.The trial is most likely to take place in the eastern city of Jinan, said the source, speaking on condition of anonymity to avoid repercussions for talking to a foreign reporter about elite politics.Bo has been charged with accepting bribes, corruption and abuse of power, the source said.Hong Kong's South China Morning Post, citing unidentified sources, said details of the charges against Bo had been read out at meetings of government officials in his former power base of Chongqing and other cities.He has been accused of receiving more than 20 million yuan ($3.26 million) in bribes and embezzling another 5 million yuan, the newspaper said.One of Bo's lawyers, Li Guifang, contacted by Reuters, said it was "inconvenient to speak". He later turned off his mobile telephone.An official at the propaganda department of the Intermediate People's Court in Jinan said by telephone he had not received any notice about the case.A Reuters correspondent at the court saw no signs of extra security and staff gave no indication a trial was imminent.However, a Jinan government official with knowledge of the case, who asked not to be identified, said the city was one of several in China where courts were preparing material for a Bo trial. He did not elaborate.Bo's wife, Gu Kailai, and his former police chief, Wang Lijun, have both been jailed over China's biggest political scandal in years, which stems from the murder of British businessman Neil Heywood in November 2011.In September last year, the government accused Bo of corruption and of bending the law to hush up the murder. It also accused him of "improper sexual relations with multiple women", a common charge leveled against officials suspected of graft.China's prosecutors and courts come under Communist Party control and they are most unlikely to challenge its accusations. Formal charges have yet to be announced and the trial is likely to be conducted, at least partly, in secret.But that would be natural if the case touches upon what China considers sensitive matters that may be considered state secrets, said Li Weidong, a former magazine editor who has followed the scandal around Bo."Still, this is not good for the government's pledges of transparency," he said, referring to the lack of any confirmation about what was happening in the case or when the trial would start.Still, Bo is unlikely to be given the death sentence, despite the severity of the charges he is facing, Li added."They've long since ruled out executing him. He's most likely to get life in jail."How Bo's case is handled will be a test of newly installed President Xi Jinping's steel in fighting corruption, a top priority for his government, though Bo's initial downfall came under the rule of Xi's predecessor, Hu Jintao.Xi has appeared casual and relaxed this week in images carried on state television as he visited factories and ports in the central province of Hubei.Bo was ousted as Communist Party chief in the southwestern city of Chongqing last year after Heywood's murder. Before that, he had been widely tipped to be promoted to the party's elite inner core.His downfall came after his estranged police chief, Wang, fled briefly to a U.S. consulate in the neighboring city of Chengdu in February last year and accused Bo's wife of poisoning Heywood.Bo, a former commerce minister, used his post as Communist Party chief of Chongqing from 2007 to 2012 to cast the sprawling, haze-covered municipality into a showcase for his mix of populist policies and bold spending plans that won support from leftists yearning for a charismatic leader.Wang had spearheaded Bo's controversial campaign against organized crime, a prominent plank in Bo's barely concealed campaign to join the topmost ranks of the Communist Party.His brash self-promotion irked some leaders. But his populist ways and crime clean-up were welcomed by many of Chongqing's 30 million residents, as well as others who hoped that Bo could take his leftist-shaded policies nationwide.Some leftist sympathizers have insisted Bo is the victim of a plot."It's very hard to believe these accusations. Bo is a great man who knew how to get things done," said Sima Nan, a well-known defender of Bo's policies who makes a living appearing on television entertainment shows."What he did, to radically transform Chongqing from the undeveloped backwater it was, was quite amazing."Bo was suspended from the party's top ranks in April 2012, when his wife Gu was named as an official suspect in the murder of Heywood, a long-time friend of the couple who also helped their son, Bo Guagua, settle into study in Britain.In August last year, Gu, formerly a powerful lawyer, was given a suspended death sentence, which effectively means life in prison, for murdering Heywood. Wang was then jailed for 15 years over charges that indicated Bo tried to stifle a murder inquiry, in the first official linking of Bo with a criminal case.After first helping Gu evade suspicion of poisoning Heywood, Wang hushed up evidence of the murder, according to the official account of Wang's trial. In late January 2012, Wang confronted Bo with the allegation that Gu was suspected of killing Heywood. But Wang was "angrily rebuked and had his ears boxed".Since Bo was sacked, he has disappeared from public view and has not responded publicly to the accusations against him.At a news conference days before his dismissal as Chongqing party chief, Bo scorned as nonsense unspecified accusations of misdeeds by his wife and said people were pouring "filth on my family".Rumors have swirled in China about Bo's fate, but the government has given no definite word on progress in the investigation against him since late last year.Another Hong Kong newspaper, the Beijing-backed Ta Kung Pao, reported in January that Bo was about to be tried in the southern city of Guiyang, which sent dozens of reporters flocking to the courthouse.The report turned out to be untrue.
The news on Tuesday was not particularly good for Apple: revenue was flat, profit was lower, and even the sales of iPads were down.Investors did not seem to mind, at least in the short term, sending the company's shares about 4 percent higher in after-hours trading. Strong iPhone sales helped beat the expectations of Wall Street.But Apple's earnings report on Tuesday highlighted some of the challenges the company faces as it continues to expand overseas. The company sells plenty of devices in the United States, but sales have lagged in some larger overseas markets, which are crucial for its future growth.China has been especially problematic for the company. Overall sales of Apple devices in China fell 4 percent compared with the same quarter last year. And in Hong Kong, Apple's sales were down about 20 percent — a trend that Timothy D. Cook, the company's chief executive, found puzzling."Hong Kong is an international shopping haven," Mr. Cook said on the company's earnings call in response to an analyst's questions about Apple's performance in China. "We saw some dramatic downturn there. It's not totally clear exactly why that occurred."Gaining a foothold in foreign markets is becoming increasingly vital for Apple. Its growth has slowed in the most recent quarters, as its devices have largely saturated the United States and some top markets in Europe.The tepid growth has led many investors to clamor for a new blockbuster product to restart growth and give Apple's sagging stock a much-needed lift. But no such product has been announced. For several quarters now, Mr. Cook has suggested that the company has plenty of new products in the pipeline, and that some could reach the public this fall or next year.The company could decide to introduce a cheaper iPhone to spur growth in China and other foreign markets, or even a so-called smartwatch that would compete in a brand-new market of wearable computers. Those ideas have long been discussed and considered at the company."Competition is heating up," said Laurence Isaac Balter, chief market strategist at Oracle Investment Research, which has clients that own Apple shares. "They need to come up with some game-changers pretty soon."The third quarter is typically a slow time for Apple. That is because the company traditionally introduces a new iPhone model in the fall, so in the summer many consumers are waiting for the next model to be released.But sales of iPhones were strong. The company sold 31.2 million iPhones, up from 26 million in the same period a year ago. It was the most Apple had ever sold in a third quarter.Those sales helped generate a net income in the third quarter of $6.9 billion, or $7.47 a share. But that was down from $8.8 billion in the same quarter a year earlier. The company said revenue was roughly flat at $35.3 billion, from $35 billion a year ago.The net income beat the expectations of Wall Street analysts. They had expected $7.32 a share and revenue of $35 billion, according to a survey by Thomson Reuters.Analysts closely watch Apple's gross profit margins. For the third quarter, Apple's gross margin was 36.9 percent, down from 42.8 percent a year ago. In April, Apple warned that its gross margin would continue to fall in the fiscal third quarter to 36 to 37 percent.Strong sales of Apple's cheaper iPads and older iPhones are putting the squeeze on the margins. Apple did not disclose how many of each phone or tablet model it sold. But it said that while its iPhone 5 was the best seller, sales of the previous generations, the iPhone 4 and iPhone 4S, were also strong. Late last year, Apple added the cheaper iPad Mini to its lineup.Even with the Mini, Apple's iPad sales were a disappointment, coming in at 14.6 million for the quarter, missing analyst estimates for 16.7 million. Mac sales were also down slightly, at 3.8 million, from 4 million a year ago.Investors concerned about Apple's growth have punished the company's stock. The stock price has fallen by roughly 40 percent from its peak of $705.07 in September. Shares closed at $418.99 on Tuesday, down 1.7 percent, before gaining ground in after-hours trading.Apple may face a challenge in China, but the tech industry's other two giants, Microsoft and Google, have their struggles, too. Microsoft posted a profit of almost $5 billion for the quarter, missing expectations of analysts, thanks in part to disappointing sales of its Surface tablet and an industrywide decline in sales of personal computers. Google also posted a profit, of $3.23 billion, but still missed analysts' expectations as its desktop search business continued to slow and ad prices shrank.Mr. Cook told investors to stay optimistic about Apple in China. About half a million people there are creating apps for iOS, Apple's mobile software system for iPhones and iPads, he said. Sales of the iPad in greater China were up 8 percent and up 37 percent in mainland China, he said."Over the arc of time, China is a huge opportunity for Apple," Mr. Cook said, "so I don't get discouraged over a 90-day kind of cycle with economic factors."
HONG KONG — China issued a directive on Tuesday banning the construction of government buildings for the next five years, the latest in a series of initiatives by President Xi Jinping to discourage corruption and foster frugality at a time of broad popular resentment against high-living bureaucrats.The central government authorities in Beijing have periodically tried to rein in the widely mocked penchant for grandiosity among local officials who order offices for themselves. A few of these projects have been slowed or stopped, including the nearly Pentagon-size headquarters started by a local government several years ago in an impoverished corner of Anhui Province in central China.But until now, such isolated cases have done little to dissuade other local officials from their own pharaonic ambitions. The government of Jinan, the capital of Shandong Province, attracted critical attention across China last fall after beginning construction of what was initially planned as Asia's largest government building.But Tuesday's joint directive by China's cabinet and the Chinese Communist Party went much further than prohibiting the construction of buildings: it also banned a long list of strategies that local leaders have used to circumvent previous, more informal efforts to discourage them.Expanding or restoring existing government compounds in the name of street repairs or urban planning? Not allowed. A new training center or hotel? Also forbidden. Multiple offices for the same official? Prohibited.Since taking over as general secretary of the Chinese Communist Party in November, Mr. Xi has tried to discourage lavish spending and gift giving by the party's cadres and rein in opulent lifestyles among senior military officers. His campaign temporarily emptied many luxury restaurants over the winter, although there have been recent signs of a revival of behind-the-scenes extravagance.The new directive showed clear signs of being a continuation of the anticorruption campaign, describing the ban as "important for building a clean government" and improving the ties between the party and the people.Yet the prohibition on new buildings also comes as the government is starting to round up and prosecute activists who called on officials to disclose their wealth and the wealth of their families. In the most celebrated case, Xu Zhiyong, a prominent human rights activist, was charged last week with "assembling a crowd to disrupt order in a public place" — even though, according to his wife, he had already been under informal house arrest for three months.Debt-fueled spending by local governments, partly for new buildings but also for roads, sewers, water systems and other projects, has been a growing worry in recent years for Beijing policy makers, as well as for economists and credit-rating agencies around the world. Most tallies of total local government debt in China tend to be in the vicinity of $2 trillion, equal to three months of China's entire economic output, but some estimates are even higher.Cheng Li, the China research director at the Brookings Institution, said the construction restrictions would do little to assuage broader worries about the Chinese economy."We should put into perspective that the problem of local government spending on buildings is not the most serious problem facing China's economy," Mr. Li said in a telephone interview from Beijing. "The property bubble, shadow banking and the state-owned enterprise monopolies are far more risky."Prime Minister Li Keqiang vowed on coming to office in March that there would be no more new government buildings during the current five-year term of the government, and the new decree follows through on that promise. But the decree also acknowledges that similar efforts to halt profligate spending on such buildings in recent years have not worked as intended, and that the buildings have "harmed the image of the party and government."A clear loophole in Tuesday's directive is that it does little to rein in spending by enterprises partly or entirely owned by government entities. State-owned enterprises have been very active builders of hotels, providing free luxury suites to local officials for their meetings and all too often for assignations with mistresses, according to hotel industry executives.Mr. Li of the Brookings Institution predicted that Mr. Xi would seek greater austerity at state-owned enterprises next.One persistent feature of Chinese political life, the retired official who continues to haunt his former agency or even the entire government by wielding influence from behind the scenes, will not be eradicated by the directive.Former officials who left or retired years ago are supposed to give up their offices, the directive said, but they are not required to do so immediately. These offices "should be returned in time," a statement on a government Web site said.
BEIJING — Ma Jiajia was too busy setting up a sex toys store, Powerful, to attend her college graduation ceremony in Beijing last year.Now Ms. Ma is unveiling a social contact app for customers to meet and share tips about her store's products. At just 22, she is part of China's trend-setting, post-1990 generation that is giving shape to enormous social and cultural changes: Sex, she says, should be openly talked about, "fun" and "funny," not "dirty" or "depressing" and relegated to the far corners of people's minds. Her app, with its bright colors and playful icons, is a symbol of that shift.What happens after people meet is up to them, Ms. Ma said."The technology puts people in touch. What happens later isn't a question of technology," she said in an interview in her black-and-pink decorated store in the city's Gaobeidian district, balancing on her knees a computer with a prototype of the app's yellow interface, the color a play on a Chinese word for pornography.Ms. Ma is alluding to an open secret: Millions of young Chinese are plunging enthusiastically into the world of social contact apps, often location-based and with a hookup element, a dozen people said in interviews."On the one hand there's the new technology, and on the other hand there's sexuality and desire, and these two are coming together and producing new possibilities," said Song Shaopeng, a scholar of Marxism and history at Renmin University of China in Beijing.While WeChat is an established market leader, Momo is rising fast with about 50 million users by July, said the company's spokeswoman, Wen Yajuan. "Mo" is part of a Chinese word meaning "unfamiliar" or "stranger."Lin Yang, 24, said he hooked up last year with a woman he met on Momo. They had sex but "not at home," he said, declining to be more specific.Assignations often take place in hotels rented by the hour, several people said.Mr. Lin, who works at a tech start-up in Beijing, said he initially questioned why a woman would get involved in casual sex. "I don't really understand how girls think," he said."Then I thought, if I am doing it, why shouldn't they?" he said by telephone. "I think they're exploring their sexual freedom. She was so open and free." He is currently seeing another woman he met on Momo.Xiao Bao, 24, a graduate student in gender studies, who asked to be identified only by her nickname, has hooked up about four or five times since she broke up with her last boyfriend. Sex was in a hotel, she said, adding, "You don't always take it all the way.""But it's exciting," she said. "There's no love. It's about sex."The app hookup scene, with its high degree of secrecy and anonymity, offers opportunities to explore different kinds of sexuality.Currently Xiao Bao is dating Sun Sun, a female medical student who used to date men. (She also asked that only her nickname be used.) Sun Sun has tried to hook up via an app called The L, but "I haven't succeeded yet," she laughed.Intrigued, I joined Momo. A friend took a photo of her pewter-furred, caramel-eyed cat. We registered me as Fifi, with the cat as my image. Several nearby men quickly offered a "Ni hao" — Chinese for "Hello." One, who called himself Dezz, was direct — and persistent. He wrote in English, not uncommon among the technically savvy. I told him I was a reporter. That didn't deter him."Wanna try it out?" he wrote.I demurred, explaining I was married. Not a problem. Plenty of women using Momo, he wrote, are in relationships, but "they feel boring that's why they looking for a new kick."At Momo's offices in a glossy Beijing office tower, Wang Li, the wispy-bearded chief operating officer, was wearing a T-shirt, jeans and flip-flops. His business card gave his English name as Wanderlust.Mr. Wang, who is from a small town in Shanxi Province, says he is aware that hooking up is part of the app's attraction, but believes there's more to its popularity — the serious issue of growing loneliness and anomie amid fast-paced urbanization.Growing up, he and his family knew all their neighbors, but all that has changed. "Over these past two years particularly, social changes have been so incredibly fast as people move to cities and towns," he said. "Chinese people are fairly introverted," he said, and in a new environment, "They tend not to make friends with their neighbors.""I've myself lived in many districts in Beijing and never got to know any neighbors," he said. "With this technology I can contact them."Then there's how the app can help people who may have married the wrong person find new life partners, Mr. Wang said."Chinese people didn't have choices before and people are getting to middle age and realizing they don't actually get on with their spouse, because they got married for reasons other than love," he said. "The younger generation has more choices, and I think that's a good thing."Mr. Wang said the app offers three types of contact: individuals making friends with others, forming groups like sport or restaurant clubs (Ms. Wen, the Momo spokeswoman, said there are 700,000 registered groups) and locating resources like bars or shops.The company patrols the app to maintain moral standards, Mr. Wang said. Log on and you will be warned that administrators will delete pornography or other inappropriate content, including soliciting for sex."If both parties are willing to meet, we don't interfere," he said. "But the situation is that things aren't always that polite or respectful and we don't want that in our app, so we expel the 'ugly customers.'"It's like at a party," he said. "If someone drops his pants, well, we'll kick him out. And we are strict."
WASHINGTON — U.S. lawmakers are concerned a Chinese company's planned $4.7 billion acquisition of pork producer Smithfield Foods Inc could affect the safety and availability of heparin, a blood-thinner widely used in heart surgery and kidney dialysis that is derived from pig intestines.Members of the House Committee on Energy and Commerce wrote to Smithfield on July 24 asking the company to turn over information on its production of crude heparin, the raw ingredient used to make the drug.As well as being the world's largest pork producer, with more than 46,000 employees in 25 U.S. states and four countries, Smithfield is also a major supplier of crude heparin.In a letter to Smithfield's Chief Executive Larry Pope, six Republican committee members said the proposed acquisition of Smithfield by Shuanghui International Holdings "raises questions related to the safety and adequacy of the U.S. heparin supply."A spokeswoman for Smithfield, Keira Lombardo, confirmed the company had received the committee's letter "and will respond within the timeframe the committee has outlined."The request comes just weeks after the Senate Agriculture Committee met to examine the potential food safety implications of the deal, which would be the biggest Chinese takeover of a U.S. company.Smithfield said on Wednesday that the U.S. government has decided to take an additional 45 days to review the planned deal. Smithfield and Shuanghui submitted their proposal in June to the Committee on Foreign Investment in the United States, or CFIUS, an executive branch panel that examines foreign investment for potential threats to national security.Many deals are approved during an initial 30-day review, but some transactions are given a second 45-day examination."The Committee's investigation indicates that the U.S. heparin supply is stressed, and could well be in shortage," the lawmakers' letter said."China's heparin market is experiencing its own pressures, and Smithfield Foods under Shuanghui control may be pressured to export its crude heparin product to China instead of supplying U.S. companies."A spokeswoman for the U.S. Food and Drug Administration, Erica Jefferson, said the agency does not comment on congressional letters. A spokesman for Shuanghui said the company had no comment.Nearly 150 people in the United States died in 2007 and 2008, and hundreds suffered serious reactions, after they were treated with contaminated heparin, according to the U.S. Pharmacopeial Convention, the body that sets standards for drug quality and purity.The serious injuries and deaths were associated with the use of heparin that contained active pharmaceutical ingredient (API) from China, the FDA said.The FDA said it evaluated 94 cases of people who died while receiving heparin during the time the contaminated product was on the market. The agency said many reports did not have sufficient information to determine that the tainted heparin was the cause though in three cases the FDA concluded it was "likely" or "probable."The House committee is continuing a broader investigation into the FDA's handling of that event."Because the contamination case was never adequately addressed by Chinese authorities, at least some of the bad actors responsible for the adulteration presumably are still operating in the Chinese heparin business, and there is little deterrence against, but high economic gain for, new heparin-contamination schemes," the lawmakers' letter said.The committee members asked Smithfield to provide details of its heparin operations, including the size of its production and a list of current heparin product customers, including any Chinese heparin customers.They also asked for the names of the key executives at Smithfield Foods involved in making and marketing heparin products, including pig intestines and crude heparin, and details of key managers at any Smithfield facility involved in manufacturing crude heparin.The Smithfield, Virginia-based company makes ham, sausage, bacon and other prepared meats under labels such as Eckrich, Gwaltney and Armor. It has argued the takeover deal is good for the United States because it will boost pork exports.
BEIJING — China will spend $275 billion to tackle air pollution over the next five years, highlighting how the issue has become a priority for the leadership.The amount is more than the total economic output of Hong Kong last year and underlines how the government is eager to bring about a visible improvement in China's bad air, which has caused discontent among its citizens and tarnished the country's image abroad.The China Daily reported Thursday that the plan targets Beijing, the neighboring port city of Tianjin and densely populated Hebei province, which surrounds them.The environment ministry didn't immediately respond to a request for comment.China's government was long indifferent to the environment as it pursued economic development. The country's major cities have some of the world's worst smog and water supplies are badly polluted.The government has begun launching anti-pollution initiatives after mounting public frustration.The China Daily said the latest initiative aims to reduce emissions of pollutants in Beijing and surrounding areas by 25 percent by 2017 from 2012 levels. It said details would be released in late July at the earliest.
BEIJING — Bo Xilai, the disgraced former Communist Party official, was indicted on Thursday on criminal charges of bribery, corruption and abuse of power, paving the way for a prominent trial expected to start within weeks that could be a climactic chapter in a scandal that exposed sordid political machinations at the top levels of the party.The charges were filed at a court in Jinan, the capital of Shandong Province, in eastern China, a court employee said. Mr. Bo was removed in March 2012 from his senior post as party chief of Chongqing, a municipality of 30 million in southwest China. He was later expelled from the Communist Party and its elite 25-member Politburo.Officials from Shandong have been in Chongqing recently to discuss trial details there, according to one person in Chongqing with official contacts.The party's General Office has circulated an internal document giving further details of the basis for the charges, said one person in Beijing with high-level contacts. The document accused Mr. Bo, 64, of taking about $3.3 million in bribes, embezzling almost $1 million and abusing his power as a senior official. The document also said a main source of the bribes was Xu Ming, a billionaire who lives in Dalian, the northeastern city where Mr. Bo had been the mayor.Mr. Xu, once listed by Forbes as one of the 10 richest people in China, has been detained since spring 2012 and is also expected to be criminally charged. Mr. Xu entered into real estate ventures in Chongqing after Mr. Bo became party chief there in December 2007, and he made frequent trips on his private plane to the city. Mr. Xu was part of an inner circle of Bo family allies that included Ma Biao, a business executive, and Yu Junshi, a former military intelligence officer who served as a Bo family fixer. All were detained in spring 2012.Last August, Mr. Bo's wife, Gu Kailai, was given a suspended death sentence, which usually equals a life prison term, for murdering Neil Heywood, a British business executive whose body was discovered in a Chongqing hotel room in November 2011. In February 2012, the Chonging police chief, Wang Lijun, fled to a nearby American consulate to tell officials there of the murder.Several political analysts said Mr. Bo's punishment could range from a prison term of 15 to 20 years to a suspended death sentence. Like those of his wife, Mr. Bo's upcoming court sessions are expected to amount to little more than a show trial, in which a verdict has already been negotiated by Communist Party leaders.Mr. Bo would be the first Politburo member to be tried on criminal charges since 2008, when the former Shanghai party secretary Chen Liangyu was sentenced to 18 years in prison for corruption.
HONG KONG — China's manufacturing sector contracted in July at the quickest pace since last summer, according to the early reading of a survey released on Wednesday.The survey came in at an 11-month low of 47.7 points for July, down from the final June figure of 48.2. A result below the 50-point level signals contraction.The monthly survey of purchasing managers in the manufacturing sector, compiled by the research firm Markit and released by the British bank HSBC, offers one of the earliest glimpses at how the economy is doing each month and is closely watched by economists and investors. Final figures for July, based on more complete survey results, are scheduled to be released next week, alongside the results of an official manufacturing survey to be published the National Bureau of Statistics.The so-called flash P.M.I. data provided the latest sign of the pressures faced by China as a whole as the authorities in Beijing try to raise productivity, living standards and domestic demand while shifting the economy away from its reliance on exports and investment.The new P.M.I. data "suggests a continuous slowdown in manufacturing sectors thanks to weaker new orders and faster destocking," Qu Hongbin, the chief China economist at HSBC, said Wednesday in a statement accompanying the survey results. The July figure puts pressure on the labor market and "reinforces the need to introduce additional fine-tuning measures to stabilize growth."The efforts by President Xi Jinping and Prime Minister Li Keqiang, who took office in March, to rebalance the economy involve a delicate attempt to rein in the inefficient investments and surging lending of the past few years — but to do so without snuffing out the growth that is needed to create jobs, and maintain social and financial stability.Analysts generally agree that the newfound emphasis on the quality, rather than the sheer speed, of growth is encouraging because it could bring about some of the changes that are needed to put China's once supercharged economy on the path toward a more sustainable pace of expansion in the long term.But this process also entails the risk that growth could slow down more sharply than intended, some economists warn.Data released on July 15 showed that China's gross domestic product grew 7.5 percent in the second quarter of this year, compared with the same period a year earlier. That was a notable slowdown from previous quarters, showing that China's economy continues to cool and indicating that Beijing may struggle to meet its official growth target of 7.5 percent for the full year if the deterioration continues.
BEIJING — At least 18 more people have been detained in China in connection with a corruption scandal involving British drugmaker GlaxoSmithKline, state media reported, giving more details on a probe which has rocked the company.State radio reported late on Friday on its website that police in the central city of Zhengzhou had "recently held, in accordance with the law, 18 GlaxoSmithKline (China) employees and some medical personnel".It provided no details of the detentions.The Zhengzhou police news department, reached by telephone, said they were "unaware of the situation" and declined to comment further.GSK did not immediately respond to a request for comment.Chinese police have previously announced the detention of four Chinese GSK executives in connection with allegations that the drugmaker funneled up to 3 billion yuan ($489 million) to travel agencies to facilitate bribes to doctors and officials.GSK has admitted that some Chinese executives appeared to have broken the law but Chief Executive Andrew Witty said on Wednesday that head office had no knowledge of the alleged wrongdoing.The official Xinhua news agency said that certain GSK employees are "suspected of offering bribes to doctors, asking them to prescribe more drugs in order to grow sales volume, and in the meantime pushing up drug prices".Xinhua cited an interview with a man surnamed Li, who it said was a regional sales manager for GSK responsible for selling respiratory drugs to more than 10 hospitals in Zhengzhou, who detailed how the corruption worked."They invited doctors to join high-end academic conferences to help the practitioners increase influence in their fields. They also established good personal relations with doctors by catering to their pleasures or offering them money, in order to make them prescribe more drugs," Xinhua said."A 35-year-old female medical representative surnamed Wang, working under Li, said she entered doctors' offices to act as their assistant, and meet their needs as much as possible, even their sexual desires," the report added."Wang said GSK China's executives already knew this, and some executives gave clear directives to the sales department to offer bribes to doctors with money or opportunities to attend academic conferences."However, many doctors got money even when the lectures did not actually exist, Xinhua said."Wang just forged lecture materials in order to obtain reimbursements from the company," it added."According to Li and Wang, the company set the target of raising drug sales by 30 percent annually in the last two years, and the target can only be achieved by pushing doctors to prescribe more if there are no increases in the number of patients," Xinhua reported.GSK this week appointed one of its top European executives as the new head of operations in China.
BEIJING — China's vice president told North Korean leader Kim Jong-un that Beijing will push for talks on ridding the Korean peninsula of nuclear weapons, as he led a delegation to Pyongyang to mark the 60th anniversary of the end of the Korean War.Li Yuanchao is a member of China's 25-member Politburo and the talks are the highest-level contact between China and North Korea since Kim assumed power in December 2011 upon the death of his father, Kim Jong-il.Li conveyed a "verbal message" from Chinese President Xi Jinping to Kim during the meeting on Thursday, China's Foreign Ministry said in a statement issued on Friday."As a close neighbor of the Korean peninsula, China will persist in the denuclearization of the peninsula, adhere to safeguarding the peace and stability on the peninsula and persist in using dialogue and consultation to resolve the problem," Li was quoted as telling Kim.Li reiterated that China was willing to work with all concerned parties to promote six-party talks and was "committed to pushing for the process of denuclearization".Six-party aid-for-disarmament talks, involving the two Koreas, the United States, Japan, Russia and host China, collapsed in 2008 when the North walked out.Kim told Li that North Korea "supports China's efforts to resume the six-party talks", according to China's Foreign Ministry.China is the main economic and diplomatic lifeline for impoverished and isolated North Korea, which has tested nuclear weapons three times since 2006, and the neighbors have shared adversity in the past.Visiting the graves of Chinese soldiers killed in the Korean War, Li praised their sacrifice in the name of "defending peace and protecting justice", China's Xinhua news agency reported."The reason we are commemorating the 60th anniversary of the end of the Korean War is to look forward to the future, to better maintain peace and stability on the Korean peninsula and seek regional prosperity and development," Li added.China has grown increasingly frustrated with North Korea since it conducted its latest nuclear test in February.The North threatened South Korea and the United States with nuclear war for weeks in response to toughened U.N. sanctions imposed after the test, but it has since been more conciliatory.Li told Kim that relations between China and North Korea were "entering a new era" and they would build on the past while preparing for the future, China's Foreign Ministry said. Li's visit ends on Sunday.In June, a top North Korean diplomat repeated an offer for international talks on his country's nuclear program during a meeting in China, saying the denuclearization of the peninsula was the "dying wish" of North Korea's founder, Kim Il-sung.The United States has said any talks must involve action by the North to show it is moving toward disarmament.Washington has been skeptical of moves by Pyongyang towards dialogue as it has repeatedly backtracked on deals, most recently in 2012, when it agreed to a missile and nuclear test moratorium only to fire a rocket a few weeks later.
BEIJING — The death toll from mudslides that have ravaged an earthquake-shattered region of northwestern China rose to 21 on Saturday, with another four missing, state media reported.The landslides triggered by heavy rains struck just south of the city of Dingxi where Monday's earthquake left 95 dead, five missing and more than 800 people in hospital.Nine villages under the city of Tianshui remained out of contact as of Saturday morning after the storms knocked out power, cut off communications and blocked roads, the official Xinhua News Agency said.The heavy storms and mudslides left one village, Rongguang, filled with debris, damaging more than half of the village homes and burying villagers, Xinhua said.The area along the Yellow River has rolling hills of loose soil blown south from the Gobi desert. Thunderstorms have loosened the terraced hillsides that were made unstable by the quake.About 123,000 people were affected by the quake, with 31,600 moved to temporary shelters, the provincial earthquake administration said on its website. Almost 2,000 homes were destroyed and about 22,500 damaged, it said.Urban areas where buildings are more solid were spared major damage, unlike the traditional mud and brick homes in the countryside.
BEIJING — China says ships from its newly formed coast guard confronted Japanese patrol vessels Friday in waters surrounding East China Sea islands claimed by both sides.The State Oceanic Administration that oversees the service says four of its ships "sternly declared" China's sovereignty over the islands called Senkaku by Japan and Diaoyu by China, and demanded they leave the area. The uninhabited archipelago is controlled by Tokyo but also claimed by Beijing.It was not clear if any action resulted from the Chinese declaration. Such sovereignty declarations are usually made by hailing Japanese boats by radio and loudspeaker, as well as flashing shipboard signs.Ships from Chinese civilian agencies have maintained a steady presence in the area since tensions spiked in September following Japan's purchase of some of the islands from their private owners.Those vessels are being replaced by ships from the coast guard, which was formally inaugurated on Monday and merges the resources of four former agencies. China says the move was intended to boost its ability to enforce its maritime claims, upping the stakes in an increasingly tense competition for marine territory and resources in waters off its eastern and southeastern coasts.Chinese coast guard ships have also been spotted this week at Mischief Reef off the western Philippine coast, according to a confidential Philippine government report obtained by The Associated Press. China occupied the vast reef in 1995, sparking protests from rival claimant Manila.China says virtually the entire South China Sea and its islands belong to it, a claim based on alleged historical precedents that are strongly contested by the Philippines, Vietnam and others.While Beijing has mainly used civilian agencies to patrol its claims, the new coast guard gives it greater latitude to do so by centralizing operations in a single body. The body is nominally under civilian control, but closely coordinates with the increasingly formidable Chinese navy that recently added an aircraft carrier to its fleet.Coast guard ships are mainly repurposed naval or commercial vessels and are equipped with light armaments such as machine guns and deck cannons, unlike in the past when most of China's patrol craft had no weaponry.Japan has already expressed renewed unease about China's military and maritime activity near the disputed islands, and on Friday released a defense paper calling for an increase in its surveillance capability, possibly including the use of drones capable of wide-range, high-altitude monitoring around the clock.The paper also proposed creating a marine force to defend the disputed East China Sea islands.Japan scrambled jets on Wednesday to keep watch on a Chinese Y-8 early warning plane flying over international waters between Japan's southern Okinawa island and an outer island relatively close to the disputed area in the East China Sea.The Chinese Defense Ministry issued a statement defending the right of its aircraft to operate in the area.Around the same time the Chinese fighter jet was sighted, Japan's coast guard reported the appearance of the four coast guard vessels near the disputed islands.Japan's coast guard said the four Chinese craft were seen early Wednesday just outside Japanese territorial waters.Associated Press writers Jim Gomez in Manila, Philippines, and Mari Yamaguchi in Tokyo contributed to this report.
BEIJING — An angry resident set fire to a nursing home in northeastern China early Friday, killing himself and 10 other elderly residents, local authorities said.The Hailun city government said the blaze was set early Friday in the home's hospice wing by a 45-year-old man who had been sent there three years ago after suffering from thrombosis, and who has no income and no one to care for him.It said the man, Wang Gui, had argued Thursday with another resident he suspected of stealing 200 yuan ($33) from him, screaming at staff and smashing windows.Staff thought that they had calmed him down, but he grew agitated again later in the night before setting the fire. Two other residents were hospitalized for smoke inhalation following the blaze.It said Wang died at the scene.The official Xinhua News Agency said 32 seniors were registered in the hospice wing. It said 283 seniors live in the home and most are retired farmers.Hailun is in Heilongjiang province about 650 kilometers (400 miles) northeast of Beijing. The area is one of China's main grain-producing regions.With a rapidly aging population and under-resourced social security net, China faces increasing pressure to provide safe and affordable care for the elderly.
BEIJING — A well-known human rights advocate who lives in Beijing, Hu Jia, was detained for several hours on Thursday evening by the police in the southern city of Shenzhen, along with his five-year-old daughter, Qianci, according to Mr. Hu's wife, Zeng Jinyan.Also detained was Teng Biao, a lawyer from Beijing.The three were at a restaurant in Shenzhen, which is across the border from Hong Kong. It was Mr. Hu's 40th birthday.A photograph of the three standing in front of a birthday cake with a pair of lit candles circulated on Twitter late Thursday.Mr. Hu served three years in prison after being found guilty of "inciting subversion of the state." That is a common charge used to silence critics of the Communist Party and its policies.Mr. Teng is often put under temporary house arrest, especially during delicate public anniversaries.
HONG KONG — A man with a knife killed two government officials at a family planning bureau and injured four other people, the Chinese state news media reported on Wednesday, in an episode that drew wide attention in China because of continuing controversy over the country's one-child policy.The man, identified only as having the surname He, entered the bureau on Tuesday morning in Dongxing, in the Guangxi Zhuang Autonomous Region in southernmost China, and began attacking people there with a knife, the state news media reported.A police officer in Dongxing confirmed in a telephone interview on Wednesday that an attack had taken place and that a suspect had been detained. The suspect had been certified by the government since 2010 as disabled because of mental illness, said the police officer, who declined to identify herself or elaborate.According to the state news media, the man had gone to the bureau on Monday to register his fourth child for permanent residency, but had been refused the registration because he had not paid a fine for having multiple children. Registration is needed to send a child to school and to qualify for many other government benefits.The one-child policy is the target of growing criticism in China partly because of the government's uncompromising enforcement, including forcing women to have abortions as well as issuing heavy fines on families who have more than one child. The policy has also begun to shrink the number of young workers in the labor force, putting sharp upward pressure on factory wages while raising concerns about how to accommodate and financially support the steady growth in the number of elderly dependents.
BEIJING — At least 18 more people have been detained in China in connection with a corruption scandal involving British drugmaker GlaxoSmithKline, state media reported, giving more details on an investigation that has rocked the company.China's state radio reported late on Friday on its website that police in the central city of Zhengzhou had "recently held, in accordance with the law, 18 GlaxoSmithKline (China) employees and some medical personnel".It provided no details of the detentions nor say exactly when they happened.The Zhengzhou police news department, reached by telephone, said they were "unaware of the situation" and declined to comment further.A GSK spokesman in London declined to comment on the report.Chinese police have previously announced the detention of four Chinese GSK executives in connection with allegations that the drugmaker funneled up to 3 billion yuan ($489 million) to travel agencies to facilitate bribes to doctors and officials.GSK has admitted that some Chinese executives appeared to have broken the law but Chief Executive Andrew Witty said on Wednesday that head office had no knowledge of the alleged wrongdoing.The official Xinhua news agency said that certain GSK employees were "suspected of offering bribes to doctors, asking them to prescribe more drugs in order to grow sales volume, and in the meantime pushing up drug prices".Xinhua cited an interview with a man surnamed Li, who it said was a regional sales manager for GSK responsible for selling respiratory drugs to more than 10 hospitals in Zhengzhou, who gave details of how the corruption worked."They invited doctors to join high-end academic conferences to help the practitioners increase influence in their fields. They also established good personal relations with doctors by catering to their pleasures or offering them money, in order to make them prescribe more drugs," Xinhua said."A 35-year-old female medical representative surnamed Wang, working under Li, said she entered doctors' offices to act as their assistant, and meet their needs as much as possible, even their sexual desires," the report added."Wang said GSK China's executives already knew this, and some executives gave clear directives to the sales department to offer bribes to doctors with money or opportunities to attend academic conferences."However, many doctors got money even when the lectures did not actually exist, Xinhua said."Wang just forged lecture materials in order to obtain reimbursements from the company," it added."According to Li and Wang, the company set the target of raising drug sales by 30 percent annually in the last two years, and the target can only be achieved by pushing doctors to prescribe more if there are no increases in the number of patients," Xinhua reported.GSK this week appointed one of its top European executives as the new head of operations in China.
BEIJING — China's Defence Ministry on Saturday urged international vigilance of Japan's military plans after it unveiled an interim report calling for strengthened armed forces, including the possible acquisition of the ability to hit enemy bases.Japan's proposal - its latest step away from the constraints of its pacifist constitution - is part of a review of defense policy by Prime Minister Shinzo Abe's government, which released an interim report on the issue on Friday. Final review conclusions are due by the end of the year.Japan's Defence Ministry also said it would consider buying unmanned surveillance drones, create a force of Marines to protect remote islands, such as those disputed with China, and consider beefing up the ability to transport troops to far-flung isles."The sections about China in this report by Japan are playing on the same old themes, exaggerating the military threat from China, and have ulterior motives," China's Defence Ministry said in a statement on its website (www.mod.gov.cn)."This year, Japan has come up with all kinds of excuses to continue to expand its armaments ... creating tensions in the region. These moves deserve the highest vigilance from neighboring countries in Asia and from the international community," it said.The hawkish Abe took office in December for a rare second term, pledging to bolster the military to cope with what Japan sees as an increasingly threatening security environment including an assertive China and an unpredictable North Korea.Abe called on Friday for a leaders' summit or a foreign ministers' meeting between his country and China as soon as possible.But Abe's appeal drew a cool reaction from China which accused Japan of lacking sincerity.Over the past year, China's stand-off with Japan over a string of uninhabited rocky islands in the East China Sea known as the Senkaku in Japan and Diaoyu in China has become more acrimonious.China also believes that Japan has never properly atoned for its brutal invasion and occupation of parts of the country before and during World War Two.
SHANGHAI — The Chinese government released more details on Friday about its accusations involving GlaxoSmithKline , which has been rocked in recent weeks by a bribery and corruption scandal at its unit in China.The company also late Thursday named Hervé Gisserot, one of the company's top executives in Europe, to succeed Mark Reilly as the head of its operations in China. Mr. Reilly left the country for London after the company's offices were raided by the police in late June.The company said Mr. Reilly was not a target of the bribery and corruption investigation and would remain at the company to help conduct an internal review of the China operation.On Friday, new details in the case were presented in interviews published by Xinhua, the official state-run news agency in China.According to those reports, several Glaxo employees have confessed to bribing doctors with gifts, travel, lecture fees and cash bonuses to persuade them to prescribe more of the company's drugs. In some cases, the Glaxo employees reportedly said, doctors were compensated for conferences or lectures that never took place.One 35-year-old Glaxo employee told Xinhua she regularly visited doctors' offices to offer assistance and even "to meet their sexual desires," according to the report.The government has said it has detained four Chinese-born senior executives from Glaxo's China operations. Xinhua reported Friday that 18 more Glaxo employees have been held in the city of Zhengzhou, in Henan Province in eastern China.Although no formal charges have yet been filed against Glaxo or its employees, the scandal has been a huge embarrassment for the company in one of its fastest-growing markets.Glaxo's top executives in London have apologized and pledged to cooperate with Chinese investigators.In a conference call after the company released its earnings on Wednesday, its chief executive, Andrew P. Witty, called the accusations against his company's China operations "deeply disappointing."Glaxo also said on Friday that Steve Nechelput, a British national and the company's head of finance in China, was no longer being barred by the authorities from leaving the country.The scandal appears to be part of a broader crackdown on bribery and corruption in China. The Chinese government has sent investigators to other global pharmaceutical companies operating in the country. Officials have also begun to review drug pricing policies and question doctors and hospital employees about whether they have accepted bribes.In Glaxo's case, the government accused the company of using travel agencies to help funnel bribes to doctors, hospitals and government officials. The company was also accused of committing tax fraud and cheating consumers with artificially high drug prices.In interviews with the state-run news media, Glaxo sales representatives said they had been trained in how to increase drug sales by bribing and entertaining doctors and that some of this was done through the use of fake invoices.One hospital employee told Xinhua that a Glaxo representative, identified only by the surname Wang, offered bribes for business."After we got familiar, Wang visited me during festivals, treated me to dinner and bought me gifts," the hospital employee said. "When our department held events, Wang also paid the bill."
TOKYO — Japanese Vice Foreign Minister Akitaka Saiki will visit China on Monday and Tuesday for talks with senior officials, the latest in a series of efforts by Prime Minister Shinzo Abe to improve relations soured by a bitter territorial row.The hawkish Abe, who cemented his grip on power in an upper house election last week, called on Friday for an unconditional meeting between Japanese and Chinese leaders.Isao Iijima, an adviser to the premier, told reporters on Sunday that Abe could soon hold a summit with Chinese President Xi Jinping, but Chief Cabinet Secretary Yoshihide Suga said no schedule had been set."As Prime Minister Abe has repeatedly said, he wants a mutually beneficial, strategic relationship and the door is always open for dialogue. However, there is no immediate schedule for a leadership summit," Suga told a news conference on Monday.Often fragile Sino-Japanese ties have been seriously strained since September, when a territorial row over tiny islands in the East China Sea flared following Japan's nationalization of the uninhabited isles.Concern that Abe, who came to power in December, wants to recast Japan's wartime history with a less apologetic tone has added to the tension."Vice Minister Saiki will visit China on July 29-30 and exchange views with Chinese officials," a Japanese foreign ministry spokesman said. He did not give further details.China's Foreign Ministry responded to Abe's overture on Friday by saying its door was always open for talks but that the problem lay in Japan's attitude."The crux of the matter at present is Japan's unwillingness to face up to the serious problems which exist in Sino-Japan relations and it is avoiding having earnest talks and consultations with China," the ministry said in a statement faxed to Reuters. Japan, it added, should "stop using empty slogans about so-called dialogue to gloss over disagreements".Abe, 58, may be hoping to repeat one of the few successes of his troubled 2007-2007 term in office, when he thawed ties with China that had frayed during the five-year stint of his predecessor, Junichiro Koizumi.Experts say a key sticking point to a Sino-Japanese summit is whether the two sides can find a way to set aside the territorial row to calm the situation and focus on other aspects of relations between the world's second- and third-biggest economies.China wants Japan to first acknowledge that a formal dispute exists, a step that Tokyo has rejected for fear it would undermine its claim to sovereignty of the isles, known as the Senkaku in Japan and the Diaoyu in China, the experts said.Tensions rose last year after Japan nationalized the islands and Chinese and Japanese ships and aircraft have been playing a cat-and-mouse game nearby, raising worries about an accidental clash that could escalate. On Monday, Japan's coast guard said four Chinese vessels were sighted in nearby waters, although not in an area Japan considers its territory.The United States has affirmed that the islands are included in its commitment under a U.S.-Japan security treaty, but has repeatedly made clear it would like to see tensions abate.Whether China's Xi, who faces huge challenges in dealing with corruption and slower-than-expected growth, has the bandwidth to improve ties with Tokyo is as yet unclear, especially given the negative view of Japan among many Chinese.Beijing may also be waiting to see how Abe handles the touchy topic of wartime history, given the still bitter memories in China of Japan's past aggression.Japan's Mainichi newspaper said last week Abe was unlikely to visit Yasukuni Shrine on August 15, the emotive anniversary of Japan's defeat in World War Two. The shrine is seen by critics as a symbol of Tokyo's past militarism because leaders convicted by an Allied tribunal as war criminals are honored there along with war dead.
"Are we coming back here to sleep?" I asked our guide, Joe Zhang, at the beginning of a two-day hike last July along the Great Wall of China, which I was making with my husband, Robb Kendrick, a photographer, and two teenage sons.Joe shook his head and guessed that the pillow belonged to a local farmer passing through. When I asked where we were going to camp, he pointed out the window to the snaking wall that sliced through lush Panlong (Coiling Dragon) Mountain, part of the Yanshan Range, which stretches across northern Hebei Province."If we camp tonight, we'll set up tents inside a watchtower that way," he said in good English. "If we camp."That "if," which he felt compelled to repeat, bothered me. My family had signed up with the tour operator Great Wall Adventure Club to hike this remote part of the Great Wall because I loved the idea of actually sleeping on the wall. I envisioned drifting off to the same sounds and scents that a Mongol-fighting soldier would have experienced centuries ago. I imagined watching the sun burst over peaks crowned by ancient crenelated watchtowers in the morning.Plenty of tour operators take visitors on half-day tours from Beijing to the Badaling or Mutianyu sections of the Great Wall, which are 40 to 50 miles north of the capital; with travel time from Beijing, that leaves about two hours on the wall. But I wanted to escape the crowds and get a wilder, deeper experience. On its Web site, the Dallas-based Great Wall Adventure Club guaranteed we'd camp on the wall, but in subsequent communications, I learned the guarantee held as long as the weather was good. As we prepared for our outing, I tried not to think of the forecast I'd heard for our first day: chance of thunderstorms, 80 percent.At 8 that morning, Joe — a lively young man who'd studied Great Wall history in college and on his own — and a driver picked us up in a van at our rented Beijing apartment. After getting through snarls of city traffic, we made our way about 90 miles northeast, much of it on a new highway that wove through increasingly mountainous terrain, arriving in the village of Gubeikou about 10 a.m. When the driver dropped us off at a ticket booth where Joe bought our entrance permits, we took only what we needed that day — water, sunscreen, cameras — and Joe carried our lunch. Our overnight bags stayed in the van with the driver, who would meet us at the end of our day's six-mile hike in the town of Jinshanling, a 20-minute drive away.Climbing up a steep paved path, we were electrified by the first glimpse of the imposing wall above us. A watchtower, poking over the trees, was haunting in its deteriorating state. "It must have seemed like a skyscraper back then," my oldest son, Gus Kendrick, 16, said.The Great Wall — 5,500 miles by some counts, longer by others — is not one wall, but many that were built starting in ancient times, and were consolidated and reinforced during the Ming dynasty (1368-1644). The purpose: keeping northern raiders from swooping down into the heart of China. The stretch of wall between Gubeikou and Jinshanling, which we hiked on the first day, is considered a prime example of Ming dynasty construction, built from 1568 through 1583 on top of a 1,000-year-old relic of a wall from the Northern Qi dynasty (550-577). Because the Gubeikou area was a strategic passage to Beijing, the more than 40 watchtowers we passed are closely spaced, and the wall was especially strong and well reinforced, constructed of brick up its 23-foot height.As we began our hike, I was struck by what felt like an eternal loneliness and loveliness; as far as I could see, nothing but that golden line careening across the crumpled mountains and standing guard alone, whether needed or not, for centuries.
LINTONG, China — With handshakes and smiles, China's military put its best foot forward on Monday as it opened a secretive base to a rare visit by journalists, in an effort to allay Asia's growing fears about the country's strategic intentions.China has advertised its military ambitions with displays of new hardware, from its first test flight of a stealth fighter jet in early 2011 to its launch of a fledgling aircraft carrier - both technologies that need further years of development.The moves come as China jangles nerves in Asia and the United States with increasingly bold moves to assert territorial claims in the East and South China Seas.But on an annual trip to a Chinese military base -- this year, for the first time, one outside of Beijing -- officers were at pains to show they had nothing to hide and the world had nothing to fear."The Chinese people and the People's Liberation Army are peace loving," said Chen Xifeng, the gruff commander of the base in Lintong, which is close to the northern tomb where the famed Terracotta Warriors were discovered."China does have territorial disputes with some neighbors but the government and military are quite restrained in dealing with them," Chen, whose base houses an air defense brigade, told reporters."As soldiers, we are happy to see the development of our military, but we love peace even more."The base is grouped under the Lanzhou Military Region, one of China's seven military regions, and is strategically important because the restive far western region of Xinjiang falls within its boundaries. Xinjiang itself borders Central Asia, Pakistan and Afghanistan.Chen's base is also home to a detachment of advanced HQ-7B short-range anti-aircraft missiles, though they were not put in front of the cameras as they were off-base at a training exercise, the commander said.Instead, ageing anti-aircraft cannons dating from the 1960s were brought out, along with a slightly more modern version, and soldiers chatted amiably about their equipment and why they joined the army as they posed for pictures."It was always my dream to join up. I've always loved my country and wanted to help defend it," said Hu Dan, 32, sweating under his tightly fitted helmet in the afternoon heat. Hu, from the eastern province of Jiangsu, became a soldier when he was just 18.Spending on the People's Liberation Army will rise 10.7 percent to 740.6 billion yuan ($120 billion) this year, a number many governments and analysts say is not representative of the country's true defense outlays.More sensitive questions were studiously swatted away on the carefully organized visit.Geng Yansheng, the Chinese military's official spokesman who often appears in state media issuing missives on everything from relations with Japan to military spending, refused to talk about anything besides the day's activities."We can talk about all these things back in Beijing," Geng admonished reporters, when asked about tensions with Japan over a group of disputed islands in the East China Sea.China wants to show its commitment to transparency by arranging such visits, he added."This visit shows how open we are ... But this openness is a gradual process," Geng said. "We will continue to do this and open up more bases for visits."
TAIPEI — Taiwan's top financial regulator and its defense minister have stepped down, the premier said on Monday, as part of a reshuffle that analysts say is aimed at boosting President Ma Ying-jeou's increasingly poor popularity ratings.Ma's economic and China policies have triggered widespread criticism while Taiwan's less-than-stellar economic performance and stagnant wage growth have also been a drag on his ratings which have hovered around the 20-percent mark for months.Chen Yuh-chang, outgoing chief of the Financial Supervisory Commission, is widely seen as close to Ma but had been criticized by industry executives for being too conservative on allowing Taiwan's financial services firms to expand into China.Defense Minister Kao Hua-chu resigned amid a public outcry over the death of a soldier after punishment for minor violations of military conduct.But one analyst said the resignations, confirmed during a news conference given by the premier, Jiang Yi-huah, were not expected to help Ma's standing."It's too late for the president to save his ratings," said a chief investment officer of a local asset management house."His poor ratings will not improve just because two top government officials were replaced," said the officer, who declined to be identified.William Tseng, a deputy finance minister, will become the top financial regulator, while deputy defense minister Andrew Yang takes over as defense minister.Five other government officials were replaced in the reshuffle, said the premier.Lin Cheng-yi, a research fellow in national security at the Academia Sinica think-tank, said the outcry over the death of the soldier had unexpectedly blown up into a major controversy."President Ma maintained a mindset much like the Defense Ministry: at the outset, no one ever thought this would be a huge issue," Lin said."Now, however, it's turned into a major challenge for the establishment."
Justin B. Smith, whose digital strategy swiftly transformed The Atlantic, one of the statelier media vessels around, is about to get a bigger boat.On Monday, Bloomberg will announce that Mr. Smith, the president of Atlantic Media, will be named chief executive of the Bloomberg Media Group. He will report to Daniel L. Doctoroff, chief executive of Bloomberg. Andrew Lack, who managed the media division for five years, will become chairman.After joining The Atlantic in 2007, Mr. Smith developed a reputation as an aggressive promoter of digital media who was able to reconfigure a 156-year-old magazine into a genuine multiplatform property.In a letter to the staff about Mr. Smith's departure, David Bradley, the owner of Atlantic Media, credited Mr. Smith with bringing the company to profitability for the first time under his ownership; doubling revenue; and creating a number of successful digital start-ups, including The Atlantic Wire and Quartz.His quick results at the Atlantic Media Company drew the attention of executives at Bloomberg, who began talking to him at the end of last year."We know that every part of media is being disrupted by technology, and we need someone who understands that," Mr. Doctoroff said. "Justin can drive things forward here because he has an incredibly digital sensibility with a unique understanding of the confluence of journalism and multiple platforms."The move will give Mr. Smith significant scale and a connection with Bloomberg's lucrative terminal business, which produces revenue that allows the company to invest aggressively in media properties. The company has had success in moving from a linear television business to a more diverse model of video distribution, while the acquisition of Businessweek gave Bloomberg an editorial cachet it historically lacked.Even with those successes, the media division has long been treated as a marketing amenity for subscribers to the terminal business. Despite its recent growth, the media division has struggled to gain a consumer base for its properties, which include television, print, radio, mobile, events and digital media.The company was heavily criticized several months ago after revelations that some of its reporters had used the Bloomberg terminals to gain access to data about its users, prompting Eric T. Schneiderman, attorney general of New York, to begin looking into the practice, The Wall Street Journal reported.The company's assets — its success, its size and a hard-driving business culture — might make bringing about change difficult. But Mr. Smith said the fit was a natural one."If you look at the entrepreneurial roots of this company and its history of market disruption and innovation, I think it is the best positioned media company there is," he said. The theory that large companies cannot innovate, he said, "has not been historically true at Bloomberg." He added, "This is a company where you can take big risks with longer horizons."Before joining Atlantic Media, Mr. Smith opened the American edition of the British newsmagazine The Week in 2001. Before that, he was head of corporate strategy for The Economist in London, Hong Kong and New York. He also founded Breaking Media, a collection of Web sites that includes Above the Law, Dealbreaker and Fashionista.Mr. Smith has no experience in the television business and said he would work closely with Mr. Lack in that area. He said he was interested in creating new products, including ones aimed at the global market, while bringing additional digital muscle to Bloomberg's existing businesses.Eric Schmidt, executive chairman of Google, met Mr. Smith at one of Atlantic Media's conferences and they became friends."How many people have really managed to be successful in digital media?" Mr. Schmidt said in a phone call. "Everyone has tried and few have been successful. Justin is one of them. He is moving very fast, but this is the next logical step. It's a serious gain for Bloomberg."
BEIJING — A former food plant worker in China confessed in court on Tuesday to poisoning frozen dumplings that sickened 10 people in Japan in 2008, a scandal that strained Beijing-Tokyo relations just months before China hosted the Olympic Games.The official Xinhua News Agency said Tuesday that 39-year-old Lu Yueting went on trial in Shijiazhuang in northern China's Hebei province and that Japanese officials were present. A court employee confirmed the trial but did not give his name, which is common among low-ranking Chinese bureaucrats.A verdict is expected to be announced at a later date. Citing local prosecutors, the state-run English-language China Daily newspaper said the man is likely to receive at least 10 years in prison.The former worker of Shijiazhuang-based Tianyang Food Plant was dissatisfied with his wages and, in late 2007, injected insecticide into several boxes of frozen dumplings to get attention from his managers, Xinhua said.The products were later sold in Japan and in the Chinese city of Chengdu. Four Chinese people also were sickened, Xinhua said.Millions of bags of dumplings were recalled, and Chinese food products were taken off shelves in Japan out of food safety worries, while Beijing prepared to host the 2008 Olympics Games.Xinhua said authorities detained Lu in 2010 after more than two years of investigations. China Daily said he contaminated the dumplings with methamidophos, a type of pesticide.
BEIJING — China's foreign minister met Japan's top diplomat on Tuesday and discussed problems clouding relations between the two countries as a state-run newspaper said Beijing has ruled out the possibility of a proposed bilateral summit.Foreign Minister Wang Yi and Deputy Foreign Minister Liu Zhenmin met Japanese Vice Foreign Minister Akitaka Saiki, the Chinese foreign ministry said."Both sides had a candid exchange of views on Sino-Japanese relations, China clearly expressed its position on problems facing relations between the two countries," it said in a statement on its website."The two sides will continue to communicate through various channels and various levels," the foreign ministry said.Tokyo had suggested the summit in a bid to defuse a bitter territorial dispute. The state-owned China Daily, in a report published on Tuesday, quoted an unidentified Chinese official as urging the Japanese government to take concrete measures to improve strained ties rather than "empty slogans".
BEIJING — Wang Xue stood in the middle of his courtyard house, next to a pomegranate tree. It could have been a scene out of a Tang dynasty poem but for the sound of a jackhammer and a layer of construction dust that thinly caked the rows of potted plants and vine-covered awnings."The weather is warm, and with that comes construction season," Mr. Wang, 53, said with a grimace at his home northeast of Tiananmen Square, in the middle of a Beijing neighborhood still filled with hutongs, or traditional Chinese alleyways.Beijing's courtyard homes and hutongs have been disappearing rapidly since China opened its economy in the 1980s, robbing the capital of some of its character.In recent years, historians and residents have expressed concern over the razing of hutongs. They have been replaced by large-scale commercial projects, like the ones that went up around Qianmen Street in the south and are now being constructed around the Drum and Bell Towers north of the Forbidden City.But just as threatening to the character of the hutongs are the small-scale construction projects, many of them ad hoc, that sidestep local planning laws and alter the atmosphere of the neighborhoods, say hutong historians and old-time denizens of Beijing. Some longtime hutong residents are complaining about their neighbors' outsize renovations and discussing how the government is or is not cracking down on illegal construction that violates the aesthetics of Beijing's hutongs.Beijing's astronomical housing prices make it tempting for homeowners to build up and out, even though it is illegal to change the exterior appearance of properties in designated heritage zones. The result is a shoddy mess of concrete, plastic awnings and tarpaulins, with an extra few floors or an extension going up in a day or two of surreptitious construction.Disgruntled neighbors complain of a history of lax enforcement, but there are signs that Beijing officials may be trying to stop the illegal construction. Before the end of July, the local government in Dongcheng District, home to many of the hutongs, plans to demolish 192 of the haphazard construction projects, according to The Beijing Evening News, a state-run newspaper. Posters that warn against illegal construction are plastered along some alleyway walls.To complicate efforts to contain the problem, Beijing's courtyards are still a jumble of private and public housing — a legacy of the Mao era, when private property was seized by governments and families were forced to move. Historians estimate that more than half the properties in Beijing's hutongs are classified as public housing, so those behind the illegal projects include both wealthy property owners and more humble local residents.For some public-housing dwellers assigned to the hutongs, four generations are crammed into one or two rooms of a courtyard home. With no kitchens, they cook in the alleyways. With no indoor plumbing, many residents trek to public bathrooms each morning, delicately balancing full plastic buckets that served as overnight chamber pots. During the summer heat, alleyways resemble living rooms, with whole families congregating outside.With space at a premium, families can either apply to move to public housing on the outskirts of Beijing or improvise in their current courtyard by building extensions to accommodate growing families.Tensions are still high at No. 5 Dongsiliutiao Hutong, where city officials at the end of April ordered the bulldozing of a row of illegally constructed houses in which poorer residents lived. Furious, residents went to work within weeks to rebuild the structures."People are angry because this is a country where the rich get richer and the poor get poorer," a 35-year-old man who lives in the neighborhood said on the condition of anonymity, because of fear of reprisal, as he puffed on a cigarette and leaned against a door frame across the street, next to piles of bricks and sand."Those people at No. 5 aren't wealthy and aren't well connected," he added. "If they were, their place wouldn't have been demolished at all."Those engaged in the construction describe it as a way of squeezing more relatives into a confined space."I'm building a second floor for my daughter," said one 60-year-old who lives in a hutong just off bustling Ghost Street, which is filled with late-night restaurants lighted by red lanterns. "She's about to get married, but real estate in Beijing is so expensive that we have no option. We can only build up."Across the street from Mr. Wang's courtyard house, a two-story concrete monstrosity is almost complete, built by a local official, Mr. Wang said.
BEIJING — As more than 100,000 Chinese soldiers swarmed over far fewer American Marines and soldiers in subzero temperatures on treacherous terrain in one of the fiercest battles of the Korean War, two United States Navy pilots took off from an aircraft carrier to provide cover for their comrades on the ground.One of the airmen, Ensign Jesse L. Brown, was the son of an African-American sharecropper from Mississippi. The other, Lt. Thomas J. Hudner Jr., was the son of a white patrician merchant family from Massachusetts.An hour into the flight, Ensign Brown's plane was hit by enemy fire, forcing him to crash land on the side of a mountain at Chosin, north of Pyongyang. Lieutenant Hudner brought his plane down nearby and found Ensign Brown, but could not rescue him.On Monday, nearly 63 years after the Battle of Chosin Reservoir, Mr. Hudner, 88, arrived in Beijing after a 10-day visit to North Korea aimed at finding his friend's remains.The trip to North Korea coincided with the 60th anniversary of the end of the Korean War, a milestone that the North Korean government has tried to use for propaganda purposes.Mr. Hudner's trip was arranged by Chayon Kim, a Korean-American who organized the visit in February of Dennis Rodman, the former N.B.A. star who became the first American to meet with the North's young leader, Kim Jong-un, since he took over from his father in 2011. The timing of Mr. Hudner's visit coincided with a massive military parade on Saturday.Not wanting to be a North Korean prop and citing his frail legs, Mr. Hudner said he avoided the parade and stayed away from the opening of a military museum featuring the U.S.S. Pueblo, an American Navy ship captured by North Korea in 1968.Nonetheless, he said he made the trip to help bring closure not only to himself but to Mr. Brown's widow, Daisy Brown Thorne, 88. In the end, though, his mission failed. It is the rainy season in the North, and the North Koreans told him that almost daily downpours had washed away roads and bridges and made access to the crash site, a five-hour drive from Pyongyang, impossible."It was sort of a jolt to see how they were claiming this was a victory," Mr. Hudner said, as he and his traveling companion, Dick Bonelli, 82, a Marine veteran from the battle of Chosin, relaxed at a hotel here before returning to the United States on Tuesday. "We decided not to go to the parade and to skip the museum and the U.S.S. Pueblo. It still belongs to the United States."Mr. Hudner's attempt to save Mr. Brown has resonated through American military annals not only for its daring, but because of what it said about race relations in the newly desegregated military.The two men met nearly two years after the official desegregation order. "Shortly after I joined the squadron, I was changing into flight gear and he came in and nodded 'Hello,' " Mr. Hudner said of meeting Ensign Brown in December 1949. "I introduced myself, but he made no gesture to shake hands. I think he did not want to embarrass me and have me not shake his hand. I think I forced my hand into his."Mr. Brown, the United States Navy's first black aviator, had endured scorn and prejudice during training from 1947 to 1948, said Adam Makos, who is writing a book on the wartime friendship between the two pilots, and who also visited Pyongyang with Mr. Hudner.On the day of the fateful flight, Mr. Hudner said he took off with Mr. Brown on his wing on Dec. 4, 1950. They were in a formation of six Corsairs, single-propeller planes from World War II that are big enough only for a pilot and are mounted with .50-caliber machine guns.The pilots had been flying almost daily sorties, giving protection to American soldiers engaged in hand-to-hand combat with Chinese soldiers sent by Mao Zedong to fortify the weak North Korean Army.The Americans, surprised by the wave upon wave of Chinese soldiers, and hindered by machine guns that did not work in the freezing weather, had been ordered to withdraw.They were within days of completing that operation when Mr. Hudner and Mr. Brown flew with instructions to patrol roads for enemy troops.This article has been revised to reflect the following correction: An article on Tuesday about the visit of a former Navy pilot, Lt. Thomas J. Hudner Jr., to North Korea to seek the remains of a fellow airman, Ensign Jesse L. Brown, whom he had tried to rescue when Ensign Brown's plane was shot down in the Korean War, misspelled the given name of North Korea's current leader. He is Kim Jong-un, not Jung-un. The article also referred incorrectly to a desegregation order that occurred two years before Lieutenant Hudner met Ensign Brown, who was the first black aviator in the Navy. It applied to the entire military, not just to the Army. In addition, the article misstated the month in which the former basketball star Dennis Rodman visited Mr. Kim, the first American to do so since the North's young leader took over from his father in 2011. It was February, not April. And because of an editing error, the article misstated the given name of Ensign Brown's widow. She is Daisy Brown Thorne, not Daily.  This article has been revised to reflect the following correction: An earlier version of a picture caption with this article referred incorrectly to Ensign Brown. He was first black aviator in the the Navy, not in the United States military.
The youngest son of Bo Xilai, the former senior Communist Party official now awaiting a criminal trial , has enrolled at Columbia Law School and is expected to begin studies this fall, according to a family associate and a person from Beijing with high-level contacts.The son, Bo Guagua, is a prominent figure in the third generation of an aristocratic Communist Party family. He earned an undergraduate degree from Oxford and a master's degree from the John F. Kennedy School of Government at Harvard, and he has been living in the United States since he completed that degree in May 2012. His exploits since his Oxford days have fascinated many Chinese, and photographs of him at parties with his arms draped around young women have circulated widely on the Internet. He was known to have driven around Cambridge, Mass., in a Porsche.Several Harvard professors said he was serious about his studies there. Mr. Bo had been interested in pursuing a law degree in the United States even before the downfall of his father, who was removed from his position as party chief of the municipality of Chongqing in March 2012, as a scandal involving a dead British businessman unfolded. Last year, a Chinese court decided that Mr. Bo's wife, Gu Kailai, would serve a suspended death sentence — equivalent to life in prison — for murdering the businessman, Neil Heywood.Mr. Bo was put under house arrest in March 2012, after being dismissed from his Chongqing post, and he was later moved to a formal detention center. Last week, prosecutors in Jinan, the capital of Shandong Province, charged him with bribe-taking, corruption and abuse of power. The trial is expected to take place soon.Bo Guagua has not made any public statements since the announcement of the charges. In September 2012, he released a brief statement that said, "The father I know is upright in his beliefs and devoted to duty."Mr. Bo did not immediately return an e-mailed request for comment on Monday.It is unclear how Mr. Bo will pay for his three-year education at Columbia, which has one of the most expensive law schools in the United States. The law school's Web site says tuition is $55,916 for the coming academic year, and total charges are $60,234 once other fees are included. Living costs are listed as an additional $22,561. It is also unclear how Mr. Bo paid for his Oxford and Harvard tuitions, though he said in a letter last year to The Harvard Crimson that the tuition and living expenses at those universities and at Harrow, an exclusive British boarding school that he attended, were paid for through scholarships and money that his mother had earned as a lawyer.On Monday, a Chinese journalist, Vincent Ni, posted on Twitter a photograph of a Web page from Columbia that showed Mr. Bo's e-mail address at the law school. Around the same time, the person in Beijing with high-level contacts, who spoke on the condition of anonymity, confirmed Mr. Bo's enrollment at Columbia in an interview. The person said Mr. Bo had earlier explored getting a doctorate at Oxford.Mr. Bo is the second son of Bo Xilai, who has another son, Li Wangzhi, a businessman, from his first marriage. Mr. Li graduated in 2003 with a master's degree from Columbia University's School of International and Public Affairs and was hired by Citigroup.Last fall, the first wife, Li Danyu, said in an interview that Mr. Bo had suspected their son of poisoning Ms. Gu, who is Bo Xilai's second wife and Bo Guagua's mother. One of Ms. Gu's lawyers confirmed that Ms. Gu believed that she had been poisoned.No date has been announced for the trial of Bo Xilai, and it is unclear whether Bo Guagua will try to attend. The court is expected to deliver a verdict that has already been determined by party leaders. Political analysts said Mr. Bo could receive anything from a 15- or 20-year prison sentence to a suspended death sentence.
BEIJING — For all the strong rhetoric, China's latest policy actions suggest a shift in focus on the economy to mix relatively pain-free overhauls that burnish Beijing's credentials for change with measures to prop up sagging growth.While Prime Minister Li Keqiang of China provides a drip-feed of easy changes, he will avoid more radical moves for fear of tipping the Chinese economy over the edge.Analysts from top government research institutions say there is no reason to doubt the government's commitment to shifting China's economy away from an investment- and credit-driven growth model to one that relies more on consumption and innovation.But the leaders are aware they are walking a fine line, and the economy's weaker-than-expected performance this year has underlined the need to tread carefully. Overhauls might well secure future growth, but if the leaders push too hard now, they could cause an economic shock that forces Beijing to resort to old-school pump-priming, prolonging the very economic model they are trying to dismantle."The government has to safeguard its bottom line in growth while restructuring the economy," said He Qiang, an economist at the Central University of Finance and Economics in Beijing and an adviser to Parliament. "It's very difficult to balance. Economic restructuring cannot be achieved overnight and it should be a gradual reform, not a revolution."Since President Xi Jinping and Mr. Li were appointed to lead China, they have pressed to wean the country off a diet of breakneck expansion and easy credit that fueled double-digit growth for three decades and catapulted China to the top table of global economies.Just last week, Mr. Xi was quoted by Xinhua, the state-run news agency, on the need "to deepen reforms in all aspects," though he also acknowledged the line between "being courageous and walking steadily."In a nod to growth concerns, Beijing has unveiled a series of small steps in recent weeks that analysts say are geared to providing quick help to the economy. Last week, Beijing said it would scrap taxes for six million small businesses, speed up railway investment and offer more help to exporters.That means radical overhauls, like full interest-rate liberalization, are off the table for now, although they may be tackled in October when the Communist Party holds a meeting that will set its economic agenda for the next decade.Until then, the authorities will reach for low-hanging fruit: uncontroversial changes that move in the right direction and could have some, even if only modest, effects on growth but that are limited in ambition.The central bank's decision earlier this month to remove the floor on bank lending rates is an example. It was welcomed as a largely symbolic prelude to removing caps on deposit rates, a much more difficult task that will take time.The central bank said a deposit insurance program and other preparations are needed before a move is made on deposits; economists said that in addition to concerns that it would squeeze banks' profits there is also concern about its near-term economic effect."They dare not liberalize deposit rates now, as that could push up borrowing costs," said Liang Youcai, an economist at State Information Center, a government research group. The working assumption is that lending rates would rise to pay for the higher cost of deposits.China's leaders have said a slowdown in economic growth is needed for the overhauls to take place, since they will be looking at areas like investment in infrastructure and factories, which ares still the main driver of expansion.That is why the growth target for this year was cut to 7.5 percent from 8.0 percent.But the 7.5 percent annual growth of the second quarter was the ninth slowdown in the past 10 quarters and showed that the economy is cutting close to the government's growth target.Economists familiar with policy makers' thinking say that splashing out on big infrastructure projects in the way China did during the global financial crisis is out of question.
HONG KONG — Robert Y.C. Ho, a scion of a historic Hong Kong family, is the chairman of the Robert H. N. Ho Family Foundation, which supports study in the fields of Buddhism, Chinese art and culture. The charity is named after Mr. Ho's father, who founded it in 2005.It has given endowments for Buddhist programs at Harvard University, Stanford University and the Courtauld Institute of Art in London. In May, it gave a $1.9 million grant to the American Council of Learned Societies for the research and teaching of Buddhist studies.Why did your father decide to focus on Buddhism?Buddhism was easier because his grandmother, Lady Clara, set up a temple in Hong Kong, Tung Lin Kok Yuen, in 1935 — it later grew to two charity organizations, in Hong Kong and Canada — and there's a school associated with it. So Buddhism has been part of the family.We also support Chinese art and culture because my father, who grew up in Hong Kong, appreciates Chinese arts — classical, traditional and contemporary.Buddhist studies are usually associated with history. How do you make them relevant to today?Generally speaking, Buddhist studies in higher institutions have been archaic and old-fashioned, in the sense that it's mostly text-based, where we have scholars who are experts in Pali, Sanskrit, classical Chinese, Japanese, old languages. They read these texts and they talk about them. A lot of time, it's not really related to what happens in the real world.But a lot of younger scholars are pushing into new areas, like studying about Buddhism and politics, Buddhism and the environment, conflict resolution, Buddhism and psychology, things like that, and how they manifest in the world. Most of our grants are geared toward the area, which is Buddhism in the contemporary world. This is the area we want to push, to advance the field, to make it relevant to the contemporary audiences.Why do you work largely with universities and institutions in the West, as opposed to in China or other parts of Asia?We're looking for the right partner, the right institution. The standard of scholarship is traditionally, at least in the modern and contemporary era, much higher in North America and the West, so there's a practical consideration.We're looking into working in China, but they're all state-funded institutions. That makes it tricky to find a partner.Southeast Asia is another story. For example, in Thailand and Sri Lanka, they have a category of institutions called Buddhist universities, and they study Buddhism in a traditional way. They take their model back from India in the Middle Ages: They have a big monastery and next to the monastery, they would have a university where they'd teach Buddhist scholarship from a traditional point of view. That's not what we're looking for.Through Tung Ling Kok Yuen in Hong Kong, we helped set up the Buddhist Studies Center at Hong Kong University — it was before we started the family foundation. After we've started the foundation, most of our grants for Buddhist-related areas are mostly through the foundation.In Hong Kong, where the foundation is based, you seem to focus on arts and culture education. Why is that?With Hong Kong being mostly Chinese, we see the program as under the umbrella of Chinese art and culture. It's a basic belief that arts and creativity are part of a human being and the human psyche — that is important to make a person well-rounded, and to have some exposure to that is very important. It's important not only to individuals but also to a healthy society.The government has some initiatives to try to make Hong Kong a culture or art hub.They are putting a lot of effort in the hardware. That's good, that's an important part of it, but you also need the audience.The software is the education program, so that people who go to art events can appreciate, talk about and criticize them. You need that aspect. What we are trying to do is a small bit, but we believe if Hong Kong wants to be a world city, it needs this component.
MACAU — Macau tycoon David Chow is ripping up the fake volcano and Roman amphitheatre that were the show pieces of a failed theme park he built in the Chinese gaming enclave seven years ago.He is replacing them with something a little less kitsch and more in keeping with the neighborhood: a casino resort boasting an opera house and dinosaur museum that he hopes will return him to the spotlight of the world's largest gambling hub.The second-generation casino operator, whose four decades of Macau experience rival former kingpin Stanley Ho, is going up against the industry's modern titans, including Sheldon Adelson's Las Vegas Sands Corp and Steve Wynn's Wynn Resorts Ltd who have built massive casino, hotel and shopping complexes that rake in billions of dollars each year."It is my time to come now," said Chow, 62, whose Macau Legend Development Ltd listed on the Hong Kong stock exchange in July, raising $283 million, less than half of what was initially planned.Chow, a former Macau politician, has kept a low profile since the failure of the theme park, which he built with Ho. In his absence, Macau has been transformed with sleek glass towers, Michelin dining and luxury brand flagship stores.Only a decade ago, the former Portuguese colony was a gangster's paradise where rivals regularly settled disputes with guns. China has sought to turn it into a safe, family-friendly resort city. It granted gaming concessions to the Las Vegas elite such as Sands, who opened glitzy casinos that dwarf the older ones surrounding Chow's property.With the IPO proceeds funding his upcoming casino resort, Chow hopes to remind Las Vegas rivals that he is still a force to be reckoned with.For investors burned by Chow's last big dream, grand plans may sound all too familiar. Merrill Lynch and U.S. hedge funds Och Ziff and TPG-Axon were among backers who plowed $400 million into the theme park in 2006, recouping only around a third of their investment three years later.It turned out that visitors preferred the air conditioned comfort of Macau's many casinos to the heat and pollution of Chow's outdoor park."We were never wrong," Chow said in an interview in Hong Kong's Central business district. "For me it was a park. We are not making money there. It was a gift to the society. Now we are going to build the park into a resort."Chow, whose mother ran multiple VIP gambling clubs in the 1970s for Stanley Ho, will have plenty of competition with six casinos scheduled to open in the next three years just as his comes online."David went away and did what he had to do, reorganize," said a former investor in Chow's theme park who declined to be named due to company policy. "He's well connected in Macau so maybe he can make it work but it's a hard model to execute. You are competing with the mega casinos."Competing projects are being built on the nearby Las Vegas-style Cotai strip, where Sands has already become a powerful force with 1,500 gaming tables, 9,000 hotel rooms, an apartment complex and multiple high-end retail outlets.Chow, who was a legislator for 13 years until 2009, said his new resort will help diversify Macau, drawing a contrast between his more culture-focused development and the sprawling "boxes" that the Las Vegas titans are building on the Cotai strip's reclaimed stretch of land.The property he is redeveloping, known as Fisherman's Wharf, sits on Macau's crowded original peninsula, where Ho's lotus-shaped Hotel Lisboa & Casino dominates the skyline. The wharf's dusty volcano is visible from the approaching ferries bringing Hong Kong visitors to the arrival terminal right next door."In 2005, when David Chow and his team toured me through the Fisherman's Wharf construction site, it felt like a mega project in comparison to tiny, village-like Macau. Times have changed. Macau has boomed," said Matthew Ossolinski, chairman of Ossolinski Holdings, a global emerging markets fund that invests in casinos and other gambling-related companies.Macau is the only place in China where nationals are legally allowed to gamble in casinos. Traditionally reliant on "big whale" spenders who drop up to 1 million yuan ($163,000) per bet, Macau's casinos are now seeing rapid growth from the "mass market" crowd who come primarily to gamble but are increasing their spend on retail, dining and five-star hotels.Gaming revenues surged 21 percent in June to $3.54 billion, according to government data, about half of what Las Vegas generates in a full year.Macau strictly limits the number of casino licenses, so Chow's gaming operations are done through a service agreement with Ho's SJM Holdings Ltd. SJM also runs his existing faux-baroque Legend Club and Pharaoh's Palace casino, where customers are greeted by giant sphinx heads and gilded columns.Chow said his experience gave him an edge in attracting customers. He helped develop Macau's VIP junket model, which extends credit to wealthy Chinese gamblers, and worked as a junket operator in Las Vegas, bringing in high-rollers."I have the blood for gaming," he said with a laugh.Chow is known as a prolific gambler himself: he was in a long-running dispute with Steve Wynn over nearly $5 million in gambling debts, and eventually settled out of court."To be a casino operator or be in the industry, you have to know what is gambling," Chow said.He hopes his focus on diversification and Macau's former Portuguese heritage will be enough to sway the government to grant him a total of 500 gaming tables. Competing casino projects are also vying for tables under a strict cap imposed by the authorities.Manuel Neves, head of Macau's gaming body, said the government had promised support for Chow's project, including the casino operated under SJM's license, but did not specify how many tables he would be granted.One of Chow's biggest backers is Dynam Japan Holdings Co Ltd, a Japanese pachinko company, which put $35 million into the IPO as a cornerstone investor.Yoji Sato, Dynam's chairman, said the Macau Legend investment would give his company "valuable know-how in the entertainment and casino business in Macau". He declined to comment on Chow's previous theme park failure.Macau Legend has enough money to start the casino development without needing to raise more until next year, said Sheldon Trainor, the company's executive director. It would likely seek debt financing rather than issuing new shares, he said.Chow, an active investor in African agriculture and honorary consul in Macau for Cape Verde, also plans a development on neighboring Hengqin island.Aware that his expansion plans are ambitious, Chow seems undeterred."After this IPO they (casino rivals) understand this is the David Chow now. They forget me a long time."
TAIPEI, Taiwan — Taiwan has ordered tens of thousands of vaccine doses to protect people against the island's first rabies outbreak in more than 50 years.Health officials have struggled to contain the Taiwan outbreak since July 17, when a ferret badger in the southern part of the island was confirmed as rabid. Since then, 17 more ferret badger cases have been confirmed, and the case of a rabid Asian house shrew reported Wednesday indicates the disease is jumping species. No humans or dogs have yet been involved in the outbreak.Health Minister Chiu-Wen-ta says the new human vaccine doses are expected to arrive Friday and will supplement some 3,000 in stock.Health workers have been vaccinating animals in central and southern Taiwan to try to control the outbreak. The island currently has some 40,000 animal-use dosages in stock, with an additional half million expected by Aug. 20.Rabies is a viral disease that causes inflammation of the brain in warm-blooded animals. It can spread from one species to another, usually through bites. If untreated, it is fatal.Before last month, Taiwan's last reported rabies case was in 1959. A dog bit a farmer, whose wife became infected after washing the farmer's rabies-tainted clothing; the farmer himself did not contract the disease.Now, the only jurisdictions world health officials consider rabies-free are Iceland, Ireland, Sweden, Norway, the United Kingdom, Australia, New Zealand, Fiji, Hawaii, and Guam.
BEIJING — Huang Dongliang says his uncle was being ignored by his low-paid cancer specialist at a Chinese government hospital. So the family gave the doctor a "hongbao," the traditional red envelope used for gifts, with 3,000 yuan ($480)."We could feel an obvious difference" after that, said Huang, who lives in the southeastern city of Quanzhou. "The doctor started to do more checkups, to give suggestions and advice and offered a detailed chemotherapy plan."Such informal payments pervade China's dysfunctional health system. Low salaries and skimpy budgets drive doctors, nurses and administrators to make ends meet by accepting money from patients, drug suppliers and others. Accusations last month that GlaxoSmithKline employees bribed Chinese doctors to prescribe its drugs brought international attention to the flow of illicit money. But to China's public, the practice has long been common knowledge.Many blame a system in which the country's hospitals nearly all are state-run but get too little money from Beijing. Most of China's 2.3 million doctors are hospital employees and are barred from adding to their income by taking on second jobs."Physicians are way underpaid and they need to find a way to survive," said Gordon Liu, a health care economist at Peking University's Guanghua School of Management.The ruling Communist Party has promised higher health spending as part of efforts to spread more of China's prosperity to its poor majority. But with a population of 1.3 billion, the cost of a full-scale overhaul will be daunting for Beijing. The government faces other financial demands while economic growth is slowing.Under the current system, the state-set price to see an oncologist or other specialist is as little as 8 yuan ($1.25) — less than the cost of a hamburger and too little to cover a hospital's expenses.An experienced physician might earn 6,000 yuan ($980) a month. That top level is about average for an urban Chinese worker at a time when a 100-square-meter (1,000-square-foot) apartment in Beijing can cost more than 6 million yuan ($1 million).To fill the gap, hospitals add surcharges to drug prices and assign employees sales quotas. Doctors and other employees accept money to move patients up waiting lists for surgery or to let them see the physician they prefer. Doctors, administrators and others take kickbacks from pharmaceutical companies to use more expensive drugs or use them more often. Bribes can also distort treatment by encouraging overuse of expensive drugs or procedures."There are many farmers and people without medical insurance, and it's they who suffer greatly," said Liu Junhai, head of the Commercial Law Research Institute of the ruling party's Renmin University.Huang said that after his uncle was diagnosed with lung cancer last October, he went to the bigger nearby city of Xiamen, which had a reputation for "better medical ability and attitude.""The doctor barely said anything useful after 12 or 13 days in the hospital," he said. "Then my cousin sent 3,000 yuan to get the doctor to pay more attention to my uncle."Complaints about medical corruption have fueled public frustration at doctors, nurses and hospitals. Distraught families that pay extra are dismayed if a patient sickens or dies. That has erupted in a spate of stabbings and other violence against hospital employees.Last year, 39 staff members of a hospital in the southern city of Gaozhou and five salespeople for drug companies were implicated in a kickback scheme that inflated medicine costs for patients, according to the newspaper Shanghai Evening Post.The hospital director was fired and 382 employees returned 5.8 million yuan ($950,000) in improper payments, the report said."For the hospital's 35 drug suppliers, no matter which is selected, in order to give the hospital an incentive to sell more drugs, they will all find ways to make contact with doctors," the hospital director, Ye Guanrui, was quoted as saying. "In a hospital with 1,000 staff members, one-third will take kickbacks."A half-dozen physicians and hospital employees approached by The Associated Press declined to talk about medical bribery, even on condition of anonymity, due to its sensitivity.In the GlaxoSmithKline PLC case, police say employees of the British company paid doctors, hospital administrators and officials of the government and medical groups to encourage use of its medications.Four employees have been detained. Police say they are suspected of laundering money through travel agencies to conceal the payments and evade Glaxo's internal anti-bribery controls.Glaxo has tried to distance itself from the scandal, saying the employees acted without its knowledge and violated its policy.Also last month, a rival drug manufacturer, AstraZeneca PLC, said police visited its office in what the company believed was an investigation of one of its sales representatives.Last year, New York City-based Pfizer Inc. agreed to pay the U.S. government $60 million to settle charges its salespeople made improper payments to health care workers in China and other countries.Estimates of how much outside money doctors and others receive range from 30 percent to up to 10 times their salaries, according to Peking University's Liu. He said he and colleagues have tried to gather data but hospital employees refuse to cooperate.Despite the scrutiny directed at foreign drug suppliers, their Chinese rivals probably are more active at spreading around such payments, said Liu."In general, people would say domestic companies actually practice this informal payment approach almost as a common marketing strategy," he said. "For multinationals, this is not a common marketing tool."The financial strain of health care on families is so great that it is distorting China's economy.Until recently, few had health insurance and families saved a big share of their income to pay for medical emergencies. That left less for consumer spending, hampering the Communist Party's efforts to nurture self-sustaining economic growth based on domestic consumption instead of exports and investment.The latest scandal could increase pressure on Chinese leaders to speed up promised health reforms.The ruling party is promising more health care spending as part of an expansion of social welfare aimed at spreading China's new prosperity to its poor majority. The government says state-provided health insurance has been expanded to cover 95 percent of people in China, up from less than 50 percent in 2006.Following the accusations against GlaxoSmithKline employees, the chairman of a government health panel acknowledged the link between low spending and graft.Beijing has imposed price caps on several hundred drugs deemed essential. But that gave hospitals that add a surcharge to medicine prices an incentive to use more of them. The Cabinet's planning agency launched an investigation in July of production costs at 60 Chinese and foreign suppliers in a possible prelude to issuing new price standards.The government has promised to ban surcharges by hospitals to reduce incentives to overuse drugs.Beijing also has promised to pay doctors more, but Peking University's Liu said bringing them into line with comparable professions could require doubling or tripling salaries.Instead, some reformers are urging Beijing to adopt a U.S.- or European-style system in which doctors can work second jobs and open private clinics.
FRANKFURT, Germany — German automaker Volkswagen AG says net profit fell 50 percent in the second quarter compared to the previous year, when earnings were boosted by a one-time accounting plus related to its takeover of Porsche.Excluding the Porsche effect, the company's operating earnings rose 1.8 percent in what it called "a difficult market environment," beating analyst estimates and indicating the company was holding its own in a difficult European auto market. It said it would still achieve its earnings goal for the year.Net profit fell to 2.85 billion euros ($3.76 billion) from 5.70 billion in the same quarter a year ago. Revenue rose 8.5 percent to 52.1 billion euros.Operating earnings, excluding Porsche as well as financial items such as interest and taxes, rose to 3.44 billion euros. That beat analyst estimates for 3.07 billion euros, as compiled by financial information provider FactSet. Profit margin slipped moderately to 6.6 percent from 7.0 percent.The results showed how Volkswagen is continuing to maintain profits despite a tough environment at home in Europe and Germany, where car sales have been shrinking. It is sustained in part by luxury businesses such as Porsche and its Audi division, where unit sales are smaller but the company earns much more per vehicle, and by its business in emerging markets such as China.CEO Martin Winterkorn said Wednesday the company had "achieved a solid result in a difficult market environment." The company said that full-year operating earnings, which exclude financial items such as interest and taxes, would at least equal last year's.The company had enjoyed a large boost in the second quarter of 2012 thanks to the recalculation of stock options related to its takeover of high-end sports car maker Porsche, which is now one of VW's 12 brands. The company also makes cars under the Skoda and SEAT nameplates.
HONG KONG — Wang Lin, an exponent of the ancient Chinese practice of qigong, claims he has used his powers to cure cancer and has performed other mysterious feats, like conjuring snakes out of thin air. But none of his abilities were enough to ward off the fury of the Communist Party, which has accused him of using superstition to draw in gullible citizens and officials.For weeks, Chinese Web sites, newspapers and television have presented a swelling pile of accusations against Mr. Wang: bewitching and swindling patients, dodging taxes and associating with criminal gang members and corrupt officials. On Tuesday, The People's Daily, the main newspaper of the Communist Party, raised the pitch of the official condemnations and accused Mr. Wang of doling out "spiritual opium" to credulous cadres.Hiding in Hong Kong, where he fled to avoid possible arrest, Mr. Wang said Tuesday in an interview that he was the innocent victim of a political vendetta that has rippled outward from a business dispute in his hometown in Jiangxi Province in southern China. Hong Kong is a special administrative region of China with considerable legal autonomy.Mr. Wang said he hoped that discussing his case would show he was the target, rather than the perpetrator, of corrupt political dealings."It's as if the whole country has turned against me, turning black into white and white into black," Mr. Wang said from a chic hotel room where he has been hiding out from reporters and, his associates said, Chinese officials. "It's truly beyond my comprehension."While China's leaders present their country as a model of resolute modernization, Mr. Wang and his sudden celebrity are flamboyant testament to the attractions and dangers of traditional, mystical beliefs that the government has often sought to suppress. After years of tolerating Mr. Wang, the government has turned against him as an example of the lurid excesses and ideological rot threatening the Communist Party, a theme that Xi Jinping, the party leader appointed in November, has emphasized."The likes of Wang Lin are spiritual opium for some officials," The People's Daily said. "He is also a mirror that has exposed the unchecked avarice and ugly souls of certain officials."The newspaper called on officials to renew their faith in Marxism-Leninism, a theme repeated several times by Mr. Xi. "The brilliant performances and string of swindles of Wang Lin and his ilk will not become chicken soup for certain officials' souls," the paper said.Separately, an official from the National Health and Family Planning Commission, Xue Xiaolin, said on the agency's Web site that Mr. Wang was under investigation for illegal medical work, and warned "there will be no soft handling" if he is found culpable."If I go back, I'll certainly be arrested," said Mr. Wang, wearing the glittery style of ring and watch favored by many newly wealthy Chinese people. He said he had made his money honestly, and never took money from officials or from ill people who sought his help. "I've always kept to myself, never promoted myself, but now it seems the media can treat me as a criminal, say anything about me."Qigong is the ancient Chinese belief that the body's energies can be channeled using breathing, massage and meditation techniques, and turned into a force for healing, health and — some followers maintain — uncanny supernatural abilities.Under Mao Zedong, qigong survived and adapted to Communist control, but along with other traditional beliefs it came under official suspicion. From the 1980s, though, qigong enjoyed a revival, becoming one of a number of traditional beliefs that found ardent followers and official patronage under Deng Xiaoping.After 1999, qigong again encountered official suspicion after the party suppressed Falun Gong, a spiritual movement whose beliefs included elements of qigong.A diminutive 61-year-old whose sculptured eyebrows and slicked-back hair are reminiscent of Liberace's, Mr. Wang has attracted a following among businessmen, officials and others, according to Chinese news reports. His recent downfall started with a burst of publicity about his meeting Jack Ma, one of China's richest entrepreneurs, and Liu Zhijun, the former railways minister recently jailed for graft."The pictures of those meetings dragged Wang Lin into the limelight, and then the publicity became fatal when it attracted official attention," said Sima Nan, a media commentator in Beijing who has denounced Mr. Wang. "Wang Lin has attracted a following among officials, and not just the ones who have been exposed on the Internet. We should make an example of him and those who abetted him."Mr. Wang said his dealings with officials were entirely innocent. He said he met the former railways minister to discuss a business deal involving a friend. But he denied reports that he had assured Mr. Liu that he would not fall from power.Successful Chinese people can feel drawn to mystical beliefs that promise guidance in a giddily materialistic society, said Yu Shicun, a writer in Beijing who has studied traditional beliefs. Officials have also embraced feng shui, the ancient practice of arranging rocks, waterways and other physical features to fend off ill fortune and attract positive forces."The education is so rigid that people then feel they lack a solid system of their own beliefs, and then they can easily fall into believing most anything," Mr. Yu said. "China has these many traditions that appeal to people, but those traditions have become distorted or ruptured by the environment they must survive in these days."Mr. Wang was coy about discussing reports that he has claimed to use psychic power to move heavy objects, and he said his performances involving conjuring snakes from thin air were "tricks" to amuse friends."You can put the qigong label on many things," he said. "I never promoted myself as a qigong master; others called me that."But a friend accompanying him in Hong Kong was more enthusiastic about Mr. Wang's powers."I've known him for 20 years, and you wouldn't believe the things he's capable of unless you were actually there," said the friend, Peng Taifeng, a coal trader from Shenzhen, the Chinese city next to Hong Kong.Mr. Wang said he had a permanent residence permit to stay in Hong Kong and for now had no intention of returning to mainland China.He likened himself to Edward J. Snowden, the former intelligence contractor who briefly hid in a Hong Kong hotel after disclosing information about the United States' intelligence-gathering efforts.
NEW DELHI — They squat like giant frogs to mop the floors. They carry large lanterns on their heads at wedding processions. With grave faces, they iron underwear that is not theirs, and serve their masters in many other ways. But there is something else that India 's poor do for the rich, something more complicated. That is why poverty is often top news in this great republic, as it has been over the past several days. Not because of its rarity or its power to shock — that is a laughable thought — but because the poor have a relentless and extraordinary influence on the rest.Last week, the Indian government announced that it had good news. In the span of seven years starting in 2004, nearly 138 million Indians had ceased to be extremely poor. Not because they had died, but because they had risen above the poverty line, also known as the Tendulkar Line.But there was no celebration. The poor did not appear to know of their great escape. As for the middle class and the mainstream news media, they reacted with anger. They denounced the news as deceit by statistics, and condemned, as they have before, the Tendulkar Line, which stands for a household expenditure of about 5,000 rupees, or $83, a month for an urban family of five, and even less in rural areas.In defense of the government, a politician who was once an actor said he could enjoy a full meal in Mumbai for 12 rupees. Another politician, an avid golfer, said it was possible to eat for just 1 rupee — if an Indian "desired." Another said 5 rupees would fetch a meal. There was much uproar from their political rivals, social activists and journalists. Yet another politician has set out to prove that he can have a meal for 20 rupees, angering the middle class even more.A less clownish defense from within the government was that the Tendulkar Line, if adjusted for living costs in India, is roughly equal to the World Bank's poverty line of $1.25, which several nations have adopted.India's leading commentator on economics, Swaminathan Anklesaria Aiyar, wrote in his column that "the world," in which he included "poverty specialists," praised China when it claimed to have reduced the number of its extremely poor by 220 million between 1978 and 2004 using a definition of poverty that was lower than the Tendulkar Line, but that the Indian government's success was being regarded with suspicion by development economists, talk show guests and other forms of intellectuals, who consider the Tendulkar Line an insult to India's poor.The poor would be moved if they only knew how much reverence the well-fed have for their condition, a sort of sacred plight that should not be defiled by charlatan statistics. In fact, the elite in India are deeply influenced, affected and shaped by the nation's poverty.At a fundamental level, it provides an affluent Indian with a moral direction, if not for himself then for the nation — end poverty — and an honorable reason to hold politicians in contempt — they have not ended poverty.It also provides him with an indisputable reason to believe that he himself is privileged, a belief he abandons only with the shock of first setting foot in a prosperous nation. Every Indian in the upper reaches of society is, inescapably, a poverty-eradication thinker. His insurmountable problem is finding a competent authority to whom to delegate this task.Yet, he is also a great beneficiary of the nation's poverty. It may appear that he is part of a fiercely competitive society, but the fact is that, considering the odds he would face if every Indian were empowered, if every Indian child had eaten well and gone to a decent school, he has it easy. In almost every sphere of activity, men and women with limited talents can go very far because most Indians have never had the opportunities to fully challenge them.In return, among other things, he has to endure the relentless stares of poverty.The simplest signs of affluence can seem obscene in public. Is it arrogant to walk down a street in most neighborhoods eating Kentucky Fried Chicken? It probably is. In a large upper-middle-class settlement of Gurgaon, which is a part of the National Capital Region, parents dropping their children off at school almost always use their smaller, more modest cars. Apart from practical reasons, like the greater convenience of parking, they are also unnerved by the steady stares of idle men sitting on the walls, standing on the sidewalks. The well-to-do prefer to be inconspicuous when they leave their children in someone else's care for hours.Abject poverty also, inevitably, shapes the works of India's economists, artists, journalists and curious people who make documentaries for a living. Until recently, India's novelists and filmmakers complained that the outside world did not take them seriously if they were not portraying exotic Indian poverty. That grouse has since subsided as the bleeding hearts of the outside world have moved to new frontiers.Not surprisingly, poverty is at the heart of Indian economics. For most of July, India's news media joyously played host to a battle between the economists Amartya Sen and Jagdish Bhagwati. Mr. Sen restated his long-held conviction that investment in public health and education would, along with the benefits of a market economy, take India far. Mr. Bhagwati restated his own that India must focus primarily on economic growth, to give it the means to pay for social welfare.Mr. Sen, in an interview, chuckled when he used an expression that is popular in India: "inclusive growth."I asked him why he found it funny."I don't find it funny," he said. "I find it somewhat redundant. Sustained economic growth and inclusive growth are not disparate."But somehow India has managed to separate the two. It is as if the nation did not really want the demise of poverty. For, after all, it is India's most enduring heritage.Manu Joseph is editor of the Indian newsweekly Open and author of the novel "The Illicit Happiness of Other People."
WASHINGTON — A Chinese sculptor has removed a disputed inscription from the Martin Luther King Jr. Memorial statue that he designed on the National Mall and said Thursday that he is working on a new finish for the side of the artwork.Plans call for sculptor Lei Yixin to carve grooves over the former words to match existing horizontal "striation" marks in the memorial. Lei said he is working to deepen all the memorial's grooves so that they will match.The disputed inscription was a paraphrase from King's "Drum Major" speech. It read, "I was a drum major for justice, peace and righteousness."Critics, including the poet Maya Angelou, argued that the quotation was taken out of context when it was paraphrased and shortened. Angelou said it made King sound arrogant.Lei said the corrective work was going well and is on track to finish before commemorations of the 50th anniversary of King's "I Have A Dream" speech at the March on Washington on Aug. 28."The difficulty is the new striations — so they won't damage the integrity of the statue itself," Lei said through an interpreter.Lei said there was not a high probability, though, of the new carvings causing any cracks."It's not a big problem because the striations are designed to appear on the sides," he said. "If it has some cracks, we could deal with them."Lei said he heard about King when he was growing up in China. He called King a "world-class hero" who was well-known in China and said it was an honor to create the statue."Right now, as we see, the statue looks really good," he said through his son, who served as an interpreter. "He thinks Americans would not regret picking him as the sculptor."More than 5.2 million people visited the memorial last year, according to the National Park Service.National Mall Superintendent Robert Vogel said the work should be completed a few days before commemorations of the March on Washington anniversary between Aug. 24 and Aug. 28."The response to the memorial has been overwhelmingly positive" since it was completed, Vogel said. "People have come and wept at the base of the statue. I think people have seen it as a great work of art and a great addition to the National Mall."The changes will cost between $700,000 and $800,000, Vogel said. The work will be paid for from funds raised to build the memorial that were transferred to the National Park Foundation for repairs and maintenance.No taxpayer dollars will be used to make the repairs, Vogel said.The removal of an inscription or piece of a memorial is rare in Washington, but debate and controversy often accompanies every memorial construction project.This situation was unusual in that the shortened version of the inscription was not formally approved by two panels that oversee architecture and design in the nation's capital, Vogel said. Angelou also served on a panel of historians who recommended this memorial's inscriptions.Harry Johnson, who led the group that built the memorial, said he was pleased everyone had agreed on a solution."There's controversy every time you build a memorial," he said. "I can't explain it. All I can say is we're here to take care of it and make sure it's done correctly."
SHANGHAI — It's been so hot in China that people are grilling shrimp on manhole covers, eggs are hatching without incubators and a highway billboard has mysteriously caught fire by itself.The heat wave — the worst in at least 140 years in some parts — has left dozens of people dead and pushed thermometers above 40 degrees C (104 F) in at least 40 cities and counties, mostly in the south and east. Authorities for the first time have declared the heat a "level 2" weather emergency— a label normally invoked for typhoons and flooding."It is just hot! Like in a food steamer!" 17-year-old student Xu Sichen said outside the doors of a shopping mall in the southern financial hub of Shanghai while her friend He Jiali, also 17, complained that her mobile phone had in recent days turned into a "grenade.""I'm so worried that the phone will explode while I'm using it," He said.Extreme heat began hitting Shanghai and several eastern and southern provinces in early July and is expected to grip much of China through mid-August.Shanghai set its record high temperature of 40.6 C (105 F) on July 26, and Thursday's heat marked the city's 28th day above 35 C. At least 10 people died of heat stroke in the city over the past month, including a 64-year-old Taiwanese sailor, the official Xinhua News Agency said.Climate scientists usually caution that they can't attribute a single weather event like the Chinese heat wave to man-made global warming. But "human-caused warming sure ups the odds of heat waves like this one," said Jonathan Overpeck of the University of Arizona. The Chinese heat wave "gives a very real face to what global warming is all about," he wrote in an email."This is the future. Get used to it," Andrew Dressler of Texas A&M University told The Associated Press by email. "You often hear people say, 'Oh, we'll just adapt to the changing climate.' It turns out that that's a lot harder than it sounds, as the people in China are finding out now."Wu Guiyun, 50, who has a part-time job making food deliveries in Shanghai, said she has been trying to linger inside air-conditioned offices for as long as possible whenever she brings in a takeout order. Outside, she said: "It's so hot that I can hardly breathe."The highest temperature overall was recorded in the eastern city of Fenghua, which recorded its historic high of 42.7 degrees (108.9 F) on July 24.On Tuesday, the director of the China Meteorological Administration activated a "level 2" emergency response to the persistent heat wave. This level requires around-the-clock staffing, the establishment of an emergency command center and frequent briefings.Some Chinese in heat-stricken cities have been cooking shrimps, eggs and bacon in skillets placed directly on manhole covers or on road pavement that has in some cases heated up to 60 degrees C (140 F).In one photo displayed prominently in the China Daily newspaper, a boy tended to shrimps and an egg in a pan over a manhole cover in eastern Chinese city of Jinan.In the port city of Ningbo in Zhejiang province, glass has cracked in the heat, vehicles have self-combusted, and a highway billboard caught fire by itself, sending up black smoke in the air, according to China Central Television. The broadcaster said the heat might have shorted an electrical circuit on the billboard.In the southern province of Hunan, a housewife grabbed several eggs stored at room temperature only to find half-hatched chicks, state media reported.A joke making the rounds: The only difference between me and barbequed meat is a little bit of cumin.Associated Press writer Didi Tang in Beijing, news assistant Fu Ting in Shanghai and science writer Seth Borenstein in Washington contributed to this report.
BEIJING — Hours after a man with long-running grievances against officialdom set off a homemade explosive at Beijing's airport, a singer-songwriter turned to the Internet to release her own sarcastic wish list of to-be-bombed targets.By the next day, Wu Hongfei — known for her activism and whimsical songs — was in police detention on a criminal charge that prompted an outcry and an outpouring of public discussion on the boundaries of China's free speech laws in the new era of social media. In a rare backtrack by local authorities, Wu will apparently be released Friday without further prosecution."If the state machine is used to penalize anyone who ever says wrong words, who would dare to say anything?" Peking University law professor Zhang Qianfan said.Wu's wish list played off a Chinese word that means both "explode" and "fry," and her list of targets included an unnamed government official and local agencies such as a government housing commission — as well as chicken wings, potato chips and Chinese-style bread.She posted the satirical comment on her Twitter-like Sina Weibo microblog in the early hours of July 21, the morning after Ji Zhongxing detonated a bomb from his wheelchair at Beijing's main airport, injuring nobody but himself. The blast by Ji, who for years had sought compensation for what he said was a beating by officials that left him paralyzed, drew both condemnation and sympathy on behalf of those deemed without avenues to redress wrongs.After Wu's post, Beijing police detained her on the criminal charge of causing trouble, though they later changed the accusations to spreading terrorist information and disturbing public order. It was the first known case of a public figure detained for something they wrote on Weibo.Nobody would suggest a wholesale easing of free speech in China was in the offing, or that questioning the dominance of the ruling Communist Party would be tolerated any time soon. However, prominent legal scholars have spoken up in defense of Wu's right to free speech, urging the government to be more tolerant of speech that can serve as a release valve for the disgruntled."It is clear that she was merely blowing off some steam, and that's markedly differently from spreading rumors," said Chen Hongguo, a law scholar at Northwest University of Politics and Law. "The public would get a sense of crisis if they see a woman like Wu getting punished."Many Chinese have been questioned and admonished by police over online comments, and some have been sent to labor camps in China's extralegal system without due process. But Wu's case, as the first known formal criminal detention of a public figure in a case like this, grabbed nationwide attention with leading news portals sending alerts on the case's latest developments.Many members of the public voiced their support for Wu, posting their own to-be-fried lists, while also noting that other far more violent posts on social media have been ignored by authorities.Local authorities this week apparently halted the criminal proceedings against Wu. Her lawyer, Chen Jiangang, said she has been fined 500 yuan ($80) and been given 10 days of detention, including those already served, and would be released Friday without further prosecution. Beijing police did not respond to AP's faxed request for comment on Wu's case."The case of Wu Hongfei generated widespread alarm among netizens in China," said Maya Wang, a researcher for the New York-based Human Rights Watch. "So it is a relief for Chinese netizens that Wu no longer faces the prospect of prison."Wu, with a fan base of about 130,000 on one social media platform, has so far been a largely underground singer who engages in social activism through music. Still, she is no political dissident, said her lawyer, Chen Jiangang."She didn't set out to be a hero or to challenge the authorities on free speech," Chen said. "She regrets the remarks, but she also does not believe she's broken the law. Anyone with common sense will not consider her posting as a terrorist message."China is not alone in parsing the line between terrorism and harmless threats or satire. However, in China, laws often are so vague and the lack of judicial independence so acute that authorities can interpret the laws to serve political interests or engage in personal vendettas. Zhang, the Peking University law professor, said China is in need of consensus on the boundaries of free speech and the limits of judicial intervention."Did her speech cause any housing commission employee not to show up for work or nearby residents to worry?" said Zhang, who argued that Wu did not pose any clear and present danger to the society. "The majority of the public probably won't take her words seriously."
BEIJING — Beijing says the human rights situation in China is at a historic best, rejecting comments from a senior U.S. diplomat that the rights situation is deteriorating in China, with relatives of activists increasingly being harassed and policies in ethnic areas becoming more repressive.In a statement issued late Friday, China's Foreign Ministry said that the Chinese are enjoying unprecedented rights but added those rights must be exercised within China's law.The remarks came after the annual U.S.-China Human Rights Dialogue was held Tuesday and Wednesday in the southwestern city of Kunming, and after Acting Assistant Secretary of State for Democracy, Human Rights and Labor Uzra Zeya criticized China on Friday.Zeya, who led the U.S. delegation at the talks, said U.S. diplomats "conveyed our deep concern about attempts to control and silence activists by targeting family members and associates of the activists.""This is a worrisome trend, and one which we have raised at senior levels with the Chinese government," she said, adding the dialogue fell short of Washington's expectations.Rights watchers have been alarmed by the targeting of relatives of high-profile dissidents, including blind lawyer Chen Guangcheng, who exposed abuses in the enforcement of China's one-child policies, and Nobel Peace laureate Liu Xiaobo, imprisoned since 2009 on subversion charges after he campaigned for peaceful democratic change in China.Chen's relatives have been harassed in their hometown in Shandong province. Liu's wife has been placed under house arrest in Beijing and her brother recently was sentenced to 11 years in prison over a business dispute, a stiff penalty in what supporters say is a vendetta against the family for Liu's activism.Zeya said U.S. officials questioned the pattern of arrests and extralegal detentions of China's public interest lawyers, Internet activists and others who challenge official policies in China."We know that such actions are contrary to China's international obligation and, indeed in most cases, China's own laws and constitution," she said.Zeya said the U.S. raised specific cases of individuals who are imprisoned, detained or under house arrest, including activists Xu Zhiyong, Gao Zhisheng and Ni Yulan, several Tibetan, Uighur and Mongolian activists, as well as Liu and his wife. Zeya said the Americans were able to get some information on the cases, but she did not reveal details.On Friday, a Chinese journalist, Xiaoshu, was forcibly taken out of Beijing for his public support of Xu.Xu, who champions building a stronger civil society through his New Citizens Movement, he is in police detention on suspicion of gathering people to disturb public order.Beijing has repeatedly rejected U.S. criticism of China's human rights record, saying Washington is biased and distorts the situation."China opposes U.S. intervention of Chinese judicial system through individual cases and wishes the U.S. would respect China's judicial sovereignty and stop its practice of badgering with individual cases," the Foreign Ministry said.Wang Dong, associate professor at Peking University's School of International Studies, said having a dialogue is better than no talks, even though the two sides have sharp differences and there was no breakthrough in the latest dialogue."It's a way to increase mutual understanding," Wang said, adding the talks have led to more common ground between Beijing and Washington than two decades ago.
BEIJING — China, Iran's largest trading partner and top oil customer, repeated its opposition on Friday to tougher U.S. sanctions on Iran after the House of Representatives approved a bill aimed at halting Iran's oil exports.The bill seeks to cut Iran's oil exports by a further one million barrels per day to near zero over a year, an attempt to reduce the flow of funds to Tehran's disputed nuclear program. The legislation provides for heavy penalties for buyers who do not find alternative supplies."China has long advocated resolution through dialogue and negotiations and opposes unilateral sanctions from one nation based on its domestic laws," the Ministry of Foreign Affairs said in a faxed statement to Reuters."In particular, it opposes sanctions that will hurt the interests of a third party," it added, without elaborating.The success of any toughening of the sanctions will depend on China, Iran's top customer, which has repeatedly said it opposes unilateral sanctions outside the purview of the United Nations.China reduced oil purchases from Iran by 21 percent last year, but that was partly on account of differences in the first quarter over the renewal terms of annual contracts and shipping delays.Chinese oil industry officials have said refiners are likely to cut shipments 5-10 percent this year from last. They cut imports 2 percent in the first six months of the year.China has consistently advocated resolving the dispute over Iran's nuclear program through talks and has opposed what it views as unilateral sanctions imposed by the United States and European Union made outside the framework of the United Nations.
TAIPEI, Taiwan — Taiwanese lawmakers exchanged punches and threw water at each other Friday ahead of an expected vote that would authorize a referendum on whether to finish a fourth nuclear power plant on the densely populated island of 23 million people.Nuclear power has long been a contentious issue in Taiwan and became more so following the Fukushima nuclear disaster in Japan in 2011. While many Taiwanese consider nuclear power generation an unacceptable safety risk for the earthquake-prone island, economic analyses suggest disruptive power shortages are inevitable if the fourth plant is not completed.Friday's fracas pitted the pro-referendum forces of President Ma Ying-jeou's ruling Nationalist Party against strongly anti-nuclear forces affiliated with the main opposition Democratic Progressive Party. DPP lawmakers occupied the legislative podium late Thursday night amid vows to disrupt the vote. It had not taken place by midday Friday, but with a large Nationalist majority in the 113-seat legislature, the referendum bill is expected to pass easily.Construction of Taiwan's fourth nuclear power plant began in 1997 but was halted while the DPP was in power between 2000 and 2008. If the referendum is passed it could become operational by 2016.Physical confrontations broke out early in Friday's session. Associated Press television footage shows some eight people pushing and shoving in one scrum. Two people scuffled on the floor, while others tried to separate them. More than a dozen activists in bright yellow shirts chanted and waved signs on a nearby balcony, and several of them splashed water onto lawmakers below. A few water bottles were thrown into the fray.Some DPP lawmakers object to the idea of any nuclear referendum at all, while others say that the language in the bill needs to be changed because it is prejudicial. According to the bill under discussion, referendum voters would be asked to vote on whether they agree with the proposition that "the construction of the fourth nuclear power plant should be halted and that it not become operational."Taiwan began transitioning away from a one-party martial law regime in 1987 and is regarded today as one of Asia's most vibrant democracies. But its political process has been undermined by occasional outbursts of violence in the legislature, much of which appears to be deliberately designed to score points among hardline supporters on either side of the island's longstanding political divide.
HONG KONG — A manufacturing index published by the Chinese authorities on Thursday provided an unexpectedly solid reading for July but did little to dispel the picture of an economy that is cooling more rapidly than many analysts had expected just months ago.The reading, published by the National Bureau of Statistics, edged up slightly, to 50.3 from 50.1 in June, indicating that recent small-scale economic support measures announced by the authorities in Beijing might be aiding some parts of the economy.The slight increase confounded analysts' expectations that the index would slip below the 50-point mark, which separates expansion from contraction.Underlining the lingering malaise within the Chinese economy, however, a separate manufacturing activity gauge published by the British bank HSBC came in at an 11-month low of 47.7. The figure, which was unchanged from the initial reading published last week, highlighted the tough environment that many Chinese companies still face. That goes especially for the small and privately owned companies — many of them exporters that are struggling with sluggish demand and a stronger renminbi — that are more heavily represented in the HSBC survey."With weak demand from both domestic and external markets, the cooling manufacturing sector continued to weigh on employment," Qu Hongbin, chief China economist at HSBC, said in a statement accompanying the release.And economists at Australia & New Zealand Banking Group wrote in a note that the improved state index "doesn't change our overall assessment of the deteriorating economy."Many analysts caution that Beijing's efforts to stem often opaque and unregulated lending activities outside the formal banking sector — while welcome — are likely to dampen economic activity. Slowing growth, meanwhile, could undermine the ability of some borrowers to service their debt, potentially leading to defaults and bankruptcies further down the line.In a report published Thursday, for example, Standard & Poor's warned that many of the weaker players in the property sector — a key pillar of the Chinese economy, the world's second-largest after that of the United States — "could find it more difficult or costly to borrow this year if the central government takes further steps to rein in 'shadow banking' activities," which it said were a major source of funding for developers that could not secure bank loans.On the upside, Mr. Qu of HSBC noted, the string of recent weak data has prompted Beijing to introduce more targeted support measures, which he said "should boost confidence and reduce downside risks to growth."The leadership that took the helm in Beijing in March has been insisting that the slowdown is not only desirable — as part of its efforts to rein in excessive lending and bring about more balanced growth — but also stable and sufficient to meet its target of a 7.5 percent economic growth rate this year.But it has also prescribed a steady stream of small-scale, targeted support measures in a bid to ensure that growth does not cool too rapidly.Those have included tax cuts for small businesses and measures aimed at speeding up railroad construction in inland and poor areas. In a bid to raise the economy's overall efficiency, the authorities have also issued instructions to more than 1,400 companies in 19 industries to cut excess production capacity this year.Meanwhile, the central bank said July 19 that it would no longer set a minimum interest rate for corporate loans — a symbolically important first step toward wider interest-rate liberalization."All of these things amount to a small-scale stimulus," said Dariusz Kowalczyk, a senior economist and strategist at the French bank Crédit Agricole in Hong Kong. Those steps, combined with more fine-tuning moves that are likely to follow in the next few months, are likely to lift economic growth to just above the official 7.5 percent growth target this year, Mr. Kowalczyk said."The new leadership cannot afford politically to miss that target during their first year," he said, adding that he expected moves aimed at bolstering consumer demand, like subsidies for big-ticket items or consumption-tax cuts, as well as a modest depreciation in the renminbi in the coming months.Beijing's approach to supporting growth this year has been markedly different to that adopted in late 2008 and 2009. Back then, the authorities prescribed a powerful, big-bang stimulus program and loosened the reins on bank lending. Those moves helped China bounce back quickly from a sharp downturn set off by the global turmoil.But they also helped cause property prices in many Chinese cities to soar, and set off a big rise in local government and corporate debt levels — unpalatable side effects that the new leadership is now working to reverse.
TAIPEI, Taiwan — Tens of thousands of Taiwanese gathered in downtown Taipei on Saturday to protest the death of a 24-year old soldier confined to a brig as punishment for bringing an unauthorized cellphone onto his base.The protest was the biggest so far in the continuing campaign to register discontent over the death of Hung Chung-chiu on July 3. The simmering anger is complicating the Taiwanese military's efforts to transition from a mixed forced of conscripts and volunteers to an all-volunteer force.The university graduate died after several days of being forced to perform a rigorous regime of push-ups, sit-ups and other exercises in sweltering heat. He was just three days short of completing his 20-month service obligation at the time.Eighteen officers and NCOs have already been charged in connection with the case. President Ma Ying-jeou has apologized and the minister of defense has resigned.Taiwan's ambitious military transition is scheduled to be completed by 2015. But even before Hung's death, recruitment goals were not being met, hampered by the military's generally low repute among large swathes of Taiwanese society. Much of the distrust stems from the central role the military played in perpetuating a martial law regime that was dismantled in 1987.There is also a widespread perception that decreasing tensions with China have destroyed the rationale for military service that once existed.
BEIJING — Health care giant Johnson and Johnson says it is pleased to put a legal dispute behind it after a Chinese court ordered it to pay compensation to a former distributor under an anti-monopoly law.Thursday's ruling said Johnson & Johnson was guilty of "vertical monopoly" for setting minimum prices its distributors charged for surgical sutures. It noted that J&J has stopped that practice but ordered it to pay 530,000 yuan ($85,000) to a Chinese distributor that said it lost potential sales due to the restriction."While we are disappointed with today's ruling by the Higher People's Court of Shanghai, we are pleased to have put this matter behind us and look forward to continuing to provide our high quality products and services to healthcare institutions and patients in China," said J&J in a statement.Lawyers said the ruling indicates Chinese authorities are stepping up anti-monopoly investigations.The ruling was the first of its kind against a Fortune 500 company under China's 5-year-old anti-monopoly law, according to lawyers and Chinese news reports.Business groups welcomed the law in 2008 as a step toward making operating conditions clearer but have said since then it is enforced more actively against global companies than against their local rivals.The case comes amid separate Chinese investigations of possible bribery, price-fixing and other misconduct by global suppliers of milk, pharmaceuticals and other products.
HONG KONG — One of the world's leading suppliers of dairy products said Saturday that a type of bacteria that could cause botulism had been found in tests of ingredients the company sells for use in infant formula and sports drinks, leading New Zealand officials to urge a recall.The company, Fonterra, is based in New Zealand and is the world's fourth-largest dairy company. It sells its milk products to other companies that make infant formula and said those companies would be responsible for any recalls. The New Zealand Ministry of Primary Industries said that in addition to New Zealand, six countries were affected: Australia, China, Malaysia, Saudi Arabia, Thailand and Vietnam.Botulism is a rare but serious illness caused by the bacteria Clostridium botulinum. Even tiny amounts of this toxin can lead to severe poisoning."We are acting quickly," the company's chief executive, Theo Spierings, said in a statement. "Our focus is to get information out about potentially affected product as fast as possible so that it can be taken off supermarket shelves and, where it has already been purchased, can be returned."Infant formula from New Zealand is in huge demand in China, largely because of concerns about the quality of domestic formula there, particularly since milk formula tainted with melamine led to the deaths of several babies and sickened thousands more in 2008. Fonterra owned part of one of the companies involved in that scandal, but that company, Sanlu, has since been shut down.After Fonterra raised alarms about the bacteria found in its milk products, the Chinese General Administration of Quality Supervision, Inspection and Quarantine, which polices food safety, ordered importers in China to recall any products that might carry the bacteria, the group said on its Web site. China is a major buyer of New Zealand's food products, especially infant formula and other dairy goods. The agency said it "promptly contacted the New Zealand Embassy to China and demanded that New Zealand take immediate measures to prevent problem products harming the health of Chinese consumers."This year, Fonterra began preparing to sell its own infant formula in China, including building an ultrahigh-temperature milk manufacturing plant there, aiming to sell a quarter-billion gallons of milk in the country by 2018, company officials told Chinese state news media in April.At a news conference on Saturday, Fonterra officials said that Mr. Spierings had been sent to China to deal with the issue.Fonterra officials said the problem involved three batches of a whey protein concentrate produced at a New Zealand manufacturing site in May 2012.Officials first noticed a quality-control problem in March. The company then conducted more intensive tests, and on Wednesday workers found signs of the presence of Clostridium botulinum in a sample. Investigators have tied the problem to unsterilized pipes, which officials said had since been cleaned.While Fonterra did not name the companies that it had alerted to the problem, the New Zealand Ministry for Primary Industries identified one product sold within the country: Nutricia Karicare follow-on formula products for children ages 6 months and older.The ministry "has been advised that in the case of the Nutricia Karicare, five batches of follow-on formula were manufactured using the contaminated whey protein," said Scott Gallacher, the ministry's acting director, adding that parents using the product should instead "use infant formula for children aged 0-6 months, ready-made formulas or alternative brands."
CRANS-MONTANA, Switzerland — Twelve-year-old golfer Ye Wocheng of China is set to play at the European Masters in September.Tournament organizers say he has been accepted for the Sept. 5-8 event in the Swiss Alps, which is jointly sanctioned by the European and Asian tours.Ye became the youngest player in a European Tour event after qualifying for the China Open in May. He missed the cut after shooting two rounds of 79.Ye's record-setting appearance followed weeks after Chinese golfer Guan Tianlang made history at The Masters by playing at age 14.
BEIJING — Having the dead guy jump up for a drink probably wasn't part of the script.A staged protest claiming that city officials had beaten a sidewalk vendor to death in central China went awry when the man playing dead under a white sheet was overcome by the region's heat wave and sprang up to quaff a bottle of water, state media reported Monday."It's too hot. I can't bear it anymore," the man was quoted as saying by state-run Xinhua News Agency.More than 10 men had gathered Saturday with a gurney that purportedly carried the vendor's body, covered by a sheet, in the Hubei provincial capital Wuhan. They were demanding tens of thousands of yuan (thousands of dollars) in compensation for the alleged death, Xinhua said.The incident drew 300 onlookers and about 80 police officers.It was not immediately clear how the group intended to press their claims without submitting the body for an investigation and autopsy. In any case, the game was up when the man — as Xinhua reported — jumped up after two hours under the sheet.The man on the gurney was identified only by his surname Han, and he has been detained for disturbing social order, said a district administration official in Wuhan contacted by telephone. She refused to give her name.Han told the police that urban management workers — known as "chengguan" — clashed with the group of vendors earlier Saturday after telling them that their drinks stands were blocking traffic, Xinhua said.Many members of China's public have long resented the heavy-handed tactics of the country's chengguan. Though they have no legal authority to use force, they are often accused of beating people who commit minor infractions in shows of power that have fueled social tension, triggered riots and aggravated public discontent against the government.
BEIJING — Two top Shanghai judges and another court official caught on a videotape apparently taking prostitutes to hotel rooms after dining with a contractor have been stripped of Communist Party membership and will likely lose their jobs.The case, exposed by a disgruntled defendant in a civil case, has aggravated public distrust of the court system and shed new light on continued wrongdoing by officials despite the Chinese leadership's vow to crack down on all corruption."They slept with prostitutes, but they raped the law," commentator Liu Xuesong wrote in an editorial posted on the website of Hong Kong-based Phoenix TV and widely circulated online Wednesday in mainland China.The hotel surveillance video, secretly copied and released publicly by a man who went to the hotel claiming he needed to see the videotapes to recover lost property, triggered an investigation by the Shanghai Communist Party Committee.The panel said late Tuesday that the three Shanghai Supreme Court officials "participated in prostitution" after being invited to dinner. A fourth court official accepted female companionship that evening but did not take a woman to a room, the panel said.The statement did not clarify whether the contractor paid for prostitutes, but party rules forbid both involvement in prostitution and accepting bribes. The committee said the three involved in prostitution were stripped of party membership while the fourth court official was on probation, and that it was requesting that the court dismiss all four employees.The party-run People's Daily newspaper, commenting on the case Wednesday, said it was important for the image of judges to be untarnished."The images of judges are not about themselves but also inherently related to the credibility of the judicial system and the public trust of law," the editorial said.Whistleblowers in China run the risk of retribution from powerful officials, and leaders are deeply wary of enlisting the public in the fight against corruption, preferring to wage the campaign on their own terms. However, the man who leaked the hotel videos — identified in state-run media reports only by his surname, Ni, has appeared to face no repercussions from his actions so far.Ni has told state-run media outlets that he set out to expose wrongdoings by one of the judges, Shanghai Supreme Court Justice Zhao Minghua, after getting what he believed was unfair treatment in a court case handled by other judges.Ni said he found out that Zhao was a cousin of the plaintiff in the case, a contract dispute in a building project, and he suspected the judge had exerted influence on the courtroom outcome. Ni told state media he then spent a year stalking Zhao, and found his opportunity on June 9 when he followed the judge to a resort hotel.Ni said he later went to the hotel management claiming that he had lost something and asking to review surveillance videos, secretly filming copies and finding that they showed Zhao and colleagues taking women into their hotel rooms.A prominent Chinese business magazine, Caixin, said the whistleblower had filed a police complaint in April, but "the case went nowhere" and he therefore decided to post the video online instead of going to the police again."It is clear that he realized the failed police report meant officials enjoy special protection," the magazine said. "An ordinary citizen making a report through official channels is likely to make little headway."Shanghai-based lawyer Zhong Jinhua said there is no clear law on citizen vigilantes in China. "Personally I think he is entitled to take action to safeguard his lawful rights," Zhong said, noting Ni had exhausted official channels before he took the matter into his own hands. "It is understandable that he should have stalked the judge and taken video after his rights were violated."Ni's act also raised questions over whether he violated the privacy of the officials. The central Chinese province of Henan recently approved a law forbidding online circulation of surveillance video without police approval. But the state-run China Youth newspaper said in a Wednesday editorial that a video documenting unsavory acts by government officials should not be banned from circulation if such acts may harm public interest."Government officials should have less privacy than ordinary citizens, because there is the need to ensure the public power operates normally and that public interest is protected," the editorial said.
BEIJING — China announced Wednesday it has fined six milk suppliers, including Mead Johnson and New Zealand's Fonterra, a total of $108 million for price-fixing after an investigation that shook the country's fast-growing dairy market.The announcement came as China reels from a separate recall of milk supplies from Fonterra this week due to possible contamination.The investigation reflected intensifying scrutiny of business under China's 5-year-old anti-monopoly law. Most targets so far have been foreign-owned. It was carried out against the backdrop of Chinese probes of possible bribery and other misconduct by global suppliers of pharmaceuticals and other products.Anti-monopoly enforcement "is getting more and more forceful," said Wang Xiang, a lawyer for the firm Orrick, Herrington & Sutcliffe.The Cabinet's National Development and Reform Commission said it imposed fines totaling 668.7 million yuan ($108 million) on the local units of Mead Johnson Nutrition Co., based in Glenview, Illinois; Hong Kong-based Biostime International Holdings Ltd.; Dumex, a unit of France's Danone SA; Abbott Laboratories, in Abbott Park, Illinois; Fonterra Co-operative Group and Dutch-based FrieslandCampina NV.The companies admitted they violated the anti-monopoly law by setting minimum prices distributors were required to charge, which raised costs for consumers, the NDRC said in a statement. Regulators did not allege direct collusion, known as horizontal price-fixing, among them.Setting minimum prices is a common practice in some markets, where companies want to maintain an image as a premium brand. But lawyers say Chinese regulators appear to see most such requirements for distributors as illegal.Last week, health care giant Johnson & Johnson was ordered by a Shanghai court to pay compensation to a former distributor in a lawsuit brought under the anti-monopoly law.Beijing is especially concerned about consumer prices at a time when communist leaders face pressure to contain surging living costs.Three suppliers were found to have violated the law but were spared fines, the NDRC statement said. They were China's Beingmate Group Ltd.; Wyeth Nutrition, a unit of Switzerland's Nestle SA, and Japan's Meiji Dairies Corp.Other industries also could face tougher scrutiny, especially those in which foreign enterprises have advanced technology that might dominate a market, said Wang."Industries like new drugs and medical equipment, especially top companies that have the potential to be monopolies, should pay more attention to this," he said.Milk and its quality and price are sensitive in China after six babies died and thousands were sickened in 2008 due to formula tainted with the chemical melamine. That prompted many parents to switch to buying more expensive imported milk.Thursday's announcement referred to suppliers of milk powder while earlier reports by state media said investigators specifically targeted sellers of powdered infant formula.Milk suppliers including Nestle and Dutch-based FrieslandCampina announced price cuts of 5 to 12 percent after the investigation was launched.Mead Johnson was fined 203.8 million yuan ($33 million), Biostime 162.9 million yuan ($26.3 million) and Dumex 172 million yuan ($27.7 million), according to the NDRC statement. FrieslandCampina was fined 48.2 million yuan ($7.8 million), Abbott 77.3 million yuan ($12.5 million) and Fonterra 4.5 million yuan ($720,000).Some fines were based on companies' annual sales and ranged from 3 to 6 percent of revenue, the agency said.There have been few court rulings so far on the 2008 anti-monopoly law. That has fed uncertainty about how it will apply to global companies that are eager to expand in the world's second-largest economy.Chinese regulators have cited the law in ordering changes to acquisitions or business practices. In 2009, they blocked Coca-Cola Co. from buying a Chinese fruit juice producer.Business groups welcomed the law as a step toward clarifying operating conditions in China. Since then, they have said it is enforced more actively against foreign companies than against their Chinese rivals.Last week, a Shanghai court ordered U.S.-based health care giant Johnson & Johnson to pay damages to a distributor in a lawsuit filed under the anti-monopoly law. The court said J&J improperly set minimum prices, depriving the local distributor of possible sales.Meanwhile, China has ordered a recall of Fonterra infant formula after the dairy company announced Saturday that hundreds of tons of infant formula, sports drinks and other products might be tainted with bacteria that could cause botulism.Also last month, police detained four employees of GlaxoSmithKline on charges they bribed doctors to prescribe the British pharmaceutical giant's drugs.
TAIPEI, Taiwan — Taiwan's defense minister resigned over a plagiarism accusation less than a week after taking the job, dealing another blow to the government of President Ma Ying-jeou and plunging the island's military deeper into crisis.Andrew Yang said he accepted full responsibility for an article that a ghost writer prepared under his name in a 2007 book on China's People's Liberation Army that contained material lifted from another source."This is my mistake and I extend my apologies," Yang said at a news conference late Tuesday night.Yang, 58, took office Thursday after his predecessor resigned amid a furor over the death in early July of a 24-year-old army conscript forced to perform grueling exercises in searing heat while being held in a military brig over a cell phone violation.The death of Hung Chung-chiu just days before his discharge infuriated many people. An estimated 200,000 protesters took to the streets of Taipei on Saturday demanding military reforms.Eighteen officers and non-commissioned officers, including a general, have been indicted in connection with the Hung case.Yang was also tasked with implementing the military's ambitious program to transition to an all-volunteer force by 2015.Yang was the first civilian appointed by Ma to the prestigious defense post. A widely respected academic, he had been deputy defense minister since 2009.His departure is a blow to Ma, whose public approval percentages have recently ranged from the high teens to low 20s. Ma was once praised for lowering tensions with China, from which Taiwan split amid civil war in 1949, but poor economic performance, repeated administrative bungles and a perceived remote style have helped alienate supporters and opponents alike.
BEIJING — More than a decade ago, a mysterious foreign buyer looking for property in France settled on a villa along the sun-bleached Riviera. The house later became tied to a British businessman, Neil Heywood, whose death in 2011 in China set in motion a political crisis within the upper ranks of the Communist Party.That villa in Cannes has emerged as a major aspect in a criminal case against Bo Xilai, a fallen Communist Party aristocrat, which has presented the party with one of its biggest challenges since the Tiananmen Square protests of 1989.Officials intend to present the villa as evidence of significant bribetaking in a coming criminal trial that is expected to signify the end of Mr. Bo's political career, according to three people with ties to the Bo family. Mr. Bo's downfall began when accusations emerged that his wife had murdered Mr. Heywood in 2011. The trial of Mr. Bo, who is facing three criminal charges, is expected to begin within weeks or days.Political analysts say the trial's probable outcome, a lengthy prison sentence for Mr. Bo, has no doubt already been determined by party leaders.The most serious charge against Mr. Bo, 64, is that of taking bribes worth more than $3.5 million, mainly from a young billionaire, Xu Ming, who was listed by Forbes in 2005 as China's eighth-richest person. The charge rests largely on the villa, which the Chinese authorities allege was bought by Mr. Xu and given to the Bo family, according to the three people with knowledge of the case, who spoke on the condition of anonymity because of the delicate politics of the trial.French documents show that people close to the Bo family have been involved with the villa since 2001. Patrick Henri Devillers, a Frenchman who knew the family when Mr. Bo was the mayor of Dalian in the 1990s, is listed in a property assessment document as a current owner of the home, and he was appointed head of a company apparently created to buy the property in 2001, according to an earlier document. That management company, Résidences Fontaine St. Georges, is registered at the villa's address, 7 Boulevard des Pins, and Mr. Heywood, the Briton and Bo family friend, was listed in court documents as the manager of the company from 2007 to June 2011, five months before he died in China.The villa, surrounded by white concrete walls, is in a leafy neighborhood whose yards have palm trees and swimming pools. An audit of the property presented to a French commercial court put the villa's base value in December 2010 around $3.5 million.Until midsummer, a court-appointed lawyer had been indicating to the Bo family that Mr. Bo would face two charges: bribetaking involving about $1.1 million in payments from Mr. Xu to the Bo family, and abuse of power for Mr. Bo's dismissal of Wang Lijun as police chief of Chongqing, in what officials called an attempt to impede an investigation into Mr. Heywood's death. As Chongqing's party chief, Mr. Bo ran the municipality for four years until his dismissal in March 2012, when the murder scandal unfolded.Right before the charges were announced in late July, an internal document circulating among officials indicated that the bribetaking amount was more than $3.5 million — three times what the Bo family had been told.The additional amount included the value the authorities attached to the villa. Other amounts cited as bribes in the indictment included around $850,000 in travel and other expenses said to have been paid by Mr. Xu in the name of Mr. Bo's wife and younger son. An embezzlement charge was also included; people briefed by lawyers said the amount was five million renminbi, or $800,000, which was missing from a Dalian government construction agency."These sums should not be considered a real and true accounting of the money, but rather the most appropriate amount as calculated from a political perspective," one family associate said. "Originally we'd been hearing it was six million-plus renminbi, but a lot of people felt that amount was too small."In recent bribetaking cases involving senior officials, amounts have been much larger. Last month the former railway minister pleaded guilty to taking 64 million renminbi, or more than $10 million, in bribes. He was given a suspended death sentence, equal to life imprisonment.
BEIJING — Activity in China's service sector defied the cooling of the country's economy and expanded modestly in July, a private survey showed Monday. New business orders recovered from a multiyear low in a rare sign of resilience.But that rise was tempered by a decline in prices charged by companies to a nine-month low, suggesting that demand was still too weak for them to raise prices, while business expectations hovered near their lowest level since 2005.The HSBC/Markit purchasing managers' index for the service industry stood at 51.3 in July, unchanged from June and just a whisker above a 20-month low of 51.1 struck in April.It echoed data China's National Bureau of Statistics had released over the weekend, which showed a reading of 54.1 last month, up from 53.9 in June.A reading above 50 suggests business has grown from the previous month, while an outcome below 50 points to contraction.Crucially, service companies are the biggest employers in China, at a time when the government is worried that the downturn could threaten social stability by driving up unemployment as Beijing tries to shift the economy away from a focus on manufacturing.China's economy is set to grow this year at its weakest pace since 1990, as flagging foreign and domestic demand weighs on exports and factory production. A slowdown in investment has further dragged on growth."China's service sector has stabilized at a relatively low level of growth," said Qu Hongbin, an economist at HSBC. "But profit margins continue to be squeezed. Without a sustained improvement in demand, services growth is likely to remain lackluster, putting downside pressures to employment growth."The subindex for new orders rebounded to 52.3 from the reading in June, which was the lowest reading in more than four years.Financial markets have grown increasingly nervous about China's economic health, despite reassurances from Beijing that it is on track to meet its growth target of 7.5 percent this year.A pair of P.M.I. surveys of Chinese manufacturers last week showed a contradictory picture of factory production; the official figure was slightly stronger than expected in July among larger Chinese manufacturers, while the HSBC/Markit survey came in at an 11-month low."I am more worried about manufacturers. I don't think the worst is over," said Zhang Zhiwei, a Nomura economist in Hong Kong.He said the service sector was holding up better than manufacturing, as it was not saddled with excess capacity and debt and was supported by demand intrinsically less volatile."Policy will continue to be tight, and growth will continue to slow in the second half of the year," Mr. Zhang said.The HSBC survey showed the employment subindex had slipped in July, although it remained above a four-year trough touched in April.HSBC said 6 percent of survey respondents had increased their payrolls, with a particular focus on hiring graduates. In contrast, 2 percent of companies had shed jobs.The service sector accounted for 46 percent of China's economy in 2012, so a sharp slowdown in the industry would exacerbate concerns about slackening economic growth.Service firms created 35 percent of all jobs in China in 2011, overtaking manufacturers, who accounted for 30 percent of hiring.
HONG KONG — Life imitated art, startlingly and crudely, in the city of Hai'an, north of Shanghai, when two men rushed the stage and groped the painter and performance artist Yan Yinhong as she danced "One Person's Battlefield" — her furious comment on sexual violence against women.The assault continued through her entire performance as she dodged the men who kissed and groped her, grappled her to the floor and thrust their hands up her skirt, the audience making only halfhearted efforts to help as they stood by and recorded the incident with phones and cameras.Did she report it to the police? No: "How could you report that here?" she asked."To me, their interference showed the vileness of society, and our society is vile," Ms. Yan said in a telephone interview.It was "real embarrassing," said Cheng Meixin, an independent art critic and curator and the organizer of the Hai'an China Contemporary Art and Ideology Forum, where the incident took place in mid-June. "It should never have happened," he said. One of the men — both are Beijing-based artists known to Mr. Cheng — had "psychological problems," he said.Was the man getting help, I asked?No, Mr. Cheng said. "In Chinese society you don't get help when you have those kinds of problems."I wrote about Ms. Yan's work in this column after she performed her piece in Beijing in late May. I described how she depicted scenes of sexual violence and then, in a moment of surprise for the audience, did a handstand, her skirt dropping away to reveal the face of a uniformed policeman painted onto her flesh-colored leotard. Her message: There is a great deal of sexual violence around, quite a bit of it perpetrated by representatives of the state.So I listened, feeling shock but also a weary familiarity, and mostly marveling at the brutish irony (sexually attacking a woman as she protests sexual attacks against women — who would make that up?) as Li Xinmo, a fellow performer, recounted the events in Hai'an over dinner in the 798 Art District in Beijing, not long afterward.Ms. Li saw something other than "a vile society" or untreated mental illness.That same afternoon in Hai'an, another, third man had interfered in Ms. Li's piece, "Mouth of the Spring."Something systematic was at work, she said: anti-woman sentiment.Dressed in her trademark white, Ms. Li had sat quietly on the stage (a large square of white-painted ground with a white wall behind it), drinking black ink from white teacups. Next she splashed herself with ink from a bucket. Finally she dumped the contents of the bucket over her head. The ink symbolized the internal poison and external stain of thousands of years of official Chinese literary, philosophical and political thought, which Ms. Li sees as overwhelmingly male-centered.Video footage shows a man walking up to her, taking a cup and drinking from it, as she moves away her tray with the teacups and a pot."I asked him to stop, but he ignored me," said Ms. Li, looking pale as she spoke, the entire incident and its aftermath a strain. It was unsolicited interference, she said, and "it felt like a violation."Video shows her angrily picking up a tea tray and flinging it away. At the end she stalks off the black-spattered floor, radiating anger.Ms. Li says she faces much criticism for her feminism from male Chinese artists. "They are just the same as other men," she said, adding, "I'm so sick of this."This is what Ms. Li concluded from the assaults on her and Ms. Yan: "If the artists had been men, such interference would have been unlikely," she said, summarizing comments she posted on an online art magazine, igniting debate. "But it seems that people are used to not respecting women's wishes.""Those three men don't represent all Chinese men," she said of the two men who interrupted Ms. Yan's performance and the one who interrupted her show. "But they are a kind of mirror that shows a face of men, an ugliness, and shows the real experience of women."Particularly upsetting, she said, was the response from some artists and critics. While some defended Ms. Li and Ms. Yan, others said the events, including the sexualized attack on Ms. Yan, constituted "interactive art."Writing on Artintern.net, the artist and critic Wu Wei challenged Ms. Li's interpretation. Mr. Wu concluded that the men's actions were a form of interactive art, though he conceded that at one point one man may have overstepped a boundary — when he unzipped his fly and took out his penis, a moment also confirmed by Ms. Yan. Even that "basically fit the meaning and needs of the piece," Mr. Wu wrote.Ms. Li's interpretation was itself a form of prejudice, he wrote. "Li Xinmo is always talking about feminism," he said. "But this kind of feminism, doesn't it just become female chauvinism?!"To Ms. Yan, it was nothing of the kind.If she appears in the video initially to play along with the assault — a true artist — she said that her energy was focused on her protecting her show and the leotard with the policeman image, as the men groped her."Otherwise my performance would have been ruined," she said.As the assault continued, her resistance grew."I was angry," she said. "But as it was happening, I was 80 percent thinking, 'How can I successfully finish my show?' and 20 percent thinking, 'What if I had been in some other place and met guys like this?"'That could have actually been dangerous, she said."I felt that I could handle it," she concluded. "There is so much of this in my daily life. I come across this kind of thing all the time."
BEIJING — Chinese police have detained a prominent leftist supporter of disgraced high-flying politician Bo Xilai who had urged people to protest against Bo's upcoming trial, underlining government nervousness about the case.Song Yangbiao, a reporter for the magazine the Time Weekly, was detained on Sunday on charges of "picking quarrels and causing trouble", according to friends and supporters, apparently after using his Sina Weibo microblog to denounce the trial and call for an uprising to oppose it.Bo was dramatically sacked last year as Communist Party chief of the south-western city of Chongqing following lurid accusations of corruption and abuse of power. His trial is expected to begin this month in the eastern city of Jinan.While Song's Weibo account has now been deleted, records kept on freeweibo.com, run by the anti-China censorship site greatfire.org, showed that Song had made his plea on Saturday for people to protest against Bo's trial."All members of the Chinese Communist Party should rise up together to oppose the illegal trial in Jinan," Song wrote, according to freeweibo.com.Friend Lu Qi said police informed the family on Monday of Song's detention, though he was unable to confirm a direct connection with any posts about Bo."There's a lot of speculation about this on the internet at the moment, but I'd personally not seen anything on his Weibo about this," Lu told Reuters.Wu Danhong, a Beijing law professor and controversial leftist blogger who writes under the pen name Wu Fatian, said he had been told by a family member that Song had been detained "because of something to do with Weibo"."He is no threat to society," Wu said by telephone, adding he had offered Song his legal services.A policeman who answered the telephone at the police station in the eastern Beijing suburb of Tongzhou, where Song is being held, said he could neither confirm nor deny the detention.Song has been a well-known and sometimes outspoken supporter of leftist policies, and of Bo, who is certain to be found guilty at his trial and given a long jail sentence, or possibly the death penalty.After his appointment as party chief of Chongqing in 2007, Bo turned it into a showcase of revolution-inspired "red" culture and his policies for egalitarian, state-led growth. He also won national attention with a crackdown on organised crime.His brash self-promotion irked some leaders. But his populist ways and crime clean-up were welcomed by many of Chongqing's 30 million residents, as well as others who hoped that Bo could take his leftist-shaded policies nationwide.A colleague of Song's, who asked not to be identified, said Song's support of Bo and passion for the late Mao Zedong was no secret, and that it was most likely because of his tweet about Bo that he had got into trouble."Still, this is nothing to do with the left or right, it's a simple matter of suppressing freedom of speech," the colleague added. "It's unfortunately a common occurrence in China."While Bo still has many sympathisers within the party, his case is unlikely to cause a major schism, though it may overshadow and slow President Xi Jinping's efforts to push economic reforms.State media has issued calls for the country to rally behind the party in the prosecution of Bo, but the government has also heavily censored microblogs to prevent discussion of the case and blocked far leftist websites which support Bo.
Mead Johnson Nutrition said on Tuesday it would pay about $33 million in connection with a Chinese investigation into possible price-fixing and anticompetitive practices by foreign makers of baby formula.Mead Johnson, the maker of Enfamil formula, said that as a result of its antitrust review, China's National Development and Reform Commission had assessed administrative penalties against Mead Johnson and a number of other milk formula companies doing business in China.Foreign infant formula is highly coveted in China, where public trust was damaged by a 2008 scandal in which six infants died and thousands of others were sickened after drinking milk tainted with the toxic industrial compound melamine. Foreign brands now account for about half of total sales.Mead Johnson said the payment, which resolves the commission's review, would reduce its full-year earnings by about 12 cents a share, but it reiterated its 2013 earnings forecast for profit, excluding one-time items, of $3.22 to $3.30 a share.The company said in recent weeks that it was being investigated, along with Danone, Nestlé, Abbott Laboratories and Biostime International Holdings, by the Chinese commission, an economic planning agency, for possible antitrust violations including price-fixing.As a result, Mead Johnson and others cut prices on their baby formulas.Representatives from Danone, Nestlé and Abbott Laboratories were not immediately available for comment.Biostime, which imports most of its products, said on Tuesday that its shares had been suspended pending an announcement related to an investigation by China's top economic planning agency. The company said previously that a unit based in Guangzhou, a city in southern China, was being investigated by the commission over possible price-fixing.In a statement to the Hong Kong stock exchange in late July, Biostime said it planned to lower prices of infant formula products by 5 to 10 percent.
HONG KONG — The Indian rupee lurched to a record low against the dollar on Tuesday, shrugging off recent measures aimed at propping it up and underscoring the severe problems facing the economy as the country heads toward an election next year.The rupee has slumped nearly 15 percent since May, when the possibility of scaled-back bond purchases in the United States prompted foreign cash to flee emerging markets around the world. The Indian central bank reacted last month with several steps to support the currency, but the rupee continued its slide Tuesday, falling to 61.71 per U.S. dollar by late afternoon.Stemming the rupee's rapid decline will be one of the first tasks for the next governor of the Reserve Bank of India, the nation's central bank. Reuters reported Tuesday that the Indian government appointed Raghuram Rajan, the chief economic adviser in the finance ministry, to the post. According to a statement by the finance minister, Mr. Rajan will replace Duvvuri Subbarao, whose tenure ends on Sept. 4 after five years, Reuters reported.Mr. Rajan joined the Indian government last August, after serving chief economist at the International Monetary Fund and a professor at the University of Chicago.India's fundamental problems, said Rajiv Biswas, Asia-Pacific chief economist at IHS Global Insight in Singapore, are a "chronic current account deficit," which has worsened over the years, and a big outflow of foreign capital since Ben S. Bernanke, the chairman of the United States Federal Reserve, signaled in May that the American economy may soon be ready to be weaned off the massive bond purchases that have bolstered its economy since the global financial crisis."Last year, they were able to deal with the current account deficit because capital inflows were strong," Mr. Biswas said. Now that the money is ebbing away, the rupee is coming under systemic pressure, he said.More broadly, much-needed economic overhauls — like improving the country's infrastructure and cutting red tape — have been notoriously tough to push through, while a slowdown in growth in recent years has made the country less attractive to foreign investors, despite the potential offered by a huge, young population.The pace of expansion has slowed to about 5.5 percent this year from more than 8 percent in 2009 and 2010, and the latest purchasing managers indexes for the manufacturing and services sectors, released by the British bank HSBC, both slipped in July."There are few good signs on the economic horizon," Mr. Biswas said, "and there is not a great deal that either the government or the central bank can do in the short term." He added that slowing growth had further reduced the government's room to maneuver.The slide in the rupee, moreover, will probably make things worse, analysts warned.Although a cheaper rupee makes Indian exports less expensive for consumers abroad, the effect provides relatively little lift to the Indian economy, as the country is far less reliant on exports than many of its Asian peers.Meanwhile, the weaker currency raises India's import bills for dollar-denominated goods like oil, of which the country is a big importer, adding pain to an already slowing economy and potentially fueling inflation to worrisome levels further down the line.
HONG KONG — The Australian central bank on Tuesday cut rates for the eighth time in less than two years in a bid to improve sluggish growth as a boom in mining investment over the past decade comes to an end.The Reserve Bank of Australia lowered its benchmark cash rate by a quarter of a percentage point to a record low of 2.5 percent, bringing the total cuts since November 2011 to 2.25 percentage points.Despite cooling growth in China, which is the main market for Australia's mineral riches, resource exports are growing, and are expected to continue to do so as projects that are now in the pipeline begin operation.Resource investments helped Australia weather the global turmoil of recent years better than other developed economies. But new investments in that sector are petering out, leaving the country struggling to rebalance with other areas, like manufacturing and tourism.A steady stream of interest rate cuts since late 2011 has helped cushion the economy so far, and data released Tuesday showed housing prices in major Australian cities rose 2.4 percent in the second quarter — more than analysts had expected.A slide in the Australian dollar could also help lift tourism. Undermined in part by a growing awareness that China is on a path to slower growth, the Australian currency has fallen about 15 percent against the U.S. dollar since mid-April.Any lift in consumer and business sentiment from this and the latest rate cut could be welcome news for the government, which faces elections next month.But unemployment has edged up as the mining boom has faded, and policy makers and analysts have warned that economic rebalancing will be challenging and take time.In a statement accompanying the rate decision Tuesday, the central bank governor, Glenn Stevens, hinted at the divergent trends, saying that although there had recently been "signs of increased demand for finance by households," the pace of borrowing had remained "relatively subdued."The latest interest rate cut had been widely expected after comments from Mr. Stevens in a speech last week about the end of the mining boom.Resource sector investment, he said, had risen from an average of about 2 percent of gross domestic product to peak around 8 percent on the back of soaring international demands."That big rise is now over, and a fall is in prospect, with uncertain timing. It could be quite a big fall in due course," Mr. Stevens said.Similarly, the government on Aug. 2 lowered its growth forecasts for the current financial year, which runs through June 2014, saying it expected expansion of 2.5 percent, rather than the 2.75 percent it had projected.The "abnormal period of heavy reliance on one part of the economy" will come to an end, and "managing the transition back to more normal, broader based growth will be a key economic challenge over the next few years," the government said in its assessment."If we don't see some improvement in the leading indicators of the economy, such as job ads and business conditions," or if the Australian dollar strengthens again, economists at UBS in Sydney wrote in a research note, the central bank "will likely have some further work to do either late this year or early 2014."
HONG KONG — American officials criticized the Vietnamese government on Tuesday for its new limits on political dissent on the Internet, citing a decree that appears to restrict people from sharing news articles on social media and personal Web sites.The decree, announced last Wednesday and scheduled to go into force on Sept. 1, states that personal blogs and social media sites "should be used to provide and exchange information of that individual only."In a statement, the American Embassy in Hanoi said that the new rule, called Decree 72, "appears to be inconsistent with Vietnam's obligations under the International Covenant on Civil and Political Rights, as well as its commitments under the Universal Declaration of Human Rights."Vietnam has received some praise over the last year from human rights activists as it has begun drafting a new constitution that addresses civil liberties and religious tolerance.But like other Asian nations, particularly China, it is grappling with how to handle the widespread adoption of social media by its citizens — and its ability to broadly disseminate articles critical of the government.It was unclear how the government would enforce the new ruling. In China, articles critical of the government are routinely disseminated on social media but then often swiftly removed, and searches for certain sensitive words or phrases are often blocked, creating a game of cat and mouse in which users try to outsmart the censors.Hoang Vinh Bao, head of Vietnam's Department of Radio, TV and Electronic Information, was quoted by the state-run VnExpress news site as saying that under the new decree, individuals would not be allowed to quote general information "from newspapers, press agencies, or other state-owned Web sites." But he later calibrated the remarks to suggest that the decree would limit only the way that information from other sources was reposted.Reporters Without Borders, a free-press advocacy group, has assailed Decree 72 as a "gross violation of the right to inform and be informed."In its report this year on civil liberties in Vietnam, Human Rights Watch credited Vietnam by noting, "On the surface, private expression, public journalism and even political speech in Vietnam show signs of enhanced freedom." But the group added that "there continues to be a subcurrent of state-sponsored repression and persecution of individuals whose speech crosses boundaries and addresses sensitive issues such as criticizing the state's foreign policies in regards to China or questioning the monopoly power of the communist party."The American Embassy also raised alarms on Tuesday about new requirements that could force companies like Google and Facebook to comply with Vietnam's censorship laws, banning them from "providing information that is against Vietnam, undermining national security, social order and national unity."The embassy said such a requirement would "limit the development of Vietnam's budding IT sector by hampering domestic innovation and deterring foreign investment."
TAIPEI — A nuclear power plant in Taiwan may have been leaking radioactive water for three years, according to a report published by the government's watchdog, adding to uncertainty over the fate of a new fourth nuclear power plant.The First Nuclear Power Plant, located in densely populated northern Taiwan, has been leaking toxic water from storage pools of two reactors, said the watchdog, called the Control Yuan.An official of Taiwan Power Co., which builds the island's nuclear power plants, said the water did not come from the storage pools, but may have come from condensation or water used for cleaning up the floor."We have explained to the Control Yuan, but they turned it down. They asked us to look into if other causes were involved," said the official. He declined to be identified as the matter is sensitive.Plans to build a fourth nuclear plant in Taiwan are becoming controversial. Scuffles broke out between legislators at a parliamentary debate on the plant this week.Currently, Taiwan has three operational nuclear power plants and six reactors.
To her supporters, Alpais Lam Wai-sze, an award-winning primary schoolteacher who shouted obscenities at the Hong Kong police last month over their handling of a street dispute between a pro-Chinese Communist Party group and an anti-Communist group, is a free-speech heroine.To her critics, she's a foulmouthed person who should apologize for directing unprintable words toward police officers.To still others, the incident in the crowded Mong Kok district of Hong Kong is just a storm in a Chinese teacup — though it triggered a 3,000-person-strong demonstration here last Sunday that saw yelling and punching between Ms. Lam's critics and supporters, who broadly divide into two camps — pro- and anti-party, pro- and anti-Hong Kong government and pro- and anti-police. Slogans flew. As the crowd pushed and shoved, people whose identities aren't entirely clear attacked two photographers from liberal news organizations.Adding to the melee, some stormed a stage erected by Ms. Lam's critics, who had gathered to rally in support of the police, and waved the British colonial-era Hong Kong flag as well as Taiwan, Tibetan and British flags, according to the local news media. Such displays are guaranteed to irritate China, which took Hong Kong back from Britain in 1997 and allowed it to keep its different political and legal system but which is believed to be increasingly impatient with the depth of anti-Communist feeling here.The columnist Alex Lo, dismissing it as "a minor spat," described the event in The South China Morning Post thus: "The furor started on July 14 when Lam was videoed shouting foul language at police officers over their handling of a dispute between the Falun Gong and the Hong Kong Youth Care Association, a pro-government group." (The spiritual movement Falun Gong is critical of the party and regularly stages demonstrations here alleging that the Chinese authorities harvest organs from its live practitioners. Falun Gong is banned on the Chinese mainland but allowed in Hong Kong.)"She went into a tirade against the Chinese Communist Party, about how it condoned the harvesting of human organs, and professing herself to be a true Hong Kong person speaking her mind," Mr. Lo wrote.Reflecting how Hong Kong politics is almost always, somehow, about China, he warned that pro- and anti-Beijing groups were "milking the incident for all it's worth.""It was all a bit off topic and unrelated to the issue at hand. But it was a hot summer; and we are all a bit tense and under pressure these days," he wrote, adding: "It's time to calm down and move on."Yet the street-shouting incident, captured on video, is the talk of the town. Ms. Lam, seemingly contrite, has apologized to her pupils and school for her language. But her outburst has highlighted a question hotly debated here in the media, among friends and in educational institutions: How can Hong Kong, population seven million, continue to protect its right to free speech when China, population 1.3 billion, seems increasingly to be calling the shots?What really bothered Ms. Lam, according to multiple news reports, was a sense that the police were favoring the pro-Beijing group as it allegedly tried to interfere with the Falun Gong practitioners who had gathered, as they often do, to express their views.Some blame the unpopular administration of Hong Kong's chief executive, Leung Chun-ying, suspecting him of doing the party's bidding."Our chief executive" — selected by a carefully vetted group and officially appointed by Beijing — "is useless," said Jennifer, a Hong Kong-born Chinese who is helping me improve my Cantonese, the local dialect. She asked that only her first name be used to protect her privacy.When Mr. Leung talks about supporting Hong Kong's distinctive way of life, "he talks a lot, but he doesn't do anything," she said."Since the mainland took over Hong Kong, it has only wanted Hong Kong people to become like mainland people," she said. That is upsetting, because, she said, most Hong Kong residents really do not want to become like people whom they often view as downtrodden and less educated.Jennifer, who is fluent in Cantonese, English and Mandarin, China's national dialect, which is now a required subject in local schools, believes there are really only two camps among young Hong Kong people like herself."They either want more democracy or they are apolitical," she said. "And most support the teacher because they think she is protecting free speech."In Apple Daily, a local newspaper, the columnist Li Yi asked: "Where is Hong Kong at today?" This is "a moment of attack on Hong Kong's undoubted core values," he wrote, which people here broadly understand as involving freedom of speech and an independent judiciary. Mr. Leung, Mr. Li suggested, is building a kind of "Hong Kong-Communist Party alliance."He praised Ms. Lam for her courage. "Lam Wai-sze, who has well-defined likes and dislikes, isn't afraid to bellow in the face of power," he wrote. "Hong Kong people who enjoy their freedom have no right to criticize her, but should respect her. Teacher Lam Wai-sze, you have no need to apologize. You are a model Hong Kong person."And so, even if the swear words of a schoolteacher may not seem like the best possible advertisement for free speech, that is exactly how the issue is being seen by many, if not all, here. As Mr. Lo noted, the pro-Beijing news media have severely criticized her, and there are critical voices among parent associations and the police.Then there's this, noted by some local news outlets: Ms. Lam may have lost her temper as she tried to reason with the police, but she is also the recipient of a coveted government honor, the Hong Kong Chief Executive's Award for Teaching Excellence for the year 2010-11 — for moral and civic education.
BEIJING — A powerful Chinese economic planning official has been expelled from the Communist Party and removed from public office over allegations of corruption that were first made by a prominent journalist.The downfall of Liu Tienan, an official of vice-ministerial rank, marks a rare victory for those among the Chinese public who want ordinary citizens to be granted a bigger role in exposing high-level graft. It also signals the growing influence of social media in China."Liu Tienan is the most senior government official who has been punished after being reported by someone on the Internet," said Liu Shanying, a politics researcher at the Chinese Academy of Social Sciences in Beijing. "It is a breakthrough, and we are going to see more similar cases like that."Though Chinese officials routinely vow to crack down on the rampant graft that pervades the Communist Party and the government, the party would prefer to retain control over the process in part to keep unseemly details out of the public eye.The party's anti-graft agency said Thursday that an investigation had found that Liu, former deputy director of the National Development and Reform Commission, took bribes and abused his power.The Central Commission for Discipline Inspection said in a statement on the Ministry of Supervision's website that it would confiscate Liu's "unlawful gains" and hand his case over to prosecutors.Liu "took advantage of his position to seek profits for others, and both Liu and his family accepted a huge amount of bribes," the statement said.The disciplinary agency also called Liu "morally degenerate." No further details were provided.Liu's case is unusual because allegations were first leveled against him by well-known Chinese journalist Luo Changping, a deputy editor-in-chief of Caijing magazine, on his microblog in December.The reporter accused Liu of having shady ties with a businessman and being involving in problematic bank loans.Luo could not immediately be reached for comment.When accusations made online gain wide attention, as Luo's did, authorities are forced to respond to public demands, researcher Liu said.
BEIJING — A detained Chinese legal activist delivered a bold message from inside a Beijing jail, urging citizens to unite in pursuing democratic freedoms in a video posted online Thursday that's sure to anger the authorities.In the video, civil rights campaigner Xu Zhiyong is seen handcuffed and wearing what appears to be an orange detainee vest over a dark T-shirt, seated at a table behind bars."No matter how utterly defeated or absurd this society is," Xu said in the video, "this country needs brave citizens who can stand up and hold fast to their convictions, who can take their rights, responsibilities and their dreams seriously."Xu's supporter and friend, Wang Gongquan, confirmed by phone that he had obtained the video and posted it on his microblogs.Wang said one of Xu's lawyers, Zhang Qingfang, shot the video on Aug. 1.Beijing police did not immediately respond to a fax seeking comment on the video.Xu is a moderate but outspoken voice in China's beleaguered rights movement, campaigning for issues that include equal rights to education, and for officials to declare their assets.Not one to call for the overthrow of the Communist Party, Xu has preferred to advocate that the government live up to its promises to protect the rights of the people enshrined in the country's oft-ignored constitution.He most recently was detained in mid-July, sparking an outcry among rights activists and academics in China and criticism from the U.S. State Department.Xu is accused of "gathering people to disturb order in a public place," a charge that has been increasingly used to punish people who speak out against abuses."The authorities' detention of Xu Zhiyong is totally unacceptable and the charge is completely without basis," Teng Biao, a rights lawyer and close friend, said Thursday.In 2009, Xu was detained and formally arrested on suspicion of evading taxes — allegations seen as a bid to stop him in his work in a legal aid organization that represented politically sensitive cases. He was released after spending about a month in jail, though hefty fines were levied on the group by the Beijing tax bureau.In recent years, Xu has advocated a movement urging the Chinese public to build a stronger civil society that is fair and just. Activists are frequently harassed, making it unclear how large the nascent movement's following might be.Xu's latest detention indicates how unsettled the authorities are by even the smallest hint of organized civil activity and his ability to rally support around a message."Let us unite and work together," Xu said in the video, urging people to take their rights and identities as citizens seriously and work to promote democracy and the rule of law.
ZHONGSHE, China — A moribund coal mine here descends deeply, more than 3,800 feet underground. But the deal in which a Chinese state-owned conglomerate bought it may be even darker and more labyrinthine.The Zhongshe mine and two others, in Shanxi Province in northern China, are at the center of unusually public accusations of mismanagement and corruption afflicting one of the nation's flagship state conglomerates, China Resources. Critics say that the $1.6 billion purchase was vastly overpriced and illegal and that large sums may have been squandered or, as some are claiming, improperly diverted.Leaked documents about the deal, and a court case in Hong Kong, have shed an unusually harsh light on the usually secretive workings of a major state-owned company. The disputed deal raises a stark question: Are China's economy and resources held hostage by privileged state corporations and their executives, who can use influence and gain access to easy credit in ways that undermine long-term growth?The dispute has become a chief exhibit in a debate in China about the wisdom of investing so much of the nation's money in state-owned companies, especially when China's economy has slowed. For the Communist Party leadership, the case distills concerns about the grip that state-owned conglomerates exert.The problems for China Resources began in 2010, when its affiliates as well as a partner state company agreed to pay 9.9 billion renminbi ($1.6 billion) for the three coal mines and related assets, according to documents submitted to a Hong Kong court. The seller was a businessman, Zhang Xinming, a man with a reputation as a swashbuckling gambler, who also gained a 20 percent stake in the new joint venture.The deal appeared to give China Resources a foothold in the coal industry here in Shanxi, the hub of China's coal industry for more than a century and close to the energy-hungry cities and factories on the coast. But the company's monthly business operations statements show that since the mines changed hands in 2010, the mines have not produced any coal."Legally speaking, this was a totally abnormal transaction," said Chen Ruojian, a lawyer with the Duan & Duan law firm in Beijing. Mr. Chen is helping to represent the minority shareholders in Hong Kong, where the subsidiary behind the deal, China Resources Power Holdings, is listed on the stock exchange."It's impossible to understand why they'd do this — pay so much for mines with expired exploration licenses," he said. "State-owned companies have all sorts of problems, but we think it's rare to have something as stark as China Resources."Political unease over the case grew after two Chinese journalists made accusations of corruption about the deal, and one singled out Song Lin, the chairman of the parent conglomerate, China Resources.The Web site of People's Daily, the Communist Party's newspaper, has reported that the party's discipline unit has received an accusation of corruption against Mr. Song and other senior executives at China Resources and is processing the complaint. Mr. Song has not been detained or charged with any wrongdoing, judging from the reports on the company's Web site of his various public appearances. China Resources has denied wrongdoing and has hinted it might take legal action against Chinese journalists who have raised corruption accusations.China Resources "is a major global player," said David Zweig, a specialist in Chinese natural resource companies at the Hong Kong University of Science and Technology. If the claims about the coal mines are proved true, he added, "it would show that these companies can be ripped off or tricked. It doesn't bode well for the globalization or professionalization of these companies."China Resources traces its roots to the days of Mao Zedong's revolution, when it was established in 1938 in Hong Kong to raise money and buy military supplies to support Communist forces.By 2012 it was China's 18th-largest state-owned industrial company by sales, with revenue of $52 billion. Its wide-ranging products include medicine and beer, coal and real estate. Its chairman, Mr. Song, holds the same government rank as a vice minister.The controversy over the coal deal has made China Resources a lightning rod for criticism of all state-owned enterprises, which produce about two-fifths of the nation's economic output.
ZHONGSHE, China — A moribund coal mine here descends deeply, more than 3,800 feet underground. But the deal in which a Chinese state-owned conglomerate bought it may be even darker and more labyrinthine.The Zhongshe mine and two others, in Shanxi Province in northern China, are at the center of unusually public accusations of mismanagement and corruption afflicting one of the nation's flagship state conglomerates, China Resources. Critics say that the $1.6 billion purchase was vastly overpriced and illegal and that large sums may have been squandered or, as some are claiming, improperly diverted.Leaked documents about the deal, and a court case in Hong Kong, have shed an unusually harsh light on the usually secretive workings of a major state-owned company. The disputed deal raises a stark question: Are China's economy and resources held hostage by privileged state corporations and their executives, who can use influence and gain access to easy credit in ways that undermine long-term growth?The dispute has become a chief exhibit in a debate in China about the wisdom of investing so much of the nation's money in state-owned companies, especially when China's economy has slowed. For the Communist Party leadership, the case distills concerns about the grip that state-owned conglomerates exert.The problems for China Resources began in 2010, when its affiliates as well as a partner state company agreed to pay 9.9 billion renminbi ($1.6 billion) for the three coal mines and related assets, according to documents submitted to a Hong Kong court. The seller was a businessman, Zhang Xinming, a man with a reputation as a swashbuckling gambler, who also gained a 20 percent stake in the new joint venture.The deal appeared to give China Resources a foothold in the coal industry here in Shanxi, the hub of China's coal industry for more than a century and close to the energy-hungry cities and factories on the coast. But the company's monthly business operations statements show that since the mines changed hands in 2010, the mines have not produced any coal."Legally speaking, this was a totally abnormal transaction," said Chen Ruojian, a lawyer with the Duan & Duan law firm in Beijing. Mr. Chen is helping to represent the minority shareholders in Hong Kong, where the subsidiary behind the deal, China Resources Power Holdings, is listed on the stock exchange."It's impossible to understand why they'd do this — pay so much for mines with expired exploration licenses," he said. "State-owned companies have all sorts of problems, but we think it's rare to have something as stark as China Resources."Political unease over the case grew after two Chinese journalists made accusations of corruption about the deal, and one singled out Song Lin, the chairman of the parent conglomerate, China Resources.The Web site of People's Daily, the Communist Party's newspaper, has reported that the party's discipline unit has received an accusation of corruption against Mr. Song and other senior executives at China Resources and is processing the complaint. Mr. Song has not been detained or charged with any wrongdoing, judging from the reports on the company's Web site of his various public appearances. China Resources has denied wrongdoing and has hinted it might take legal action against Chinese journalists who have raised corruption accusations.China Resources "is a major global player," said David Zweig, a specialist in Chinese natural resource companies at the Hong Kong University of Science and Technology. If the claims about the coal mines are proved true, he added, "it would show that these companies can be ripped off or tricked. It doesn't bode well for the globalization or professionalization of these companies."China Resources traces its roots to the days of Mao Zedong's revolution, when it was established in 1938 in Hong Kong to raise money and buy military supplies to support Communist forces.By 2012 it was China's 18th-largest state-owned industrial company by sales, with revenue of $52 billion. Its wide-ranging products include medicine and beer, coal and real estate. Its chairman, Mr. Song, holds the same government rank as a vice minister.The controversy over the coal deal has made China Resources a lightning rod for criticism of all state-owned enterprises, which produce about two-fifths of the nation's economic output.
BEIJING — In a case that drew the attention of millions of Internet users in China, two judges and an official of the Shanghai high court have been expelled from the Communist Party and dismissed from their jobs after being seen on video apparently consorting with prostitutes in nightclubs.A disgruntled businessman compiled the videos from security cameras and from footage he shot while trailing the judges. He then posted the videos as a way of seeking justice for what he considered unfair rulings in a commercial suit, for which he blamed meddling by one of the judges he exposed.The videos circulated on various Web portals for five days before a disciplinary committee in Shanghai for the Communist Party announced the dismissals on Tuesday. According to one estimate, 4.3 million people viewed the images on Youku, China's version of YouTube.The images, which show middle-age men in open-neck white shirts accompanied by young women in short skirts in hotel corridors, and outside a nightclub called Diamond No. 1, tapped into widespread anger at corruption and excessive spending by party officials.China's leader, Xi Jinping, began an anticorruption campaign soon after taking power in November, and party officials have tamed lavish expenditures on banquets, liquor and gifts. But there have been no arrests or demotions of senior officials for financial misconduct. A prominent general, Gu Junshan, was arrested on suspicion of corruption before Mr. Xi assumed office. And Bo Xilai, the former party secretary of Chongqing, is likely to stand trial soon on charges of corruption and abusing power.The uproar about the case was enough that Han Zheng, the Communist Party secretary of Shanghai, issued a statement warning judges and court officials, according to the Web site of the People's Daily newspaper."Although this case involved only a few corrupt and dissolute officials, it has shamed the entire judicial and legal system of Shanghai, and, indeed, the entire city itself," Mr. Han said. "Certain judges have spurned law and discipline, forsaken ethics and morality, and behaved with reckless abandon."The bold disclosure and actions by the businessman, Ni Peiguo, 55, touched a nerve because they showed in lurid detail the behavior of some judges at a time of mounting popular frustration with the court system.The Shanghai Communist Party's Discipline Inspection Committee said Tuesday that the judges and the court official were dismissed after they had "participated in prostitution" during an evening organized by a construction company manager.In all, four officials of the Shanghai judiciary were disciplined. The committee said Chen Xueming, chief judge of the No. 1 Civil Tribunal of Shanghai High People's Court, and Zhao Minghua, deputy chief judge of the tribunal, had been dismissed from the party and their jobs. A member of the discipline committee of the high court, Ni Zhengwen, was also expelled from the party, and his job. Wang Guojun, deputy chief judge of another tribunal at the Shanghai court, was placed on two years' probation.The focus of Ni Peiguo, the businessman, appears to have been Mr. Zhao, whom Mr. Ni suspected of exerting unfair influence over rulings that resulted in a major financial loss for Mr. Ni. One video titled "Shanghai Judges Out Whoring" showing Mr. Zhao and Mr. Chen drew particular attention, according to Legal Weekly, a newspaper produced by the Justice Ministry.The state-run media have trumpeted the scandal, and Legal Weekly approvingly detailed Mr. Ni's persistence in following Mr. Zhao, including to a funeral."From Monday to Thursday, I would go after work, on Saturdays and Sundays, I would mostly wait outside his house," Mr. Ni was quoted as saying.According to Legal Weekly, Mr. Ni said that when he spotted Mr. Zhao taking an elevator with his mistress, he then waited five hours in front of the elevator to see the couple come down.The businessman said he got some of the most incriminating video in June by bribing guards with cigarettes at a Shanghai resort that the three judges and the court official had visited.The disciplinary committee cited that June 9 outing at the Hengshan Resort in the Pudong area of Shanghai, saying the judges and the court officials had patronized prostitutes there. A plaque at the hotel's front desk says, "designated hotel for government and party officials, 2013-2014." The hotel features gyms, saunas and a karaoke bar.A state-run TV station in Anhui Province showed footage from the resort visit, with young women in short dresses walking down a corridor after leaving several rooms. One can be seen shoving money down the front of her dress.In the broadcast, an announcer says the footage "allegedly showed five sexily dressed women entering the rooms of the judges late at night before exiting about half an hour later, with several stuffing money into their bras."After a year of sleuthing, and with the Hengshan Resort video in hand, Mr. Ni told Legal Weekly he decided he had sufficient footage and hired a professional editor to make the production that he posted last week. Some of the video online shows a red circle around Mr. Zhao, making it easier for viewers to identify him.The Global Times, a populist tabloid owned by the newspaper People's Daily, said in an editorial that the Communist Party officials should be banned from nightclubs to protect them from the temptations of prostitutes."To be frank, improving the moral standards of Chinese officials in a short time under the current situation is a difficult task," said the newspaper, which acts as the government's mouthpiece. But there should be "zero tolerance" for such behavior, the editorial said.
BEIJING — Local authorities have detained nine people, including an obstetrician, on suspicion of baby trafficking at a hospital in northwestern China, state media reported.Three government officials and three hospital managers at Fuping County Maternal and Child Health Care in Shaanxi province were also fired over the baby trafficking scandal, the official Xinhua News Agency reported late Friday.Among the detained suspects is Zhang Shuxia, an obstetrician at the hospital who abducted newborns by sometimes falsely claiming the infants were born with congenital problems, it said.Xinhua said police had received 55 reports of child abductions and that Zhang allegedly was involved in 26 of them.It said police had rescued twin baby girls and located a third child, all taken from the Fuping hospital.Despite severe legal punishments, including the death penalty, child trafficking is a big problem in China. It is very profitable for the traffickers, and demand is strong, driven partly by the traditional preference for male heirs, a strict one-child policy and ignorance of the law.
BEIJING — Chinese President Xi Jinping is not serious about fighting corruption and is more intent on maintaining his position than curing the country's "sickness", the most senior official jailed over the 1989 Tiananmen Square protests said on Friday.Bao Tong, the most trusted aide to purged reformist Communist Party chief Zhao Ziyang, characterized the new president as no different from Mao Zedong - the leader who led China into the chaos of the Cultural Revolution.It was Bao's harshest criticism to date of Xi, who many liberals and intellectuals are hoping will emerge as a reformer, like his father, Xi Zhongxun, a liberal-minded former vice premier."I can only see one thing: he has continued suppression," Bao, 80, told Reuters in his apartment in Beijing."Besides that, I can't see what else he wants to do. So I think he probably just wants to do one thing: to maintain his stability, maintain his position."Bao was once a political high-flyer, and as secretary to the Party's all-powerful Politburo Standing Committee held a rank equivalent to a cabinet minister.He was jailed for seven years for his opposition to the decision to send in troops to crush the pro-democracy Tiananmen Square demonstrations in 1989. He remains an outspoken government critic and is kept under close watch.His criticism reflects fading optimism among Chinese intellectuals that Xi will launch political reforms.Xi, who took office in March, has made fighting pervasive corruption a central theme of his administration, warning the problem is so severe it could threaten the party's survival.The party has targeted everything from the use of government cars to liquor served at official banquets, and vowed to spare no one in its efforts to fight graft.But Xi's stability obsessed government has also detained at least 16 activists after they demanded officials disclose their wealth."I think this means he does not want to fight corruption," Bao said of Xi. "Such anti-corruption efforts are just for looking good, for fooling the ordinary people.""If he really wants to fight corruption, why doesn't he dare disclose the assets of officials? Why does he want to arrest citizens who are requesting officials to disclose their assets?"Bao said the president was "taking the road of Mao Zedong"."That is, he's not prepared to solve the problems in China. All he wants to do is put on some make-up. He does not want to treat the sickness, have surgery or take medicine."Few high-level officials have been caught in the dragnet and the party has shown no sign of wanting to set up an independent graft-fighting body that could challenge the party's authority and reveal embarrassing secrets to the public.On Thursday, state media said the party had expelled a former deputy head of the top planning agency and will prosecute him for corruption, following lurid accusations of bribery and sexual impropriety.The trial of one-time high-flying politician Bo Xilai, on charges of corruption and abuse of power, is also expected to start this month as authorities attempt to close the door on China's biggest political scandal in decades.
TAIPEI — A nuclear power plant in Taiwan may have been leaking radioactive water for three years, according to a report published by the government's watchdog, adding to uncertainty over the fate of a new fourth nuclear power plant.The First Nuclear Power Plant, located at Shihmen in a remote northern coastal location but not far from densely populated Taipei, has been leaking toxic water from storage pools of two reactors, said the watchdog, called the Control Yuan.An official of Taiwan Power Co. (Taipower), which operates the island's nuclear power plants, said the water did not come from the storage pools, but may have come from condensation or water used for cleaning up the floor."We have explained to the Control Yuan, but they turned it down. They asked us to look into if other causes were involved," said the official. He declined to be identified as the matter is sensitive.In any case, the water has been collected in a reservoir next to the storage pools used for spent nuclear rods and has been recycled back into the storage pools, and so poses no threat to the environment, the official added.The Control Yuan said there had been a catalogue of errors, including a lack of a proper plan for how to handle spent nuclear materials, and did not believe the explanations from Taipower."The company has yet to clearly establish the reason for the water leak," it said.The use of nuclear power on resource-poor Taiwan has long been controversial, not least because the island is comparatively small and any major nuclear accident would likely affect its entire land area.Plans to build a fourth nuclear plant - located close to the one at Shihmen - have been held up for years, and have been subject to mass protests on the streets of the island.Scuffles broke out between legislators at a parliamentary debate on the plant this week.Currently, Taiwan has three operational nuclear power plants and six reactors.Taiwan has also had problems on what to do with its nuclear waste, which for many years was dumped on a small island off its southeast coast, to the anger of its aboriginal inhabitants.Taiwan has previously considered sending its nuclear waste to the Pacific Ocean state of the Marshall Islands and even North Korea.
HONG KONG — China's trade rebounded in July in a possible sign that its economy is stabilizing after a slowdown over the last year.The improvement offers small but encouraging hope for China's leaders, who are struggling to arrest a downturn that dragged growth to a two-decade low in the latest quarter.China's exports rose 5.1 percent in July from a year earlier and imports were up 10.9 percent, according to customs data. China is the world's second-largest economy, after the United States.Economists had expected trade to grow after it shrank in June, but the rate of growth surpassed expectations.Economists said the surge in imports suggested that domestic demand was holding up, a major goal for China's policy makers, who are trying to reduce the economy's dependence on trade and investment in favor of more self-sustaining domestic consumption.Imports of iron ore, an important commodity used to make steel, surged 24 percent by volume, while copper imports grew 12 percent. Both figures were the fastest rates in more than a year, said Yao Wei, China economist at Société Générale.She said the return to growth was a sign of "some stabilization in external demand, at best — not yet a solid recovery."Analysts said the figures were a sign of improvement but cautioned about reading too much into a single set of numbers."July seems to reflect a return to a normal, relatively uninspiring trend after a weak June, rather than the beginning of acceleration in growth," said Alistair Chan, an economist at Moody's Analytics. "While the worst seems to be over, the upturn will be relatively flat."Chinese leaders are facing pressure to meet a goal of 7.5 percent growth for the year, which is far stronger than the forecasts for the United States, Europe and Japan, but would be the country's weakest performance since 1991.Exports to the United States, China's biggest foreign market, edged up 2.3 percent, leaving a trade surplus of $19.1 billion. Exports to the 27-nation European Union shrank 2.8 percent, for a trade gap of $10 billion.
BEIJING — Surprisingly strong rebounds in China's exports and imports in July offered some hope that the economy might be stabilizing, government data showed Thursday, after more than two years of slowing growth, although an imminent rebound still looks improbable.Data from the Customs Administration showed exports had risen 5.1 percent in July from the same month last year. Analysts had expected a 3 percent rise. It was a sharp turnaround from June, when exports had declined for the first time in 17 months.Exports to the United States rose at an annual rate of 5.3 percent and those to Europe were up 2.8 percent, as China's two biggest markets posted their strongest gains since February. Shipments to Southeast Asia were also up.Imports fared even better, with a 10.9 percent jump from a year earlier, more than five times what analysts had forecast. The surprising strength in imports left China with a smaller-than-expected trade surplus of $17.8 billion."July seems to reflect a return to a 'normal,' relatively uninspiring trend," analysts from Moody's said in a note. "In other words, while the worst seems to be over, the upturn will be relatively flat." Exports in the three months ended July 31 posted the slowest annual increase since October 2009, a Reuters calculation showed.Imports of crude oil and iron ore rebounded from multimonth lows to record highs last month, as more raw materials were shipped in to rebuild depleted stocks, and soybean purchases hit a record for a second month.A steadying of the economy would be a relief to China's leaders, who have scrambled to shore up growth in the past couple of months. There had been concerns that a sharp slowdown could derail their attempts to shift the economy to being driven more by consumption than debt-funded investment and manufacturing.Asian stocks rebounded on the data on hopes that Chinese demand might have found a floor.China's trade performance has whipsawed this year after figures were inflated by companies reporting fake deals to disguise illicit cash transfers, and then subsequently deflated by the government as it quashed the fictitious transactions.Analysts said the July data probably had minimal distortions, but some cautioned against concluding that the upbeat performance had been driven by an actual improvement in final demand.Commodity imports rose sharply last month, with iron ore purchases jumping 17 percent from June. Some commodity analysts said July shipments may have been inflated by unprocessed deals from June."I would think it has something to do with the fact that the June number was low and there was some catch-up tonnage coming through," said Graeme Train, analyst with Macquarie in Shanghai.Soy imports also hit a record high for the second straight month, though again analysts said that was partly due to delayed shipments finally arriving from congested Brazilian ports.Crude oil imports, on the other hand, were likely lifted by refiners replenishing stocks after a three-month lull and as some new refineries started business."The monthly data is very volatile. I wouldn't read too much into it and say that domestic demand is strong," said Zhang Zhiwei, an economist at Nomura in Hong Kong.Exports to the United States rose an annual 5.3 percent and those to Europe were up 2.8 percent, as China's two biggest markets posted their strongest gains since February. Shipments to southeast Asia were also up on the year.With the United States economy showing signs of a gradual recovery, Ting Lu, an economist at Bank of America-Merrill Lynch, said Chinese exporters could benefit further in coming months.The trade figures were seen as a positive sign for industrial output data on Friday, with economists expecting production to show an annual rise of 9 percent in July.Fixed asset investment is forecast to have risen 20 percent in the first seven months of the year, in line with growth in the first six months, while inflation is forecast to have quickened to a five-month high of 2.8 percent.Top leaders in Beijing have made clear they will accept a slowdown in growth as they restructure the Chinese economy, but have indicated that annual growth should not be allowed to slip below 7 percent.The economy has slowed in nine of the past 10 quarters, but the government has stressed it is confident of meeting its 7.5 percent growth target this year — the lowest in 23 years.
BEIJING — A prominent Chinese rights advocate who was detained last month has spoken out in a video shot from behind bars at a detention center in Beijing, urging citizens to stand up against the government and turn their rights into reality.The unusual act of defiance by the advocate, Xu Zhiyong, was available for viewing on a number of Web sites Thursday, including YouTube and Voice of America, after being disseminated by his supporters.Handcuffed and wearing a neon orange jail vest, Mr. Xu, 40, spoke in the video for just over a minute to an unidentified visitor."I propose that we all act as citizens, upstanding citizens, and exercise the rights of citizens under the Constitution," he said. "No matter what becomes of this society, however crushed or absurd, this country needs a group of brave citizens to stand up and abide by their convictions, turning their rights, responsibility and dreams into reality."A Chinese journalist, Chen Min, who has led efforts to secure Mr. Xu's release, said the video was made on Aug. 1 but declined to say who made it. Mr. Xu's lawyer, Liu Weiguo, did not answer calls to his cellphone.A lawyer with a decade-long record of using litigation, petitions and publicity to seek broader political rights, Mr. Xu was among a number of dissidents whose cases were raised by the State Department at the annual United States-China Human Rights Dialogue held in China last week.After three days of talks, the acting assistant secretary for human rights, Uzra Zeya, said that the United States believed there was "a deterioration in the overall human rights situation in China," including a pattern of arrests and extralegal detentions of public-interest lawyers like Mr. Xu. Mr. Xu was the first name on a list of eight people that Ms. Zeya said she had discussed with the Chinese authorities.Mr. Xu was arrested on July 16 on charges of "assembling a crowd to disrupt order in a public place." He had been under informal house detention for more than three months.Mr. Liu, his lawyer, has said the charges are a baseless effort to silence Mr. Xu, who had been encouraging people to join the New Citizens' Movement, a newly formed group that has demanded that government officials publicly declare their assets.The Chinese leader, Xi Jinping, started an anticorruption campaign after assuming office in November. But Mr. Xu's push to organize citizens around corruption, a sensitive issue for the Communist Party, appears to have pushed the government's limits. His detention has made him the focus of a deepening confrontation between activists and the Communist Party authorities.Under Chinese law, the government has a little more than a month after Mr. Xu's arrest to formally charge him. Another legal advocate, Teng Biao, a friend of Mr. Xu, said it was likely that Mr. Xu would be convicted, which could result in a prison sentence of up to seven years."Xu Zhiyong has many supporters across the country," Mr. Teng said in a telephone interview from northeast China, where he was traveling. "If he is convicted, that will be a huge blow" to activists.Appearing tired and haggard but speaking with steady conviction, Mr. Xu said in the video that the charges against him were really about his push to abolish discriminatory barriers against schoolchildren from rural areas and calling for public disclosure of officials' wealth.In the video, Mr. Xu suggested that he was willing to face imprisonment."Social progress always demands that someone pays a price," he said. "I am willing to pay all it takes for freedom, the public good, love and faith."The video of Mr. Xu was largely blocked in China, where censors heavily monitor Web sites and people are prevented from seeing banned sites based abroad unless they have access to technology that can outsmart censorship barriers. The footage appeared, at least briefly, on Youku, a Chinese video-sharing site.Officials at the detention center in Beijing where Mr. Xu's lawyer and friends earlier said he was being held refused to say whether he remained there.Mr. Xu won nationwide attention in 2003 as an advocate for the family of Sun Zhigang, a young man beaten to death in a detention center for vagrants and rural migrants without the right official documents. The case provoked an outcry against arbitrary detention in those centers, which the government soon abolished.In his statement from the detention center, Mr. Xu renewed his call for citizen activism."I am proud to have the word citizen put before my name, and I hope that everyone will do the same and put citizen before their names," he said. "We will certainly be able to build a free, public-spirited, loving and beautiful China, as long as we are united and strive together, and make real our rights as citizens."
HONG KONG — China's economy faces major structural challenges in the coming years, but for now, the slowdown of the recent past may have bottomed out.A new batch of economic data released Friday provided additional signs of buoyancy in an economy that has been weighed down by lackluster international demand. The Chinese government has also taken a tough-love approach, eager to wean the country from its reliance on exports and cheap credit.Industrial output growth, which had been languishing around 9 percent for the past few months, jumped to 9.7 percent in July, the National Bureau of Statistics reported. The figure easily beat expectations for a rise of 9 percent, and helped support tentative signs that conditions in the country's manufacturing sector were starting to show a moderate improvement.Retail sales grew 13.2 percent from a year earlier, slightly less than the 13.5 percent that analysts polled by Reuters had expected, but in line with the performance of the past few months.And investment in fixed assets, like buildings and machinery, in urban areas also was in line with expectations, growing 20.1 percent in the first seven months of this year.Together with unexpectedly solid import and export data released Thursday, this week's data appeared to show that the Chinese economy has stabilized, at least for now, and prompted some analysts to project a modest pickup in the coming months.''The better-than-expected July activity data has largely dampened the concern of a hard landing of China's economy,'' economists at Australia and New Zealand Banking Group wrote in a note. It suggests that China's economy ''is bottoming out.''China had been gradually losing steam for many months as it left behind the supercharged growth that turned it into the world's second-largest economy, after the United States. Economic growth is likely to come in at about 7.5 percent this year, a far cry from the double-digit annual increases the country enjoyed for much of the past three decades.Still, the data for July appeared to indicate that some of the recent drags on growth have eased.Export demand from the West has improved as the United States and other economies have gained momentum. And domestically, the authorities in Beijing have clarified in recent weeks that while they are prepared to tolerate slower growth, they will also step in to prevent growth from slowing too rapidly.Beijing has also announced a string of small-scale measures aimed at propping up activity — tax cuts for small businesses, for example, and measures aimed at speeding up railroad construction in inland and poor areas.The improved policy clarity and support measures appear to have encouraged the increased activity, especially in the private sector, said Stephen Schwartz, chief economist for Asia at the Spanish bank BBVA in Hong Kong.The latest reports on Friday "gives us more confidence in our forecast that growth will stabilize in the third quarter, and pick up gradually in the fourth quarter," Mr. Schwartz said. However, like many other analysts, he said that the outlook for next year and beyond remained uncertain as China battles with the tough overhauls that are needed as the country tries to shift toward more efficient, balanced and sustainable growth.Economic turmoil in the West and rising wages at home have undermined the export growth that formed the bedrock of China's growth for decades. The fact that China's population is aging and its labor force is shrinking means there is an urgent need to raise labor productivity and reduce the inefficiencies and misallocations of capital that have marred growth for years. And overcapacity, corruption and poor allocation of assets continue to affect growth.Inflation figures released Friday underlined the challenges facing many industries. While consumer price inflation remained muted in July, at 2.7 percent, the price of goods as they leave the factory gate fell 2.3 percent from a year ago, continuing a decline that has lasted for more than a year.Beijing has sought to rein in credit in a bid to tackle the flow of easy money that fueled growth in recent years, but that has generated worries about asset quality and potentially destabilizing defaults further down the line.These challenges will weigh on China for years, prompting some analysts to warn — despite the apparent stabilization in July — that growth will slow to well below the current official target of 7.5 percent.''While we believe the government could delay sub-7 percent growth into 2014, we do not believe it can be avoided,'' Zhang Zhiwei, China economist at Nomura, wrote in a note, adding that he believed the government was likely to cut its growth target for next year to 7 percent.''Leverage in the economy remains high, and many industries continue to face overcapacity problems,'' Mr. Zhang said. ''The resolution of these problems will inevitably require a period of constructive destruction — expect some bankruptcy cases.''
BEIJING — A medicine mogul spent six years building his own private mountain peak and luxury villa atop a high-rise apartment block in China's capital, earning the unofficial title of "most outrageous illegal structure." Now, authorities are giving him 15 days to tear it down.The craggy complex of rooms, rocks, trees and bushes looming over the 26-story building looks like something built into a seaside cliff, and has become the latest symbol of disregard for the law among the rich as well as the rampant practice of building illegal additions.Angry neighbors say they've complained for years that the unauthorized, 800-square-meter (8,600-sq. feet) mansion and its attached landscaping was damaging the building's structural integrity and its pipe system, but that local authorities failed to crack down. They've also complained about loud, late-night parties."They've been renovating for years. They normally do it at night," said a resident on the building's 25th floor, who added that any attempts to reason with the owner were met with indifference. "He was very arrogant. He could care less about my complaints," said the neighbor, who declined to give his name to avoid repercussions.Haidian district urban management official Dai Jun said Tuesday that authorities would tear the two-story structure down in 15 days unless the owner does so himself or presents evidence it was legally built. Dai said his office has yet to receive such evidence.The villa's owner has been identified as the head of a traditional Chinese medicine business and former member of the district's political advisory body who resides on the building's 26th floor. Contacted by Beijing Times newspaper, the man said he would comply with the district's orders, but he belittled attempts to call the structure a villa, calling it "just an ornamental garden."Authorities took action only after photos of the villa were splashed across Chinese media on Monday. Newspapers have fronted their editions with large photographs of the complex, along with the headline "Beijing's most outrageous illegal structure."The case has resonance among ordinary Chinese who regularly see the rich and politically connected receive special treatment. Expensive vehicles lacking license plates are a common sight, while luxury housing complexes that surround Beijing and other cities are often built on land appropriated from farmers with little compensation.China's leader Xi Jinping has vowed to crack down on official corruption, and Beijing itself launched a campaign earlier this year to demolish illegal structures, although the results remain unclear.Demand for property remains high, however, and the rooftop extralegal mansion construction is far from unique. A developer in the central city of Hengyang recently got into hot water over an illegally built complex of 25 villas on top of a shopping center. He later won permission to keep the villas intact as long as they weren't sold to others.While all land in China technically belongs to the state — with homebuyers merely given 70-year leases — the rules are often vague, leaving questions of usage rights and ownership murky.A city in Sichuan province recently caused a minor stir when it was discovered to have cut the length of land leases from the normal 70 years to just 40 years.The local government's response to public queries drew even more jeers. Officials posted a statement online maintaining that the law allows for lease periods of less than 70 years and adding: "Who knows if we'll still be in this world in 40 years. Don't think too long-term."
WASHINGTON — Work to refinish part of the Martin Luther King Jr. Memorial where a disputed inscription was recently removed may not be done until after the 50th anniversary of the March on Washington.Executive architect Ed Jackson Jr. told The Associated Press on Monday that a disagreement arose over the past 10 days over how to sandblast and refinish the stone where an inscription was recently chiseled away.The side of the memorial's "Stone of Hope" has been left unfinished because the main contractor, Worcester Eisenbrandt Inc. of Baltimore, doesn't have insurance to complete the sandblasting with steel pellets, the way it was originally created, Jackson said.There are color differences now where words were removed, and a slight yellow stain was left on the stone Friday when workers tried an alternate process using walnut shells to blast the stone."It looks unfinished," Jackson said. "The artist is furious about leaving his work unfinished."Sculptor Lei Yixin, who created the memorial, traveled from China to do the corrective work and plans to return home Aug. 20.Lei told AP that sandblasting was always a crucial piece of the project, and he did not know how it was left out of the National Park Service's contract."All we have done is kind of physical damage to the sculpture because we chiseled the inscription out," Lei said through his son, Ke Shi, who interpreted. "The sandblasting is a way to restore the damaged surface to make those damaged surfaces look uniform with the rest of it."National Park Service spokeswoman Carol Johnson said officials agree the work must be done, but it may have to be part of a new contract because of government rules.The project may have to stop for the 50th anniversary of the March on Washington on Aug. 28 when commemorative events are expected to draw big crowds. Scaffolding would be taken down around the monument, and work would resume later, she said."We are committed to going forward in the way Master Lei wants to go forward," Johnson said. "It's just a question of what's the best way and the quickest way to get this done."It was not clear how the sandblasting process that was used to create the memorial more than two years ago was left out of the contract.Jackson said part of the problem was there was never full agreement with the National Park Service on the process outlined by Lei. He said the foundation that built the memorial felt the park service was choosing the wrong contractor to remove the disputed inscription.The Park Service said the project requirements were not clear."We certainly didn't know that this is what was going to be necessary until the process had already started," Johnson said. "Otherwise it would have been in the contract."The agency is still working to finish the project before Lei leaves for China, Johnson said. It is seeking approval to have the work done by the agency's Historic Preservation Training Center, "under the watchful eye of Master Lei," she said.That could allow the project to be completed before the 50th anniversary of King's "I Have a Dream" speech.On Monday, the work site was quiet. Scaffolding wrapped by a white material covered both sides of King's statue, including the area where the inscription was removed.The now-removed inscription was a paraphrase from King's "Drum Major" speech. It read, "I was a drum major for justice, peace and righteousness."Critics, including the poet Maya Angelou, argued the quotation was taken out of context when it was paraphrased and shortened. Angelou said it made King sound arrogant.Associated Press writer Jessica Gresko contributed to this report.
BEIJING — Chinese authorities have begun an investigation of the French drug maker Sanofi after a news report that accused the company of bribing hundreds of Chinese doctors in 2007.The state-owned 21st Century Business Herald in Guangzhou, citing an unidentified person, reported that the French company paid 503 doctors a total of $274,000 to prescribe Sanofi products, disguising the payments as grants for research programs.China's official Xinhua News Agency said on Saturday that the Beijing municipal health bureau was teaming up with disciplinary authorities to look into the research programs and determine whether the payments were actually bribes.Sanofi did not immediately respond to a request for comment.According to the 21st Century Business Herald report, Sanofi said it took the claim "very seriously" and had started to investigate the allegations.The investigation of Sanofi comes as China's drug regulator has started a crackdown on misconduct in the country's pharmaceutical market.Chinese police detained four employees of the British drug maker GlaxoSmithKline in July on suspicion of paying bribes to doctors and hospitals to encourage them to prescribe drugs.In China's dysfunctional health system, low salaries and skimpy budgets drive doctors, nurses and administrators to make ends meet by accepting money from patients, drug suppliers and others. The practice has long been common knowledge.The Chinese cabinet's planning agency has also announced that it is investigating production costs at 60 Chinese and foreign pharmaceutical manufacturers.
BEIJING — A typhoon that had shut down business in the financial center of Hong Kong and sunk a cargo ship weakened into a tropical storm as it churned through southern China on Thursday.Packing high winds and torrential rain, Typhoon Utor had forced the closure of schools, offices, shopping centers and construction sites in cities along its path northwest across Guangdong province.Yet only minor damage was reported, a result, state media said, of strict adherence to orders to confine tens of thousands of fishing boats to port and evacuate vulnerable people to shelters.Thousands of travelers were stranded by the suspension of flights and ferry services, but no deaths or injuries were attributed to the storm.By Thursday morning, the force of the storm had weakened considerably, with sustained winds at its center falling to speeds of 85 kph (53 mph) as it headed northwest through Guangxi province, about 350 kilometers (215 miles) west of Hong Kong.Life returned to normal in Hong Kong Thursday, a day after offices, schools and courts were shut and the stock market halted trading, bringing an eerie calm to the normally busy southern Chinese commercial hub.Flights had been canceled and ferry services curtailed while helicopter search and rescue teams from Hong Kong and Guangdong province rescued 21 crew members from a bulk carrier transporting nickel ore before it sank in waters southwest of Hong KongUtor was the world's strongest typhoon of the year before it crossed the Philippines earlier this week, leaving at least eight people dead.Associated Press writers Kelvin Chan in Hong Kong and Hrvoje Hranjski in Manila, Philippines, contributed to this report.
HONG KONG — Typhoon Utor veered closer to Hong Kong and China's southern coastline on Wednesday after leaving a trail of destruction in the Philippines, where at least six people died.The weather observatory in the international financial hub was poised to raise its No. 8 tropical cyclone signal early on Wednesday morning, its third highest alert level.Heavy rain and winds of up to 122 km per hour (76 mph) were recorded in parts of Hong Kong, with a number of flights canceled at the city's international airport.While financial markets, schools, businesses and non-essential government services close when any No. 8 or above signal is hoisted, the cyclone was not expected to hit Hong Kong directly, but to stray towards the western fringes of China's Guangdong province, nearer to Macau and the island of Hainan.Should the No. 8 signal remain hoisted until 9 a.m. on Wednesday (0100 GMT), the Hong Kong stock exchange will remain closed for at least part of the day.As of late Tuesday, more than 3,000 passengers were stranded at Sanya and Haikou airports on Hainan, according to China's official Xinhua news agency.Some train and shipping services were also suspended, with waves of over 10 meters (32 feet) expected in some coastal zones.Utor was the worst typhoon to hit the Philippines this year, displacing over 30,000 families as it caused landslides and floods and disrupted power and communications links.
BEIJING — The family of a British businessman who was murdered by the wife of an influential Chinese politician is seeking compensation from his killer, a lawyer said Tuesday.Beijing attorney Li Xiaolin said lawyers representing Neil Heywood's family had met with lawyers for Gu Kailai, the jailed wife of the former Communist Party leader in the megacity of Chongqing, to ask for compensation.The spokesman for the British Embassy, John Gallagher, said British officials had repeatedly raised the issue of compensation for the Heywood family with China's Foreign Ministry."We made the Chinese authorities aware of the family's concerns on the compensation issue on several occasions since the trial, most recently twice during July 2013," Gallagher said.Heywood's murder was at the center of China's most embarrassing political scandal in decades, with Gu's husband, Bo Xilai, dismissed from his post as Chongqing party chief and stripped of other political positions.Bo is awaiting trial on charges of corruption and abuse of power that appear limited in scope to secure his cooperation and minimize damage to the Communist Party's image.Bo has been appointed two lawyers from a firm with close government ties. Another lawyer Gu Yushu, said one of Bo's sisters, Bo Jieying, sought to add him to her brother's legal team, but the request was rejected late last week.Gu said that Bo Jieying was hoping to attend the trial, but that it was unclear whether she would be able to do so. Bo Jieying has not spoken directly to the media and could not be reached for comment.Last year, Gu was given a suspended death sentence after confessing to poisoning Heywood with cyanide.Heywood's mother, Ann Heywood, issued a statement through The Wall Street Journal on Sunday saying that she was worried about the financial well-being of Heywood's two children, aged 8 and 12. She said Chinese authorities had not been responsive."Given the circumstances of Neil's murder, I have been surprised and disappointed that, despite repeated discreet approaches to the Chinese authorities, there has been no substantive or practical response," Heywood wrote.Li, the attorney, said that while he did not officially represent the Gu family, he served as an informal legal adviser to Gu's mother. At the time of Gu's trial, Li was representing Gu's household aide, who was accused of abetting the crime.He said that the Heywood family was seeking 30 million to 50 million yuan ($5 million to $8 million) in compensation, but that no outcome was in sight because it was unclear how much money Gu had. "While she's locked up in prison, how much assets she has is unknown," Li said. "If a person is to repay a debt, they must first have money to pay."He Zhengsheng, a Beijing lawyer representing the Heywood family, declined to comment, saying it was not the appropriate time to do so.China's Foreign Ministry had no response to a faxed request for comment.
BEIJING — The wife and the mother of Neil Heywood, the British businessman whose mysterious death in China set off the downfall of a senior Communist Party official last year, have pressed for compensation over what the Chinese authorities had determined was a murder, according to people with knowledge of the case.Family members of Mr. Heywood began pressing for compensation months ago from the family of Gu Kailai, the wife of the Chinese official, said one person with knowledge of the matter, who spoke on the condition of anonymity because of the delicate politics of the case.Ms. Gu was convicted last year of poisoning Mr. Heywood in November 2011 in a hotel in the municipality of Chongqing, a region of 30 million in southwest China that was governed by Ms. Gu's husband, Bo Xilai. Ms. Gu was given a suspended life sentence, which generally equates to life in prison. The trial of Mr. Bo on charges of bribetaking, corruption and abuse of power is expected to start soon.Officials at the British Embassy in Beijing discussed the Heywood family's concerns with Chinese Foreign Ministry officials twice in July, an embassy spokesman said Tuesday.There is no sign that the Gu family intends to pay any compensation. It is unclear how much money in assets, cash or investments Ms. Gu herself owned.Mr. Heywood's mother, Ann Heywood, released a statement to The Wall Street Journal on Sunday in which she said her "overriding concern has been for the security and well-being of Neil's two children," who live with Mr. Heywood's widow, Wang Lulu, in Beijing."Now aged just 8 and 12, the children are particularly vulnerable to the hurt and horror of their father's murder and, since Neil was the family's sole breadwinner, to uncertainty and insecurity, there being no financial provision for their future," she said.Ann Heywood said the Chinese authorities had ignored repeated entreaties from the family for compensation. "I hope and trust that the leaders of this great nation, which Neil loved and respected, will now show decisiveness and compassion, so as to mitigate the consequences of a terrible crime and to enable my family finally to achieve some kind of closure to our ongoing nightmare," she said.One person with knowledge of the case said the Heywood family members could have sought to attach a civil suit demanding compensation to the criminal case against Ms. Gu. But they failed to do so, and so the judges making the decision in the criminal case did not consider asking Ms. Gu or her family to pay compensation, said the person. Ms. Gu's trial ended last August.Mr. Heywood's family members still have the option of filing a separate civil suit against Ms. Gu or her family. Ms. Wang, the wife of Mr. Heywood, could not be reached for comment. She has refused to talk to reporters since the murder scandal first emerged in March 2012.Officials announced indictments against Mr. Bo on July 25. The trial is expected to take place in Jinan, capital of Shandong Province. Mr. Bo was removed from his post in Chongqing in March 2012 and expelled from the party in September; he had a seat on the 25-member Politburo.
HONG KONG — A court in restive western China on Monday sentenced two members of the Uighur ethnic minority to death and gave prison sentences to three others for what the authorities called a "terror attack" that killed 15 people, state news media reported.The court in Kashgar, in the Xinjiang region, said the charges against the five men included committing intentional homicide, making illegal explosives, and organizing and leading a "terror group," said Tianshan, the official regional news Web site.The Chinese government has begun a drive to reinforce control in Xinjiang after a succession of deadly confrontations pitting the authorities against members of the Uighur population. Uighurs are a largely Muslim, Turkic-speaking group, and many resent Communist Party controls and the growing presence of Han Chinese people in Xinjiang.The bloodshed that brought the convictions broke out in April in a village near the historic bazaar town of Kashgar. At the time, state news media called the perpetrators "gangsters." The court gave a different account, describing the accused as militants inspired by extremist literature and broadcasts from abroad.The five defendants and other accomplices "printed a large number of reactionary books promoting religious extremism and violent terror, and purchased supplies to undertake training in capabilities to undertake terror," said the Tianshan report, citing the court verdict.In April, community watch workers came across a room used by the defendants and their associates and reported their suspicions to the police. Fearing exposure, the men used machetes and axes to attack the community workers and police officers.Three community workers were killed in the attack, and nine police officers and community workers later died after being herded into a house that the militants then burned down, the report said. Three other people were killed as the militants attacked shops and the police, the report said. Six militants were killed during the confrontation, and another died after being captured.International human rights groups and advocates of Uighur self-determination say the Chinese government denies Uighurs opportunities for peacefully expressing their demands, and mischaracterizes local outbursts of violence as acts of concerted terrorism orchestrated from abroad.In June, a confrontation at a police station and government offices in Turpan Prefecture, in Xinjiang, left 35 dead, including 11 rioters shot by the police. That month, state news media also reported on a confrontation in Hotan Prefecture, but details have been scant and contradictory.The prison sentences announced on Monday ranged from nine years to life. The report said the defendants had confessed, but it did not say whether any would appeal. China's Communist Party-run courts rarely find in favor of defendants or overturn convictions on appeal.The death penalties and accusations of concerted terrorism are in keeping with the unyielding stance that the Chinese government has taken in Xinjiang. Tensions in Xinjiang have remained high since July 2009, when Uighur rioters attacked Han Chinese residents in the regional capital, Urumqi, leaving almost 200 people dead."We must be resolute to win this hard battle against terror and for stability," Zhang Chunxian, the Communist Party secretary of Xinjiang, said in a speech published last week.Advocates of Uighur self-rule say the Chinese government's security campaign and controls on religious life in Xinjiang are exacerbating ethnic tensions, rather than relieving them.
BEIJING — Chinese consumers are responding to a powerful new marketing tactic that plays to a widespread fear of food contamination: the promise of safe groceries sold online.With pledges to supply produce directly from the farm, vendors have found that food is becoming one of the fastest-growing segments of Internet retailing. They are benefiting from scares about products like cadmium-tainted rice and recycled cooking oil.The trend is adding momentum to a Chinese online retail boom driven by a rapidly expanding middle class, with companies like Cofco, one of China's top food processors and traders, and S.F. Express, a leading shipping company, betting that a segment of a population of 1.3 billion will pay for the peace of mind they say their services offer."I think people are willing to pay a higher premium than in the West. In other markets, like the U.K., food e-commerce is about convenience. Here, there's going to be a higher quality and safety premium," said Chen Yougang, a partner in Shanghai at the consulting firm McKinsey & Co.But convincing some skeptical Chinese consumers about food quality will remain a battle. Zhang Lei, a mother of one who lives in Shanghai, expressed doubts about some products being touted as organic."Everyone knows that in China, organic is not the real thing," Ms. Zhang said.Nonetheless, total online sales of fresh produce in China could rocket to 40 billion renminbi, or $6.5 billion, in five years, from about 11.5 billion renminbi in sales this year, said Zhou Wen Quan, a senior analyst at the Beijing Orient Agribusiness Consultant firm.The research firm Euromonitor International has more modest expectations, but still sees growth comfortably beating major overseas markets. It looks at volume rather than the value of online purchases of fresh food, with the Chinese market expected to grow about 8 percent by 2017, from 660 million tons this year. In comparison, the U.S. market is expected to grow about 5 percent, from 75 million tons.So far, most food sold on China's largest online shopping sites, like Yihaodian — majority-owned by Wal-Mart Stores Inc. — and Jingdong Mall, has been packaged items or fruit with a relatively long shelf-life.But new businesses are focusing on fresh and premium produce, using the Internet to focus on higher-income consumers. Supermarkets typically serve a broader customer base, analysts say."The vegetables are really fresh," said a Beijing resident, Lei Na, who had shopped on Web sites like Womai.com, owned by Cofco. "Supermarket food doesn't look that fresh, especially if you only get there in the evening."The S.F. Express group introduced a program last year that offers a range of food to about 500,000 consumers. About 70 percent of the food is imported products like wine and milk powder, but the company also sells local seafood, meat and vegetables."We go directly to the farms to pick the produce, and then using our own logistics, deliver straight to the consumer," said Yang Jun, director of sales and marketing at S.F. Express. "So from the tree to the consumer's dining table, we'll remove all the sectors in between."Convincing customers they can meet promises on food safety is crucial for online retailers."If I'm busy I use Web sites. But if I have time, I prefer to drive to the supermarket and choose vegetables myself," said Ms. Zhang in Shanghai.But vendors say cutting out middlemen increases freshness and makes food more traceable, while packaging barcodes that can be read by smartphones help consumers verify the origins of items.And online retailers go to some lengths to describe their products on their Web sites. Customers looking at free-range chickens on the Benlai Shenghuo Web site — a 2012 start-up whose name roughly translates as "original life" — can get details on the breed they are selecting and its diet, along with photographs of the birds wandering on farms.Online customer reviews and ratings are also important in convincing buyers of quality, said Chen Liang, a senior research expert at Alibaba, the company that owns one of China's largest online marketplaces, Taobao. With 10 million users per minute, Taobao has ridden the e-commerce boom in China, with customers moving from nonessential items, like books and electronics, to clothes and recently food. Its sales of meat, seafood, fruit and vegetables grew 42 percent last year to nearly 1.3 billion renminbi."Before, people thought the Internet wasn't suitable for selling clothes. But now it's the most suitable channel. I think food will follow this trend," Mr. Chen said.Another major challenge facing e-commerce food companies is the cost of developing nationwide cold chain logistics, with Mr. Chen of McKinsey suggesting that industry players should work together to connect suppliers with a network of cold-storage facilities.But with the many recent food scandals in China — products from the New Zealand dairy exporter Fonterra have just been recalled from Chinese shelves — companies are confident they can overcome hurdles in the market."During the bird flu outbreak, our chicken sales exploded," said Steve Liang, founder and chief executive of the Shanghai-based online retailer Fields, referring to a new strain of the virus discovered in February that killed more than 40 people in China and Taiwan.
HONG KONG — A typhoon struck the south coast of China on Wednesday, forcing airlines to cancel flights and halting stock exchange trading in the financial center of Hong Kong after leaving a trail of destruction in the Philippines.The Hong Kong weather observatory raised its No. 8 tropical cyclone signal early in the day, its third highest alert, but had lowered it by the afternoon as Typhoon Utor moved inland west of the territory.Heavy rains and gale force winds lashed Hong Kong and uprooted trees, with heavy disruptions to shipping services and flights. Markets, schools and businesses closed for the day.China's State Oceanic Administration issued a first-level emergency response late on Tuesday and fishing boats and other vessels were called back to port in western Guangdong.Nearly 200 workers were rescued from an artificial island on the Hong Kong-Zhuhai-Macao Bridge as conditions deteriorated, local police said.On the tropical resort island of Hainan, west of the storm's path, 27,000 boats returned to port while more than 98,000 people were evacuated from low-lying areas, the official Xinhua news agency reported.As of late Tuesday, over 3,000 passengers were stranded at Sanya and Haikou airports on Hainan. Some train and shipping services were also suspended, with waves of over 10 meters (32 feet) expected in some coastal zones.Utor was the worst typhoon to hit the Philippines this year, killing six people and displacing over 30,000 families as it caused landslides and floods and disrupted power and communications links.Cyclones are common at this time of year in the South China Sea, picking up strength from the warm waters and dissipating over land.
Constructed with ersatz boulders, crisscrossed by trellises and walkways and dotted with the occasional shrub, the two-story aerie resembles the idealized mountains depicted in classical Chinese paintings — except the requisite lonely monk of yore has been replaced by a flashy karaoke parlor.The entire 8,000-square-foot addition, as it turns out, is illegal. On Monday, The Beijing Morning Post featured a front-page photograph of Mr. Zhang's garish rooftop expansion, along with disturbing accounts of how the well-connected entrepreneur blithely ignored his neighbors' complaints during the six years he spent creating his craggy villa atop a luxury gated complex in western Beijing.Residents were so tortured by the din of nonstop construction — and the resulting leaks and cracked walls — that several of them sold their apartments and moved out. One next-door neighbor was reportedly beaten up after he confronted Mr. Zhang about the project, which is said to have cost more than $4 million.The story, zealously covered by much of the Chinese news media on Tuesday, seemed to embody the popular perception that the rich and powerful can simply do as they please. According to news reports, Mr. Zhang amassed a fortune through a chain of traditional Chinese medicine clinics he owned, or through private acupuncture sessions he provided. Disciples claimed that Mr. Zhang could cure chronic neck pain or even cancer.Until recently, he was a local delegate to the Chinese People's Political Consultative Conference, an advisory body to the ruling Communist Party.And as Mr. Zhang thumbed his nose at his complaining neighbors, he suggested that he had friends in high places, according to The Beijing Morning Post. He also brushed off gripes about the late-night warbling that emanated from his karaoke studio by boasting about the stature of the singers. "I'm not afraid of the complaints," he reportedly told a property management employee. "And you can't stop famous people from singing when they come here."Code enforcement officials said they had been stymied by Mr. Zhang's refusal to let them through the door of his apartment. The deputy head of the Purple Bamboo Park urban management district said that he had even sent inspectors to the building's underground parking garage but that Mr. Zhang had managed to evade them."If we can't calculate the scope of this illegal construction, we can't issue a notice requiring him to dismantle it," the official told the newspaper.By Tuesday, however, officials had slapped a notice on Mr. Zhang's front door, giving him 15 days to remove the addition or present evidence that it had been legally constructed. Later, in a brief phone interview with the state broadcaster CCTV, Mr. Zhang asserted that the structure was safe, but conceded that it might have been a folly after all."Now I realize it was a huge mistake," he said, adding that he would dismantle the addition within a week.Not everyone is thrilled to see it go. An elderly man who lives on the 21st floor and whose son owns two apartments on the 25th floor, said he was not bothered by Mr. Zhang's illegal penthouse. In fact, he said he thought the structure was a eye-pleasing capstone to an otherwise drab high-rise.Standing in front of the building Wednesday morning, the man, who declined to give his name, said he thought Mr. Zhang's biggest mistake was failing to keep fellow tenants happy. "Who doesn't disturb the neighbors when you're doing construction?" he asked. "You just have to buy them fruit and gifts and things."
HUAIROU, China — A Chinese court on Friday rejected an appeal by the brother-in-law of jailed Nobel Peace Prize laureate Liu Xiaobo, upholding his 11-year sentence on fraud charges, a case seen as another example of official retribution on the Liu family.Supporters of Liu Hui say his case was trumped up, aimed at thwarting the increasing attention by the rights community on the plight of Liu Xia, who has remained under effective house arrest since her husband won the Nobel Prize in 2010.The ruling - announced by a court in Huairou, a one-hour drive northeast of Beijing - was not unexpected as China hardens its stance towards the rights community under the rule of newly-installed President Xi Jinping.The Huairou court upheld the June sentence that Liu Hui, a manager in a real estate company in the southern city of Shenzhen, defrauded a man called Zhang Bing of 3 million yuan ($490,000), along with another colleague. Liu Hui has maintained his innocence, according to his lawyers.Liu Tong, Liu Hui's brother, told reporters he was furious at the verdict."This result fundamentally will make anyone angry, especially his family members. Because at its heart, it's a miscarriage of justice," he said. "The government says daily it wants to prevent wrongful convictions, miscarriages of justice from happening, but everyone knows that this is a miscarriage of justice."Shang Baojun, one of Liu Hui's lawyers, said the decision was "unreasonable"."I met with Liu Hui. He thought that the verdict is completely unfair. Frankly speaking, this verdict is a mistake. He does not think he was defrauding anyone," Shang said, adding Liu Hui was considering a further appeal.The case has also renewed international concern about the plight of Liu Xiaobo's family, which has attracted considerable attention in the United States and European Union.Charles Parton, political affairs counselor for the EU's mission in Beijing, said the EU expressed regret at the upholding of the sentence."Liu's prosecution and conviction may have been linked to the situation of Liu Xiaobo and his sister, Liu Xia, Liu Xiaobo's wife, and therefore may have been politically motivated," he told reporters outside the courthouse.Liu Hui was allowed out on bail last September, but arrested again in January, after several rights activists and foreign reporters forced their way past security guards late last year to visit Liu Xia, lawyer Shang told Reuters previously.Liu Xiaobo, a veteran dissident involved in the 1989 Tiananmen Square pro-democracy protests crushed by the Chinese army, was jailed for 11 years in 2009 on subversion charges for organizing a petition urging the overthrow of one-party rule.His wife Liu Xia is rarely allowed out and is almost never allowed to receive visitors. She has not been convicted of any crime.Liu Xia did not appear at the court on Friday as she was feeling unwell, Liu Tong said.She is currently resting at home and her physical condition is "very fragile", he added.
BEIJING — A Chinese court on Friday upheld the 11-year prison sentence handed down to the brother-in-law of jailed Nobel Peace Prize winner Liu Xiaobo, the man's lawyer said.Relatives have denounced Liu Hui's conviction on fraud charges in a real estate dispute as political payback for the strong pro-democracy stance taken by Liu Xiaobo, who has been imprisoned on subversion charges since 2009.Lawyer Shang Baojun said the court in suburban Beijing's Huairou district turned down Liu Hui's appeal at a 20-minute hearing attended by the defendant."We're very disappointed by this outcome," Shang told The Associated Press.Foreign diplomats and journalists who sought to attend the trial were denied entry to the courthouse, which was cordoned off with crime scene tape and surrounded by dozens of police officers and private security guards in a sign of the case's sensitivity and high visibility.Liu Hui's sister, Liu Xia, has been under house arrest since her husband was awarded the Nobel Peace Prize in 2010. Shang said that Liu Xia, who has protested her extralegal detention, did not attend Friday's hearing because she wasn't feeling well.The European Union's political officer in Beijing, Charles Parton, said Liu Hui's case was being closely followed because of its possible ties to Liu Xiaobo's conviction. Parton also called for the lifting of what he described as Liu Xia's "illegal house arrest.""The EU would like to recall the great importance it attaches to the respect of human rights all over the world, the situation of human rights defenders and of their family members, as well as the due process of rule of law in China," Parton said.Liu Hui's brother, Liu Tong, was permitted to attend the hearing. He said the outcome was "very, very disappointing.""In our family, we were all hoping to see a good result, a result that would give our family and all of us hope," Liu said.Liu said Liu Hui's case has caused his sister's generally poor health to deteriorate further."This issue brings a lot of psychological pressure and affects her greatly," he said.Liu Xiaobo was prosecuted after he co-authored a bold call for sweeping changes to Beijing's one-party communist political system in a document titled called Charter '08. A court dismissed his appeal in early 2010.His Nobel Peace Prize incensed China's leaders, who have retaliated against Norway, where the prize is awarded. It has frozen the country's diplomats out of meetings, halted trade talks and blocked salmon imports.Liu Hui's lawyers have said his dispute over a development deal in Beijing had already been resolved, with the disputed 3 million yuan ($500,000) handed over to partners in the transaction, before the case went to trial.Associated Press reporter Aritz Parra contributed to this report.
BEIJING — A typhoon left one person dead and five others missing as it churned through southern China before weakening into a tropical storm on Thursday, authorities said.After shutting down business in the financial center of Hong Kong and sinking a cargo ship, Typhoon Utor brought high winds and torrential rain to Guangdong province after making landfall Wednesday afternoon. These triggered flooding and mountain torrents that led to the casualties, the provincial government said Thursday.The typhoon had forced the closure of schools, offices, shopping centers and construction sites in cities along its path northwest across Guangdong.Only minor damage was reported, a result, state media said, of strict adherence to orders to confine tens of thousands of fishing boats to port and evacuate vulnerable people to shelters.Thousands of travelers were stranded by the suspension of flights and ferry services.By Thursday morning, the force of the storm had weakened considerably, with sustained winds at its center falling to speeds of 85 kph (53 mph) as it headed northwest through Guangxi province, about 350 kilometers (215 miles) west of Hong Kong.Life returned to normal in Hong Kong Thursday, a day after offices, schools and courts were shut and the stock market halted trading, bringing an eerie calm to the normally busy southern Chinese commercial hub.Flights had been canceled and ferry services curtailed while helicopter search and rescue teams from Hong Kong and Guangdong province rescued 21 crew members from a bulk carrier transporting nickel ore before it sank in waters southwest of Hong Kong.Utor was the world's strongest typhoon of the year before it crossed the Philippines earlier this week, leaving at least eight people dead.Associated Press writers Kelvin Chan in Hong Kong and Hrvoje Hranjski in Manila, Philippines, contributed to this report.
BEIJING — China summoned Japan's ambassador Thursday to register a protest over Japanese Cabinet members' visits to a controversial shrine to war dead in Tokyo.Vice Foreign Minister Liu Zhenmin lodged "solemn representations" in his meeting Thursday with Ambassador Masato Kitera and expressed "strong protest and severe condemnation," the ministry said in a statement posted to its website."We call upon Japan to rigorously honor their expression and commitment to deeply reflect on their history of invasion ... or there will be no future to Japan's relations with its Asian neighbors," the statement said.The meeting followed visits by ministers and dozens of lawmakers to the Yasukuni Shrine to mark the 68th anniversary of Japan's surrender in World War II.The shrine honors 2.5 million Japanese war dead, including officers executed for war crimes committed against nations including China and Korea. Beijing regards such visits as an affront to its past suffering and evidence that Japan has yet to show true contrition over its actions.Past shrine visits by former Prime Minister Junichiro Koizumi incensed China and sparked years of fractious relations. While current Prime Minister Shinzo Abe did not visit Thursday, the Chinese ministry's statement still criticized him for having had an aide present an ornamental offering bought with his own money."Regardless of what form or capacity the Japanese leader worships at the Yasukuni Shrine, the essence is to deny and prettify Japan's history of militarism," the statement said.This year's anniversary comes amid heightened tensions over disputed East China Sea islands controlled by Japan but claimed by China. Tokyo's purchase of the islands from their private owners in September sparked violent anti-Japanese protests in a number of Chinese cities.
BEIJING — A zoo in central China has been closed after visitors were outraged to discover its lion was really a bushy and barking Tibetan mastiff.The dog was not the only fake at People's Park Zoo in the city of Luohe, which tried to pass off other common mammals and rodents as a leopard and snakes, Chinese media reported.Photographs showed the mastiff with its muzzle poking through the bars of its dingy enclosure. A grimy sign on the cage read "African Lion" in Chinese characters.The zoo apologized for the exhibits and was closed down for "rectification", the Beijing News said, citing local officials.Animal rights activists have criticized Chinese zoos for their record of poor conditions and other abuses.
HUAIROU, China — A Chinese court on Friday rejected an appeal by the brother-in-law of jailed Nobel Peace Prize laureate Liu Xiaobo, upholding his 11-year sentence on fraud charges, a case seen as another example of official retribution on the Liu family.Supporters of Liu Hui say his case was trumped up, aimed at thwarting the increasing attention by the rights community on the plight of Liu Xia, who has remained under effective house arrest since her husband won the Nobel Prize in 2010.The ruling - announced by a court in Huairou, a one-hour drive northeast of Beijing - was not unexpected as China hardens its stance towards the rights community under the rule of newly-installed President Xi Jinping.The Huairou court upheld the June sentence that Liu Hui, a manager in a real estate company in the southern city of Shenzhen, defrauded a man called Zhang Bing of 3 million yuan (313,540 pounds), along with another colleague. Liu Hui has maintained his innocence, according to his lawyers.Liu Tong, Liu Hui's brother, told reporters he was furious at the verdict."This result fundamentally will make anyone angry, especially his family members. Because at its heart, it's a miscarriage of justice," he said. "The government says daily it wants to prevent wrongful convictions, miscarriages of justice from happening, but everyone knows that this is a miscarriage of justice."Shang Baojun, one of Liu Hui's lawyers, said the decision was "unreasonable"."I met with Liu Hui. He thought that the verdict is completely unfair. Frankly speaking, this verdict is a mistake. He does not think he was defrauding anyone," Shang said, adding Liu Hui was considering a further appeal.The case has also renewed international concern about the plight of Liu Xiaobo's family, which has attracted considerable attention in the United States and European Union.Charles Parton, political affairs counsellor for the EU's mission in Beijing, said the EU expressed regret at the upholding of the sentence."Liu's prosecution and conviction may have been linked to the situation of Liu Xiaobo and his sister, Liu Xia, Liu Xiaobo's wife, and therefore may have been politically motivated," he told reporters outside the courthouse.Liu Hui was allowed out on bail last September, but arrested again in January, after several rights activists and foreign reporters forced their way past security guards late last year to visit Liu Xia, lawyer Shang told Reuters previously.Liu Xiaobo, a veteran dissident involved in the 1989 Tiananmen Square pro-democracy protests crushed by the Chinese army, was jailed for 11 years in 2009 on subversion charges for organising a petition urging the overthrow of one-party rule.His wife Liu Xia is rarely allowed out and is almost never allowed to receive visitors. She has not been convicted of any crime.Liu Xia did not appear at the court on Friday as she was feeling unwell, Liu Tong said.She is currently resting at home and her physical condition is "very fragile", he added.
SHENMU, China — As the Chinese economy boomed, few cities soared faster or higher than Shenmu, a community of nearly 500,000 in northwestern China.Top luxury clothing stores in this city's downtown were recording as much as $500,000 a day in sales. Tables at the best restaurants had to be reserved weeks in advance. The new Fortune Garden Club for the city's business elite made headlines by paying $1 million for a king-size mahogany bed, to be used by members and their companions.But a painful credit crisis is now spreading across Shenmu and cities nearby, as thousands of businesses have closed, fleets of BMWs and Audis have been repossessed and street protests have erupted.Now the leading purveyors of Western fashions are deserted, monthly sales at restaurants are down as much as 97 percent and the marble entrance to the Fortune Garden Club is shuttered. All but one of the city's car dealerships have failed.The owner of the city's largest jewelry store was detained by the authorities a week ago after creditors found him secretly packing millions of dollars' worth of gold and jewels into cases and accused him of preparing to flee the city without settling his debts. A top restaurant closed a day earlier, and its owner left town, as have the founder of the Fortune Garden and many other executives."It's an economic crisis just like the United States has had; just like it," said Wang Ting, an operator of an illegal casino in Fugu, near Shenmu. "There's no cash, everyone stays home without a job, there's no way the economy can recover."Shenmu, and nearby cities like Ordos and Fugu, are at the leading edge of broader troubles that are beginning to afflict the entire Chinese economy. Across China, growth has slowed. With the slowdown have come rising defaults on loans made outside the conventional banking system, chronic overcapacity in many industries like coal mining and steel production and, in particularly troubled cities like Shenmu, a sharp decline in previously debt-fueled prices for real estate and other assets.The cracks are showing in many sizable cities like coastal Wenzhou, where informal lending, a big part of so-called shadow banking, has dominated for a quarter-century. Cities with economies linked to commodities with falling prices have also been affected, as more people have defaulted on loans. The biggest, most economically diverse metropolitan areas like Beijing and Shanghai seem considerably less affected, but also have many small and medium-size businesses that depend on informal lending.Lending has collapsed here in northern Shaanxi Province, where it was particularly speculative and frenzied, and where the local coal industry has also been crippled by steeply falling prices.As some borrowers began defaulting early this year, worried lenders in the informal sector raised interest rates for small and medium-size businesses, previously 25 to 40 percent a year, to as much as 125 percent a year. The increase set off a much broader wave of defaults in recent weeks, as owners found themselves unable to repay billions of dollars in bad debts, many of them handwritten and hard to enforce in court."Almost no one will give you a loan," said a construction executive who gave only his surname, Xie, as he stood next to his white Toyota Land Cruiser outside a project that had been halted.Although changes are being slowly introduced, state-owned banks have long been allowed to lend only at low, regulated rates barely above the inflation rate, with the total value of loans controlled by quarterly quotas. All over China, these loans go overwhelmingly to large state-owned businesses, government officials and politically connected individuals, who then relend the money at much higher interest rates to small and medium-size businesses in the private sector that need money to grow.Liu Linfei, a government official from nearby Yulin, stood on a Shenmu street corner in a T-shirt and shorts on a recent weekend afternoon, outside two high-rise hotels where construction had been stopped just before the windows could be installed. He said he had borrowed 600,000 renminbi, almost $100,000, from a bank shortly before the collapse, at an interest rate of 4.1 percent a year.Mr. Liu then lent the cash to moneylenders here at an interest rate of 10.4 percent, planning to pocket the difference.
BEIJING — The image flashed for only a few seconds on an enormous video screen, but it was enough to catch the attention of some concertgoers in the Chinese capital.Then began days of head-scratching and hand-wringing over an unlikely political flash point: the appearance during a Michael Jackson tribute concert of the famous "Tank Man" photograph of June 1989. The most common version of the image, distributed worldwide by The Associated Press, shows a lone man facing down a line of tanks near Tiananmen Square the day after Chinese troops killed hundreds or thousands of peaceful protesters.As the Chinese might say, the image is as rare as phoenix feathers and unicorn horns here, where the Communist Party suppresses any mention of the 1989 violence. Its sudden appearance at the opening performance of the China leg of Cirque du Soleil's "Michael Jackson The Immortal World Tour" underscored the challenges that governments face in controlling history in the modern age. Censors can work overtime scrutinizing content for taboo messages, but some inevitably slip by.In imperial times, China's rulers tried to exercise strict control over what versions of history were fit for public consumption. "The punishment for bringing sensitive historical matters to light could be death," said John Delury, co-author of a new book on modern Chinese history, "Wealth and Power.""Today, of course, Chinese, with the world's largest online community, live in a world of radically expanded information borders," he said. "Yet there remain certain taboo images and texts that, even when iconic at a global level, are verboten to Chinese eyes. It takes a tremendous amount of energy for the state to maintain this screen over knowledge of the past, and a vast amount slips through the censors today, just as it did back in imperial days. This is what Deng Xiaoping referred to as 'The flies come in when you open a window for some fresh air.' "The Cirque du Soleil dance show used Mr. Jackson's music, including "They Don't Care About Us," an overtly political song whose lyrics are full of rage. "Tell me what has become of my rights?/Am I invisible because you ignore me?/Your proclamation promised me free liberty, now/I'm tired of bein' the victim of shame," the song says. Along with the lyrics, Cirque du Soleil featured a montage of images showing civil rights abuses and protests, including that of the Tank Man.The sight of Tank Man resulted in "an audible collective gasp from the audience," wrote Stephen George, one of the thousands of concert attendees, in a blog post on the Web site of "That's Beijing," an expatriate-oriented magazine where Mr. George works. The post went up on Saturday but has since been deleted.The moment "felt genuinely quite radical," Mr. George wrote. "As my friend commented, 'I can't imagine ever being witness to that image being shown in Beijing again, even if I stay here for another 50 years.' "Reports of Tank Man's appearance circulated online. For some, it evoked Bjork's Shanghai concert in 2008, where she surprised concertgoers by calling for Tibetan independence.In this instance, Cirque du Soleil quickly cut the image from subsequent shows in Beijing. It is unclear whether tour organizers had come under pressure from officials.A tour spokeswoman, Laura Silverman, sent an e-mail this week to The South China Morning Post, a Hong Kong newspaper, that said "the image was removed immediately and is no longer shown." She also said the full show had been submitted to the Chinese Ministry of Culture for approval before the first China concert.In an e-mailed statement on Thursday, Ms. Silverman said: "We believe in diversity and are apolitical. We also respect any laws and cultural uniqueness of the countries where we perform."The show is scheduled to open in Shanghai on Friday and in Hong Kong next Thursday. Since 2011, when the show opened, it has grossed about $300 million, and a review in The New York Times called it a "galumphing sensory assault."Ms. Silverman's assertion that the show had been officially reviewed in China has raised the question of whether a government official allowed Tank Man to stay in the video. The Culture Ministry did not respond to questions on Thursday.It could be, though, that blanket censorship of all things related to June 4, 1989, has resulted in such widespread amnesia about the episode that even some censors can no longer recognize the taboo material for what it is.There have been past cases of this. In 2008, Beijing News ran a profile of the veteran photojournalist Liu Heung Shing, who covered China in the late 1970s and 1980s for Time magazine and The Associated Press. The article featured several of his photographs, including one of the injured and dead being taken from the scene of the June 4 killings by rickshaw drivers.
BEIJING — Relatives of Neil Heywood, a British businessman murdered in China in 2011, demanded $8 million in compensation from the family of the woman convicted last year of poisoning him, according to a lawyer associated with the woman's family.The lawyer, Li Xiaolin, said in a telephone interview on Thursday that the amount being demanded was in flux, and that there had been negotiations between the two parties. He said Mr. Heywood's family members might have lowered their demand to $5 million, but talks between lawyers for the two sides have failed nevertheless.Mr. Li said he was not directly involved in the discussions and did not know which one of Mr. Heywood's family members had been demanding the compensation. On Sunday, Mr. Heywood's mother, Ann Heywood, released a statement to The Wall Street Journal in which she said she had made "repeated discreet approaches" to the Chinese authorities for compensation. She did not mention an amount.Mr. Heywood's wife, Wang Lulu, from northeast China, lives in Beijing with their two young children. She has declined interview requests from news organizations.A person briefed on the case also said earlier this week that Mr. Heywood's family members had approached the family of Gu Kailai, the woman convicted of the murder, months ago demanding compensation, but that there had been no serious talks.There is no indication that the family of Ms. Gu is ready to give any compensation. It is unclear how much in cash, assets and investments Ms. Gu and her husband, Bo Xilai, have accumulated.Mr. Bo was a Politburo member and party chief of Chongqing, the municipality in southwest China where Mr. Heywood died in a hotel in November 2011. After the murder scandal broke in March 2012, he was put under house arrest and dismissed from his post. In September, Communist Party leaders revoked Mr. Bo's party membership. He is expected to be put on trial soon on charges of bribetaking, corruption and abuse of power. Mr. Bo is the son of one of the party's top revolutionary leaders.Ms. Gu and Mr. Heywood were business associates, and she killed him because she reportedly feared that he was planning to harm her son. She was given a suspended death sentence in August 2012, which usually equates to life in prison. A family aide, Zhang Xiaojun, was convicted of conspiring with her in the murder plot. Mr. Li, the lawyer, was hired to represent Mr. Zhang, but he was never allowed into the courthouse.A spokesman for the British Embassy said this week that diplomats had relayed the Heywood family's demand for compensation to Chinese Foreign Ministry officials. He said that the message was most recently passed to the Chinese twice in July.
That milestone, which the company announced Thursday, underlines the growing influence of Chinese companies like Lenovo in the shift from desktop to mobile computing. Now even Lenovo, which acquired I.B.M.'s PC business in 2005 and sells ThinkPad notebooks, is remaking itself for a post-PC era.Lenovo said its sales of smartphones had more than doubled in the three months that ended June 30, to 11.4 million. The company also sold 1.5 million tablet computers.Executives said Lenovo had benefited from a structural shift in the smartphone business, where the high end, dominated by Apple and Samsung Electronics, is showing signs of saturation. Sales of less expensive handsets made by Lenovo and other Chinese companies, like Huawei and ZTE, are growing more rapidly. "The recent change in the market favors Lenovo and our business model," Yang Yuanqing, chief executive of Lenovo, said in a conference call with analysts. "The market is shifting from the premium part to the mainstream. It is shifting from the mature markets to the emerging markets."Lenovo was the fourth-largest maker of smartphones worldwide in the second quarter, according to IDC, a research firm, with a market share of 4.7 percent, up from 3.1 percent a year earlier.The company's smartphone business relies heavily on China, which accounts for about 80 percent of sales, but Lenovo is trying to expand its global presence.On Thursday, Lenovo executives declined to comment on speculation about a possible bid for BlackBerry, which has put itself up for sale. But Lenovo made it clear that it did not plan to rely on internal, or "organic," growth alone."Given its solid financial position, the group will continue to actively look for inorganic growth opportunities which will supplement its organic growth strategy to accelerate future expansion," Lenovo said in its latest quarterly earnings report.Analysts say acquisitions might be a way for Lenovo to address some of the shortcomings of its smartphone arm, including the low prices that its devices command — an average of less than $100 in China, while devices like Apple's iPhone 5 and Samsung's Galaxy S4 cost more than $700 in that country.Because of the low prices, Lenovo's smartphone and tablet arm generated only 14 percent of the company's revenue in the most recent quarter. The company remains heavily reliant on its PC division for sales and earnings, even though that business is shrinking.Lenovo has managed the decline better than some of its rivals. Its shipments of computers slipped 1.4 percent in the second quarter, to 12.6 million, compared with a decline of 11 percent in the overall market, according to IDC. As a result, Lenovo overtook Hewlett-Packard and become the world's largest PC maker in the period. That helped Lenovo post a 23 percent increase in net income, to $174 million, for its financial first quarter, which ended in June. The results were above analysts' expectations.Despite the solid performance of the PC division, company executives have taken to calling Lenovo a PC-plus company. Mr. Yang stuck with a previous forecast that the company would sell 50 million smartphones and 10 million tablets in the current quarter. But he acknowledged that Lenovo still had work to do in getting out the message about its mobile devices in markets beyond China."We still need to invest in the branding, we still need to invest in the channel and network building," he said.In China, Lenovo's mobile business is growing rapidly. Canalys, a research firm, said it had shipped 10.8 million smartphones there in the second quarter, second only to Samsung, with 15.5 million. That is a strong base from which to develop new phones for other price-conscious developing markets, analysts say."The whole dynamic favors Lenovo a lot," said Jenny Lai, an analyst at HSBC. "If you are No. 2 in the largest market in the world, your suppliers will come to you."
BEIJING — The European Union on Friday asked the World Trade Organization to rule in a dispute over Chinese anti-dumping duties imposed on steel pipes imported from EU countries.The EU said in a news release that it made the request to the WTO after unsuccessful consultations in July to resolve the dispute over the duties imposed by China on imports of high-performance stainless steel seamless tubes from EU countries."The EU continues its fight against unjustified Chinese trade defense measures, which do not comply with WTO rules and often seem to be motivated by retaliation," said EU Trade spokesman John Clancy in the statement.But Beijing has said the duties would protect Chinese companies."This is not an act of retaliation but to protect the domestic steel trade," said analyst Zhang Lin in a statement posted on the official site of the Chinese Ministry of Commerce in June when the EU lodged a complaint with WTO.The statement says China's steel products are often subject to anti-dumping investigations in overseas markets. "It is a reasonable and logical measure for hitting back," Zhang said.China and the EU have been embroiled in a series of trade tiffs. A dispute over China's solar panels was defused in July after Chinese companies agreed to set minimum prices. Meanwhile, the Chinese commerce ministry spokesman Shen Danyang said last week that Beijing continued to investigate whether the EU has been dumping its wine and poly silicon products in China.China imposed anti-dumping duties ranging from 9.2 percent to 14.4 percent on the high-performance steel pipes imported from EU countries and Japan in 2012.The EU said that the duties have significantly hampered its access to the Chinese market and that the WTO consultations — joined by Japan and held in mid-July — were unsuccessful.
BEIJING — The writing was perhaps already on the wall for Bo Xilai, the controversial former top official of China's southwestern city of Chongqing, when he appeared at last year's parliamentary meeting, alternately chastened and combative.In earlier annual sessions of parliament, Bo had swept in, all smiles and lanky grace, preceded by a wave of TV cameras and popping flashbulbs. This time he was uncharacteristically restrained.Bo rolled his eyes at repeated questions from foreign reporters about a scandal involving then-vice mayor Wang Lijun, and the normally effusive state media and parliament delegates kept their distance.Wang, who doubled as the city's police chief before his downfall, went to ground in the U.S. Consulate in nearby Chengdu in February last year until he was coaxed out and placed under investigation."I certainly never expected this," Bo said of Wang's flight. "I felt that it happened extremely suddenly."News of his own change of fortune came just as suddenly.A few days after his news conference in March last year, a terse report from the official Xinhua news agency announced that Beijing had sacked Bo from his post, all but snuffing out his chances of rising to the top echelons of the Communist Party.Now the end appears imminent for Bo, 64, whose long-awaited trial on charges of corruption, accepting bribes and abuse of power opens on Thursday, when he is certain to be found guilty by the Communist Party-controlled court.Bo's wife, Gu Kailai, and Wang were jailed last year over China's biggest political scandal in years, which stems from the murder of British businessman Neil Heywood in November 2011, a crime for which Gu was convicted.After first helping Gu evade suspicion of poisoning Heywood, Wang hushed up evidence of the murder, according to the official account of Wang's trial. In late January 2012, Wang confronted Bo with the allegation that Gu was suspected of killing Heywood. But Wang was "angrily rebuked and had his ears boxed".After Bo was sacked, he disappeared from public view and has not had a chance to respond publicly to the accusations against him.Sources told Reuters in February that Bo was refusing to cooperate with the government investigation, had staged hunger strikes and had refused to shave to protest against what he saw as his unfair treatment.As the outspoken Chongqing party chief, Bo had mounted a daring bid for the nation's top political body, the party's Politburo Standing Committee.He captured national attention with a crackdown on organized crime and corrupt police officers in Chongqing, China's teeming wartime capital, and brought about stronger economic growth. But he also alienated political peers.The anti-mafia campaign netted thousands of people and tapped into popular anger over the corruption and collusion that has accompanied China's economic boom."Fighting organized crime is for the sake of letting the people enjoy peace and creating a clean social environment in Chongqing," Bo said at his parliamentary news briefing, defending his record."We are sure of ourselves and free of regrets."Bo, a former China commerce minister and mayor of the northeastern port city of Dalian where he wooed foreign investors, once had a flair for the dramatic.His directness and independent streak impressed foreigners but annoyed peers, who prefer to rule through backdoor consensus and often stilted slogans.Analysts have noted that no one in the top leadership had publicly praised Bo or the crackdown on organized crime.Then-Premier Wen Jiabao told his annual news conference last year that Chongqing's leadership should reflect on the Wang Lijun incident, and also obliquely criticized Bo's drive to revive songs and culture from the heyday of Mao's Communist revolution.Bo is a son of late vice-premier Bo Yibo, making the younger Bo a "princeling" - a child of an incumbent, retired or late national leader.His wife was a lawyer and their son, Bo Guagua, was educated at an expensive, elite British private school and then Oxford University. The younger Bo's Facebook photos from parties caused their own Internet stir.While wooing investors, Bo also envisioned low-cost housing for rural poor and migrant laborers, designed to appeal to then-President Hu Jintao's goal of creating a "harmonious society".He called his vision "Peaceful Chongqing." It included text messages with Maoist slogans, singing old-style revolutionary songs by civil servants, who also had to adopt poor families and staff petition offices where citizens can complain.But Bo had difficulty shaking off the suspicion of some critics, both inside and outside the country, that he was more concerned with his own rise than that of China.
HONG KONG — The police in southern China have detained an outspoken advocate of democratic rights on charges of disrupting public order, his lawyer and human rights groups said Saturday. They called his detention another step in a government effort to stifle dissidents who have challenged the Communist Party over censorship and officials' wealth.The advocate, Yang Maodong, who is better known by his pen name, Guo Feixiong, was detained on Aug. 8, but the police notified his family only on Saturday, his lawyer, Sui Muqing, said by telephone from the city of Guangzhou, where Mr. Yang also lives. Chinese Human Rights Defenders, an international advocacy group, also reported Mr. Yang's detention on its Web site, and it posted a copy of the police notice listing charges of "assembling a crowd to disrupt order in a public place."Mr. Yang, 47, is the second well-known member of China's "rights defense" movement to be arrested recently. In mid-July, the police in Beijing arrested Xu Zhiyong, a legal advocate who has also long been a prominent member of that loose campaign, which seeks to expand citizens' rights through litigation, petitions, publicity and training."I think the general reason is that the authorities are putting pressure on many dissidents, and Yang Maodong is one of them," Mr. Sui said. "I think the direct reason may be his involvement in the protests at the Southern Weekend."Mr. Yang was among a group of activists who gathered near the offices of the newspaper Southern Weekend in Guangzhou in January, offering encouragement to reporters and editors there who were protesting what they called heavy-handed censorship of an editorial.The government gave some ground to the protesting journalists. But since then, the Communist Party authorities have tightened media and Internet controls and sought to rein in dissidents. The police have brought Mr. Yang in for questioning about the Southern Weekend protests and other issues several times since March, Mr. Sui said.Mr. Yang, formerly a novelist and a businessman involved in publishing, has been among the members of China's human rights advocacy movement who favor a more combative approach and more ambitious demands. He first became widely known in 2005, as an organizer of villagers on the outskirts of Guangzhou protesting official corruption and land seizures.In 2007, he was sentenced to five years in prison on charges of illegal publishing activities, although he and his supporters maintained that the charges were a baseless excuse to silence him. He was released in late 2011, having already served some of his sentence in detention before his conviction.Mr. Sui said he would try to meet with Mr. Yang, who is being held in a detention center in Guangzhou. If Mr. Yang is formally charged, indicted and convicted, he could be sentenced to up to five years in prison. "It's still too early to know what will happen to him," Mr. Sui said.
BEIJING — Heavy rains brought by a typhoon triggered landslides in southern China that buried homes and vehicles and killed at least 15 people, as the number of dead or missing from recent flooding in the country surged past 200.Nine people were reported killed in Hunan province and six in Guangxi, where vehicles were covered in mud and rocks along a mountain highway, local flood control offices said.The deaths come after three people died Sunday in a landslide near the Guangxi city of Wuzhou.Rains brought by last week's Typhoon Utor have caused severe flooding across Hunan, Guangxi and neighboring Guangdong province. In Guangdong, 22 people have died and eight were missing in flooding since Friday.By Tuesday morning, a total of 105 people were reported dead and 115 missing in the extreme south and northeast.In the deadliest incident, torrential rains over the last week caused the Nei River in northeastern Liaoning province to overflow near the city of Fushun, sweeping away homes, roads and utilities and leaving 54 people dead and 97 missing.Flooding hits China each summer, but heavy rains have brought greater than usual levels of destruction in some areas.
BEIJING — The curtain may be about to fall on China's disgraced leader Bo Xilai, but victims of the harsh brand of justice he handed out in a high-profile crime crackdown are not making any headway in their campaign for redress.Lawyers estimate there are thousands of cases demanding restitution in the foggy southwestern metropolis of Chongqing, which Bo ruled as Communist Party boss until he was dramatically sacked early last year amid lurid allegations of graft and murder.Bo is to stand trial from Thursday and his police chief and his wife have already been jailed over the scandal stemming from the November 2011 murder of British businessman Neil Heywood.But despite the official repudiation of Bo's tactics in Chongqing, China has shown little appetite to follow or publicize cases brought by the victims of his crackdown, largely because it could focus unwanted public attention on how the Communist Party operates.Critics say Bo was simply doing what other party leaders were doing elsewhere, and continue to do - using courts, prosecutors and police to enforce their will. Openly vindicating Bo's victims could open a can of worms, they said."Bo Xilai was a leader in the party and the government, and didn't he interfere with the law? They (the government) don't want to give people a pretext to find fault with them," said Liu Yang, an attorney who published an open letter last year urging fellow lawyers to form a team to review criminal cases in Chongqing.More than 4,000 people were arrested during Bo's much-heralded campaign against organized crime, launched in 2009, according to state media, though the government has never released figures for the number jailed.Bo won national attention with his "strike the black" offensive, but critics have said it involved abuses such as torture and the jailing of innocent people.As the appeals by Bo's victims mount, their demands for justice are emerging as a potent challenge for the government, already struggling to contain the consequences of the politically divisive case that has exposed rifts within Chinese society."When I defend my clients in court, I cite a Chinese proverb: 'one miscarriage of justice will lead to three generations of hatred'," Liu said."The wounds that have been borne by these miscarriages of justice, they'll never forget."Before his dramatic fall last year, Bo was set to join the upper ranks of China's leadership. But his rise was stopped by a murder scandal involving his wife, Gu Kailai, and his former police chief, Wang Lijun. Both Gu and Wang have since been jailed.Bo is set to stand trial on charges of bribery and abuse of power in the eastern city of Jinan and is almost certain to be found guilty.Liu said the Beijing Municipal Bureau of Justice told him to disband his organization to offer legal services to families in Chongqing just three days after he had published his open letter. Officials at the bureau could not be reached for comment.According to Liu, the officials told him at a meeting: "At first, we approved of your action - it is motivated out of goodwill - but because you are not in line with policies of the central government, and your information isn't the same as that of the decision-makers, so we're afraid your work may sometimes affect the stability and unity that we have".After his appointment as party boss of Chongqing in 2007, Bo turned the region into a showcase of revolution-inspired Maoist "red" culture, as well as state-led economic growth.Bo's populist ways were welcomed by many of Chongqing's 30 million residents. But critics said the anti-crime campaign trampled rudimentary legal safeguards and was used to weed out people who Bo and Wang disliked.During Bo's anti-crime drive, Chongqing police held thousands of suspects and prosecuted dozens of businessmen and women and officials accused of extortion, graft or running syndicates to protect rackets and prostitution.One of the reasons petitions for redress are blocked is that judges and prosecutors in Chongqing who have ruled on these allegedly wrongful convictions are still in office. The Chongqing government could not be reached for comment."Several prosecutors who handled the wrongful convictions are still in their positions in court, so to ask that they correct their own mistakes, that's somewhat difficult," said Chen Youxi, a lawyer who is representing two clients who say they were wrongfully convicted.Li Zhuang, a former lawyer and outspoken critic of Bo, said he is giving legal advice to more than a dozen people hoping to seek redress for their jailed relatives."If it's one or two cases, it's easy to handle, but when the volume is too large, what can you do?" Li said. "The government is now probably in a bind about this."Li is himself appealing a conviction on charges of persuading a client to commit perjury. He was sentenced to a two and a half years in jail in early 2010 after vigorously defending a client on trial in Chongqing's anti-gang campaign.Others caught in Bo's dragnet included critics such as Gao Yingpu, who was sentenced to three years in prison in 2010 on a charge of "inciting subversion of state power" after he criticized Bo's crackdown on organized crime.Earlier this year, Gao appealed to have his name cleared, said a source with direct knowledge of his situation. The source declined to be named for fear of retribution.The authorities have not responded to Gao, who was released in January after his sentence was cut by six months, according to the source.Among the people persecuted during Bo's time, a large proportion were policemen. More than 5,600 police officers were punished by Wang over three years, Chinese media reported.Family members say Wang wanted to remove officers he thought were loyal to the city's former justice chief and deputy police chief, Wen Qiang, who was executed in 2010 for protecting gangs, accepting bribes, rape and property scams.One typical case was that of a 50-year-old police officer sentenced to 17 years in prison for accepting bribes and protecting gangs. His lawyer, Chi Susheng, said her client was targeted by Wang because he had worked for Wen and maintains that the charges are fabricated.During his questioning, the police officer said he endured beatings, nine days of sleep deprivation and other torture to force him to confess to a crime he did not commit, according to his wife, who asked that the names of her and her husband not be disclosed. Now in prison, the police officer is depressed, she said."We will probably appeal for our entire lifetimes, until the day we die," said his wife.When asked about the prospects for Bo's trial, she said: "I think even if there are loopholes in the law, God will not tolerate him."Heaven is watching, I believe he will not meet a good end."
TOKYO — The biggest Internet takeover to date in China has already sharpened a rivalry among the country's digital powerhouses, but the deal could also bring more order to China's messy world of mobile apps.Baidu, the leading search engine in China, signed a deal last week to buy an operator of mobile application stores called 91 Wireless for $1.9 billion from an online video game company, NetDragon. The move should help Baidu regain ground against two other Chinese Internet giants, Alibaba and Tencent, which were quicker to add mobile capabilities.The deal may also advance the fight against digital piracy of mobile apps, which remains widespread in China. In the rest of the world, most mobile applications are distributed through official outlets like Google Play or Apple's App Store. But in China, dozens of so-called alternative app stores are the dominant distributors. Many of the applications available for download through the alternative stores are unauthorized knockoffs.Baidu will get two of the alternative stores, HiMarket and 91 Assistant, as part of its deal with 91 Wireless. And analysts say Baidu could be motivated to crack down on unauthorized copies, which would alter the landscape of China's app market."It's fair to say that it has not been a priority among Chinese app stores to police the content," said Carl-Johan Skoeld, director of Stenvall Skoeld & Company, a consulting firm in Shanghai that works with app developers.Two years ago, Baidu reached a landmark agreement with major record companies to distribute licensed online music after it had been labeled a conduit for piracy by the Office of the United States Trade Representative. In addition, Baidu's stock is listed on the Nasdaq, potentially exposing the company to litigation from software developers whose applications had been copied and offered through 91 Wireless, legal experts said."It's unlikely that app stores would be protected by safe harbor," a provision of Chinese law that gives Internet companies legal protection, in certain cases, if they act to take down pirated material, said You Yunting, an intellectual property lawyer at DeBund Law Offices in Shanghai."If I were Baidu, I would put aside 10 to 30 percent of the purchase price as a copyright infringement fund and pay it out a year or two later, conditional on 91 stopping piracy," he said.Analysts say 91 Wireless has already been more active in fighting piracy than some other app stores in China, taking down infringing applications when notified. But developers complain that they should not be responsible for patrolling the stores for violations; given the number of stores and the frequency of updates, the task is practically impossible.Alternative app markets have thrived in China in the absence of Google Play, which caters to phones using the company's Android operating system. More than three-quarters of smartphones in China use Android, but Google, which had a prominent dust-up with Beijing over accusations of censorship and network security, has not introduced a Chinese version of its app store.Alternatives like Qihoo 360, Wandoujia, 91 Assistant and HiMarket have filled the gap. Many of the Android apps on these sites are legitimate; because there is no Chinese Google Play, the developers instead license their apps to the alternative markets.But it is another matter for alternative apps compatible with Apple's iOS operating system. Apple integrates its hardware and software, so iPhones are configured to download applications only from the company's official app store.Apple did not introduce a Chinese-language version of the online shop until 2010, and did not permit credit card transactions in the local currency until a year later. As a result, many Chinese iPhone owners decided to "jailbreak" their phones — hacking them to accept applications from outside sources. Most of the apps are unauthorized copies.
HONG KONG — Advertisements for star tutors in Hong Kong can be seen all over here: on billboards that loom over highways and on the exteriors of shopping malls. Invariably, the local teaching celebrities are young, attractive and dressed in designer outfits befitting pop stars. But beyond the polished shine, the advertisements also claim that their celebrity tutors can help students ace Hong Kong's university entrance exam."From a marketing perspective, every company wants to present their products with good packaging," said Antonia Cheng, a celebrity English teacher at Modern Education, one of the city's largest tutorial chains. "I believe, very simply, that this is a business principle."Although Ms. Cheng's Web site features photos of her in various poses, including in a red cocktail dress with a flash of leg, she maintains that "the quality of lessons is most important."Many of the city's celebrity tutors have their own music videos, Facebook fan pages and products including files and sticky notes. The local news media have reported that some tutors can annually earn more than 10 million Hong Kong dollars, or $1.3 million.In addition to some aggressive marketing techniques, tutorial schools sometimes claim that they can offer tips on questions likely to come up on public examinations. "I've heard that some 'tutor kings' tell students that they will excel in the English examination if they memorize 50 chosen words," said Ip Kin-yuen, a Hong Kong lawmaker who represents the education sector. "But this is impossible. These are all gimmicks."Woo Ching-tung, 17, has attended various cram schools over three years. "The tips the tutors gave were very vague," she said. "They would name a dozen things that might appear in the exam paper and claim that they predicted the exam questions."Complicating matters is the fact that some of the companies operating tutorial centers also run mainstream schools with government accreditation. The schools often encourage students to attend tutorials as well, offering discounts.Last month, the government examination results of 23 students at Modern College, a subsidiary of Modern Education, were invalidated after the students were found to have plagiarized from the Internet one segment of the exam that is conducted in school. The students filed an appeal, and the Hong Kong Examinations and Assessment Authority decided Tuesday to overturn the decision despite evidence of "serious" plagiarism. Instead, the authority said the students would get marks of zero for that portion of the test only.In response to that verdict, Karin Chan, a public relations representative for Modern College, said Tuesday that the decision had been "fair" and "comprehensive."Despite concerns about quality, the private tutoring business for Hong Kong high school students is valued at nearly 2 billion dollars, according to a report in 2011 by Synovate, a market research firm. Modern Education became a listed company in 2011 and reported a profit of almost 32 million dollars in the 2012 financial year. It has 14 branches for secondary school students, with a total of more than 600,000 course enrollments.Large educational companies, including King's Glory and Beacon College, make up more than half the local tutorial market and are becoming increasingly popular, according to the Synovate report.Almost three-quarters of Hong Kong high school seniors use some sort of outside tutoring service, according to a report released this year by Mark Bray, director of the Comparative Education Research Center of the University of Hong Kong."What happened in Hong Kong is a bit like hamburgers," Dr. Bray said in an interview. "We got an industry which produces a form of food which is relatively cheap."Tutorial-school chains generally generate most of their revenue through the mass sales of relatively affordable courses. At Modern Education, students can pay about 100 dollars an hour to attend classes with about 100 other pupils.Tutorial centers in Hong Kong have been accused of capitalizing on a high-stress, exam-oriented education system."The marketing and promotional campaigns of tutorial centers are like a form of psychological warfare," said Mr. Ip, the lawmaker. "They succeed because they manipulate the minds of students and parents. I think many Hong Kong students do not need to attend tutorial schools. But by creating fears, a herd mentality can be instilled among them."
HONG KONG — Bo Xilai, an ambitious and divisive Chinese politician whose downfall shook the Communist Party elite, will stand trial on Thursday on charges of corruption, taking bribes and abusing power, state-run news media announced Sunday.The brief report from the Xinhua news agency said Mr. Bo would be tried in Jinan, the capital of Shandong Province in eastern China. But the report gave no other details about the lurid allegations of corruption and a murder that toppled him and exposed bitter contention in the usually secretive Communist Party leadership.The announcement said the trial would start Thursday morning, but did not say how long it would last.Mr. Bo, 64, fell from power last year, upsetting preparations for a leadership transition and setting off reverberations that are still felt in Chinese politics. Accusations of skulduggery and graft around him and his family have drawn intense attention in China, and his trial is considered a test of how harshly and candidly the Communist Party elite deals with one of its own."Politics will determine how Bo Xilai is tried," said Chen Ziming, a commentator in Beijing who closely follows Communist Party affairs. "How much evidence they present will depend on how severely they want to punish him, not vice versa."China's courts are controlled by the Communist Party, and there is little doubt that Mr. Bo will be found guilty after a carefully choreographed trial. His defense lawyer was appointed by the court. But experts have offered opposing views about the probable punishment. A death penalty appears very unlikely, but a prison sentence of 15 years or longer is almost certain, Mr. Chen said."The central leadership will have weighed up the various pressures — for Bo, against Bo — and come to a decision," he said. "It's not a decision for the court."The political passions evoked by Mr. Bo have made his case a difficult one for the party leadership. If the evidence offered is flimsy or relatively slight, his supporters may accuse leaders of pursuing a political vendetta. But if the evidence is extensive and severe, others will ask why Mr. Bo was allowed to stay in power for so long, and even position himself for possible promotion into the central leadership.An urbane former minister of commerce with a liking for sleek suits and media attention, Mr. Bo was appointed the Communist Party secretary of Chongqing, a relatively poor municipality in southwest China, in 2007. He turned Chongqing into a showcase for a blend of welfare programs, reverent propaganda for the revolutionary past and harsh measures against those suspected of being members of organized crime cartels. Mr. Bo was a member of the Politburo, an elite council with 25 members, and his supporters hoped that he would win a place in the Politburo Standing Committee, the innermost circle of party power.But his critics claim that Mr. Bo's populist facade hid abuses of power and corrupt self-enrichment by him and his family. Mr. Bo fell abruptly from power in March last year, more than a month after the former police chief of Chongqing, Wang Lijun, fled to a United States Consulate. Mr. Wang disclosed accusations that Mr. Bo's wife, Gu Kailai, was involved in the murder of a British businessman, Neil Heywood, who knew the Bo family. And he accused Mr. Bo of trying to silence concerns about the case.Ms. Gu was tried last August and found guilty of fatally poisoning Mr. Heywood in a hotel villa in Chongqing in November 2011. She received a death sentence with a reprieve, meaning the sentence is likely to be reduced to a long prison term. Mr. Bo was expelled from the Communist Party in September, when the authorities began a formal criminal investigation."We still don't know what specific allegations lie behind the three charges against Bo Xilai," said Li Zhuang, a lawyer in Beijing who became one of Mr. Bo's fiercest critics after Mr. Li was jailed in Chongqing. Mr. Li had worked as a lawyer for a Chongqing businessman accused of running a criminal network."He could be accused of abusing power by trying to conceal or failing to report the Heywood murder," Mr. Li said in a telephone interview. "From what I've heard, the sums involved in the corruption case are not as much as in some other corruption cases, but I think Bo Xilai's damage to rule of law, private enterprise and justice was much worse than those other cases."An associate of Mr. Bo's family said the prosecution's case would feature Ms. Gu's testimony, although it was unclear whether she would appear at the trial or, as is often done in China, give written testimony. The associate, who spoke on the condition of anonymity to protect himself from official recrimination, said Ms. Gu might testify about, among other things, a villa in France that could form part of the corruption accusations. Phone calls to Mr. Bo's court-appointed lawyer, Li Guifang, were not immediately answered Sunday night.Mr. Bo has not been seen or heard in public since March last year, and it remains unclear whether he will contest the charges. But the government is taking no chances by holding the trial in Jinan, a city far from Chongqing. Many residents of Chongqing still think fondly of Mr. Bo.Another complication is that Mr. Bo is a "princeling" — the son of a revered revolutionary who served alongside Mao Zedong — and had personal ties with many other princelings, including Xi Jinping, who was appointed Communist Party chief in November. Since coming to office, Mr. Xi has promised to clean out corruption and waste in the party, and to remove crooked officials.A Chinese businessman who is friends with other princelings said some of them had continued to express misgivings that Mr. Bo was being treated too harshly, even if he deserved censure for his mistakes. He spoke on the condition of anonymity to preserve his friendships with party insiders.
HONG KONG — China's economy is cooling, and Asia's once-rosy prospects look less shiny than they did two years ago, but this has not deterred Sotheby's from choosing Hong Kong as the place to sell a rare multimillion-dollar diamond in October.The auction house announced Monday that the stone, "The Premier Blue," will be sold on Oct. 7 as part of Sotheby's regular twice-yearly auction series.The stone weighs 7.59 carats and is about the size of a shirt button. Its size, vivid blue color and round cut — highly unusual for colored diamonds — make it exceptionally rare, and Sotheby's expects the stone to bring about $19 million, Quek Chin Yeow, deputy chairman of Sotheby's in Asia, said in an interview before Monday's announcement. That, he said, would be a record per-carat price for any diamond.The choice of Hong Kong as a place to sell the stone underlines just how important Asia has become as a consumer of luxury items, as rapid growth has swelled the ranks of the ultrarich."Since about 2006, 2007, Hong Kong has ranked alongside Geneva and New York as a center for jewelry sales," Mr. Quek said. "It is now the third pillar of the global jewelry market."That the rapid growth has slowed has generally not dented the ability and willingness of these superrich to spend. The rich generally remain rich even when times are worse, luxury industry analysts said.Moreover, Mr. Quek said, Asian buyers tend to be more willing than their Western counterparts to seek out buying opportunities during uncertain times, often making purchases with an eye to potential price increases down the line. And when it comes to diamonds, they tend to like round cuts and colors — another reason for auctioning the Premier Blue in Asia rather than in Europe or the United States.Sotheby's is previewing the stone and other auction items around Asia, including in Beijing, Shanghai, Bangkok, Singapore, Jakarta and Taiwan — a reflection of the regional spread of buyers.About 25 percent to 30 percent of the money spent at the Hong Kong art and jewelry auctions comes from mainland Chinese buyers, but Hong Kong buyers are also very active, as are Singaporeans, Indonesians, Taiwanese and southeast Asians, Mr. Quek said.
BEIJING — Three Chinese ships are sailing east to join rare naval drills with the United States as Beijing ramps up its military diplomacy amid regional territorial disputes and other tensions.The ships left the port of Qingdao on Tuesday to participate in search-and-rescue drills with the U.S. Navy in the waters off Hawaii. Afterward, the ships will continue on to Australia and New Zealand for similar exercisesThe naval drills build on a commitment to create stronger ties made by President Barack Obama and Chinese leader Xi Jinping at a June summit in California, and are an "important mission of military diplomacy," deputy navy commander Xu Hongmeng said, according to the military's official newspaper, People's Liberation Army Daily.There have been only a handful of exercises at sea involving the two countries' navies, and this week's drills are the first since an unprecedented joint anti-piracy exercise was held last year off Somalia.The ships' departure came during a visit to the U.S. by Chinese Defense Minister Chang Wanquan, during which he and U.S. Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel spoke of expanded military cooperation. During the visit, Hagel said he would visit China next year for the first time since assuming the Pentagon's top job in February.The U.S. and Chinese militaries are also exchanging military officers for academic studies and holding talks on humanitarian assistance and disaster relief. In 2014, China's navy will participate for the first time in a major international maritime exercise known as Rim of the Pacific.The expanding military ties are part of an on-again, off-again drive to build trust even as Beijing continues to express wariness over Washington's strategic "pivot" to Asia, in which the bulk of U.S. Navy vessels are being positioned in the Pacific and broader alliances have been struck with regional allies such as Australia. China sees the moves as an effort to counter its expanding military and contain its growing economic and political influence.China's disputes with Vietnam, Malaysia, the Philippines and other Asian neighbors over territorial boundaries in the South China Sea are also an irritant, even though the U.S. insists it does not take sides in territorial claims.The Chinese navy flotilla on the current mission is made up of a supply ship, a frigate, and the guided missile destroyer Qingdao, which has taken the lead in China's naval diplomacy with visits to 21 countries. It also includes one shipboard helicopter and 680 officers and sailors.
BEIJING — Only a few people heard it, but when one of China's most prominent politicians slapped his police chief across the face, it would end up reverberating far and wide. The smack unleashed tales of murder and conspiracy at the highest levels of the Communist Party — and eventually, the politician's own undoing.A day earlier, the chief had confronted Bo Xilai, the party boss of the megacity of Chongqing, with some unwelcome information: He had evidence Bo's wife had killed a British businessman in China. Bo's stinging rebuke sent the top cop fleeing into the arms of American officials, creating the Communist Party's most embarrassing scandal in decades.Now the final chapter in the saga is about to unfold: a closely orchestrated trial, opening Thursday, in which the 64-year-old Bo is virtually assured of being convicted of corruption and abuse of power.Bo's trial will seal the political demise of a charismatic figure who cultivated a following by mobilizing the masses and sending his critics to labor camps. His naked ambition might have led to his fall.He had been a member of China's 25-member Politburo, and had been considered a contender for one of the seven seats on the party's all-powerful Politburo Standing Committee. Today, he is in many senses a nonentity; his own family has not seen him in 18 months."It's dealing with a ghost, really. The guy has been absolutely annihilated," said Kerry Brown, a former British diplomat in Beijing and China expert at the University of Sydney.Bo's ouster laid bare how he and other top officials reigned unfettered by the law in Chongqing, a sprawling city of 30 million people where skyscrapers have risen at the confluence of two rivers. The scandal also ruptured the Communist Party's facade of unity, exposing divisions at the highest echelons.Bo rode to nationwide fame by leading an anti-mafia crusade and mass sing-alongs of communist anthems in Chongqing, and by implementing populist policies that made him beloved with his region's poor. But his publicity-seeking ways angered leaders who were wary of any revival of the personality cult, chaos and bloodshed of the Mao Zedong era.The rising political star precipitated his downfall in January of 2012 by censuring his top aide, police chief Wang Lijun, and then stripping him of his powerful post.Spurned by his influential patron and fearing for his life, Wang slipped out of the city by car a week later and fled to the U.S. consulate in neighboring Chengdu to seek asylum. He brought explosive allegations: murder by a city boss's wife, a cover-up and other high-level machinations."It felt like something out of a spy thriller," U.S. Ambassador Gary Locke later said in an interview with Newsweek.The exact details of what Wang revealed remain unclear but an incomplete narrative rolled out by Chinese authorities in the months since sheds some light.The Bo family was once — outwardly — a picture of success: a telegenic politician and his devoted wife, Gu Kailai, a corporate lawyer who gave up her job to help her husband's ascent and raise their son. They nurtured a network of strong political, military and business connections aided by their pedigrees as the children of veteran revolutionaries.But in recent years, the official story goes, Gu descended into anxiety and paranoia. She became troubled by a dispute with a British associate of the family, Neil Heywood, who allegedly had demanded a multimillion-dollar commission on a property venture and threatened her son's life.In November 2011, Gu lured Heywood to a secluded hilltop retreat in Chongqing where she got him drunk and then, with an aide's help, poured cyanide into his mouth. Then she turned to Wang, who sent police officers to remove evidence, including hotel surveillance videos."It's all gone up in smoke, flown on a crane to paradise," the police chief told Gu after Heywood was declared dead by excessive drinking and his body was cremated.Unknown to Gu, Wang had recorded a phone conversation in which she'd confessed to the crime. He also had secretly saved samples from Heywood's heart and other evidence.Left out of the official account was a surprising twist that was exposed in court testimony: The police chief had helped Gu plot the murder from the start, but backed away from its execution. Also unclear is why Wang brought the murder allegations to his boss, though reports suggested that Wang hoped Bo would shield him from an unrelated graft investigation.His plan backfired, forcing him instead to flee to the U.S. consulate, prompting Chinese security vehicles to surround the building. Photos of the scene circulating on microblogs were the first public hints of trouble brewing. When Wang realized that asylum was not an option, he negotiated with Chinese officials for safe passage to Beijing.The murder allegations were not yet publicly known, but Wang's actions were considered a severe breach of party protocol.Three weeks later, at Beijing's annual national legislative sessions, Bo admitted lapses in judgment but defended himself and his anti-mafia campaign, which had come under fire for abuses of the legal process."I feel like I've failed in my supervision of my staff," Bo said, referring to Wang, as he leaned back in a large armchair. "This incident is something we need to seriously reflect on and sum up."Though he looked tired, his eyes puffy, Bo exuded his signature self-confidence and charm. He smiled often as he held court in a room crowded with journalists asking pointed questions.Raising his palm as if taking an oath, Bo deflected questions about whether he was jockeying for a top spot in China's political transfer of power, then under way. He blasted reports that suggested his then-24-year-old son led a playboy lifestyle, accusing his critics of "pouring filth" on his family.Bo insisted his true concern was China's rich-poor gap. "If only a few people are rich, then we are capitalists. We have failed."Those were his last remarks in public.Several days later, on March 14, 2012, then-outgoing Premier Wen Jiabao criticized Bo — without naming him — in a rare public rebuke of a party leader of that stature. Wen said Chongqing leaders "must seriously reflect on the Wang Lijun incident and learn lessons from it." Wen also took a swipe at Bo's Maoist reputation, saying China must guard against regressing to one of its most violent periods.The next day, Bo was dismissed as Chongqing party boss.At a labor camp in Chongqing, inmates cheered at the announcement on the evening news. "We all thought: He's finally getting what he deserves," said Fang Hong, a forestry official who had been sent to the camp for a year for posting a scatological ditty online that mocked Bo. He spent that year making Christmas lights for export to Germany.Fang's was no isolated case of extralegal abuse — dozens of people were locked up for various minor transgressions, said Fang, whose case was overturned by a court recently."It was a time of red terror," he said in a recent interview. "The labor camps were overflowing with people."The murder allegations against Bo's wife emerged after his dismissal. She has been convicted of murder and given a suspended death sentence that may be reduced to life in prison.Bo was stripped of further posts, including on the powerful Politburo. He now faces charges of interfering with the murder investigation, as well as bribery and embezzlement, in a trial in the city of Jinan.Bo Guagua, the couple's son, said in a statement released to The New York Times that he has been denied contact with both parents for the past 18 months.Bo Xilai's trial is expected to be a short affair with a predetermined outcome: guilt. Analysts note that in China's recent history of political purges, the fates of senior officials accused of corruption tend to be decided by backroom negotiations that have little to do with justice.
JINAN, China — The trial of ousted Chinese politician Bo Xilai will be televised live to reporters in eastern China, a Hong Kong-based broadcaster said, a landmark move by authorities to appear transparent as they put a lid on the country's biggest political scandal in decades.Bo, 64, is set to appear in public for the first time in 17 months in a court in the eastern city of Jinan in Shandong province on charges of bribery, corruption and abuse of power, capping the country's biggest political scandal since the 1976 downfall of the Gang of Four at the end of the Cultural Revolution.The trial will be televised live to reporters in a hotel in Jinan, where a media reception center has been set up specially for reporters, Phoenix Television reported late on Tuesday, citing an unnamed television official from Shandong. There will also be live microblogging, the broadcaster said.A court spokeswoman in Jinan told Reuters information about the proceedings would be given to journalists during the trial but said she had not received any information on whether it would be televised live. An official from state broadcaster CCTV said the trial would not be televised live nationally.The last television coverage of a major trial in China was when state television broadcast excerpts from the trial of the Gang of Four in 1980. Jiang Qing, the wife of Mao Zedong, was removed from the courtroom several times after shouting down judges and insulting witnesses as she stood trial for crimes committed during the Cultural Revolution.Bo's trial is officially scheduled to start on Thursday.But the charge of abuse of power against Bo relates to his flouting the authority of central leaders in Beijing, sources told Reuters on Tuesday, an allegation so sensitive that his trial could start one day sooner to hear it in secret.On Wednesday, however, there was no immediate sign that the trial had started.The trial of Bo, a charismatic and well-loved leader to some and a power-hungry politician to others, could sharpen rifts within a society that is already divided about his fate.About 10 supporters of Bo protested briefly outside the courthouse in Jinan, holding signs that said: "We're watching the Bo trial to see if it's fair and just.""Bo Xilai is not corrupt, Bo Xilai works for the people and is a good cadre," said a protester from Beijing surnamed Li. "Others have talked about serving the people but they have just left the people hanging out to dry and not done anything practical for the people.""I hope the Communist Party and (President) Xi Jinping will support justice."Before his dramatic fall last year, Bo, the party chief of Chongqing metropolis, was set to join the upper ranks of China's leadership. But his rise was stopped by a murder scandal involving his wife, Gu Kailai, and his former police chief, Wang Lijun.Both Gu and Wang have since been jailed over the scandal, which stems from the murder of British businessman Neil Heywood in November 2011.After his appointment as party boss of Chongqing in 2007, Bo turned the region into a showcase of revolution-inspired Maoist "red" culture, as well as state-led economic growth. Bo's populist ways were welcomed by many of Chongqing's 30 million residents - and others across the country."I have my own case for over 20 years and have come to see if Bo Xilai can get justice because if a member of the Politburo can get no justice, then we have no hope," Bao Runpu, a petitioner from northern Hebei province, said.Bo's son, Bo Guagua, has urged the authorities to allow his father to defend himself at his trial. Bo is almost certain to be found guilty, given that China's prosecutors and courts come under Communist Party control and courts have a 98 percent conviction rate.
BEIJING — Bo Guagua, the younger son of a fallen Communist Party leader scheduled to go on trial this week, made a rare public comment on the case on Monday, saying in a statement that he had been unable to communicate with his father or mother for a year and a half and drawing attention to their "clandestine detention."In a statement released to The New York Times on Monday, Mr. Bo, who lives in the United States, bemoaned his mother's conviction on a murder charge and said he hoped his father would be "granted the opportunity to answer his critics and defend himself."The father, Bo Xilai, is at the center of arguably the biggest scandal to shake the Communist Party in decades. His wife, Gu Kailai, was convicted last year in the poisoning death of a British businessman, and in July, Mr. Bo, a former Politburo member and party chief of the municipality of Chongqing, was charged with bribetaking, corruption and abuse of power. The party announced Sunday that his trial will start Thursday in Jinan, the capital of Shandong Province, which is far east of Chongqing.Political analysts said the outcome had almost certainly been decided already by party leaders, and Mr. Bo, 64, is expected to get a long prison sentence.Bo Guagua, a graduate of Harrow, Oxford University and the John F. Kennedy School of Government at Harvard, has just enrolled in Columbia Law School. The third generation of an aristocratic Communist family, he had led a privileged life until the downfall of his parents."It has been 18 months since I have been denied contact with either my father or my mother," Mr. Bo, 25, said in his statement. "I can only surmise the conditions of their clandestine detention and the adversity they each endure in solitude. I hope that in my father's upcoming trial, he is granted the opportunity to answer his critics and defend himself without constraints of any kind.""However, if my well-being has been bartered for my father's acquiescence or my mother's further cooperation, then the verdict will clearly carry no moral weight," he added.There has been speculation this week among Chinese political observers that the elder Mr. Bo or Ms. Gu might have acquiesced to demands from officials in exchange for a guarantee that no harm would come to their son.Ms. Gu was convicted last August of poisoning Neil Heywood, a British family associate who died in a hotel room in Chongqing the previous year. She received a suspended death sentence, which often equates to a life term.Some people briefed on the case have said Ms. Gu might have provided crucial testimony that prosecutors will present against Mr. Bo, though it was unclear whether Ms. Gu would appear in court.Those briefed on the case said the substance of two of the charges against Mr. Bo, bribetaking and corruption, appeared related more to Ms. Gu's actions than to his. Both charges supposedly involve financial transactions that took place when Mr. Bo was mayor of the northeastern port city of Dalian.The third charge, abuse of power, is said to be related to Mr. Bo's demotion of Wang Lijun, the police chief of Chongqing, who was in theory leading the investigation into Mr. Heywood's death and was tied to the Bo family in complicated ways.In his statement, Bo Guagua discussed the fate of his mother publicly for the first time since the scandal broke in early 2012."My mother, who is now silenced and defenseless, cannot respond to the opportunistic detractors that attack her reputation with impunity," Mr. Bo said. "She has already overcome unimaginable tribulation after the sudden collapse of her physical health in 2006 and subsequent seclusion. Although it is of little comfort to my anxiety about her state of health, I know that she will continue to absorb all that she is accused of with dignity and quiet magnanimity."Mr. Bo was referring to an illness that appeared to have struck Ms. Gu in Beijing when her husband was commerce minister. Family associates have said that the illness was debilitating, and that Ms. Gu became paranoid and was rarely seen in public afterward.Last year, family associates said in interviews that Ms. Gu believed she had been poisoned with a substance mixed into daily herbal medicine, and that she blamed mainly Li Wangzhi, the son from Mr. Bo's first marriage. That son's mother, Li Danyu, said in an interview that her family had played no role in any poisoning.After releasing the statement, Mr. Bo declined to answer any further questions about himself or his family, though he did confirm his enrollment at Columbia.Mr. Bo has released only one other statement after his father's downfall. In September, when the party announced some of its findings against the father, Mr. Bo said in a brief statement that his father was "upright in his beliefs and devoted to duty."
HONG KONG — Communist Party cadres have filled meeting halls around China to hear a somber, secretive warning issued by senior leaders. Power could escape their grip, they have been told, unless the party eradicates seven subversive currents coursing through Chinese society.These seven perils were enumerated in a memo, referred to as Document No. 9, that bears the unmistakable imprimatur of Xi Jinping, China's new top leader. The first was "Western constitutional democracy"; others included promoting "universal values" of human rights, Western-inspired notions of media independence and civic participation, ardently pro-market "neo-liberalism," and "nihilist" criticisms of the party's traumatic past.Even as Mr. Xi has sought to prepare some reforms to expose China's economy to stronger market forces, he has undertaken a "mass line" campaign to enforce party authority that goes beyond the party's periodic calls for discipline. The internal warnings to cadres show that Mr. Xi's confident public face has been accompanied by fears that the party is vulnerable to an economic slowdown, public anger about corruption and challenges from liberals impatient for political change."Western forces hostile to China and dissidents within the country are still constantly infiltrating the ideological sphere," says Document No. 9, the number given to it by the central party office that issued it in April. It has not been openly published, but a version was shown to The New York Times and was verified by four sources close to senior officials, including an editor with a party newspaper.Opponents of one-party rule, it says, "have stirred up trouble about disclosing officials' assets, using the Internet to fight corruption, media controls and other sensitive topics, to provoke discontent with the party and government."The warnings were not idle. Since the circular was issued, party-run publications and Web sites have vehemently denounced constitutionalism and civil society, notions that were not considered off limits in recent years. Officials have intensified efforts to block access to critical views on the Internet. Two prominent rights advocates have been detained in the past few weeks, in what their supporters have called a blow to the "rights defense movement," which was already beleaguered under Mr. Xi's predecessor, Hu Jintao.Mr. Xi's hard line has disappointed Chinese liberals, some of whom once hailed his rise to power as an opportunity to push for political change after a long period of stagnation. Instead, Mr. Xi has signaled a shift to a more conservative, traditional leftist stance with his "rectification" campaign to ensure discipline and conspicuous attempts to defend the legacy of Mao Zedong. That has included a visit to a historic site where Mao undertook one of his own attempts to remake the ruling party in the 1950s.Mr. Xi's edicts have been disseminated in a series of compulsory study sessions across the country, like one in the southern province of Hunan that was recounted on a local government Web site."Promotion of Western constitutional democracy is an attempt to negate the party's leadership," Cheng Xinping, a deputy head of propaganda for Hengyang, a city in Hunan, told a gathering of mining industry officials. Human rights advocates, he continued, want "ultimately to form a force for political confrontation."The campaign carries some risks for Mr. Xi, who has indicated that the slowing economy needs new, more market-driven momentum that can come only from a relaxation of state influence.In China's tight but often contentious political circles, proponents of deeper Western-style economic changes are often allied with those pushing for rule of law and a more open political system, while traditionalists favor greater state control of both economic and political life. Mr. Xi's cherry picking of approaches from each of the rival camps, analysts say, could end up miring his own agenda in intraparty squabbling.
BEIJING — At least 83 people have been killed in recent days in floods and landslides in three different parts of China, according to reports on Monday by Xinhua, the state news agency.With mass evacuations taking place, millions of other people across China have been affected by heavy rains and flooding.The greatest death toll was in Liaoning Province, in northeast China; at least 54 people had died by Monday morning and 97 were missing from the worst flooding in decades in the area around Fushun City, Xinhua reported.The flooding was the result of extreme rainstorms that hit the province starting Thursday and lasted until Saturday. The area is a major source of grain production in China.In Guangdong Province, in the south, at least 20 people had been killed by floods and landslides and 7 were missing after rains lashed the province over the weekend.In Hunan Province, north of Guangdong, at least 9 people were dead, 54 were injured and 1 was missing after heavy rains caused landslides in Lanshan County over the weekend.
BEIJING — A Chinese bus driver angry over being punished by his company drove a bus into a pack of bicyclists and motorcyclists on Wednesday, injuring 27 people, the official Xinhua News Agency said.The bus driver — identified only by his surname Li — had been fined 200 yuan ($32) by his company for exceeding the speed limit in July and put on leave after he refused to write a self-criticism letter, Xinhua said.The upset driver went to a maintenance shop without the knowledge of his company and took an empty bus which he plowed into the people in the southern Chinese city of Shunde in Guangdong province, according to the state-run China News service.Xinhua said Li slammed into one motorbike, 10 mopeds and five bicycles. Of the injured, two were in serious condition, it said.Li was detained by police on charges of endangering public safety, Xinhua said.
JINAN, China — Officials say ousted politician Bo Xilai has denied some of the bribery accusations against him in his $4 million corruption trial — part of his first public comments since his detention early last year in one of China's biggest political scandals.The Jinan Intermediate People's Court quoted Bo as saying Thursday that he denied taking bribes from development corporation official in the northeastern city of Dalian."I hope the judge will reasonably and fairly judge, and judge this according to the laws of our country," Bo also was quoted as saying in a stream of microblog postings issued by the court.The tweets by court officials were a rare display of openness for a high-profile political trial in China.
JINAN, China — Outside the courthouse where fallen political juggernaut Bo Xilai is about to stand trial, a woman pumped her fist, declared him a champion of ordinary folks and shouted that punishing him will turn the world upside down. Another woman rode up on a bicycle topped with a pink umbrella and yelled, "Give me justice!" But she wasn't talking about Bo at all.China's most anticipated trial in years begins here Thursday when Bo, former Communist Party leader in the megacity of Chongqing, faces charges of corruption and abuse of power. But on Wednesday the venue presented a rare opportunity for a few dozen people, fans of the fallen politician and government critics alike, to let off steam in front of a gaggle of international reporters.Police, usually keen to clamp down on any sign of public dissent, mostly left the protesters alone. By the afternoon they were stretching police tape across trees near the court entrance and setting up plastic road dividers along the curb.Bo was a media-savvy politician who rose to great power as he championed populist policies and tapped into nostalgic feelings by encouraging the singing of old communist anthems. He fell from grace last year after his police chief made an embarrassing flight to a U.S. consulate with revelations that Bo's wife had murdered a British businessman.Bo has not been seen publicly or by his family for a year and a half, but even now he enjoys some residual popularity."He did real work for the ordinary people," a woman in a blue dress said outside the marble-clad courthouse. She would give only her surname, Li.A retired office worker who traveled from Beijing to attend the proceedings, Li said she was a fan of sing-alongs of old communist songs, but she faulted the Communist Party for high housing prices and unaffordable medical care."Where will the people's cries be heard? How can the people live in this society?" she said. "People believe that Bo Xilai is a good cadre and a good leader. If he should fall, this society's black and white has completely been reversed."Bo's Communist revival efforts had alarmed the elite in China's previous administration who were wary of the violent excesses of the Mao Zedong's radical era and of any one politician gaining prominence. However, China's new Communist Party leader Xi Jinping, installed last fall, appears keen to use some of Mao's tactics, including an ideological campaign urging cadres to purify themselves of corruption and bind more closely to the masses.The trial is widely expected to be a brief proceeding with a conviction virtually assured. There had been speculation that part of the trial might be held in secret ahead of the announced opening day, but there were little signs of any proceedings outside the courthouse Wednesday. Calls to Bo's lawyers rang unanswered.A migrant worker in a white polo shirt was among those angry about the prosecution. He refused to give his name but said he traveled from his native Anhui province to show his admiration for the way Bo fought for laborers' wages in Chongqing."This trial is illegal. We will not acknowledge any verdict whatsoever," the bespectacled man said. "I live at society's lowest level, but I have a Chinese person's conscience."Zhu Zhiyong, a judge from Yunnan county who was on holiday in Jinan, spoke out in defense of Chinese legal system as he stood outside the courthouse to read a notice about Bo's trial."Only the courts can define the crimes of suspects. No other organizations can judge whether someone is guilty or no," Zhu said. "I don't think what some people are saying is true, that this trial is only a formality."Uniformed police officers stood on either side of the courthouse's main gate and on nearby street corners. Journalists gathered across a narrow two-lane street to photograph the building, as did curious onlookers, some of whom lugged folding chairs and babies in strollers.The trial also drew people with grievances unrelated to the case. Jinan resident Chen Sixue rode to the courthouse in a yellow bicycle with a pink umbrella attachment, and later strode to the courthouse entrance, where she draped a long sheet of printed paper over her head. She yelled, "People should be equal before the law! Give me justice!"Chen said she had been lobbying authorities to punish the criminal gang she held responsible for her husband's death in 1994. She spoke for several minutes before a few police officers pushed her away.Wu Huizhen, a 58-year-old Beijing resident who says her home was demolished in 1993 without adequate compensation, said she traveled to Jinan to "see what Chinese justice looks like.""Ordinary people have no protections," Wu said. "It's not only Bo Xilai who is corrupt. They are all corrupt."
BEIJING — Three years ago, the mayor of China's sprawling southwestern city of Chongqing was asked to describe how well he got along with his then boss, the ambitious Communist Party leader Bo Xilai."Like fish and water," the portly Huang Qifan told reporters on the sidelines of the annual full session of parliament, using a Chinese expression meaning an almost symbiotic relationship. "Everything is great, magnificent. The whole Communist Party secretariat works smoothly together with one mind."Bo was dramatically ousted from his post last year following lurid accusations of corruption and murder.Huang, still Chongqing mayor, said this year that Bo's legacy had been "banished", and the "vanity projects" he championed which "tired the people and drained money" would never be allowed to happen again.As Bo goes on trial this week, Huang's survival in office is a signal of China's hesitation in fully taking its customary hard line against senior party members who fall from grace.Several junior officials lost their jobs or were detained because of their proximity to Bo, but Huang is one of two senior allies not purged, underlining the leadership's caution as new President Xi Jinping seeks to maintain stability and unity.Bo was an advocate of populist, leftist welfare policies and his downfall exposed ideological schisms in the party and society at large which still exist.Xi needs unstinting support at a party plenum later this year to endorse an ambitious program to rebalance the world's second-largest economy and will be keen to put the Bo scandal behind him with a minimum of fuss.Huang's survival, which has come against all the odds, was ensured once he had disavowed his former mentor.The mayor was once seen as the brains behind Bo's grandiose economic plans for foggy Chongqing, which included an ambitious urban renewal scheme and an egalitarian narrowing of the stark rural-urban income gap.He was Bo's right-hand man, even as the party chieftain's rule began to crumble when his police chief Wang Lijun sought political asylum at the U.S. consulate in nearby Chengdu city in February last year.Huang led security personnel to besiege the U.S. mission, according to sources with ties to the leadership or with direct knowledge of the case.Wang had fled there after confronting Bo with information that his glamorous lawyer wife, Gu Kailai, had murdered the couple's friend, British businessman Neil Heywood, setting off the scandal which eventually bought Bo down.Wang hid in the consulate for more than 24 hours until officials from Beijing coaxed him out and put him on a flight to the capital, where he divulged details of the murder safely away from Bo.Both Wang and Gu were jailed last year.After Bo's downfall, Huang redeemed himself by writing a self-criticism - a throwback to the Mao-era practice of self-denunciations for political or ideological mistakes - and selling out Bo, the sources said."He exposed Bo Xilai's ambitions," a source with leadership ties said, referring to Bo's barely concealed public campaign for a seat on the Communist Party's powerful inner circle, the Politburo Standing Committee."Huang Qifan also exposed wiretapping by Wang Lijun," the source said, referring to the bugging of telephone calls between then-President Hu Jintao and a central government anti-corruption investigator who was in Chongqing."Politically, he (Huang) is someone who can't be knocked down," the source said. "But he stayed on also to stabilize Chongqing.""Once Bo Xilai went down, people defected, and I think Huang Qifan is a very good example of that," said Bo Zhiyue, an expert on elite Chinese politics at the National University of Singapore, who is not related to Bo Xilai."As long as you distance yourself from this person, you criticize them, you offer evidence or whatever, you cooperate with the authorities, you will be ok," he added.A number of Bo's most prominent cronies and supporters have however been either sacked or detained, including Xia Zeliang, party secretary of Chongqing's Nanan district, and Xu Ming, a plastics-to-property billionaire entrepreneur whose long association with Bo extended for over two decades.However, another senior Bo ally who has so far survived is Zhou Yongkang, once China's powerful domestic security tsar.Zhou was implicated in rumors last year that he hesitated in supporting the party's move against Bo. However, his reputation was also dented when security forces failed to prevent blind dissident Chen Guangcheng from fleeing to the U.S. embassy in Beijing from house arrest in a nearby province last year.The hulking, grim-faced 70-year-old Zhou stepped down along with most members of the Standing Committee at the 18th party congress last November.His replacement failed to get a position on the new Standing Committee and was only given membership of the larger Politburo, which showed party concerns the domestic security position had become too powerful and also that Zhou was out of favor.Speculation continues to surround Zhou, fueled earlier this month by a story from U.S.-based Chinese news site Duowei, which said he was being investigated for graft. However, the report was later withdrawn and the government has not commented.Three of Zhou's allies are currently under investigation, including the deputy party boss of Sichuan province, Li Chuncheng, who had for many years overseen development of the province's prosperous capital, Chengdu.However, sources with ties to the leadership, as well as analysts, are skeptical Zhou will be taken into custody because of an unwritten rule that incumbent and retired members of the Standing Committee are immune from prosecution."The norm has been to avoid attacking (incumbent) and former Standing Committee members, for if they do so it opens a Pandora's box," said the University of Singapore's Bo.
BEIJING — The paraphernalia of the global left litters the bookstore called Utopia on the sixth floor of an office tower here: tomes titled "Mao Zedong's Road to Success" and "The Marxian Legacy," and canvas satchels with Che Guevara's visage.But the store's most important product, a Web site that gives voice to the Chinese left, is missing. "It's still shut down," said a woman working at the store. Chinese officials forced the site to close in April 2012 because of its fervent backing of Bo Xilai, the former Communist official who invoked Maoist talk to rally popular support during his four-year governance of Chongqing in southwest China. A new site set up by the store is used mainly to sell books and publish nonpolemical commentaries.With Mr. Bo set to go on trial on Thursday on charges of corruption, taking bribes and abusing power, China's leaders are engaged in a delicate balancing act. On the one hand, they aim to parade Mr. Bo as a criminal and silence his most vocal supporters. On the other, they want to avoid tarring the leftist policies he championed or alienating important revolutionary families.The tension lays bare the continuing need to preserve the vaunted place of the party's original ideology in China's political life, nearly 35 years after the party turned from Maoism to economic reform and opening. As Mr. Bo showed, the ideology remains the most fundamental wellspring that Chinese politicians can tap for popular support and legitimacy. Some political analysts say China's leader, Xi Jinping, is taking a page from the Bo playbook when he stresses the importance of learning from Mao and Marx and pushes an old-school "mass line" rectification campaign among party officials.Those analysts, and leftist allies of Mr. Bo, point out that the charges against him deal mainly with financial transgressions earlier in his career — taking bribes from Xu Ming, a tycoon and old friend, is said to be the biggest criminal act— rather than anything substantially related to the controversial policies he championed during his governance of Chongqing. There, from 2008 to his dismissal in March 2012, when a murder scandal involving his wife and a dead British businessman emerged, he pushed policies in the name of socialist revival. They ranged from building low-cost housing to promoting mass Communist "red song" singalongs to battling corruption in a "strike black" campaign that liberals criticized for its human rights abuses."People believed in Bo Xilai because he held up the banner of Mao Zedong," said Yang Fan, a professor at the China University of Political Science and Law, and a founder of the Utopia Web site. "If you don't use the banner of Mao, you're nobody. Who would believe in you?""Even more than Bo Xilai," Mr. Yang added, Mr. Xi "uses a lot of Mao's words."Yet as the trial approaches, the party is intensifying its clampdown on Mr. Bo's leftist supporters. Some have been detained, others ordered to avoid making public comments. In late June, a former college teacher, Wang Zheng, who had gone to Chongqing to help local Bo supporters find exculpatory evidence, was forced to fly back to Beijing, where she was detained in the suburbs, according to a first-person account posted online.Fears of Bo-inspired dissent are not unfounded. Ardent leftists have insisted that the prosecution of Mr. Bo is rooted in personal vendettas. The "Red Hometown" Web site signified the party's announcement of his trial date on Sunday with a headline beginning, "Tragedy!" Leftist commentators have continued to depict the case as a plot. Last year, leftists circulated an extraordinary petition online calling for the impeachment of Wen Jiabao, a political enemy of Mr. Bo who was then the prime minister; it got more than 1,600 signatures.Recently, a group of Maoists revived the campaign, and a version of the updated petition supposedly had 3,000 signatures.China's far left is small, but is a vocal part of the political agitation allowed under party controls. For the party, loyalists who embrace Marx and Mao as patron saints are useful watchdogs to be unleashed against liberal voices.But as the party pursued policies that created huge gaps in wealth and a vastly moneyed elite, many leftists found in Mr. Bo — with his expensive suits, foreign business friends and a son educated at elite schools in Britain and the United States — an unlikely beacon. The son of one of the revered "Eight Immortals" who helped lead the party in the Mao and Deng Xiaoping eras, he pursued a place on the elite Politburo Standing Committee by turning Chongqing into a showcase for policies aimed at securing both market prosperity and socialist equality.Many on China's far left embraced him as a potential ally; he in turn burnished his new image by luring leftist journalists, writers and intellectuals to his fief to extol the "Chongqing model" and sing red with him. (They ignored that staunch defenders of the capitalist way were also among the pilgrims — Henry Kissinger gave a speech in praise of Mr. Bo at one gala.)"Bo Xilai's Chongqing model showed that the current system can be used to restore relations between the party and the people," said Zhang Hongliang, a teacher in Beijing who is an intellectual leader of the hard-line left. "The people in Chongqing used to say, 'The Communist Party has come back.' "Mr. Zhang said that after Mr. Bo's fall, some leftists turned against party leaders. "In particular, many people who originally supported Xi Jinping began to complain about him," he said."Because of the Bo Xilai incident, the whole left wing is a mess," he added, referring to "a massive split" between those condemning the party and others who, like himself, still seek to influence it from within.One of those who hardened against party leaders is Han Deqiang, another founder of Utopia and an associate professor at the Beijing University of Aeronautics and Astronautics."This is an unjust case with charges trumped up out of nothing or exaggerated accusations grafted on from elsewhere," he said.Like others, he said he had noticed Mr. Xi and fellow party leaders donning Mr. Bo's neo-Maoist mantle after taking power in November. "China is walking on the path of Bo Xilai without Bo Xilai himself," Mr. Han said. "What it proclaims in public banners is still the same as what Bo Xilai did in Chongqing. But the problem is, a Bo Xilai road without Bo Xilai lacks substance. It's flimsy and fake."This week, Mr. Xi gave a speech in which he stressed the continued importance of Marxism. But he also appeared to try to reinforce conformity."It's up to propaganda and ideological work to consolidate the guiding status of Marxism in the ideological sphere," Mr. Xi told a conference of propaganda officials in Beijing, the Xinhua news agency reported Tuesday. "We must uphold, consolidate and strengthen mainstream thinking and opinion."Li Weidong, a political analyst and magazine editor, noted that the party leadership would have a hard time convincing leftist critics like Mr. Han that the trial was anything other than the climax of a political struggle. "They need Bo to directly admit guilt and apologize in his own voice on television," Mr. Li said. "Otherwise, it's even easier for the left to say it's all just a fraud."
HONG KONG — The Chinese authorities said on Tuesday that they would set up a group to coordinate financial regulation, in an apparent attempt to reduce risk and wean the economy off easy credit and steer it toward a slower, more sustainable expansion.The new agency will, among other things, coordinate monetary policy and financial regulatory policies, help regulate financial products where jurisdiction overlaps, and coordinate information-sharing and statistics, an announcement on the Chinese government's Web site said.The entity will be led by the central bank and will include representatives from banking, stock market and insurance regulators, as well as the State Administration of Foreign Exchange.Described in a Xinhua report as an "interdepartmental joint conference system for financial regulation," the body appears to lack real enforcement or policy-making powers, which will remain with a host of other agencies in the financial sector. The group will "not alter the current system of financial regulation, and will not replace or weaken the current division of responsibilities of the relevant agencies," the government announcement said.The new arrangement appears to be "more of a coordinating scheme rather than a decision-making agent," Zhu Haibin, chief China economist at JPMorgan in Hong Kong, said in an e-mail. "However, given the member composition, it will have a very important advisory role on financial regulation."The plans for better coordination also highlight Beijing's acute awareness of the need to contain the risks that have built up within the country's financial system amid a lending splurge that followed the global financial crisis in 2008.At the time, the authorities in Beijing announced a stimulus package worth 4 trillion renminbi, or $654 billion at current exchange rates, and instructed banks to lend freely. Those efforts helped the Chinese economy bounce back quickly from the global downturn.But the availability of cheap cash also led to a sharp increase in debt and in credit-financed projects undertaken with little regard to their ability to pay off the loans.More recently, a sharp increase in so-called shadow banking — activities outside the formal banking sector that often entail riskier, less regulated lending — has further fanned concerns about credit quality.The government leadership that took the helm in March has been fairly outspoken about potential financial risks and has sought to rein in shadow banking activities. A cash squeeze engineered by the central bank in June, for example, was widely seen as an effort to prompt banks to adopt a more prudent approach to lending.But that episode also caused a period of market nervousness and fueled concerns about the effect that more restrictive lending would have on economic activity. A report from a major government research body warning of risks to the financial system from poor coordination appeared to show that the government was eager to minimize disruption and exert more control over the shadow banking system."During the course of withdrawing stimulus policies, the major tightening of monetary policy and regulatory policies has lacked effective coordination," said the report from the State Council Development Research Center, which advises the central government. It was published in the China Economic Times on Tuesday."This has had a massive impact on the entire financial system, especially the banking system," the report said.The center's researchers said the financial tightening policies had successfully prevented excessively fast growth and a rebound in inflation. But it had also created risks of their own by encouraging financing activities outside the regulated system and by encouraging banks to rapidly expand new products off their usual balance sheets."Lack of unity in regulatory policies and the lagging of development of the related legal framework has increased the difficulty of defusing risks from the shadow banking sector," the researchers said.Those failings have allowed banks to get around regulators by, for example, using investment funds and other entities, the report said."The even deeper reason why regulatory policies have been so disparate and lacked unity is that reform of our country's current financial legal system lags so badly behind," it added. "This is also, at present, the biggest difficulty we face in establishing effective mechanisms to isolate risks and defuse the risks in shadow banking."
BEIJING — Much of China was riveted to the stream of microblog updates from the trial of disgraced politician Bo Xilai — even a TV anchorwoman on a live national program checked her cellphone for the latest posting.The Jinan Intermediate People's Court in eastern China began its blow-by-blow updates on its Sina Weibo microblog 21 minutes before the trial opened Thursday and updated steadily through the day, including details on testimony, photos and even an audio clip from a key witness."When the court's Weibo is the only source of information about the trial, is it wrong to check my cellphone?" anchorwoman Yang Shu of Phoenix TV wrote on her own microblog. "It's better to announce the information with my head down than having nothing to say with my head up. This is the era of new media."Followers of the court's Weibo postings jumped from 70,000 to more than 300,000 during the day, and some posts were reposted tens of thousands of times, including a photo of Bo standing trial in a white shirt with his hands crossed in front of himself without a pair of cuffs.The display of openness was unprecedented in China, where this kind of political trial is normally considered orchestrated political theater with a foregone conclusion of guilt. Some reporters for state media were also allowed in the courtroom.Zhang Zhi'an, a journalism professor at Sun Yet-sen University in the southern Chinese city of Guangzhou, said the posts were a clever move by the court in that they offered the appearance of openness while retaining the control of information."The postings could be selective," Zhang said.Beijing-based rights lawyer Pu Zhiqiang said the posts did not make up for the fact that Bo had been barred from meeting with his family for 18 months and could not choose his own lawyers."Without fair procedures, how can you have a fair outcome?" Pu said.Nevertheless, the Weibo posts mark progress in transparency, said Yang Dali, a political scientist at the University of Chicago Center in Beijing."It is a great move by the Jinan court. In many ways, it has lent a lot more credibility to this case," Yang said. "You read the case, and you can get a sense of different personalities. It is a very riveting case so far."The court made 59 posts on Thursday, portraying an orderly but lively courtroom with lengthy recounts of the exchanges among the defendant, his lawyers, prosecutors, witnesses and the judge.In one exchange, prosecutors accused Bo of taking bribes from business associate Tang Xiaolin. Bo flatly denied the accusation. "The matter of me taking money on three occasions, as Tang Xiaolin said, does not exist," he said, adding that he had once admitted the bribe-taking only because of "mental pressure."Prosecutors later responded: "Judge, the defendant has not provided truthful testimony in this court. On the issue of Tang Xiaolin giving money three times to the defendant, the prosecution will provide evidence that will verify it."At one point, Bo appeared to thoroughly cross-examine a businessman who alleged he paid bribes to the politician.Shanghai-based lawyer Si Weijiang said the court's posts offered more details than expected. "Bo's challenges to the allegations were quite powerful, and they are based on his personality, and he is not an easy person," he said.
BEIJING — With detailed online transcripts carried by China's version of Twitter, Beijing is making an unprecedented effort to show its people that the trial of ousted politician Bo Xilai is fair and above board, but the court case is little more than theatre.Never before has the stability and unity-obsessed ruling Communist Party allowed the gritty and colorful details of such a sensitive trial to be publicized almost real-time to the population at large.None of this means, however, that China has turned a corner in efforts to push the rule of law and official transparency.Bo, the 64-year-old former party chief of the southwestern city of Chongqing, has been charged with illegally taking almost 27 million yuan ($4.41 million), corruption and abuse of power and will almost certainly be found guilty in China's most political trial in decades.The party is almost certainly preventing any really embarrassing outbursts from Bo from appearing, has banned the world's media from the courtroom and is certainly not broadcasting it live on national television.Even the "Gang of Four" trial Mao Zedong's wife Jiang Qing in 1980 for crimes committed during the Cultural Revolution, previously the country's most dramatic case, was only shown in part on state television.Jiang was removed from the courtroom several times after shouting down judges and insulting witnesses - a scene the party would never want to risk the whole country seeing with Bo.The party is simply hoodwinking people with its use of the court microblog, Jiang's former defense lawyer, Zhang Sizhi, told Reuters."Making a microblog public is just their ruse, it's meaningless," Zhang said."Because if you can post microblogs, why can't you broadcast it live?" he added. "It shows that they aren't transparent, they are just pretending to be."Still, the court's Sina Weibo microblog has proved a huge hit, and an apparent temporary relaxation of censorship has allowed users to post comments about Bo which normally are swiftly removed, many supportive of his fiery defense and ridiculing the prosecution for relying on hearsay."Too funny! I can't believe they actually believed those casual comments and brought them out as evidence. Are they stupid or do they have some secret motive? Go Bo Xilai!" wrote one Weibo user."Looks like he'll only be sentenced to 3-5 years in the end. Great happiness," wrote another.On Thursday, the number of people following the court's microblog feed jumped from 40,000 early morning to 2 million in the late afternoon."This is the most difficult case since the trial of the Gang of Four and Chinese society has profoundly changed over the three decades," said Cheng Li, a senior fellow at the Brookings Institution in Washington. "You can't have a completely secret trial."Reuters had applied to attend the Bo trial, but a court official rejected the request due to limited space - a reason that authorities typically give for politically sensitive cases."No one in China believes that Bo is getting a fair trial," said Nicholas Bequelin, senior researcher at New York-based Human Rights Watch."This is not sufficient to enhance the trust that the citizenry has in its judicial system. This is a very carefully crafted piece of political theatre."But some transparency to the trial is better than none, said He Weifang, a law professor at Peking University who has followed Bo's downfall closely."Bo Xilai is of course a popular political star, so publishing some of the transcript will allow many people to understand better what's going on," He said."Many people have serious doubts about this case. He's a hero to lots of people."
HONG KONG — China's fast growing air travel market is the world's second biggest. But when it comes to flight delays, it's No. 1.Shanghai resident Chen Chen learned the hard way on a recent business trip when she flew out of Inner Mongolia about 24 hours later than scheduled. Her evening flight to Beijing was delayed until the next day and when staff couldn't give her a departure time, she bought a ticket on another airline. That flight left late too."That's the worst experience I've ever had," said Chen, a modeling agent. "I was numb when I reached Beijing. No words. I just wanted to kiss the ground."Chen's ordeal was typical of the problems faced by many air travelers in China. Delays are so frequent and lengthy that scenes of travelers smashing up check-in desks, brawling with staff or storming the tarmac have verged on the commonplace.According to official figures, 75 percent of China's flights left on time last year. But private surveys paint a different picture. A recent report by travel industry monitor FlightStats Inc. found that just 18 percent of flights at Beijing's airport left on time in June, the lowest proportion among 35 airports worldwide, with Shanghai second at 29 percent. Eight of the 10 worst performing airlines were mainland Chinese carriers.The chronic delays underscore the challenges for China's domestic carriers as they strive to meet booming passenger demand. They face two longstanding problems that won't be easy to fix. The first and biggest is the powerful military's tight control of airspace, which analysts say leaves as little as 20 percent of the country's airspace for civilian traffic.Congestion is inevitable as jetliners are forced into narrow air corridors that snake through restricted military airspace. Those airways will become even bigger bottlenecks, with demand for domestic air travel forecast by IATA to grow 10 percent a year in China, adding nearly 160 million new passengers by 2016."You start to have a pressure cooker of flights growing faster than there is space available to accommodate them," said Will Horton, an analyst at CAPA The Center for Aviation. "Until there is reform of air traffic, growth will be stunted."In the U.S. and many other countries, most airspace is given over to civilian traffic while military zones are typically small and in remote areas far from busy airports.In China, planes are routinely delayed when the military shuts down civilian airspace at short notice for air drills. Delays also happen when large thunderstorms sweep in, as is common in summer. Pilots say they're routinely denied permission to detour around storms into restricted military areas in order to avoid severe turbulence. So planes typically sit on the ground waiting for clearance."Those delays build up and it cascades through the rest of the system, so by the evening, the system is clogged," said Todd Siena, partner at Shanghai-based consultancy Avia-Tek.Sometimes, no reasons are given for are delays.Pat Morris, a former pilot for Asian carrier Dragonair, said on one flight from Hong Kong to Beijing, air traffic control demanded the plane go into a holding pattern for an indefinite period while it was still two hours away from its destination.After the crew replied by saying the plane wouldn't have enough fuel to land in Beijing, controllers told them to pick an alternate airport for a landing."We queried the reason for this request and we were told, 'weather at Beijing.' However no adverse weather was reported or encountered," he said. They managed to "negotiate" so that they could continue on to Beijing "without much delay," he said.The second problem is air traffic control that some industry experts say has become unduly cautious after Chinese regulators were shocked into focusing on safety after a string of fatal accidents at domestic Chinese carriers in the 1990s.Pilots complain about longer separation distances, with planes being kept as much as 10 miles (16 kilometers) apart on landings at airports, compared to three miles (five kilometers) in other countries. They're also required to stay 2,000 feet (610 meters) apart vertically, twice the distance elsewhere.On landing, Chinese controllers require pilots to descend to certain levels and airspeeds while in other countries, pilots can make a continuous descent to the airport."It's almost like a staircase. And as you go each step further, then you have to slow down," said Christopher Jackson, a director at Shanghai-based aviation investment firm Genesis. "That means more time in the air. When you're controlling the aircraft in that manner, it's easier for them to get backed up."Authorities have tried to get around the problem with new measures, including a recent decision allowing planes to take off regardless of conditions at their destinations. They're also building dozens of new airports, including a new one in Beijing slated to open in 2018 that would help ease some of the load at the city's existing international airport, the world's second busiest with 82 million passengers a year.But experts say such measures are stopgaps. What's needed is deep-rooted reform, though there's little sign that the People's Liberation Army is willing to loosen its grip on airspace.A new airport is "like putting a Band-Aid on a gunshot wound," said Jackson, adding that pace of reform is up to President Xi Jinping, who is the ultimate head of the military and the aviation regulator."I think Chinese air travelers are going to be stuck with delays until President Xi decides that he wants to do something about it," Jackson said.If the delays aren't resolved, more people could opt to travel on the high-speed trains, an increasingly viable competitor. Authorities plan to double the country's high-speed rail network to 18,000 kilometers (11,120 miles) by 2015."While a flight from Beijing to Shanghai may be faster than the train, a delay could make the air journey longer and sway a preference to trains," which are more convenient because they offer wireless Internet, said Horton.Chen, the business traveler, said that after her nightmare journey, "I'll try to take high-speed trains as much as I can, to avoid taking planes."She said her fellow passengers got angry when they learned about the extended delay to their late evening flight from Hohhot, the capital of the Inner Mongolia region. They yelled at staff and threw plastic drink bottles at a senior manager. Chen complained no helped her find a hotel."No one took care of us. No food, no drink," she said. She got a refund and flew on another airline instead of trying to get compensation. "I was just so desperate" to get home, she said.Researcher Fu Ting in Shanghai contributed to this report.
JINAN, China — Ousted Chinese politician Bo Xilai denied on Thursday one of the charges of bribery against him, a court in eastern China quoted him as saying as he appeared at the start of his trial.Bo was charged with receiving about 21.8 million yuan ($3.56 million) in bribes from Xu Ming, a plastics-to-property entrepreneur who is a close friend, and Tang Xiaolin, the general manager of Hong Kong-based export company Dalian International Development Ltd, the court said.Bo said he did not accept any bribes from Tang, according to a microblog by the Jinan court in eastern China.
SHANGHAI — For years, Xu Ming, once a little-known entrepreneur from northeastern China, worked his way into the good graces of the families of China's political elite.He cared for the parents and children of the powerful, accompanied officials on foreign trips and enriched their relatives — as well as himself — through early investments in businesses that eventually went public.Mr. Xu, however, is now in custody, and one of his most important relationships has become a central piece of evidence in the much-anticipated trial of the former Politburo member Bo Xilai, which began Thursday morning, according to a microblog post by the court.Mr. Xu, who is 42, funneled millions of dollars in bribes to Mr. Bo and his family, including paying for trips and perhaps even giving the family a $3.5 million villa on the French Riviera, according to people briefed on the indictment against Mr. Bo that was read by the prosecution when the trial got under way.Those charges — along with accusations that Mr. Bo abused power by obstructing a murder investigation — could result in a lengthy prison term for Mr. Bo, the son of a Communist revolutionary and once a top Chinese leader whose fall from power last year shook the political establishment.But the Communist Party's decision to rely on evidence linked to the businessman could also be risky, analysts say, because Mr. Bo was by no means Mr. Xu's only political patron.Although the trial itself was closed to the public and its proceedings expected to be released only selectively by the state news media, judicial scrutiny of how broad political connections can greatly enrich an otherwise obscure businessman could prove delicate to more than one member of the Chinese leadership — and raise questions about whether Mr. Xu's ties to other leaders should receive legal scrutiny.There have been no publicly announced charges against Mr. Xu, and there is no evidence that his links to other prominent political clans included the kind of direct payments he was alleged to have made to Mr. Bo. But according to public records obtained by The New York Times, Mr. Xu had close business and personal ties to family members of several senior Chinese officials, including the former prime minister, Wen Jiabao, who was one of Mr. Bo's chief political rivals.Mr. Xu had unusual access to the homes of Beijing leaders, offered to care for some of their parents and even traveled with some of them on official visits abroad, according to longtime business partners of Mr. Xu's and government travel records.In 2002, for instance, he accompanied Wu Yi, then state councilor, on a trip to the Middle East. Back home, visitors to his company, Dalian Shide, included the then-Politburo members Huang Ju and Li Changchun.And beginning in the late 1990s, Mr. Xu co-invested in a series of private companies with the relatives of Mr. Wen, who retired last March. Mr. Xu for a time even dated Mr. Wen's only daughter, Wen Ruchun, according to close associates."He was a public relations genius," said Larry Cheng, one of Mr. Xu's longtime business partners. "He was helping everyone in the leadership. He knew just who to get close to and how to do it."Mr. Xu and members of the Wen family could not be reached for comment. But Mr. Xu's ability to curry favor with China's ruling elite shines a light on how some business gets done in this country's tightly regulated economy.To get access to land, licenses and capital, Chinese entrepreneurs say they are expected to cater to the needs of Communist Party officials and their families. That can mean paying school tuition, entertaining spouses and giving corporate shares to the relatives of public officials.But it also makes them vulnerable when an official they are close to gets forced out in a power struggle and is accused of corruption.
JINAN, China — The trial of Bo Xilai, the fallen Communist Party aristocrat, began Thursday morning in a closed-door hearing in this eastern provincial capital, after security officers, journalists and some supporters of the charismatic Mr. Bo had fanned out in the streets around a downtown courthouse, looking for signs of how the session might unfold.A microblog post by the court said that Mr. Bo was brought in around 8:50 a.m., and that the prosecution read out the charges against him.The scandal that brought down Mr. Bo is arguably the biggest one to shake the party in decades, and China's leaders have had to take into account powerful competing forces — from liberal party officials who have denounced Mr. Bo to revolutionary families still close to him — while preparing for the trial.Detained by security officials since March 2012, Mr. Bo was indicted in late July on charges of corruption, taking bribes and abuse of power. The charges came almost one year after his wife, Gu Kailai, was given a suspended death sentence for murdering Neil Heywood, a British family associate. The trial that starts Thursday is expected to be the final blow to Mr. Bo's vaunted political career. Until last year he was one of 25 Politburo members and party chief of the municipality of Chongqing; he had even been considered a candidate for one of the very highest party posts, which were handed out in November.The Bo case has exposed deep-rooted corruption and vindictiveness at the top levels of the party and cast a spotlight on the growing power of the "princelings," those privileged Chinese who are the children or grandchildren of the Communist revolutionary leaders. Like the obsession with royal families in other countries, many Chinese are alternately fascinated and repelled by the princelings, whose ranks include Mr. Bo and Xi Jinping, China's top leader.One Bo family associate said a rehearsal of the trial was held Tuesday in Jinan, with Mr. Bo reportedly in attendance. What Mr. Bo will say — or be allowed to say — in court is one of the central questions hovering over the trial. On Monday, Mr. Bo's youngest son, Bo Guagua, 25, who is in orientation week at Columbia Law School, said in a statement to The New York Times that he hoped his father would be "granted the opportunity to answer his critics and defend himself without constraints of any kind."On Wednesday, police officers in light-blue uniforms stood at the gate outside the courthouse and along a patch of sidewalk across the street, where a holding pen for journalists had been erected with colorful plastic barriers. On occasion, a supporter of Mr. Bo would show up yelling a slogan, or a petitioner with an unrelated grievance would unfurl a banner, and the officers would urge them to move on. Paramilitary police officers in green uniforms stood beneath a nearby overpass, next to a fire truck.Some of Mr. Bo's supporters have become more vocal in recent days, against the wishes of party leaders, who presumably want the trial to end quickly and without causing further political rifts."The people, of course, will support Bo Xilai, especially the people of Chongqing," Han Deqiang, a college professor and co-founder of a leftist Web site, said in a telephone interview. "But since our party central has said so, they are unable to do anything about it. Maybe one day in the future, history will rehabilitate this unjust case."Mr. Bo, 64, certainly has his critics, including liberals who label his "strike black" anticorruption drive in Chongqing an affront to human rights. And the announcement of the trial date last Sunday indicated that the top ranks of the party had remained united on how to deal with Mr. Bo. One year ago, after the Heywood scandal became public, party leaders and elders agreed to fully end Mr. Bo's career, despite the fact that he is the son and political heir of one of the "Eight Immortals" of the party, Bo Yibo.Political analysts said the exact charges and their substance had been calibrated to ensure that the public could accept officials' handing Mr. Bo a long prison sentence, probably 15 to 20 years or a life term.
For about a decade, Chinese Communist Party officials and scholars regularly visited Chan Kin-man, an expert on civil society in China and advocate of democracy in Hong Kong , for advice on this former British colony that returned to Chinese rule in 1997."I told them, 60 percent of people want democracy in Hong Kong; 80 percent of young people want democracy. The tide is coming in. There is something coming," said Mr. Chan, sitting amid towering bookshelves and desks overflowing with papers in his office at the Chinese University of Hong Kong, a lushly green campus near the border that separates Hong Kong and the Communist-run Chinese mainland."I told them why Hong Kong needs democracy, and how there was no evidence that the pro-democracy camps are controlled by the British and United States governments," he said, a nod to suspicions he faces today from Beijing that he and others are attempting a democratic "color revolution" in Hong Kong.About four weeks ago, the visitors brought "a very clear signal," said Mr. Chan, gesturing at two green-upholstered, rococo-style armchairs where he said they sat. "They came here to advise me not to support Occupy Central."Occupy Central is a civil disobedience campaign he heads along with two other men (another professor and a Christian minister) to push for universal suffrage to choose the city's leader in elections due in 2017. Hong Kong's leader is now selected by an elite committee of about 1,200 people, many of them tycoons and others that Beijing considers friendly. "Occupy Central with Love and Peace," to use the movement's entire name, plans to organize thousands of people to occupy the Central district of Hong Kong or another part of the city, probably in July next year. Mr. Chan says he believes he could go to jail for staging such a major obstruction of the business heart of the city."Of course not. We don't want to overthrow the government. We just want a democratic system in Hong Kong. We are not interested in ending Communist rule in China," he said. "To me, Hong Kong is mature enough to have democracy. But in China we need to build a civil society first," said Mr. Chan.Hong Kong, once broadly derided as an apolitical, money-obsessed "cultural desert," is today riven with political passions as the forces for and against democracy seem headed for collision — sparked, ironically, by Beijing's own promises to introduce universal suffrage in 2017.Positions are being staked out. At political rallies tempers have flared and small-scale street brawls have broken out, incidents that some commentators have likened to the thuggery that accompanied the Nazis' rise to power in Germany. The democracy camp says people sent by the powerful local triads have begun attacking demonstrators in an effort to support the unpopular administration of Hong Kong's chief executive, Leung Chun-ying, who is widely seen as unwilling to push for greater democracy.Mr. Chan believes the triads are involved. "Yes. For sure," he said. "I have checked with friends who know."Democracy for Hong Kong, he said, is his "vocation." But the struggle is taking a toll.Mainland universities and, recently, a major newspaper in the southern province of Guangdong have withdrawn speaking invitations, the newspaper citing an "act of God." This, Mr. Chan said, refers to political pressure that cannot be withstood. He has resigned as director of his university's Chinese studies center and will soon give up another post as director of its Center for Civil Society Studies, he said."The university didn't give me any pressure," he said. "They want me to stay. But I knew it wasn't for the benefit of the centers." If he remained director, he feared, fellow academics and students would be frozen out of research activities in China.The man who long prided himself on his moderation has become a persona non grata in most of his own country.Why do it? Hong Kong, a sophisticated city, is becoming ungovernable, he said. Frustrations run high; people are unable to vote for representatives who can actually make policy and reflect their demands — the legislature is partly chosen by direct election, but partly through professions-based constituencies, and lacks real power. Issues like land use, housing, education and the environment are pressing, but power is concentrated in the person of the chief executive, who is chosen by the election committee with the tacit approval of Beijing and therefore is not seen as representative, he said.Beijing is interested in good governance in Hong Kong and in preserving stability, said Mr. Chan, but he doesn't believe it will allow its leaders to be elected by the public at large, whatever its promises."I am very pessimistic that they will give Hong Kong universal suffrage in 2017 unless we do something, such as Occupy Central," he said.So the true puzzle is perhaps this: Firmly opposed to democracy at home, why did Beijing excite these expectations in Hong Kong? Article 45 of the Basic Law, Hong Kong's constitution adopted in 1997, says the "ultimate aim" is to choose a chief executive "by universal suffrage." In 2007, the National People's Congress announced the chief executive "may" be chosen by universal suffrage in 2017, and Hong Kong legislature "may" be fully directly elected in 2020.From years of meeting with officials, Mr. Chan believes Beijing's bureaucrats, who think in terms of quotas and plans, estimated China would be economically developed enough around 2020 to consider greater democracy there, too."They believed that by 2020 China would be a 'xiaokang shehui"' — a moderately prosperous society, said Mr. Chan. "And then we can talk political reform in China, too.""They treat 2017 as a starting point. But to us, it's an end point," he said. "Free speech, an independent judiciary, a free press, for China, I can wait. But in Hong Kong we are in deep trouble if we wait.""So to me, they should take the first step" and grant the democracy many here crave, he said. "It's very bold, yes. They have to get used to that. To two political parties in China!"As I left, he called out: "Visit me in jail!"
SHANGHAI — The police in Shanghai have arrested a British investigator who specialized in advising foreign investors on fraud, cheating and other business risks in China, a spokeswoman for the British Embassy in Beijing said on Wednesday.The investigator, Peter Humphrey, has been held by the Shanghai police since early July. He is managing director of ChinaWhys, a risk management consulting firm that has done work for GlaxoSmithKline, the British pharmaceutical group that is facing graft and bribery allegations in China, raising speculation that his detention might be linked to that case.A spokeswoman for the British Embassy, Hannah Oussedik, would say only that he had been formally arrested. "We can confirm the arrest of a British national, Peter Humphrey, in Shanghai, China, on Monday, 19th August," Ms. Oussedik said in a brief telephone interview. "We are providing consular assistance to the family."The Wall Street Journal, which first reported Mr. Humphrey's arrest, said that his wife, Yu Yingzeng, was also formally arrested in Shanghai, and that they were both accused of illegally buying information about people. Ms. Oussedik said that she could not confirm those details. Ms. Yu is a naturalized American citizen. American officials in Beijing and Shanghai declined to comment.The formal arrest means the police have more time to pursue their investigation of the couple before deciding to drop the case or seek an indictment.China's rough-and-tumble commercial environment, in which laws and rules are often arbitrarily enforced or ignored, can make work in private corporate investigations risky. But Mr. Humphrey, a former journalist for Reuters, had worked in the area for more than a decade. He co-founded ChinaWhys in 2003, and his wife is a co-founder and general manager, according to the company's Web site.One acquaintance of Mr. Humphrey who asked not to be identified said he appeared to have been arrested in connection with his work for GlaxoSmithKline.The government has detained four of Glaxo's Chinese executives in connection with an investigation of bribery and tax fraud. Glaxo distanced itself from some of the former executives after investigators said the executives had confessed to fraud.Officials at multinational corporations operating in China have complained in recent weeks that the Chinese government is using law enforcement to weaken international competitors in commercial sectors where Chinese companies are not strong or have spent very little money to develop their own products."It's a hugely political thing," the acquaintance of Mr. Humphrey said. "They're just using him as a lever to force the pharmaceutical industry to lower prices."The person added that, although Mr. Humphrey had worked for Glaxo, it was not clear whether he was doing so when he was detained last month.The detention of Mr. Humphrey and his wife is even more politically delicate because his wife is part of a well-connected Chinese family.
HONG KONG — The beleaguered Indian rupee continued its steep descent on Wednesday, hitting a record low of 64.54 to the dollar amid global nervousness about the timing and scale of the Federal Reserve's likely scaling back of its bond-buying program.The 2 percent drop took the Indian currency's decline since early May to 20 percent, raising worries about the impact it will have on the country's substantial import bills and on an already large current account deficit.Indian stocks also dropped. The Sensex index closed down 1.9 percent and the Nifty ended 1.8 percent lower. Both indexes have dropped more than 10 percent since late July.Signs that the American central bank will reduce its bond purchases soon set off big outflows of cash from emerging markets around the world in May, and the reverberations continued Wednesday. A drop in the Indonesian currency sent the rupiah to 10,755 per dollar, its lowest level since April 2009. The South African rand and Brazilian real likewise are now at their weakest level since early 2009. Indonesia also has a large current account deficit.In India, however, the rupee's latest decline comes on top of a slide that began in 2011, when mounting signs of reform gridlock began to cast a serious pall over the once-rosy India story. In total, the rupee has now sagged more than 40 percent since mid-2011, and many analysts warn that it could fall even further.The Indian government, scrambling to halt the slide, have in recent weeks rushed out measures like higher import duties on gold and silver and restrictions on the amount that local companies can invest overseas without seeking approval. The Reserve Bank of India also appeared to have intervened in the currency markets on Wednesday to stem the rupee's fall, Reuters reported, citing traders.So far, however, these efforts have not succeeded in restoring investor confidence, which had already been undermined by slowing growth and by the prospect that elections next year may handicap efforts to push through much-needed structural reforms."Rupee sentiment is very fragile," Brian Jackson, global currency strategist at Coutts, wrote in a research note. It is hard to see the central bank "being able to control the rupee's fall without further impeding growth, either by pushing up bond yields or making it more difficult to access bank financing," he added.Kim Eng Tan, senior director of Asia-Pacific sovereign ratings at Standard & Poor's, said in an e-mailed statement that recent government measures to restrict capital outflows had increased uncertainty among foreign and domestic investors.If this continues, he said, "business financing conditions could deteriorate further and investment growth could slow further. India's long-term growth prospects could weaken on a sustained basis, with negative implications for the sovereign credit fundamentals. It is, however, too early now to tell if this scenario will come to pass. This will be largely dependent on policy makers' reactions to these latest developments. We maintain a negative outlook on India's BBB- sovereign credit ratings."
BEIJING — Police have arrested one of China's most prominent rights activists who has called for officials to disclose their wealth, his lawyer said on Friday, raising the stakes in the government's crackdown on anti-graft campaigners.The arrest of Xu Zhiyong, who has pushed for greater civil rights, could trigger an international outcry over Beijing's tightening grip of a fledgling movement. It also exposes shortcomings in the government's drive against corruption.Western governments have sparred repeatedly with Beijing over human rights and the United States raised Xu's case this month during its annual rights dialogue with China.Xu, the founder of the "New Citizens' Movement", advocates working within the system to press for change.On the Internet, he has called on officials to disclose their assets and fellow activists have gone into the streets to urge citizens to combat corruption.Beijing police arrested Xu on Thursday on a charge of "gathering a crowd to disturb order in a public place", one of Xu's lawyers, Zhang Qingfang, said by telephone.Xu was detained last month on the same charge. Before that, he had been under house arrest for three months, with no reason given by the authorities. Xu had previously told Reuters that "it could be due to my campaign to push for asset disclosure".Wang Gongquan, a venture capitalist and an old friend of Xu, said he was shocked at the arrest."What I'm shocked about is that the government and the police have gone farther and farther down the wrong road on the matter of Xu Zhiyong," he said."I feel sorry because there was an opportunity to release him before his arrest, but they are too overconfident and accustomed to doing their own thing regardless of right and wrong."Police in Beijing could not be reached for comment.China has detained at least 16 activists involved in pushing for asset disclosure by officials, in what rights groups say is a new, coordinated crackdown by the stability-obsessed ruling Communist Party against graft campaigners.Xu's arrest coincided with the opening of the trial of former senior leader Bo Xilai on corruption charges, a case which has so far focused on Bo's alleged ill-gotten gains.In China, a formal arrest usually leads to a trial, though Zhang said he was relatively confident that Xu could be released before the case comes to trial."I'm convincing Xu Zhiyong to express his views on social issues more rationally, in a more moderate way," Zhang said. "Xu has accepted this point."Zhang said the lawyers were also trying to persuade authorities that litigating the case "is not necessarily the best way".In a rare video-taped message from a detention center issued in early August, Xu, wearing handcuffs and an orange vest, urged the Chinese people to fight for their rights."Somebody has to pay for the society's progress, I am willing to bear all the costs for freedom, justice, love and faith," Xu said in his video.In 2009, Xu was briefly arrested on tax evasion charges his defenders said were trumped up in a bid to stifle his work. The charges were dropped after a furor.
JINAN, China — Disgraced Chinese politician Bo Xilai told a court Saturday his wife stole government funds without his involvement and revealed how the couple became estranged after he had been unfaithful, offering a glimpse in his politically charged trial of the unraveling of one of China's elite families.Bo also mocked as implausible a former city official's testimony that Bo had facilitated the embezzlement of 5 million yuan ($800,000) with a phone call to his wife, while expressing remorse that he had not acted to stop the misconduct."I am ashamed of it. I was too careless, because this is public money," Bo told the Jinan Intermediate People's Court. "I failed to retrieve the money later, and that's a factual statement, but can you say I had the intention to embezzle the money? No."The ruling Communist Party is using the trial against Bo, a former Politburo member and party leader of the megacity of Chongqing, to cap a messy political scandal unleashed by suspicions that his wife killed a British businessman.That scandal led to Bo's political ouster, cemented by criminal charges of interfering with a murder investigation and netting $4.3 million through corruption. Courts in China are controlled by the Communist Party so a conviction is expected, but Bo has mounted an unexpectedly spirited defense.The court's release of trial proceedings are in sharp contrast with the August 2012 conviction of Gu in the murder of a British businessman, when she pleaded guilty in daylong proceedings and scant details were released.Bo's trial had been expected to be similarly swift, but observers say giving him a chance to defend himself helps lend a veneer of legitimacy to what is widely seen as a political show trial. The trial has focused attention on Bo's alleged economic and official misdeeds and avoided discussing the threat he posed to China's leadership in his pursuit of a seat in China's apex of power ahead of last year's leadership transition."The leadership wants to have a trial that's seen as fair. You can't have a completely secret trial in today's China, it would be an embarrassment," said Brookings Institution scholar Cheng Li. "Bo Xilai is taking advantage of that trial to continue to perform as he did before."Authorities remained on high alert for any unrest that might be triggered by the trial, closely guarding a security perimeter that expanded several miles around the court Saturday, with main roads in the vicinity sealed and many shops and restaurants shut.Inside the courtroom, Bo questioned the testimonies of his wife Gu Kailai and others that prosecutors presented, that in 2000 he had told Gu to take the government funds to cover the expenses of accompanying their son in Britain while he attended middle school. Bo said that Gu had piles of her own money, and that she had taken their son overseas in a fit of rage after he had been unfaithful."She left after giving me only the courtesy of a notification," Bo said. "At the time, I had had an affair, and she was very angry. She took Bo Guagua away, largely because she felt wronged and was acting rashly."It was the third day of a trial that in which Bo had earlier similarly dismissed testimony from his wife, saying she was "crazy," He said Gu, a convicted killer serving a suspended death sentence, could be seeking a more lenient jail term by denouncing him.Bo similarly questioned the testimony of Wang Zhenggang, who was then an official with a land planning department in Dalian, where Bo was party boss at the time. Wang had testified that Bo made a call to his wife in front of him and explicitly said he was going to funnel 5 million yuan ($800,000) in funds from a government project to their family, an account Bo called implausible."Is this in line with the way an embezzler would think?" Bo said of the account of the alleged event that took place 13 years ago in Dalian. "Would I say something this sensitive on the phone?"Prosecutors have also charged that he accepted bribes from businessmen in the form of money or gifts to his family — including a villa in Nice, France, and plane tickets to three continents — in exchange for political favors.The charges of bribery and embezzlement, based on the indictment's specified monetary amounts, carry penalties of between 10 years and life imprisonment, or death in severe cases, while the abuse of power charge could result in up to 7 years' imprisonment.The trial on Saturday also began hearing allegations that Bo interfered in the investigation of the murder of a British businessman, for which Gu was convicted of in August 2012, and of the events surrounding his top aide's attempted defection at a U.S. consulate.Courtroom revelations by the prosecution have laid bare the way that shady ties between powerful officials and businessmen can play out in China. Part of the couple's influence comes from their pedigree as the children of revolutionary veterans, a status that gives them access to important political and business networks.Associated Press writer Didi Tang in Beijing contributed to this report.
BEIJING — Much of China was riveted to the stream of microblog updates from the trial of disgraced politician Bo Xilai — even a TV anchorwoman on a live national program checked her cellphone for the latest posting.The Jinan Intermediate People's Court in eastern China began its blow-by-blow updates on its Sina Weibo microblog 21 minutes before the trial opened Thursday and updated steadily through the day, including details on testimony, photos and even an audio clip from a key witness."When the court's Weibo is the only source of information about the trial, is it wrong to check my cellphone?" anchorwoman Yang Shu of Phoenix TV wrote on her own microblog. "It's better to announce the information with my head down than having nothing to say with my head up. This is the era of new media."Followers of the court's Weibo postings jumped from 70,000 to more than 300,000 during the day, and some posts were reposted tens of thousands of times, including a photo of Bo standing trial in a white shirt with his hands crossed in front of himself without a pair of cuffs.The display of openness is unusual for the Chinese justice system of recent decades, though the 1981 trial of Mao Zedong's wife and other members of the "Gang of Four" was televised. This kind of political trial is normally considered orchestrated political theater with a foregone conclusion of guilt. Some reporters for state media were also allowed in the courtroom.Zhang Zhi'an, a journalism professor at Sun Yet-sen University in the southern Chinese city of Guangzhou, said the posts were a clever move by the court in that they offered the appearance of openness while retaining the control of information."The postings could be selective," Zhang said.Beijing-based rights lawyer Pu Zhiqiang said the posts did not make up for the fact that Bo had been barred from meeting with his family for 18 months and could not choose his own lawyers."Without fair procedures, how can you have a fair outcome?" Pu said.Nevertheless, the Weibo posts mark progress in transparency, said Yang Dali, a political scientist at the University of Chicago Center in Beijing."It is a great move by the Jinan court. In many ways, it has lent a lot more credibility to this case," Yang said. "You read the case, and you can get a sense of different personalities. It is a very riveting case so far."The court made 59 posts on Thursday, portraying an orderly but lively courtroom with lengthy recounts of the exchanges among the defendant, his lawyers, prosecutors, witnesses and the judge.In one exchange, prosecutors accused Bo of taking bribes from business associate Tang Xiaolin. Bo flatly denied the accusation. "The matter of me taking money on three occasions, as Tang Xiaolin said, does not exist," he said, adding that he had once admitted the bribe-taking only because of "mental pressure."Prosecutors later responded: "Judge, the defendant has not provided truthful testimony in this court. On the issue of Tang Xiaolin giving money three times to the defendant, the prosecution will provide evidence that will verify it."At one point, Bo appeared to thoroughly cross-examine a businessman who alleged he paid bribes to the politician.Shanghai-based lawyer Si Weijiang said the court's posts offered more details than expected. "Bo's challenges to the allegations were quite powerful, and they are based on his personality, and he is not an easy person," he said.
JINAN, China — Fallen Chinese politician Bo Xilai called his wife insane after she testified at his landmark trial on Friday that he knew of money and a villa in the French Riviera that prosecutors say were given to the couple by a businessman friend.The video and written testimony by Gu Kailai directly contradicted Bo's robust defence on Thursday, and appear to set him up to be found guilty in China's most dramatic trial since the Gang of Four were dethroned in 1976 at the end of the Cultural Revolution."He should know about it all," Gu said in a video recording shown in court and posted on the court's microblog, when asked whether Bo knew that she and their son, Bo Guagua, had received money from plastics-to-property entrepreneur Xu Ming.Bo dismissed Gu's testimony as the ravings of a madwoman."Bogu Kailai has changed, she's insane, often tells lies," Bo said, according to transcripts on the court microblog, using Gu's official but rarely used name. "Under the circumstances of her mental illness, the investigators placed huge pressure on her to expose me."Her testimony as far as I am concerned, was (given) under psychological pressure, and driven by (hope of) a reduced sentence," he added.Gu has been jailed for the murder of British businessman Neil Heywood in November 2011, the crime which eventually led to Bo's downfall.The businessman Xu, who is also in custody, was once close to the Bo family, but also testified against him on Thursday, according to the transcripts. Foreign reporters were not allowed into the court.Bo, the 64-year-old former Communist Party chief of Chongqing metropolis, has been charged with illegally taking almost 27 million yuan (2.82 million pounds), corruption and abuse of power. Of that amount, about 21.8 million yuan came from Xu and another businessman Tang Xiaolin, the court said, citing the indictment.Bo was a rising star in China's leadership circles when his career was stopped short last year by the scandal involving Gu.Supporters of Bo's Maoist-themed social programmes say he lost out in a power struggle with capitalist-leaning reformists in Beijing, exposing divisions within the ruling party as well as Chinese society.Last week, two sources told Reuters that Gu would only testify against her husband if a deal had been reached with authorities to protect their son.A deal in which Bo can be swiftly convicted and sent to jail, sparing him a death penalty and with no repercussions for his son, would be in the interest of China's leadership, which wants the trial to be concluded without causing open friction between Bo's followers and critics.On Thursday, observers said the court proceedings were probably scripted and that Bo could receive a pre-arranged sentence in exchange for limited outbursts that would show that the trial was fair, appeasing his followers.The trial will continue for a third day on Saturday, the court said, despite expectations it could last just a single day.In written testimony, Gu said she had shown Bo the graphics and slideshows for the design of a villa in Nice, France that was paid for by Xu. Bo asked her about the slideshows and according to Gu, she told Bo about Xu's involvement."Therefore he knew that I asked Xu Ming to pay for this villa in France," Gu said in her written statement.In the poorly shot video, Gu appeared soft-spoken and composed as she was questioned by a worker from the state prosecutor's office. She laughed when asked whether she had been coerced into giving evidence.Gu did not link Bo with Heywood's murder, but said he was aware she considered the Briton a threat to their son. According to testimony at Gu's trial, she killed Heywood because he had threatened Guagua after a business dispute with Gu.Gu said Bo was also aware of her fears about the safety of Guagua, who is now in the United States preparing for a law degree at Columbia University. Gu said she was afraid Guagua "would be kidnapped and killed in America"."In 2011, Guagua's personal safety was threatened and Bo Xilai understood this," she said in her written testimony."We drew up a blacklist of suspicious people. One of them was Neil Heywood. I explained all of this to Bo Xilai."Bo could face the death sentence, though a suspended death sentence is more likely, which effectively means life imprisonment, or a 20-year term.
HONG KONG — Even in the inventive annals of Chinese propaganda, it was a first: show trial by microblog. When Bo Xilai, the politician whose fall convulsed the Communist Party, stood trial on Thursday, the government took the unprecedented step of reporting the proceedings to a nationwide audience of many millions over China's equivalent of Twitter.The court, in eastern China, reported the day's developments on Sina.com's Weibo service, a popular microblog platform similar to Twitter. The reports, quotes and pictures that emerged in fits and starts from the courtroom drew riveted attention from the Chinese, testament to the public's fascination with Mr. Bo and to the power of the Chinese Internet. In recent decades, trials of former senior officials have mostly been muted in secrecy, often until hearings ended and state news media showed the officials making tearful confessions."There's never been anything like this before," said Li Yonggang, an expert on the Internet and Chinese society at Nanjing University in eastern China. "It's likely that there's so much attention on this that they had to choose a relatively open way to report it. Otherwise, it would have triggered all kinds of speculation."But as Thursday progressed, the trial began to look less polished. Mr. Bo scorned the charges and ridiculed prosecution witnesses, and the microblog feed from the courthouse, though perhaps selective, gave him an unusually prominent podium. "I really saw the ugliness of a person who sold his soul," Mr. Bo said of one important witness for the prosecution, according to the court's running account.Mr. Bo appears likely to end his public career the way he advanced it: as the combative star in a drama played out over the Internet and in mass media."To begin with, everyone believed that it would all be prearranged," Mr. Li said. "But now it looks less sure."Before Mr. Bo's fall, he had challenged the dour mold of Chinese Communist Party politics, courting media attention and cultivating journalists during meetings of the national Parliament. He cast himself as a visionary populist who wanted to return China to socialist egalitarianism.The reaction of many Chinese Internet users to the trial cannot all have been to the government's liking, even among the comments that were not censored. Weibo became a raucous forum for and against Mr. Bo, with many people voicing admiration for him or skepticism about the motives for ousting him.Some swooned. "Bo Xilai is a picture of vigor," said one. Many shared a belief that the 27 million renminbi, or $4.4 million, he is reported to have taken through bribes and embezzlement would count as mere pocket money for many, more corrupt, officials."Old Bo took just over 20 million yuan," or less than $3.3 million, wrote one Weibo user. "A dinky little village party secretary could get more than him. It's just a case of winner takes all, the fate that comes from political defeat."In one sign of the corrosive suspicion faced by the Communist Party, some people found reason to doubt, at least tongue in cheek, that the figure in the courtroom was the real Mr. Bo. There was meticulous debate about his height compared with that of the two guards who stood towering beside him.Even citizens who want to see Mr. Bo convicted voiced doubt that his misdeeds outdid those of other officials. "Bo should be punished by the law," said one Weibo user. "But I hope that all criminal officials will be punished. That's the heartfelt wish of ordinary people."The spectacle was a demonstration of how important the Internet has become in political life. For the government, it potentially offers a tool to monitor and persuade a population jaded by traditional, state-run news media. By midyear, China had nearly 600 million officially registered Internet users. Even discounting duplicate and fake registrations, the number is a daunting challenge for a state that prizes its grip over information.Weibo, the biggest of China's microblog services, had more than 500 million registered users at the end of 2012, according to Sina.com. About 46 million people use the service daily, it said. Weibo, the Chinese word for microblog, is also used to refer to other such services.The government recently started an effort to consolidate control of the Web. This week, the police in Beijing announced that they had arrested a gang that they said specialized in spreading scurrilous rumors against politicians, celebrities and even Lei Feng, an icon of piety to the party. Propaganda officials have shepherded leading voices on Weibo to pledge publicly to abide by seven rules intended to stanch the spread of rumors and antigovernment sentiment.During Thursday's hearing, China's usually vigorous Internet censors seemed more relaxed about online comments than usual, or perhaps overwhelmed. The court's Weibo page attracted more than 300,000 direct followers, but many other readers followed the proceedings on other pages that copied the court's postings. By the end of the first day of the trial, more than 600,000 postings that included Bo Xilai's name had accumulated on the Weibo site, although it was impossible to say how many were put there on Thursday.Regardless, Mr. Bo's performance in court is unlikely to win him freedom. China's courts are controlled by the Communist Party; defendants in criminal trials rarely win, and virtually never in politically charged cases. "I think you're a political sacrificial object," said one Weibo user. "I don't believe that the remaining governors and ministers are clean."
HONG KONG — South and Southeast Asia are being buffeted by broad shifts in international economics, but with Japan and China to the north largely unaffected, fears of a more widespread crisis are being played down.The most affected large economies have been those of India and Indonesia, two countries where many domestic and foreign investors are now rushing for the exits, exchanging local currencies for dollars. After months of decline, both countries' currencies dropped further on Thursday, with the Indonesian rupiah and the Indian rupee falling about 2 percent before recovering some of their losses.Some Asian business leaders say they still hope the region can escape largely unscathed from the broader troubles afflicting emerging markets this summer. Sofjan Wanandi, the tycoon who is the longtime chairman of the Indonesian Employers' Association, said in a telephone interview on Thursday that he believed Indonesia's currency troubles were a result of a temporary failure by the government to formulate a response and communicate it clearly."We know the economy is O.K., but the government is not taking quick action," he said, adding that he and other business leaders were working with the government on a policy statement to be issued on Friday. "After that, we hope this will all be calmed down," he said.The currencies of Malaysia, the Philippines and Thailand also declined, although by less than 1 percent. Stock markets across most of the region fell on Thursday, but share prices rebounded slightly in India after days of decline there.At this point, fears of a continent-wide crisis, like in 1997, have been minimized. But economists are still cautious. "Between the two countries, Indonesia has a far better balance of economic growth and a greater chance of revival," HSBC, referring to India and Indonesia, said on Wednesday in a research report that cautioned investors against buying Indian government bonds.Largely unaffected on Thursday and in recent weeks have been the currencies of Asia's two largest economies, China and Japan. The Japanese yen has been little changed over the last month, despite weakening marginally this week, and the value of the Chinese renminbi, heavily managed by China's central bank, has stayed flat as well. Both countries have begun economic stimulus programs in recent months, although they have done so with very different styles.China's stock market has even posted a small rally this month on signs that an economic slowdown may be less severe than expected this autumn, although worries persist about next year.The preliminary purchasing managers' index in China, compiled by the research firm Markit and released by the British bank HSBC on Thursday, showed a swing to expansion from contraction in August. The increase, to a four-month high, easily beat analysts' expectations.HSBC's preliminary survey offers one of the earliest indications each month of how the Chinese economy is doing, and Thursday's reading is likely to solidify expectations that a stabilization that began to show in July has continued into August.The reading "adds to the number of green shoots indicating a stabilizing economy since July," Li Wei and Stephen Green, economists at Standard Chartered, wrote in a note, adding that government-led measures aimed at shoring up economic growth, like tax breaks for small businesses and efforts to speed up railway construction, appeared to have begun to take effect.After years of double-digit expansion rates, the economy has now settled into a slower pace of growth of around 7.5 percent this year. And despite Thursday's unexpectedly strong survey results, some analysts said the picture could well cloud again next year.Indonesia and other countries in Southeast Asia have been hurt by their dependence on slower-growing China. They have also been hit by China's gradual shift away from industries dependent on commodity imports from Asian neighbors, like steel production, and toward service industries.With chronic trade deficits and a dependence on foreign investment, Indonesia and particularly India have faced the biggest problems in the region. The government of India has resorted to increasingly desperate measures in the last two weeks, like steeply raising taxes on imports of silver and gold, but it has been unable to halt the decline of the rupee, which is down more than 7 percent in August and more than 20 percent since the start of May.Daily steep declines in the rupee are making it much harder for Indian companies to repay their foreign loans, many of them denominated in dollars. The rupee's decline has also made real estate and other projects in India less attractive for foreign investors who count their profits and losses in dollars, prompting many of them to pull out as well.As the Federal Reserve mulls tightening monetary policy in the United States in response to early signs of economic recovery there, rising interest rates on Treasury securities and other American financial instruments are drawing money away from emerging markets around the world.Indonesia has tried to undertake some difficult overhauls this summer, most notably raising retail gasoline prices in June to limit government subsidies for the country's millions of drivers. Economists say they expect Indonesia's trade deficit to start shrinking in the coming months and its government finances to improve as families avoid unnecessary trips and buy less fuel as a result.
JINAN, China — Bo Xilai, the politician who fell from the heights of China's elite, took a pugnacious stand on Thursday in the opening session of China's most closely watched trial in decades, denying that he took millions of dollars in bribes and ridiculing his wife's testimony against him.According to lengthy transcripts the court released in an extraordinary show of transparency, Mr. Bo, 64, called his wife's assertions that she had noticed anonymous deposits in their safe "laughable." He accused a businessman who had recorded video testimony against him of having "sold his soul." And he discounted his earlier confession to taking bribes, saying he had made the statements to Communist Party investigators against his will, out of "opportunism and weakness" and under "mental strain."The authorities' unexpected openness about the trial — by allowing a running court microblog that was followed by millions of Chinese directly or through news reports drawing on the microblog — turned what many had expected to be banal ritual into an unpredictable display of Mr. Bo's defiance.But as the trial moved into its second and possibly final day on Friday, government and party media outlets unfurled several commentaries that feted the legal proceedings while ridiculing Mr. Bo over his denials — an unmistakeable signal that the Communist Party leadership would not let the skilled politician wriggle free of punishment. One signed commentary in the online edition of the People's Daily stated: "What is regrettable is that, with regard to the facts, Bo Xilai made a supreme effort to quibble, to avoid the major charges while admitting the minor ones, and almost completely denied the facts of his crimes."The dramatic first day raised questions about how party officials would continue to steer a delicate political process that has captivated Chinese scrutinizing it on the Internet. Officials set up a media center in a hotel across the street in this eastern provincial capital. Dozens of foreign journalists and a handful of reporters for Chinese state media gazed at large-screen televisions streaming the court feed. When the first photograph from the trial was posted before 11:30 a.m., showing the 6-foot-1 Mr. Bo standing with a bemused look between two towering police officers, journalists charged the televisions and snapped photos.Dressed in a white shirt and black pants with his hair neatly trimmed, Mr. Bo displayed some of the showmanship he deployed in climbing to the party chief post in Chongqing municipality and the elite Politburo, before he was felled last year by a scandal involving the death of a British businessman, a case in which his wife, Gu Kailai, was convicted of murder. Mr. Bo is also charged with abuse of power over allegations he obstructed an investigation into the death, and with embezzlement.There were limits to the transparency. One person briefed on the proceedings said that some court testimony did not appear in the released transcripts. And by evening, censors had sanitized the comments section of the court microblog, removing many remarks skeptical of the justice process.Analysts said that publicizing the hearing was the party's attempt to lend legitimacy to a trial in which a guilty verdict and long prison sentence were almost certainly preordained. The hearing was not as public as the televised trial in 1980 of the Gang of Four blamed for the havoc of the Cultural Revolution. But officials issued about 60 real-time updates over the court microblog."This is the most open trial of its kind, certainly the most open among the ones we have seen recently," He Weifang, a law professor at Peking University, said in a telephone interview. "He seems to be speaking his mind, judging from his speech and the words he used."But over all, he added, "the whole court is controlled by Beijing."The party's efforts at forging an aura of legitimacy could backfire. If evidence released during the trial proves flimsy, the public could side with Mr. Bo, whose Maoist slogans and new brand of socialism bolstered his popularity in Chongqing.Mr. Bo insisted that he knew nothing of a villa on the French Riviera that prosecutors said Ms. Gu bought in 2000 with $3.2 million from Xu Ming, a young tycoon, or about a hot-air balloon venture between the two. He denied knowledge of a $16,000 trip to Africa made by his youngest son, Bo Guagua, and his friends; an $18,000 Segway-like vehicle that Mr. Xu bought for the son; and $50,000 of debt on the son's credit card that Mr. Xu paid.He said he did not know much about his wife and son's expenses, because Ms. Gu was "a person of culture and taste, a modern intellectual woman," so they did not discuss money.Mr. He, a critic of Mr. Bo's past policies, said the prosecutor "appeared to be ill-prepared," echoing a sentiment widely seen online. "In comparison," he said, "Bo appears to be more authentic."
HONG KONG — An early reading Thursday of a closely watched survey of manufacturing-sector activity provided the latest indication that China's economy had bottomed out after many months of slowing growth.The preliminary purchasing managers' index for August, compiled by the research firm Markit and released by the British bank HSBC, jumped to 50.1 points from 47.7 in July, showing a swing to expansion from contraction, with a figure of 50 the dividing line. The increase, to a four-month high, easily beat analysts' expectations.HSBC's preliminary survey offers one of the earliest indications each month of how the Chinese economy is doing, and Thursday's reading is likely to solidify expectations that a stabilization that had begun to show in July has continued into August.The reading "adds to the number of green shoots indicating a stabilizing economy since July," Li Wei and Stephen Green, economists at Standard Chartered, wrote in a note, adding that government-led measures aimed at shoring up economic growth, like tax breaks for small businesses and steps aimed at speeding up railway construction, appeared to have begun to take effect.Future purchasing manager surveys, they said, were likely to "continue to hover between 50 and 53 in the coming months, with no dramatic improvement."The Chinese authorities' approach of economy-bolstering tweaks focused on specific areas contrasts with the big-bang stimulus adopted after the global financial crisis and highlights Beijing's willingness to accept slower growth as it tries to reduce the economy's reliance on cheap credit, investments and exports.After years of double-digit expansion rates, the economy has now settled into a slower pace of growth of around 7.5 percent this year. And despite the unexpectedly strong survey results on Thursday, some analysts said the picture could well cloud again next year.Yao Wei, China economist at Société Générale Hong Kong, said government-driven infrastructure investment should be able in the short term to offset problems like the renminbi's strength relative to many other emerging Asian currencies, many of which have fallen sharply in recent months. A rebound in the third quarter is "almost certain," Ms. Yao said.However, she added, a similar pickup during the fourth quarter of last year, which was also aided by government policy, was short-lived. Given efforts to rein in shadow banking activities and potential challenges from abroad as the Federal Reserve scales back its support of the U.S. economy, "we caution that this uptick may not last either," she said.
HONG KONG — The authorities in Beijing have formally arrested one of China's best-known human rights advocates on charges of disturbing public order, his lawyer and a friend said on Friday. It was the latest escalation in a case that has prompted a protest in China and criticism from the United States government.The advocate, Xu Zhiyong, was detained last month on charges of "assembling a crowd to disrupt order in a public place." On Thursday, prosecutors in Beijing told Mr. Xu's lawyer, Zhang Qingfang, that they had approved Mr. Xu's formal arrest on that charge."For Xu Zhiyong, this means the prosecutors have approved the matter, that they believe there is sufficient evidence for the allegations to be further investigated," Mr. Zhang said in a telephone interview. "But that's not a decision to prosecute. That could take months."Mr. Zhang declined to give details of the allegations against Mr. Xu, who was under informal house arrest for more than three months before his detention. A Beijing businessman who has campaigned for Mr. Xu's release, Wang Gongquan, also confirmed that Mr. Xu had been formally arrested."As you move each step down the process — from detention to arrest and so on — the probability of it ending in conviction goes up dramatically," said Joshua Rosenzweig, a researcher on human rights in China at the Chinese University of Hong Kong. "The chances are that Xu will face trial, and that makes it highly probable that he'll be convicted."Mr. Xu, 40, rose to prominence in the broad "rights defense" movement of Chinese lawyers and advocates who have tried to use courts, media and the Internet for their cause. In recent years, Mr. Xu and others have turned increasingly to grass-roots campaigns. He supported a "New Citizens' Movement," which has urged the government to make public information about officials' wealth. Many of Mr. Xu's friends believe that he was arrested because of that campaign.Under the new Communist Party leader, Xi Jinping, the Chinese government has continued to arrest and detain dissidents and human rights advocates seen as threatening party control. Chinese Human Rights Defenders, an international advocacy group, has estimated that since March more than 50 Chinese involved in peaceful political activism have been detained or have disappeared, apparently into state custody.Mr. Xu's supporters have organized a petition drive to demand his release. Uzra Zeya, the American acting assistant secretary of state for democracy, human rights and labor, said in Beijing early this month that Mr. Xu was among the people whose detention she had raised in talks with Chinese officials.This month, the police in southern China detained Yang Maodong, a well-known campaigner for human rights. Mr. Yang, who is best known by his pen name, Guo Feixiong, was also held on charges of assembling a crowd to disrupt order in a public place. If the two men were convicted of that charge, they could receive sentences of up to five years in prison.
JINAN, China — Prosecutors in the trial of Bo Xilai, the former Communist Party star, presented testimony on Friday asserting that he knew about a villa on the French Riviera bought for his family by a tycoon and about demands for compensation from a British businessman managing the villa who was later murdered by Mr. Bo's wife.The testimony was aimed at proving that Mr. Bo knew about favors his family was accepting from the tycoon, Xu Ming. But Mr. Bo denied knowledge of such crimes on the second day of his trial, which has been unveiled for the public via an unexpected feed of titillating official microblog posts from the court here in northern China. The use of the microblog suggests pressure on the party to make transparent the case against Mr. Bo, a polarizing neo-leftist politician from a powerful Communist revolutionary family, but at the risk of exposing weakness in the prosecution and bolstering public support for Mr. Bo.The party authorities took measures to temper some of the spectacle on Friday. A person briefed on the proceedings said late Friday that under orders from the authorities, the day's transcripts were less comprehensive than those released Thursday. The newer ones were vetted longer before being posted, and offered fewer rebuttals from Mr. Bo and his lawyers.And the party intensified its case against Mr. Bo in the state media, not just in court. On Friday, official news outlets issued a chorus of commentaries that said the evidence against Mr. Bo, once the party leader in the sprawling southwestern metropolis of Chongqing, was overwhelming. The commentaries lauded the trial as fair and open while effectively prejudging Mr. Bo."Confronted with the facts, Bo's attitude was to flaunt his cunning and use a hundred kinds of denial," said a commentary on the Web site of Guangming Daily, a party newspaper. "The documents are there in black and white and the evidence is overwhelming. Bo Xilai's self-defense collapsed instantly before the evidence, so that his sophistry was futile and laughable."The trial is likely to end on Saturday, and a verdict is expected within a couple of weeks.On Friday, Mr. Bo again upbraided the prosecution's main witnesses, including his wife, Gu Kailai, who appeared in a video recording being interrogated about the family's finances."How much of it is believable?" Mr. Bo said of Ms. Gu's testimony. "She has become crazy, and she often tells lies. She was mentally unstable and under enormous pressure from the investigators to inform on me."Witnesses for the prosecution painted a vivid portrait of family life within the Bo clan, which appeared to be awash in favors from Mr. Xu. According to testimony, Mr. Bo's younger son, Bo Guagua, went to Africa in 2011 at Mr. Xu's expense, and brought back for his father a slab of meat from a rare animal that he insisted should be eaten raw. The father had it cooked, though, to the young Mr. Bo's disappointment, and the family feasted on it for a month. The cost of the six-person Africa trip was nearly $131,000 — including $80,000 for a charter jet from Dubai to the Mount Kilimanjaro area.Mr. Xu also paid for a trip in 2011 to China by Mr. Bo, then a graduate student at Harvard, and 40 of his fellow students. As for the villa, the elder Mr. Bo helped his wife plan the aesthetics — "he's an expert in home renovation and decoration," Ms. Gu testified.In August 2012, Ms. Gu was convicted of the murder of the British businessman, Neil Heywood, and given a suspended death sentence, essentially life in prison. Mr. Heywood's death and the ensuing scandal led to Mr. Bo's downfall. He is charged with taking bribes, embezzlement and abuse of power. The embezzlement charge accuses him of taking $800,000 in government money earmarked for a construction project, and the abuse of power charge accuses him of trying to obstruct an investigation into Mr. Heywood's murder.Testimony on Friday centered on the villa, which French documents show was owned by Patrick Devillers, a French friend of the Bo family. According to testimony from Mr. Devillers and others read aloud in court, Mr. Devillers was a frontman in the purchase; Ms. Gu bought the villa more than a decade ago as an investment for her son with $3.2 million from Mr. Xu, the tycoon.Prosecutors said Ms. Gu used different people in the French company that managed the property as fronts to hide her ownership. Mr. Heywood was brought in to hold Ms. Gu's shares in the villa in 2007, and then removed in 2011. Prosecutors said he then demanded $2.2 million from Ms. Gu and threatened her son, Bo Guagua; she poisoned Mr. Heywood in November 2011 because of the threats.In a sign of inconsistencies among official accounts, the story spun by prosecutors on Friday was different from the one that officials presented at Ms. Gu's trial. At that time, officials said Mr. Heywood had demanded $22 million, mostly as compensation for a failed property project in Chongqing. He threatened the son in efforts to get that money, those prosecutors said, and that made Ms. Gu fearful.Bo Guagua, who has just started classes at Columbia Law School in New York, did not respond to an e-mail request for comment on Friday. Family members of Mr. Heywood could not be reached for comment.Officials from the court, the police and state security met late Thursday in Jinan to review the handling of the trial, according to a person briefed on the case. They determined that it was under control despite the uproar caused by Mr. Bo's spirited defense. "The authorities did not seem to think that was so unexpected," the person said.There was no doubt, though, that the unveiling of testimony on Friday was more tightly managed. Though more than an hour of video testimony from Ms. Gu was played in court, officials posted only an 11-minute clip online, he said. Ms. Gu spoke to an interrogator about expensive items that Mr. Xu had bought for the Bo family, including abalone, airplane tickets and a Segway-like vehicle that the son wanted.Mr. Bo denied any knowledge of payments by Mr. Xu, which some legal scholars said was smart strategy. "Bo's defense today is that he was unaware of the bribes Gu took, which stands legally," said Jiang Tianyong, a liberal lawyer and rights defender. "If he was unaware and took no part in the bribe-taking, he has no responsibility, even if he is married to Gu."
JINAN, China — In a dramatic high point of his trial, Bo Xilai, the fallen Communist Party star, faced off in court on Saturday with Wang Lijun, the former police chief whose flight to an American consulate last year set off the biggest scandal to shake the party in decades.It was the first time the two were known to have seen each other since February 2012, when Mr. Wang fled the southwest metropolis of Chongqing, which Mr. Bo governed for four years, for the nearby consulate. There, Mr. Wang told American officials that Mr. Bo's wife had poisoned a British businessman, Neil Heywood, and that Mr. Bo was persecuting Mr. Wang because he knew about the murder.Mr. Bo stands charged with abusing his power through moves to suppress exposure of the Heywood murder, including demoting Mr. Wang. In his testimony on Saturday, Mr. Bo took blame, to a degree, for the episode leading to Mr. Wang's flight."I made mistakes; I am very ashamed and I am willing to take appropriate responsibility, but whether it's a crime or not a crime is another matter," Mr. Bo testified. He added that he had not bent the law to protect his wife, because he did not believe that she had killed Mr. Heywood, and that he demoted Mr. Wang right before he fled for the consulate because he believed that Mr. Wang was unstable.Mr. Wang, who is serving a 15-year prison sentence for defection and other crimes, took the witness stand on Saturday for the prosecution. In glasses, a white shirt and neatly parted hair, he looked much as he did when he served as Mr. Bo's enforcer. Mr. Wang testified that Mr. Bo's wife, Gu Kailai, secretly confessed to him on Nov. 14, 2011, that she had just poisoned Mr. Heywood. Mr. Wang was close to Ms. Gu and kept this a secret, but in late January 2012, he said, he told Mr. Bo that his wife had poisoned Mr. Heywood.At a meeting the next day, he said, Mr. Bo bawled him out in front of other officials and punched him in the face. "My body was shaking a bit," Mr. Wang said. "I discovered that the corner of my mouth was bleeding. Fluid was coming from my ears."In his testimony, Mr. Bo said he had slapped Mr. Wang for what he thought were fabricated accusations against his wife. "I couldn't accept this, I was furious, I smashed a mug to the ground," Mr. Bo said.Besides the abuse of power charge, Mr. Bo is charged with taking bribes and embezzling amounts totaling $4.4 million. The abuse of power charge is the last one to be addressed in the trial, which began Thursday and is expected to run at least through Sunday. Mr. Bo has pleaded not guilty to all charges.Mr. Bo, a populist politician and the son of a Communist revolutionary leader, was dismissed from his post in March 2012. Soon afterward, the murder allegations became public. Ms. Gu was convicted of murder a year ago and given a suspended death sentence, essentially life in prison.On Saturday, lurid Bo family secrets were laid bare to millions of fascinated Chinese who have been following the trial on a running court microblog that party officials set up in an effort to give the trial an air of legitimacy.Earlier in the day, the defendant rejected accusations of embezzlement after a former colleague testified that Mr. Bo had arranged for Ms. Gu to accept $820,000 of government money earmarked for a secret construction project in the early 2000s. Mr. Bo said that after his wife found out about an extramarital affair of his, she left for Britain with their son, Bo Guagua, and lived mainly there from 2000 to 2007, while their son was in school. Mr. Bo said Ms. Gu, a lawyer, had saved a lot of money — $3.3 million to $5 million in cash and assets — and his son had scholarships for his schooling, so he had no need to steal government money.Mr. Bo's admission of adultery was immediately seized on by Chinese Web portals, one of which posted the headline "Bo Xilai Admits in Court Having Had an Affair, Wife Took Son off to England in a Rage."It was an example of how China's major state-approved news portals were presenting a unified voice to highlight the prosecution's evidence against Mr. Bo or, as in the case of the affair, to taint him with scandal.Last September, when the Communist Party announced its findings against Mr. Bo, it decided to include the accusation of adultery, saying he "had or maintained improper sexual relationships with a number of women." A Bo family associate said Saturday that Mr. Bo and Ms. Gu both had had affairs going back before 2000.
Whether he was pouring in 13 points in 35 seconds for Houston in 2004 or sitting on the bench and watching the San Antonio Spurs win another playoff game in June without needing him, that cool expression rarely changed. It all looked almost too easy for McGrady, even if it rarely was.McGrady announced his retirement from the NBA on Monday, ending a 16-year career that included two scoring titles, seven All-Star appearances, injuries to his knee and back and zero playoff series wins while he was leading the way. The straight-from-high school project who blossomed into a dominant, two-way superstar will always be remembered, too, as a player who struggled with injuries."Thank all of you who have supported me over 16 NBA seasons, 7 All-Stars, and countless exciting moments," McGrady tweeted on Monday morning. "Retiring from NBA. Stay tuned."McGrady didn't rule out continuing his career overseas, perhaps in China where he played last season."Officially retired from the NBA," he said on ESPN. "Door's still open."McGrady was drafted by Toronto out of high school in 1997 and was outshined early in his career by Raptors star Vince Carter, McGrady's distant cousin. He became a star in Orlando, was traded to Houston in 2004 and also played for the Knicks, Pistons and Hawks before finishing up his career with the Spurs last season. He averaged 19.6 points, 5.6 rebounds and 4.4 assists per game in his career and at one point was considered one of the best perimeter players of his generation, a talent that rivaled Kobe Bryant and any other player in the league."Congrats to Tracy McGrady on an awesome career," LeBron James tweeted. "7-time All-NBA (2 1st Team), 2-time scoring champ, and just an all-around dazzling talent."The Raptors drafted McGrady ninth overall out of Mount Zion Academy and spoon-fed him early while his body developed to withstand the rigors of the NBA. By his third season, McGrady was averaging 15.4 points, 6.3 rebounds and showing all the early signs of becoming a star. He left Toronto after that season, joining up with Grant Hill in Orlando, which is where some of the hard luck that plagued McGrady for years first started to surface."There are a lot of things that go into winning in the NBA," former Rockets coach Jeff Van Gundy said in a phone interview. "And until McGrady's body betrayed him, he was a dominant player."McGrady's body wasn't the only one that let him down.Hill hardly played in his first two seasons in Orlando, leaving McGrady to carry the load all by himself. He averaged 33.8 points per game in the Magic's first-round playoff loss to Milwaukee, then scored 30.8 per game in a four-game loss to Charlotte the following season.He delivered his finest individual season in 2002-03, winning his first scoring title with 32.1 points while averaging 6.5 rebounds, 5.5 assists and 1.7 steals in a tour-de-force season that ended, once again, with a first-round exit at the hands of the Pistons.No matter how brilliantly McGrady played, he couldn't get his teams over the hump in the postseason, and a narrative started to form. After the Magic missed the postseason in 2003-04, McGrady was traded to the Rockets. He enjoyed one of the crowning moments of his career that season when he scored 13 points in 35 seconds to lift the Rockets over the Spurs in a December game. But more than the scoring prowess, which put McGrady practically in a class by himself, Van Gundy prized his star player for his versatility — he was a lock-down defender, deft passer and could be a force on the glass."Maybe his greatest attribute is he's one of the best wing passers ever," Van Gundy said. "Great size, great skill, incredibly unselfish. He was a multi-dimensional player that unfortunately rarely got the opportunity to play with better teams when he could advance further in the playoffs."Ankle problems kept Hill from helping McGrady in Orlando, while foot problems for Yao Ming spoiled a potentially devastating tandem in Houston. McGrady also had microfracture surgery on his knee in 2009, which combined with chronic back spasms to limit him to 65 games over the next two seasons. All of a sudden, that effortless athleticism was gone.The Rockets made it to the second round in 2009 with both McGrady and Yao on the bench with injuries, only adding fuel to his critics.While McGrady bowed out in first round after first round, some started to question his work ethic. Where was Michael Jordan's competitive fire? Where was Bryant's passion? How badly did McGrady really want it?After a stint with the Hawks, McGrady spent most of last season playing in China until the Spurs jettisoned Stephen Jackson and asked McGrady if he was interested in being an insurance policy for them in the playoffs. He played just 31 minutes in six games during San Antonio's run to the NBA Finals.Sitting on the bench in San Antonio, surrounded by healthy All-Star talent for the first time in his career, McGrady couldn't help but wonder what might have been."That's really the story of my career," McGrady told Grantland in June. "What if. What if Grant Hill was healthy when we were in Orlando and what if the Magic would have signed Timmy (Duncan) as well? What if I was healthy when Yao was healthy and when we played a Game 7 against the Lakers in the second round? What-ifs. That's what you can put on my career. 'What If: Tracy McGrady's Career.'"
BEIJING — A Chinese-developed attack helicopter has successfully fired air-to-air missiles for the first time, state media said Monday, in another apparent advance for the domestic arms industry.The firing took place last week during drills off the coast of the southern province of Guangdong that were the biggest test yet for the army's aviation wing, the Xinhua News Agency reported.The aircraft were of the WZ-10 model developed by the domestic arms industry primarily for attacking tanks. Xinhua said its missiles successfully intercepted low-altitude targets during the drill, indicating an increased role for the helicopter in countering enemy aircraft.China has shifted rapidly over the last decade from importing most of its military hardware from Russia to producing it at home, a result of the booming economy, increasing technical sophistication, and annual double-digit percentage increases in the defense budget.China is now working on two separate stealth fighter programs, and is believed to be building at least two aircraft carriers, along with domestically developed destroyers, cruisers, and nuclear submarines.However some key items, namely top-performing jet aircraft engines, must still be imported.
JINAN, China — China's most sensational trial in decades ended with disgraced politician Bo Xilai hinting at a love triangle involving his wife and former right-hand man — both key witnesses against him — as he made last-ditch efforts to redeem his reputation.The prosecution countered by saying Bo should be severely punished because he showed no remorse in the five-day corruption trial in the eastern city of Jinan that was aimed at capping a scandal set off by his wife's murder of a British businessman and resulting in Bo's purge from top posts and the Communist Party.In testimony, Bo denounced both his wife, Gu Kailai, as crazy and his former police chief, Wang Lijun, as dishonest, as he has sought to portray himself as an official who worked too hard to scrutinize his family's affairs and who was surrounded by conniving, duplicitous people."He (Wang) was secretly in love with Gu Kailai, his emotions were tangled and he could not extricate himself," Bo told the court.Prosecutors said Monday that the trial proceedings have shown adequate proof of Bo's guilt on charges of netting $4.3 million through bribes and embezzlement and abuse of power in interfering with the murder investigation. A date for the verdict has not been given. The corruption charges carry a maximum penalty of death, though many observers believe his sentence will be in the range of 20 years' imprisonment."The defendant's crimes are extremely grave, and he also refuses to admit guilt. As such, the circumstances do not call for a lenient punishment but a severe one, in accordance with the law," the prosecutor said, according to a transcript of the court proceedings.Though Bo's downfall has widely been perceived as the result of his defeat in party infighting ahead of last fall's once-a-decade leadership transition, officials have taken unusual steps to portray his trial as a legitimate prosecution of his misdeeds, including the release of detailed, though presumably vetted, transcripts of the proceedings.Bo mounted an unexpectedly vigorous defense against the criminal charges, recanting earlier confessions and rarely expressing contrition as he sought to lay the blame for most of the misdeeds on his wife and others. However, he refrained from using the trial as a stage to denounce the administration and his political opponents, according to the transcripts.Most importantly, he acknowledged the party's legitimacy while holding firm to his denial of the charges — a move that at once seeks to retain his honor and appeal to party loyalists."I know I am not a perfect person and I had a bad temper and acted subjectively and I made serious faults and mistakes," Bo said. "I deeply feel that I failed to govern my family and it had a negative effect on the state. I sincerely accept the investigation from the party and the judicial departments, but the charge of corruption is not true."Bo added a folksy touch to his arguments, hitting on themes of filial piety, simplicity and tradition that appeal to his support base, made up mostly of farmers and workers at the lowest rung of society who have been disillusioned by the perceived immorality of party cadres. He said the jacket he was wearing was made by a local township company in Dalian, and the pants were bought by his mother in the 1960s.In his efforts to distance himself from Gu, he admitted an affair and said the couple had been estranged at one point.Bo was accused, among other things, of providing political favors to a businessman, Xu Ming, in return for having him at his family's beck and call. According to Bo's wife, Xu gave the family expensive gifts that included a villa in France, international airfare to three continents, abalone dinners and a Segway scooter — and Gu said Bo knew about the gifts because she told him.Bo is also accused of funneling $800,000 in government funds from a secret project.The court also heard allegations over the weekend that Bo abused his power as the Communist Party secretary of Chongqing to block an investigation into the Briton's murder, as well as to hide his aide's embarrassing flight to a U.S. consulate — an event that help set the scandal into motion.On Monday, Bo repeated his doubts about the evidence presented by prosecutors while introducing a bizarre twist to the narrative. Bo said that Wang tried to defect to the consulate early last year, not in a dispute over the investigation into the Briton's murder — as was commonly understood — but because he had confessed his feelings to Gu and feared Bo's rage over that trespass."He knew my personality, he'd trespassed on my family and violated my basic emotions, this is the real reason he decided to defect. Wang Lijun in reality is trying to muddy the waters," Bo testified.He also said that Gu and Wang were as close as "glue and lacquer" and that they had a "very special relationship; I was frustrated by that."Wang had earlier said in court he went to the Americans because he feared for his safety after he told Bo that the politician's wife had murdered the Briton.Striking a note of resignation, Bo thanked the court for letting him fully defend himself. "I know there is no escape from my fate and sometimes I was weak at heart. Faced by imprisonment, I have mixed feelings and the only thing I have is the rest of my life."
HIRONO, Japan — Tokyo Electric Power Co, the operator of the stricken Fukushima nuclear plant, said it would invite foreign decommissioning experts to advise it on how to deal with highly radioactive water leaking from the site, and Japan signaled it may dip into a $3.6 billion emergency reserve fund to help pay for the clean-up.Visiting the plant crippled by an earthquake and tsunami in March 2011, Toshimitsu Motegi, the trade and industry minister, said on Monday he would set up a taskforce to take charge of the clean-up, and send officials to Fukushima to oversee operations."I strongly feel that the government should get fully involved," he told reporters after touring the Fukushima Daiichi facility, which is 220 km (137 miles) north of Tokyo.Motegi ordered Tokyo Electric Power, or Tepco, to replace storage tanks that are at risk of leaking radioactive water. Tepco acknowledged last week that hundreds of tons of highly radioactive water had leaked from one of around 350 tanks that were assembled quickly after the 2011 nuclear meltdowns at the site. The tanks are used to store water pumped through the reactors to keep fuel in the melted cores from overheating.Motegi said Tepco should have more frequent patrols around the tanks and better documentation of inspections. He said the utility should replace weaker bolted tanks with sturdier welded storage units. Tepco said it was setting up its own group of experts to oversee toxic water and storage tanks at the Fukushima site."For measures that require sophisticated technology, we will appropriately implement them as the government while collaborating with authorities on fiscal measures, including the use of a reserve fund," Motegi said.Earlier on Monday, Chief Cabinet Secretary Yoshihide Suga said the situation at Fukushima was "deplorable", and signaled the government could use some of the 350 billion yen set aside in this year's budget as a reserve for natural disasters and other emergencies.Tepco's revelation of the toxic leaks is the most serious problem in a series of recent mishaps, including power outages, contaminated workers and other leaks. Tepco also said last month - after repeated denials - that the Fukushima plant was leaking contaminated water into the Pacific Ocean from trenches between the reactor buildings and the shoreline.Japan's Nuclear Regulation Authority said last week it feared the disaster was "in some respects" beyond Tepco's ability to cope.The latest crisis comes as Prime Minister Shinzo Abe has been touting Japan's nuclear technology abroad to countries like Turkey, promising that its nuclear reactor makers have learned vital safety lessons from the disaster.Tepco shares ended down 6.9 percent on Monday after falling as much as 10 percent to their lowest level in 12 weeks.Foreign Minister Fumio Kishida on Sunday visited Chernobyl in Ukraine, the site of the 1986 nuclear disaster, and said he hoped to apply lessons learned there to Fukushima."I directly saw that the battle to contain the accident still continues 27 years after the disaster. Ukraine's experience and knowledge serve as a useful reference for workers coping with the Fukushima nuclear crisis," Kyodo news agency quoted Kishida as telling reporters.China on Sunday said it was paying close attention to developments at Fukushima, noting it has the right to request entry into waters near the facility to conduct checks and assess the impact of the nuclear accident on the Western Pacific.The country's State Oceanic Administration said it hadn't found any evidence of a "direct impact" from radiation on Chinese waters, but will closely monitor developments.Public distrust towards Tepco's handling of the Fukushima plant clean-up has also intensified, with a Mainichi newspaper poll finding 91 percent of respondents saying the government should take a more active role in the contaminated water issue.
SHANGHAI — A prominent investor and online social commentator was detained Friday in Beijing on charges of soliciting prostitution just after the government stepped up a campaign aimed at cracking down on online activism.The investor, Charles Xue, 60, was picked up Friday evening with a 22-year-old woman, the police said in a statement.Mr. Xue has been known in China for his investments in Internet and technology companies, including the telecom company UTStarcom. But in recent years, he also became an Internet celebrity for his investing tips and commentary on social issues, including child trafficking and the plight of the underprivileged. He has attracted more than 12 million followers to his account on Sina.com's Weibo service, a popular microblog platform similar to Twitter.The government has been cracking down on social media activists who have exposed corruption or stirred up interest in social issues. Some prominent activists have been detained, including a journalist and people working at public relations firms.Whether this is the case for Mr. Xue, who is also known as Xue Manzi, is unclear. But people posting on microblogs on Sunday speculated that the arrest was a setup and an attempt to stifle online commentary.Mr. Xue, who grew up in China but is a naturalized American citizen, could not be reached for comment on Sunday.Because microblogs have grown into a powerful social force that has led to the downfall of some prominent government officials, analysts say the authorities are determined to put stricter controls in place and have pressed Internet companies to censor more content.
JINAN, China — In the weeks before Bo Xilai, the fallen Communist Party star, went on trial here on corruption-related charges, senior officials from the powerful party investigation agency told him about two officials who had been tried earlier on somewhat similar charges, Mr. Bo said in court.One, a former vice governor of Anhui Province, fought back and was executed in 2004 for taking bribes and stealing $1.6 million. The other, a former railway minister, was more compliant; he received a suspended death sentence — essentially life in prison — in July, mainly for taking $10.6 million in bribes.The senior officials' point, Mr. Bo told the court here in a 10-minute speech on Friday, was that the party could mete out any punishment it chose, and that Mr. Bo's fate rested on whether he chose to cooperate during his own trial on charges of bribe taking, embezzlement and abuse of power, according to two people briefed on the proceedings.Mr. Bo's speech and some other instances in which he railed against threats and hardships during his 17 months in captivity have not appeared in the torrent of court transcripts released publicly since the trial — China's most closely watched in three decades — began on Thursday. Instead, those transcripts show Mr. Bo cross-examining witnesses, ridiculing the testimony of his wife and former colleagues, and seemingly free to play his part as defendant however he chooses.The trial remains political stagecraft, fashioned around Mr. Bo's combative character, analysts say, despite the fact that the party, in an unexpected show of relative transparency, has allowed millions of Chinese citizens to witness much of Mr. Bo's performance through a running court microblog.The spectacle, they say, is an effort by the party to convince his elite party allies and ordinary supporters that Mr. Bo, a populist politician and the son of a revolutionary leader, had his say in court, and that the long prison sentence he is expected to get is based on evidence of crimes committed, not political payback. State news media highlight daily the evidence presented against Mr. Bo, while officials have limited his airtime in court and in the transcripts to help maintain control."The authorities hope to separate the Bo Xilai case from politics," said Chen Jieren, a legal commentator. "They want people to think this was only an anticorruption struggle, not a political and ideological struggle."While the microblog gambit may have won Mr. Bo additional sympathy and exposed cracks in the prosecution, its show of legal parrying between the defendant and his accusers also lent considerable credibility to the political theater. Perhaps most important for the party, what has most captivated ordinary Chinese — thanks to headlines in major state media outlets — is a mountain of testimony that depicts Mr. Bo as the archetypal corrupt official, with a spoiled son and a wife who murdered a British businessman. (She was convicted in August 2012).Evidence at Mr. Bo's trial has shown his wife, Gu Kailai, and son, Bo Guagua, regularly taking favors from a tycoon friend, Xu Ming, including a $3.2 million villa on the French Riviera; a $131,000 six-person vacation to Africa in 2011 that included use of a private jet; and a $12,000 Segway for the son, who also traveled to Paris, Venice, Argentina, Cuba and, for the 2006 World Cup, Germany. "It was convenient to call Xu Ming," Ms. Gu testified. "He used to pay for things."Mr. Bo has not denied that those two had a cozy relationship — he only disavowed knowledge of gifts given — and the portrait the testimony paints of his family is likely to condemn him in the eyes of many Chinese citizens who abhor the official corruption so rampant in China. It could also be enough to convince ordinary people and leftist intellectuals, who praised Mr. Bo for pushing neo-socialist economic policies and an anticorruption campaign when he was party chief of Chongqing, that he is a hypocrite. The trial also benefits party leaders by playing to another audience: corrupt party officials. The new party leader, Xi Jinping, is directing a campaign to rein in their lavish living arrangements and bring "tigers and flies" to heel for corruption. State media has trumpeted Mr. Bo as the biggest tiger caged so far.More salacious details of decadence and conflict in the Bo family emerged over the weekend. Mr. Bo testified Saturday that he had an affair that drove his wife and son to Britain. On Sunday, he quibbled over testimony from a former Chongqing police chief, Wang Lijun, who had said that Mr. Bo punched him, bloodying his face, after he confronted him with suspicions that Ms. Gu had murdered the Briton, Neil Heywood. Mr. Bo insisted he had only slapped Mr. Wang: "I've never trained in boxing," he said, "and I don't have that kind of force."
HONG KONG — State-owned Air China's half-year profit rose 10 percent as foreign currency gains more than made up for declining passenger and cargo revenue.The Beijing-based airline said late Tuesday that profit margins in the passenger business shrank as competition intensified in China's fast-growing air travel market, the world's second biggest, while the air cargo market remained weak."The global economy continued its sluggish recovery whilst China's economic growth slowed," the company said.A protracted slowdown in the world's second-biggest economy is biting into travel budgets while an uncertain global outlook is cutting demand for exports from Chinese manufacturers.Air China Ltd., one of China's three major state-owned airlines, reported that profit rose to 1.14 billion yuan ($180 million) in the January-June period.Revenue slipped 2 percent to 46 billion yuan as sales from its core business shrank.The airline made 1.12 billion yuan in foreign currency gains as China's currency strengthened against the dollar. The yuan, which is not freely convertible into foreign currencies, has gained 1.8 percent this year.The airline lost 341 million yuan in the same period last year as the currency slipped against the dollar.Profitability at Chinese airlines is affected to a large degree by currency fluctuations because while they mostly earn revenue in yuan, expenses for jet fuel and new airplanes are priced in dollars.Air China also earned 101 million yuan from its shareholding in Hong Kong's Cathay Pacific Airways Ltd., compared with a loss a year earlier.
BEIJING — As a Chinese court poured out details from disgraced politician Bo Xilai's trial, it released two transcripts that accidentally revealed the limits of China's rare display of judicial openness.The first, the original, mentioned a claim from Bo that his superiors had told him to cover up an aide's disappearance. That transcript was soon replaced with one that made no mention of the claim, or of Bo's Communist Party bosses.Beijing was happy to let Bo call a former police chief a liar, or his wife mentally ill, as prosecutors described his alleged individual economic and administrative misdeeds. But that redaction shows how focused the party leadership was on keeping itself out of the proceedings.The Jinan Intermediate Court released a surprising amount of details from Bo's trial, issuing regular microblog posts and same-day transcripts that included testimony, cross-examination, details of evidence and defense statements. But the partial openness is less a sign of legal reform than of the leadership's desire to lend credibility to a process believed to have a foregone conclusion: a lengthy jail sentence for Bo for dragging the ruling Communist Party into a lurid scandal of corruption, murder and betrayal."Publicizing details of the trial has paid off" for the authorities, said Chen Jieren, an independent political commentator who said the public could see for themselves the extent of Bo's alleged corruption."Before the trial, there were many supporters of Bo who said it was just part of a political struggle," Chen said. "Now there's solid evidence. Everybody has seen that, even if there was no political struggle, Bo's crimes still exist."Bo, formerly Chongqing city's top leader, has denied charges that he netted $4.3 million through corruption, that he interfered with a murder investigation involving his wife, and that he caused his former police chief Wang Lijun to attempt to defect to the U.S., embarrassing the party and setting off the scandal.In the five-day trial that closed Monday, the court's openness was seen as unprecedented in recent decades for such politically charged proceedings. Foreign journalists were kept out of the courtroom, however, and the altered transcript shows the leadership's desire to erase any mention of politics.In the first version of one of Monday's transcripts, a prosecutor rejected Bo's argument that he was following orders from above to fabricate a medical certificate to hide Wang's disappearance when he fled to the American consulate. The prosecutor said the fake certificate was issued before superiors' orders came down and that in any case, the directive didn't include such an order.The transcript then disappeared from the site. It was replaced shortly after by one that excluded the prosecutor's reference to Bo's argument.That deletion points to the party's sensitivity about being implicated in Bo's alleged crimes.It is unknown what other details have been similarly omitted, but many legal and political experts in China said that overall, the transcripts seem to have presented the proceedings fairly."Don't disparage the director of this drama. He's revealed our current era to a great extent, but without losing control," wrote Luo Changping, a prominent editor, on his microblog. "And don't belittle the defendant for his awkward way of cooperating in completing this drama. There's never been a focal point quite like this in causing people to gather around and think. A bigger common factor is that at least, from here, we can strive for rule of law."But even as the court released details from Bo's trial, there were strong reasons to doubt it would usher in greater openness in China, or fairness in a judicial system controlled by the party. Authorities have been waging a crackdown on online expression and civil society, detaining journalists who have exposed alleged corruption and arresting bloggers and rights activists who urge officials to declare their assets.Bo's trial itself was designed to avoid references to politically thorny issues that could spark factional disputes in the party. The charges against Bo avoided widely held accusations that he trampled over the law in waging an anti-mafia crackdown in Chongqing, including illegally seizing millions of yuan in assets from entrepreneurs and using summary trials to convict them based on confessions extracted using torture.Political observers speculate that trial details were decided through backroom deliberations between Bo's supporters and opponents within the leadership about how long he should be locked away. The charges were then tailored to the sentence, while omitting his political offenses to avoid alienating his allies, they say.Despite the meticulous scrubbing of politics from the trial's proceedings, many widely followed commentators stepped in to fill in some of the missing context, pointing to the unchecked power with which Bo ruled over his city and the tangled web of political and business connections through which illicit funds could flow."Details in Bo Xilai's case show that all officials, in the eyes of the party secretary, are his henchmen and family servants," wrote Tong Zhiwei, a law professor at the East China University of Politics and Law, on his microblog. "It's nearly impossible for them to do things according to the law and not according to the leader's will."But party leaders would likely be disappointed if they had hoped the trial would turn Bo's followers against him. The media-savvy fallen politician mounted a feisty defense, portraying himself as too busy to scrutinize his family's affairs and as a well-meaning public servant surrounded by duplicitous people. While denying criminal conduct, he expressed contrition for some missteps."I didn't manage my family and my subordinates well. I have made serious errors and let down the party and the people," Bo said at the close of the trial Monday.Political analyst and Beijing historian Zhang Lifan said it was a mistake for the leadership to avoid prosecuting Bo for political offenses, because now there's a chance he could resurface if political winds shift.Bo is widely regarded as having unnerved some in the party leadership with his naked ambition to scale to the apex of Chinese political power with Mao Zedong-style mass mobilization campaigns and the fostering of a personality cult."The real factor behind this case was that he was seeking supreme power, but they did not pursue any charges on this front. This is the prosecution's strategic error and now it's hard to redeem," Zhang said. "He has still maintained his fans while creating new difficulties for the current leadership and fear in his opponents."
HONG KONG — The most prominent Catholic in greater China warned on Tuesday of violence in Hong Kong next year as a planned campaign of civil disobedience demanding full democracy possibly sparks a backlash from the government after unnerving Beijing.Cardinal Joseph Zen said he would join the Occupy Central campaign targeting Hong Kong's financial district and would happily risk arrest, saying it was a "desperate last resort".The 81-year-old former Bishop of Hong Kong said he did not think Beijing would live up to its promises of allowing full democracy in the territory by 2017.The Hong Kong government and pro-Beijing supporters might try to incite violence to justify a crackdown on a peaceful campaign, he added."They may like to provoke some violence, yes, and they may even send people to infiltrate the (protesters). So that's a danger," he told Reuters in an interview. "I'm worried we may finish with some violence ... Then they have the pretext to crush everything."The former British colony returned to Chinese rule on July 1, 1997, with the promise of universal suffrage as an "ultimate aim" in its mini-constitution, making it potentially the first place on Chinese soil to enjoy fully democratic elections.The territory enjoys wide-ranging autonomy from Beijing, with a relatively free press, freedom of religion and independent judicial system, but every year, tens of thousands protest to demand full democracy.The Occupy Central movement is demanding firm government proposals towards electing the city's leader in 2017 and is planning choreographed acts of peaceful disobedience climaxing with a mass rally to shut down the financial district in July next year.The threats have alarmed Beijing officials and Hong Kong's leader, Leung Chun-ying, has said there is "no possibility" Occupy could be lawful or peaceful, or that it would be tolerated by the police or the courts.Zen said, however, that Leung's government needed only to "prepare more prisons for the occasion and not prepare tear gas because those people who join Occupy Central are happy to be arrested. They are there in order to be arrested".Zen also urged Pope Francis to take a tougher line with Beijing.China's Catholics are divided between the state-sanctioned Catholic Patriotic Association, which has installed bishops without Vatican approval, and an "underground" wing loyal to the Vatican that rejects state control."He should not be too nice," Zen said, noting that Pope Francis had yet to send a message to Beijing or appoint a secretary of state for the Holy See. "They don't understand kindness, they only understand force."Beijing and the Vatican broke off formal diplomatic relations shortly after the Chinese communists took power in Beijing in 1949.
JINAN, China — Concluding a trial that has riveted China, Bo Xilai, the former elite Communist Party official, attacked elements of the prosecution's case on Monday and said his former top deputy and his wife, both of whom provided evidence against him, had a passionate relationship.Mr. Bo said the charges of bribery, embezzlement and abuse of power against him were deeply flawed because they depended on evidence from his wife, Gu Kailai, and his former top deputy, Wang Lijun, who he asserted were themselves involved with the abuses Mr. Bo was accused of committing — and with each other.Mr. Wang and Ms. Gu "were stuck together as if by glue," he said in his closing comments.Mr. Bo's final testimony added to the soap opera-like twists in a trial that provided an unusual showcase of how China manages its legal system. Mr. Bo, 64, who was stripped of his membership in China's ruling Politburo last year, is nearly certain to be found guilty. But he was given considerable latitude to defend himself in extended and colorful testimony, according to censored transcripts of the trial that were circulated by the court and that appeared widely in state media, which praised the proceedings as progress for the rule of law in China.The trial was carefully stage-managed by the ruling Communist Party to focus on narrow criminal charges brought against Mr. Bo rather than on the broader political struggle that culminated in his purge. Neither Mr. Bo nor the prosecutor referred to serious tensions that moving against a Politburo member, who hailed from a prominent revolutionary clan, caused for the party during a year of political succession.Mr. Bo's oratory, starting from his defiant remarks on Thursday, may have given spectators the impression that he was free to speak his mind, and also won him sympathizers. But the trial transcripts substituted drama for completeness. Mr. Bo appeared to limit his own comments to addressing the prosecution's claims and did not, as he might have done, use his knowledge as a party leader to reveal how the families of other powerful party leaders had amassed far more wealth than he was accused of acquiring. Sensitive remarks were struck from the record.In previous days, testimony showed that Mr. Bo's wife and son had taken lavish gifts from a billionaire; that Ms. Gu had told Mr. Wang, who was the police chief of Mr. Bo's metropolitan region, Chongqing, that she poisoned a British businessman; and that Mr. Bo had punched or slapped Mr. Wang in the face after Mr. Wang confronted him with that news two months later.The trial was the most closely watched in China since that of the Gang of Four, which included Mao's wife, Jiang Qing, was broadcast live on television in 1980. It is taking place in the social media age, and the party is learning to harness the power of microblogs for information control. Journalists in Jinan to cover the trial were barred from the courtroom and sat in hotel rooms for hours reading transcripts released via the court microblog.The most explosive revelation of the trial came when Mr. Bo asserted in his closing speech that Mr. Wang had had a final falling out with Mr. Bo and fled to a nearby American Consulate in February 2012 in large part because of tensions that boiled over from his infatuation with Ms. Gu. The wife and the police chief had been close for years, Mr. Bo said, ever since a young tycoon, Xu Ming, introduced Mr. Wang to Ms. Gu. Mr. Wang won Ms. Gu's confidence when he investigated Ms. Gu's suspicions that she had been poisoned, and he became a fixture in the Bo household."Because he and Gu Kailai were stuck together as if by glue, Gu Kailai took him at his word, and Wang Lijun infiltrated my household because of his association with Gu Kailai," Mr. Bo said. "So now such a serious thing has occurred." He added, "The two had an extremely special relationship, and I was so sick of it."Mr. Bo said that Mr. Wang harbored an enduring "secret love" for Ms. Gu, and that "his emotions were twisted; he could not free himself." Mr. Wang expressed his feelings in one or more letters to Ms. Gu, Mr. Bo said. One day, Mr. Wang told her of his love and slapped himself eight times in front of her."You're a little abnormal," Ms. Gu told Mr. Wang, according to Mr. Bo."I used to be abnormal, but now I'm normal," Mr. Wang said.Then Mr. Bo suddenly walked into the room and took the letter or letters away, he said. "He knew my character," Mr. Bo said. "He harmed my family. He harmed my basic feelings. That's the true reason for his defection."
SHANGHAI — Global milk powder companies are scrutinizing Chinese social media reports as many as four times a day to gauge consumer reaction to a high-profile pricing investigation and food safety scare that threaten their squeaky-clean image in the $14.5 billion China market.The stepped-up monitoring of the microblogging site Weibo and local online forums reflects the outsize role the social media play in China, where access to information is restricted. Chatter about food safety scares spreads with lightning speed on Weibo, so companies are learning to keep constant track of their online brand reputations."We work with a number of clients in this sector, and we've been busy, very busy, over the last couple of weeks," said a China-based senior executive at a social media analytics firm.He asked not to be identified because the firm is working with industry brands, including those owned by Fonterra Co-Operative Group, Danone and Nestlé.Earlier this month, five international milk powder companies and one Chinese company were fined a record $110 million after an investigation into price fixing in the sector, while a botulism scare at the New Zealand dairy giant Fonterra tarnished the wider reputation of imported milk powder.Reuters analyzed the frequency of Weibo posts mentioning the major infant formula brands and found that the number of posts had begun to increase as early as May and then peaked at the start of August, around the time of the botulism scare.The earlier spikes could be explained by the spread of rumors around the milk powder price investigation, which was publicly disclosed in July but had been in the works for four months. The viral nature of the social media can also amplify the chatter without necessarily reflecting wider consumer thinking because a single message can be reposted thousands of times.Nestlé, which was named in the pricing investigation but escaped a fine, experienced the smallest spike in online chatter about its Wyeth infant formula unit. Mentions of Mead Johnson Nutrition spiked the most, peaking in June, but then returned close to normal this month.The frequency of posts about Dumex and Abbott Laboratories, which make brands like Similac, remained elevated into August, suggesting the companies may have work to do to reassure consumers.Chatter about Fonterra, which does not have its own brand in China, was little affected by the earlier price investigations but spiked steeply in August at the time of the botulism scare.In August alone, posts that mentioned Fonterra were five times as numerous as those from January through July.Nestlé and Danone declined to comment. Mead Johnson, Wyeth and Fonterra did not respond to e-mailed queries.Abbott, a U.S. company, said it was stepping up social media engagement worldwide. "Our use of social media is increasing globally as we look to better understand, respond to and connect with our customers around the world," said Kelly Morrison, an Abbott spokeswoman.Chinese consumers are highly sensitive to dairy safety after a scandal in 2008 involving baby milk powder contaminated by melamine, an industrial chemical. At least six babies died, and thousands more fell ill.For the international infant formula brands, the recent scandals hit a particularly sensitive spot: their reputations for safety, which was their primary edge over local rivals."The picture that is being painted in China is that their quality isn't that much better than local firms," said Torsten Stocker, a partner in Hong Kong at the consulting firm AT Kearney.He said that infant formula companies had made use of online media to gauge consumer sentiment, track the spread of conversations related to their brands and work out how to respond to the crisis."There was one brand which was holding out and didn't admit involvement until the very end," he said. "That made Chinese netizens angry. Other brands did better, responding quickly and getting opinion leaders to support the brand online."Consultants will now create detailed reports using the data to identify weak spots of brands through the crisis and helping milk powder makers with recovery drives, he said, adding that some companies had asked for updates four times a day.Milk powder makers are also using analysis of the online Chinese retailer Taobao, owned by Alibaba, to map out demand hotspots in China's multitude of lower-tier cities, where analysts predict that 80 percent of growth in the sector will come from. China has more than 150 cities with populations of more than one million, and the major Western brands have yet to establish coast-to-coast distribution channels."Many firms are looking at Taobao, which is a good indicator because it tells you where demand is, but where the physical infrastructure hasn't yet reached," said Jeff Walters, managing director at Boston Consulting Group, which advises a number of milk powder companies in China.Global infant formula companies in China have traditionally benefited from high prices and a domestic sector dogged by safety fears, but analysts said the recent turmoil could be the start of a more challenging period for companies in China.The Chinese authorities are also looking to consolidate the sector and create stronger local champions, which means the global companies will be taking on fewer but more formidable competitors."Now companies are going to have to get a lot smarter. They're going have to come up with the right pricing, the right brand image and focus on far better distribution," said Shaun Rein, managing director of China Market Research Group.
JINAN, China — In the weeks before Bo Xilai, the fallen Communist Party star, went on trial here on corruption-related charges, senior officials from the powerful party investigation agency told him about two officials who had been tried earlier on somewhat similar charges, Mr. Bo said in court.One, a former vice governor of Anhui Province, fought back and was executed in 2004 for taking bribes and stealing $1.6 million. The other, a former railway minister, was more compliant; he received a suspended death sentence — essentially life in prison — in July, mainly for taking $10.6 million in bribes.The senior officials' point, Mr. Bo told the court here in a 10-minute speech on Friday, was that the party could mete out any punishment it chose, and that Mr. Bo's fate rested on whether he chose to cooperate during his own trial on charges of bribe taking, embezzlement and abuse of power, according to two people briefed on the proceedings.Mr. Bo's speech and some other instances in which he railed against threats and hardships during his 17 months in captivity have not appeared in the torrent of court transcripts released publicly during the trial, China's most closely watched in three decades, which ended on Monday. Instead, those transcripts have shown Mr. Bo cross-examining witnesses, ridiculing the testimony of his wife and former colleagues, and seemingly free to play his part as defendant however he chooses.On Monday, Mr. Bo used the platform of his closing argument to lay bare the secret love triangle involving the prosecution's two star witnesses — his wife and a former police chief — that he asserted had ultimately ended his vaunted career.The trial remains political stagecraft, fashioned around Mr. Bo's combative character, analysts say, despite the fact that the party, in an unexpected show of relative transparency, has allowed millions of Chinese citizens to witness much of Mr. Bo's performance through a running court microblog.The spectacle, they say, is an effort by the party to convince his elite party allies and ordinary supporters that Mr. Bo, a populist politician and the son of a revolutionary leader, had his say in court, and that the long prison sentence he is expected to get is based on evidence of crimes committed, not political payback. State news media have highlighted daily the evidence presented against Mr. Bo, while officials have limited his airtime in court and in the transcripts to help maintain control."The authorities hope to separate the Bo Xilai case from politics," said Chen Jieren, a legal commentator. "They want people to think this was only an anticorruption struggle, not a political and ideological struggle."While the microblog gambit may have won Mr. Bo additional sympathy and exposed cracks in the prosecution, its show of legal parrying between the defendant and his accusers also lent considerable credibility to the political theater. Perhaps most important for the party, what has most captivated ordinary Chinese — thanks to headlines in major state media outlets — is a mountain of testimony that depicts Mr. Bo as the archetypal corrupt official, with a spoiled son and a wife who murdered a British businessman. (She was convicted in August 2012.)In his closing argument on Monday, Mr. Bo unveiled more explosive elements surrounding his family, and essentially argued that the saga came down to crimes of passion. He said Wang Lijun, the former police chief of Chongqing, which Mr. Bo governed until his downfall in March 2012, had a final falling out with Mr. Bo and fled to a nearby American consulate in large part because of tensions that boiled over from his secret affair with Mr. Bo's wife, Gu Kailai. Mr. Wang had told Ms. Gu that he was in love with her, and that outraged Mr. Bo, he said. His wife and the police chief had been close for years, he said, ever since Mr. Wang came to Chongqing to investigate Ms. Gu's suspicions that she had been poisoned."Because he and Gu Kailai were stuck together as if by glue, Gu Kailai took him at his word, and Wang Lijun infiltrated my household because of his association with Gu Kailai," Mr. Bo said Monday. "So now such a serious thing has occurred."He added: "The two had an extremely special relationship, and I was so sick of it."Mr. Bo said Mr. Wang harbored an enduring "secret love" for Ms. Gu, and that "his emotions were twisted; he could not free himself." Mr. Wang expressed his feelings in one or more letters to Ms. Gu, Mr. Bo said. One day, Mr. Wang told her of his love and slapped himself eight times in front of her.According to Mr. Bo, Ms. Gu said: "You're abnormal.""I used to be abnormal, but now I'm normal," Mr. Wang said, according to Mr. Bo.
BEIJING — The teenage son of a well-known Chinese military singer has pleaded not guilty to alleged gang rape, in a case that has focused attention on what the public often sees as spoiled behavior among the children of China's elite.The state-run Beijing News reported Thursday that Li Tianyi, 17, told a court in Beijing that he was drunk and passed out during the February attack, that he never beat or had sex with the victim and that he could remember little of the night in question. The trial is closed because Li is a minor, and the newspaper did not say how it obtained details of the proceedings.Li is the photogenic, baby-faced son of Li Shuangjiang, a celebrity military singer famed for crooning anthems for the People's Liberation Army and starring in television galas. His trial, along with four co-defendants, opened Wednesday to a flurry of local media coverage.The elder Li has often been referred to in the past as a "general" as a title of respect, although he is a civilian member of the PLA.Uncharacteristically for China, lawyers for both Li Tianyi and the victim released public statements about the case during the weeks running up to the trial, apparently seeking to form public opinion, which can indirectly sway proceedings by influencing the Communist Party officials who control the courts.Li's lawyers sought to lay blame for the incident on a Beijing bar for letting underage teens drink heavily. The victim's lawyers released a statement saying she had been threatened not to come forward about the attack.The rape case isn't the younger Li's first brush with the law. He was sentenced to a year in detention in 2011 as a 15-year-old for attacking a couple over a minor traffic dispute and threatening onlookers in a case that attracted widespread attention.The children of China's wealthy and politically connected are routinely mocked on public networking sites for their sense of entitlement and wasteful spending.
BEIJING — China confirmed Wednesday that police conducted a raid last week on an alleged terrorist cell in the restive northwestern region of Xinjiang, although details about the death toll and identities of those killed in the bloody incident remain sketchy.Officials have refused to discuss the Aug. 20 incident, the latest in a series of clashes this year that have killed dozens of people and led to scores of arrests.However, the official Kashgar Daily newspaper reported the raid in an article Wednesday on a memorial service held for policeman Yan Xiaofei, who was killed in the clash. The newspaper said the 32-year-old SWAT team deputy commander was killed while taking part in an action to "deal with a band of violent terrorists." It said he fought in the vanguard of the action, but did not say how he died.Citing Xinjiang police and government sources, U.S. government-funded station Radio Free Asia said 22 members of the region's native Uighur (WEE'-gur) ethnic group were killed in the raid and their bodies were buried in the desert without their relatives being notified.The station said police had been monitoring the group from a helicopter for a week as they gathered at a house in Yilkiqi township in the southwestern Xinjiang prefecture of Kashgar. It said police attacked while members of the group were performing Muslim prayers, and that they found six axes and knives at the scene.An officer reached by phone at Kashgar police headquarters said he wasn't authorized to say anything about the incident and then hung up. Calls to county and township government offices rang unanswered and an official with the Kashgar Communist Party propaganda office asked for questions to be sent by fax.Xinjiang has long been wracked by violence between authorities and members of the Uighur community who resent Chinese dominance of the economy and chafe at restrictions on their unique Central Asian culture and Muslim religion.This year has seen an unusually large number of clashes, however, including police firing on angry crowds and fighting between gangs of radicals and the security forces.Militants typically armed only with bladed weapons and homemade explosives are heavily outgunned by an overwhelming security presence, while the authorities often respond to clashes with crackdowns and mass arrests.Information about such incidents is tightly controlled and it is usually impossible to confirm the facts of individual clashes.Even non-violent activity can be punished with heavy prison sentences if it is determined to be subversive or extremist in nature.On Wednesday, the website of the ruling Communist Party's official People's Daily announced the sentencing of nine men to up to life in prison on charges of inciting ethnic hatred, ethnic discrimination, and conducting illegal religious activities.Germany-based Uighur activist Dilshat Rexit said the heavy sentences were intended to intimidate and threaten the native population and the court proceedings lacked transparency."The goal is to divert attention from the real reasons Uighurs are protesting. The court's decision is made according to China's political needs," Rexit, whose name is also spelled Dilxat Raxit, said by telephone.
BEIJING — The teenage son of a prominent Chinese general denied the charge of gang rape on Wednesday, inflaming public anger in a case that has stirred resentment against the offspring of the political elite who are widely seen as spoiled.Li Tianyi, 17, is one of five accused of assaulting a woman in a Beijing hotel in February, according to state media.Li has become the most prominent target of complaints that the sons and daughters of China's top-ranked Communist Party officials can dodge the law because of family influence.Li's father is General Li Shuangjiang of the People's Liberation Army (PLA), who is a singer known for performing patriotic songs on television shows and at official events.Li's mother, Meng Ge, is a famous singer in the PLA.At a closed-door trial, Li said he was drunk and had no knowledge of the alleged assault, two Beijing-based state-run newspapers said on their microblogs.Dozens of journalists as well as supporters of Li and the victim gathered outside the court in northwestern Beijing. Police officers dragged away one of Li's supporters after she was seen talking to a reporter.Two women stood in protest outside the court, holding signs that said: "Protecting the rights of mothers, females and young girls" and "Believe in justice"."The Li family continues to challenge the intelligence of normal people. They're using despicable, rogue means to acquit Li," said a microblogger. "If a heavy sentence is not imposed, it will not satisfy the people's resentment."The case has dominated headlines for weeks, focusing attention again on China's political aristocrats who are widely viewed as corrupt and above the law.It follows the dramatic trial of ousted former senior politician Bo Xilai, whose family's lurid excesses were detailed by the court and lapped up on social media.Li's legal adviser, Lan He, told reporters that lawyers hoped for a fair trial."Celebrities are also citizens and should not be held to ransom because of emotions," he said in a question-and-answer session with bloggers on Tuesday. "A moral judgment cannot replace justice."It is not Li's first brush with the law. In 2011, he drove a BMW into another car in Beijing, beat up the couple inside the vehicle and then scoffed at bystanders about calling the police.He was sentenced to a year in a juvenile correctional facility and his father made a public apology."The general public is worried that his family, because of their relationships and power, will be able to use their connections," said Zhang Ming, a politics professor at Renmin University."In China, this kind of privilege is very powerful. It's omnipresent," Zhang said. "The people's fears are not groundless."On Wednesday, "Li Tianyi" was the second-most searched topic on Sina Weibo, China's version of Twitter, with his name generating 9.7 million search results.In July, hackers attacked the website of one of the law firms representing Li, saying: "We just want to return justice to the client."President Xi Jinping has made addressing discontent over abuses by officials a main goal. Rising mistrust of the government presents a potent risk for leaders who fear social instability.Even the People's Daily, the party's mouthpiece, weighed in on Li's case when it broke, saying the failure of prominent families to educate their children could "lead to antagonism among the people".
BEIJING — Chinese police are hunting for a woman suspected of gouging out the eyes of a six-year-old boy, possibly to get her hands on his corneas to sell on the organ transplant black market, state media reported on Wednesday, a crime which has horrified China.The boy, from northern Shanxi province, was lured into a field on Saturday by the woman, where she gouged out his eyes and left him in a pool of blood, only to be discovered by his parents hours later, Chinese media reported.While his eyes were recovered, doctors were unable to save his sight and he is now blind, the official Xinhua news agency said.The China News Service said his corneas had been removed, likely to be sold on the black market.However, Xinhua said police have "initially ruled out the possibility of organ trafficking involvement in the case".Police are offering a reward of 100,000 yuan ($16,300) for the capture of the woman suspected of the crime, Xinhua added.The case has become the most widely searched for term on China's Twitter-like Sina Weibo microblogging service, with people calling for swift justice to be meted out."What kind of terrible person could do this? Let's unite together to find the criminal," wrote one Weibo user.Supply of organs and other body parts for transplants in China falls far short of demand due in part to the traditional Chinese belief that bodies should be buried or cremated intact.An estimated 300,000 patients are waitlisted every year for organ transplants and only about one in 30 ultimately will receive a transplant. Many organs come from executed prisoners, a practice China is trying to phase out.The shortage has driven a trade in illegal organ trafficking.
BEIJING — The worsening Syria conflict has exposed an uncomfortable truth behind China's cherished policy of non-interference: Beijing cannot do much to influence events even if it wanted to.With weak and untested military forces unable to project power in the Middle East, China can only play a low-key role in a region that is crucial for its energy security.As the United States and its allies gear up for a probable military strike on Syria, raising fears of a regional conflagration, China remains firmly on the sidelines, despite it having much more at stake than some other big powers.The Middle East is China's largest source of crude oil. Without it, the world's second-largest economy would shudder to a halt. In the first seven months of this year, China imported about 83 million metric tons (91.49 million tons) of crude from the region, half its total, with top suppliers including Saudi Arabia, Iran, Iraq, Oman and the United Arab Emirates.China has few economic interests in Syria itself but believes it has a strategic and diplomatic imperative to ensure Middle East stability and to protect a vital energy source.Retired Major General Luo Yuan, one of China's most outspoken military figures, told the official People's Daily last year that with so much oil at stake "we cannot think that the issues of Syria and Iran have nothing to do with us".China insists it is neither backing nor protecting Syrian President Bashar al-Assad, saying it only vetoed U.N. resolutions it thought would worsen the crisis. Beijing has also hosted both government and opposition officials in an attempt to find a political solution, albeit with few results.Even if the government were to go against its principle of not interfering in the affairs of other countries, the People's Liberation Army (PLA) is still far from capable of all but the most token presence in lands far from home."In terms of the PLA becoming actively involved, doing things the United States and its allies plan to do in the next few days, it does not at the moment have the wherewithal to do that," said Ross Babbage, a military analyst in Canberra and a former senior Australian defense official.China's military, despite making rapid progress in stealth fighter technology and launching its first aircraft carrier, is largely untested. It last fought a war in 1979, against Vietnam, which did not go well for the ill-prepared Chinese.Chinese ships have participated in anti-piracy patrols off the coast of Somalia, but when it came to evacuating its citizens from Libya in 2011 during fighting there, China was forced to rely mainly on chartering ferries.The PLA is for now focused on operations in the Pacific, Babbage said."But to conduct the sort of operations we're talking about here, into the Mediterranean, they're really not geared for that. Could they do it in 10 years time? Absolutely, if they chose to do it."President Xi Jinping said last month that becoming a maritime power was an important task for China as "the oceans and seas have an increasingly important strategic status".Publicly, China has shown few signs of wanting to get more deeply involved in the Middle East, whether militarily or diplomatically, a region it has little experience in, unlike the United States, Russia, Britain or France, the other veto-holding members of the U.N. Security Council.China has gone through the motions of sending envoys to Syria, and hosting government and opposition officials in Beijing, though some of its diplomatic efforts have come across as insensitive in the Arab world and have provoked a backlash.Early last year, demonstrators hurled rocks, eggs and tomatoes at the Chinese embassy in the Libyan capital, Tripoli, after Russia and China vetoed a U.N. Security Council resolution backing an Arab plan urging Assad to give up power.China does not think responsibility for security there lies in China's hands as it has no way to effectively get involved, said Yin Gang, an expert on China's Middle East policies at government think-tank the China Academy of Social Sciences."If there is stability that's good for China, and if there is chaos that is bad for China. But China does not have the ability to maintain stability there," Yin said."It's impossible, totally impossible. China has no way of using military forces to protect its interests in the Middle East. The best way to protect its interests would be to diversify its oil imports, get more from Russia, from other parts of the world."For China, the Middle East is also a mysterious region about which the Chinese know little, said Xu Guangyu, a retired major general and now senior adviser to the government-run China Arms Control and Disarmament Association."China has no way of knowing what's really going on in these countries," said Xu, who agreed that China's armed forces were simply not up to the task of a Middle Eastern adventure."We need to adopt a neutral position," he said.Still, there has been discussion on the fringes, on websites frequented by hawkish military types, of whether the time is right to re-focus its military for more of a aggressive role in the Middle East.China effectively relies on a strong U.S. military presence in the region to guarantee stability and the smooth flow of oil, especially through the Strait of Hormuz, which Iran has threatened in the past to close in the event of war.That could increasingly grate on the Chinese and prompt a strategic re-think, said a diplomatic source who is familiar with China's Middle East policy."At some point China is going to say: why should the United States be protecting our oil?"
BEIJING — Police in northern China launched a massive search Wednesday for a woman accused of gouging out the eyes of a 6-year-old boy.Authorities in the city of Linfen in Shanxi province offered a 100,000 yuan ($16,000) reward for the woman's capture.Police did not say if they had identified a suspect, and the boy said only that the woman spoke with an accent from outside the area. State media said the boy was recovering in a hospital, but had lost his sight permanently following the brutal ordeal Saturday.A police officer who only gave his surname, Liu, said he couldn't speculate on a motive because the investigation was continuing."We are sparing no efforts trying to solve this case," he added.Liu said the boy's eyeballs were found at the scene, and that the corneas hadn't been removed.State media previously had raised the possibility that the boy's corneas were taken for sale because of a donor shortage in China.A news report on a provincial TV channel showed the boy writhing in pain on a hospital trolley, with bandages around his head, and his parents, both farmers, crying.The Beijing Times newspaper quoted the parents of the boy, whose family name is Guo according to police, as saying that their son had told them he was walking along a path when he was grabbed by a woman. She used an unspecified tool to gouge out his eyes, they said.
BEIJING — China has accused two risk consultants, a British man and his American wife, of illegally buying and selling private information, state media reported on Tuesday, in what could be a widening crackdown on obtaining data for commercial purposes.Peter Humphrey and Yu Yingzeng were detained in Shanghai on July 10. They have since been formally arrested, which typically means police believe they have enough evidence for a case to be brought to trial.Police in Shanghai had arrested 126 people this month alone in a crackdown against the illegal collection of personal information, the Ministry of Public Security said in a statement on the case involving Humphrey and Yu.It did not give details on the nationalities or professions of those arrested, or say precisely what they had done.But the detention of Humphrey and Yu has already had a chilling effect on other risk consultants working in China, with some corporate investigators saying they had become more cautious about which projects to accept, avoiding any the government might see as sensitive.Multinationals, banks and investors rely on corporate investigators for information about potential partners and investments in China, where a lack of transparency is a hurdle to doing business.A police investigator in Shanghai, Lu Wei, said on state-run CCTV the couple "wantonly" obtained a lot of information on home registrations, international travel and property records.They sold the information to lawyers, multinationals and financial institutions, CCTV said.Humphrey said in a statement broadcast on CCTV that he had occasionally used illegal methods."I sometimes used illegal means to obtain personal information," Humphrey said in Mandarin to a camera as he sat handcuffed wearing an orange vest."I very much regret this and apologies to the Chinese government," said Humphrey, who worked as a journalist for Reuters in the 1980s and 90s.ChinaWhys, the investigative risk consultancy Humphrey and Yu founded, worked for many firms including British drugmaker GlaxoSmithKline (GSK), sources familiar with the matter have said.Chinese police have been investigating bribery accusations against GSK since July, although Chinese media reports on Humphrey and Yu made no mention of the firm.GSK has declined to comment on the work ChinaWhys did for the company except to say that Humphrey is not, nor has he ever been, an employee.In a statement, Britain's foreign office expressed concern at Humphrey's appearance on state TV."We were concerned to see that Peter Humphrey was interviewed about the details of a case which is currently under investigation and has yet to come to trial," the foreign office said, adding it was continuing to provide consular assistance to Humphrey and his family.The American embassy could not immediately be reached for comment.Jason Cai, a Chinese investigator who worked with Humphrey and Yu, was arrested around the same time, said a source with direct knowledge of the matter. Cai was not mentioned in the state media reports, and his arrest has not been announced.The ChinaWhys website says Humphrey has worked as a risk management specialist and corporate detective for 14 years.Cai Hua, a Chinese criminal lawyer, said it was difficult to say how heavy the penalty would be if the couple is convicted."For the most part, it rests on the extent of the damage the crime has done and the amount of information obtained," said Cai, who is not related to Jason Cai.The couple "confessed to the crime without concealing anything," the official Xinhua news agency said. " actions seriously violated the personal privacy of Chinese citizens.""Whether it's a Chinese person or foreigner engaging in illegal activities, public security organs will firmly crack down without holding back," the news agency said.
CHANGSHA, China — The 202-story Sky City project is not the tallest building on the drawing boards around the world. That distinction belongs to the Kingdom Tower, a project in Jeddah, Saudi Arabia, that is supposed to be 532 feet taller — the first building to reach a full kilometer.But while work on the Kingdom Tower's foundations is further along than work on Sky City, the Saudi skyscraper is not slated for completion until 2019 — five years after Sky City is to be finished.The much faster building schedule here underlines how different Sky City is from most other skyscraper projects. The Broad Group, an air-conditioning manufacturer that has moved into construction, wants the building to be not only the tallest jumbo skyscraper when it opens, but also the most rapidly built.The company will build it as if it were a house in the American suburbs — with prefabricated modules.Dennis Poon, the chief structural engineer for some of Asia's tallest buildings and the vice chairman of the Thornton Tomasetti engineering firm in New York, said erecting a 202-story building out of prefabs was an extension of a global trend in the construction industry in the last few years. Many companies are using factories to make larger and larger pieces of buildings; Mr. Poon said an ambitious hotel project that he was helping to build in the Bahamas used prefab bathrooms.Relying entirely on modules means the 4,450 apartments will have little flexibility later to be turned into hotel rooms or offices if these should prove more profitable, he said. Assembling an entire building out of modules also considerably limits the flexibility of architects to create distinctive shapes that can symbolize a city"Feasible? Yes, of course, but you get what you get," he said.David Scott, a recent chairman of the Council on Tall Buildings and Urban Habitat, a nonprofit group in Chicago, agreed that the project was feasible in engineering terms. China has much stricter standards than the United States for earthquake resistance, he said, and the lightweight, modular construction of Sky City will help it withstand quakes.But while the exterior walls of the building will be very heavily insulated against the weather to save energy, the thin, lightweight floors may not block enough sound traveling up and down through the building."You will have a challenge of hearing the people above and below you," said Mr. Scott, who is the chief structural engineer at the Laing O'Rourke engineering firm in London. "I don't think it would meet market expectations here."International experts question whether Sky City can be built as fast as the Broad Group promises. Keith Brooks, the director of global property at EC Harris, a global consulting firm that is one of the project managers for the Kingdom Tower in Saudi Arabia, predicted that hoisting large modules high into the sky for a 202-story building would prove more time-consuming and difficult than Broad expects.Large components tend to catch the wind like sails while they are being lifted by cranes. "I'm sure you can design the modules. The question is getting them up there," Mr. Brooks said.He also questioned Broad's claim that the use of prefab modules would cut in half the construction costs for Sky City, to $1.5 billion. Prefabrication reduces construction time, particularly for shorter buildings, but very seldom results in such large cost savings, he said.But Zhang Yue, the chairman of Broad, insisted that materials savings were substantial. Prefabrication greatly reduces the need for concrete and other materials, he said.Yet another question is whether the building will sway too much at the top during thunderstorms and on other windy days, making visitors queasy, even if the sway does not present a safety hazard.Many very tall skyscrapers built these days have a solid steel ball suspended inside the top of the building. The ball is the size of a full-size sport utility vehicle but weighs as much as 600 minivans, and it hangs from steel cables to swing back and forth like a pendulum. Called a tuned mass damper, it offsets and reduces the sway of the building.Mr. Poon said the Shanghai Tower, which he helped design and which builders topped out at the 125th floor in early August, could have met visitor comfort guidelines for building sway without a mass damper. But the developers of that project, as in many others, opted to sacrifice space near the top of the building and incur extra costs for the installation of a tuned mass damper to have an extra margin of comfort, Mr. Poon said.Mr. Zhang said that Sky City would not have a tuned mass damper because he believed that the steel modules would provide enough rigidity to limit sway.
CHANGSHA, China — China is slowing down, but the buildings keep going up — until now.China is home to 60 of the world's 100 tallest buildings now under construction. But the skyward aspirations of Changsha, the capital of Hunan province, have inspired incredulity tinged with hostility.Broad Group, a manufacturer based here in Changsha, has been planning to erect the world's tallest building here this winter, and in record time. The 202-story "Sky City" is supposed to be assembled in only four months from factory-built modules of steel and concrete early next year on the city's outskirts. The digging of foundations began on July 20.But the project's scale and speed have set off a burst of national introspection in recent days about whether Chinese municipal leaders and developers have gone too far in their increasingly manic reach for the skies."The vanity of some local government officials has determined the skylines of cities," an editorial in the People's Daily newspaper, the Communist Party's mouthpiece, said on Aug. 12.On Tuesday, the tycoon behind the project said in a telephone interview that he had ordered a pause in work at the site while waiting for further approvals from regulators in Beijing."It's because of all the concern in the media and on the Internet, the government is a little wary and has slowed down the process," said Zhang Yue, the chairman of the Broad Group.But he vowed to finish the building, saying that he expected a delay of no more than two to three months, with completion of the building in June or July next year instead of the original plan of finishing it in April. Workers have already dug a large hole in the ground for the foundations and have just laid a four-lane road to the site to bring in heavy equipment."No matter how high the obstacles, I will for certain overcome them to make sure this project is completed," Mr. Zhang said. He declined to identify who in Beijing had delayed his project, but said that he had not been asked to make any adjustments to the design.David Scott, a prominent structural engineer in London who has worked on many extremely tall buildings, said that regulatory delays were a periodic problem for such projects all over the world, but could usually be overcome.Local officials here say that while they have transferred the land for Sky City to Broad Group and have been installing electricity and water lines for the project, final approval for the project is still "in progress" from building safety experts in Beijing.The blueprints for Sky City call for a stack of long, skinny rectangles that taper to a narrow top, like a very tall and angular wedding cake. It bears a blocky resemblance to the 110-story Willis Tower in Chicago, formerly the Sears Tower, which was the world's tallest building until 1998 but is now being left in the shade by numerous rivals.Beijing, Shanghai, Shenzhen, Guangzhou and Chongqing, each similar in population to metropolitan New York, are now finishing one building apiece that will top the Willis Tower.Wuhan, the size of greater Houston, is erecting two buildings taller than the Willis Tower and Tianjin, the size of metropolitan Chicago, is constructing three, according to the Council on Tall Buildings and Urban Habitat, the Chicago nonprofit that tracks skyscraper bragging rights.Ambitious local officials, together with state-owned companies and state-owned banks, stand behind most of these projects, raising fears that taxpayers may eventually pick up the bill if projects prove uneconomical."If you let the market decide, I don't think a lot of these tall buildings would proceed," said Chau Kwong Wing, a professor of real estate and construction at Hong Kong University. Despite public concerns, there is no sign so far that any of the many very tall buildings under construction in China has been canceled by regulators in Beijing, he and Mr. Zhang both noted.
CHANGSHA, China — China is slowing down, but the buildings keep going up — until now.China is home to 60 of the world's 100 tallest buildings now under construction. But the skyward aspirations of Changsha, the capital of Hunan province, have inspired incredulity tinged with hostility.Broad Group, a manufacturer based here in Changsha, has been planning to erect the world's tallest building here this winter, and in record time. The 202-story "Sky City" is supposed to be assembled in only four months from factory-built modules of steel and concrete early next year on the city's outskirts. The digging of foundations began on July 20.But the project's scale and speed have set off a burst of national introspection in recent days about whether Chinese municipal leaders and developers have gone too far in their increasingly manic reach for the skies."The vanity of some local government officials has determined the skylines of cities," an editorial in the People's Daily newspaper, the Communist Party's mouthpiece, said on Aug. 12.On Tuesday, the tycoon behind the project said in a telephone interview that he had ordered a pause in work at the site while waiting for further approvals from regulators in Beijing."It's because of all the concern in the media and on the Internet, the government is a little wary and has slowed down the process," said Zhang Yue, the chairman of the Broad Group.But he vowed to finish the building, saying that he expected a delay of no more than two to three months, with completion of the building in June or July next year instead of the original plan of finishing it in April. Workers have already dug a large hole in the ground for the foundations and have just laid a four-lane road to the site to bring in heavy equipment."No matter how high the obstacles, I will for certain overcome them to make sure this project is completed," Mr. Zhang said. He declined to identify who in Beijing had delayed his project, but said that he had not been asked to make any adjustments to the design.David Scott, a prominent structural engineer in London who has worked on many extremely tall buildings, said that regulatory delays were a periodic problem for such projects all over the world, but could usually be overcome.Local officials here say that while they have transferred the land for Sky City to Broad Group and have been installing electricity and water lines for the project, final approval for the project is still "in progress" from building safety experts in Beijing.The blueprints for Sky City call for a stack of long, skinny rectangles that taper to a narrow top, like a very tall and angular wedding cake. It bears a blocky resemblance to the 110-story Willis Tower in Chicago, formerly the Sears Tower, which was the world's tallest building until 1998 but is now being left in the shade by numerous rivals.Beijing, Shanghai, Shenzhen, Guangzhou and Chongqing, each similar in population to metropolitan New York, are now finishing one building apiece that will top the Willis Tower.Wuhan, the size of greater Houston, is erecting two buildings taller than the Willis Tower and Tianjin, the size of metropolitan Chicago, is constructing three, according to the Council on Tall Buildings and Urban Habitat, the Chicago nonprofit that tracks skyscraper bragging rights.Ambitious local officials, together with state-owned companies and state-owned banks, stand behind most of these projects, raising fears that taxpayers may eventually pick up the bill if projects prove uneconomical."If you let the market decide, I don't think a lot of these tall buildings would proceed," said Chau Kwong Wing, a professor of real estate and construction at Hong Kong University. Despite public concerns, there is no sign so far that any of the many very tall buildings under construction in China has been canceled by regulators in Beijing, he and Mr. Zhang both noted.
HONG KONG — The Chinese Communist Party's drive against corruption moved into the powerful and politically delicate oil sector this week, as the authorities announced that four executives of the state-owned China National Petroleum Corporation were under investigation.On Tuesday, the Assets Supervision and Administration Commission of China said on its Web site that three oil executives — Li Hualin, a deputy general manager of China National Petroleum; Ran Xinquan, a vice president of PetroChina, the company's listed unit; and Wang Daofu, the chief geologist of PetroChina — were "suspected of grave violations of discipline and are currently undergoing investigation," by an anti-corruption agency. PetroChina also announced that the three men were under investigation and had resigned "due to personal reasons."A day earlier, authorities revealed an investigation into a deputy general manager of China National Petroleum, Wang Yongchun, for suspected "disciplinary violations," generally considered to be corruption, embezzlement or taking bribes.The investigations indicate that the Communist Party's effort to fight corruption extends beyond the government to powerful parts of the state-dominated economy. The party leader, Xi Jinping, came to power in November with promises that he would rein in official corruption and self-enrichment, which has become a major source of public discontent.On Tuesday, the Communist Party's Politburo, a council of 25 senior leaders, approved a five-year plan to curb corruption, the official news agency, Xinhua, reported. The report did not give details of the plan, but the official summation of the Politburo meeting noted that the party would "sternly investigate and punish violations of party rules and laws by party members and officials," and "give full play to deterrent force."Looming over this case is the recent trial of Bo Xilai, the former Politburo member, accused of taking bribes, embezzling and abusing his power to protect his wife from murder allegations. The trial of Mr. Bo, spread over five days and reported in unusual detail through a court microblog, highlighted what many citizens see as the brazen greed of China's political elite. A verdict is expected in early September."I think there's a dynamic here that suggests this may prove to be a more rigorous crackdown than we've seen for years," said Andrew Wedeman, a professor of political science at Georgia State University in Atlanta who researches corruption in China. "Way too many officials have been wearing Rolex watches and driving Mercedes."China's oil sector has long been the domain of powerful party officials, making any investigations politically thorny. For example, Zhou Yongkang, a former general manager of China National Petroleum, later became the head of China's domestic security organization, retiring last year. Such close ties have prompted speculation about whether powerful party figures could be ensnared in the inquiries.China National Petroleum "is a huge company, China's biggest energy company, but these people being investigated aren't the highest in the company," said Lin Boqiang, director of the China Center for Energy Economics Research at Xiamen University in eastern China. "It's relatively sensitive because ordinary people have so many complaints about the monopoly behavior of C.N.P.C. and other oil companies."But many observers are skeptical that officials have the will and the power to investigate their colleagues, who can appeal to patrons for protection from inquiries. Typically, corruption inquiries are initially carried out by party agencies, which then decide whether to hand over the matter for criminal investigation."It's a challenge, because there's an awful lot of power concentrated in these people's hands," said Professor Wedeman, the expert on corruption in China. "That concentration gives them the power to engage in corruption, and the power to cover it up."
BEIJING — "Have you noticed how woman opinion leaders are being called 'Mr.' on Weibo?" asked my sharp-eyed friend Mei Zhang, referring to the influential Twitter-like microblogs.She was right.In scattered online references subsequently confirmed in interviews, the evidence is there: "Liu Yu Xiansheng," or Mr. Liu Yu, a Tsinghua University politics professor and the respected author of "Details of Democracy," an admired book about the years she spent in the United States. In February, "Mr." Liu, 37, gave birth to a daughter, so calling her "xiansheng"  seems especially odd. She has more than 780,000 followers on Sina Weibo, the biggest microblogging platform in the country."Xiansheng" is the most common way to address a man today in Mandarin, replacing the gender-free "tongzhi," which began to fade in the 1980s, after the death of Mao Zedong. Once upon a time, "xiansheng" also indicated a teacher (more on that later). It means "first born" and expresses respect for a person older, and therefore more venerable, than yourself.Ms. Zhang, who was born in Shenyang but works in Hong Kong in finance, explained: "Historically, when a woman was called that, it really elevated her to the status of a man. It meant a brilliant woman. Not because she was pretty but because she was really respected, really clever."As a woman you have to be really outstanding to be called it, whereas if you are a man it can be anybody," she said.Lu Pin, of the Beijing-based Media Monitor for Women Network, agreed. "Why should a woman be called a man just because she's clever?" she said, sounding bemused at the very thought. "Why does she have to be a man to be respected?"I met Ms. Liu for lunch to ask how things were going as a new mom — and a man.Looking fresh, if a little rounder than I remembered from our last, prebaby meeting, her reaction wasn't indignation at this transformation of her gender, but surprise that she should be called "xiansheng" while only in her 30s."I think it's funny, and quite sad, because mostly only old women are called that," she said, looking slightly uncomfortable with the question. Answering it required acknowledging that she is held in high esteem, and that is embarrassing in a culture that places importance on appearing modest."I think when you are called 'xiansheng' it's about how people see you," she said. "They think I'm an intellectual, I'm respected, and I suppose they like me."Feminist linguistics, which examines how women are described in language and highlights the gender biases embedded in it, has not been deeply explored in China, meaning that awareness may be low, said David Moser, a Chinese-language specialist and a director of a Chinese studies program at Capital Normal University in Beijing."I think it's a little bit off the radar," he said.In other words, even feminists aren't watching out for this stuff, though women are represented in a colorful and wide range of derogatory ways in Chinese. "Xiansheng" undoubtedly isn't the worst.The very character for woman, "nu," is an ideogram that suggests submission: a kneeling person with her hands clasped before her, according to Li Leyi, a scholar, in his "Tracing the Roots of Chinese Characters: 500 Cases." Some think her hands may be bound, though Mr. Li doesn't confirm that.In contrast, the character for man, "nan," shows a field and a plow. (The latter became the standalone word for "power.") Then there is "yao," meaning goblin or devil, which contains the character for "woman." So does "traitor," while a sinister smile and plot — yes, they have a woman in them, too. The long list includes many hoary proverbs and sayings: "Brothers are your hands and feet, a woman your clothes," meaning that she is inessential and can be changed. "A woman is a mule who can be ridden and beaten," is another.There are other female "misters," like Yang Jiang, 102, a writer along with her husband, Qian Zhongshu,  and Zhang Yihe Xiansheng, the author of "The Past Is Not Like Smoke," a powerful memoir of her democratic father and his colleagues who were destroyed by the Communist Party after it seized power in 1949. She has more than 370,000 followers on Sina Weibo.Then there are famous, deceased female "misters": Bing Xin, a celebrated children's author, and  Wang Guangmei, a politician and the wife of Liu Shaoqi, a president of China.Bing Xin's daughter, Wu Qing, a former deputy to a local Beijing congress, is sometimes addressed as "xiansheng," even though, she said in a telephone interview, she doesn't deserve it.For Ms. Wu, the word's ancient meaning of "teacher" is more relevant than its contemporary meaning of man; it can be understood as a gender-neutral accolade. "I think it can be a good thing," she said. Young people may not understand that it once was a traditional form of respect for all, she suggested.Ms. Lu, the feminist, pooh-poohed that. After all, in olden times all teachers were men, and either way, today, she said, xiansheng "has become a male thing. Totally."A quick, unscientific poll of friends and colleagues drew a uniform reaction: it signifies "man."For Mr. Moser, these deep language structures operate on conscious and subconscious levels, showing enduring, patriarchal attitudes.Chinese linguistic insults to women are legion, but the subconscious ones interest him the most because they are the most insidious, he said.For example, a person with a doctorate — a "boshi" — is a man, unless you specify she's a woman, in which case she's a "nu boshi," he said, noting that Chinese is not the only language that exhibits this bias and that it extends to a range of professions."The male is always the generic and the female is the special case," he said."In English we have made some strides" toward eradicating bias, but things are backsliding, he said. "The use of 'Ms.' is kind of dying out or going back a bit," he said, pointing also to the fact that many women in the West still change their surname to their husband's."It's so common to say, 'you guys' when it's males and females," he said.Sometimes, a woman just has to be one of the guys — like Mr. Liu Yu, Mr. Zhang Yihe and Mr. Wu Qing.
HONG KONG — The police in Shanghai announced the arrest of an American woman and her British husband on charges of illegally gathering personal information as part of their work advising foreign companies on investment risks and fraud in China.The police announcement, issued through Xinhua, the state-run news agency, late on Monday, was the first official Chinese confirmation that the woman, Yu Yingzeng, and the man, Peter Humphrey, were arrested in connection with their work at ChinaWhys, an investigation and advisory company that they founded in Shanghai in 2003. Last week, the British Embassy in Beijing said Mr. Humphrey, formerly a reporter for Reuters, had been arrested.A Chinese state television news program showed what it said was video of Mr. Humphrey confessing, and the Web site of the newspaper Legal Daily said Ms. Yu had admitted to breaking the law. But the couple have been held in secrecy, making it impossible to say whether they spoke under duress.The allegations against the couple will probably send a chill through the fraud and commercial investigation firms in China that help foreign investors navigate the country's business landscape. Some multinationals in China have also come under pressure recently as a result of government investigations and allegations of price fixing and using bribery to facilitate business. The Xinhua report said that "the work concerning the case is still developing."According to the Xinhua report, police investigators in Shanghai found that, over the course of a decade, Mr. Humphrey and Ms. Yu had "used compilation, purchasing and other methods to illegally acquire and sell a large amount of citizens' personal information, seeking to make illegal gains." The information includes details about home addresses, family members, overseas travel and property, the Xinhua report said. It called ChinaWhys an "illegal investigation company."The report said that Ms. Yu and Mr. Humphrey were formally arrested on Aug. 16, have confessed to the allegations, and have "expressed extreme remorse for their criminal behavior and apologized to the Chinese government.""The two clearly knew that this behavior violated Chinese law," the report said.Chinese television news showed what it said was Mr. Humphrey's admission of guilt. "We sometimes in the past used illegal means to acquire personal information," said the man in the video, his face obscured by a digital blot, speaking in fluent Mandarin Chinese. "I'm very remorseful about this and wish to apologize to the Chinese government."The formal arrest means that the police will have more time to investigate the couple, and the authorities will then decide whether to indict them. The couple have been detained since July and unable to speak publicly, so the Shanghai police account could not be independently verified.Calls to the ChinaWhys office in Shanghai were not answered. Mr. Humphrey is the managing director of ChinaWhys, and Ms. Yu is general manager.Police investigators studied more than 500 investigation reports that ChinaWhys carried out for clients and found "dozens of reports with serious violations of Chinese citizens' privacy," the Xinhua report said. Those clients included manufacturers, financial institutions and law firms, according to Xinhua.Earlier, an acquaintance of Mr. Humphrey's, who asked not to be identified by name, said Mr. Humphrey appeared to have been arrested in connection with his work for GlaxoSmithKline, the British pharmaceutical group besieged by bribery allegations in China. The Xinhua report did not mention GlaxoSmithKline or any other companies.A spokesman for the United States Embassy in Beijing, Justin Higgins, said consular officers had visited Ms. Yu on July 16, soon after she was first detained. "We remain in contact with Ms. Yu and will continue to provide consular assistance," Mr. Higgins said.British officials said they remain involved in the matter as well. "We were concerned to see that Peter Humphrey was interviewed about the details of a case which is currently under investigation and has yet to come to trial," Britain's foreign office said in a statement, according to Reuters. "We are continuing to provide consular assistance to Mr. Humphrey and his family."
BEIJING — China's senior leadership has agreed to open a corruption investigation into Zhou Yongkang, one of China's most powerful politicians of the past decade, stepping up its anti-graft campaign, the South China Morning Post reported on Friday.The move against Zhou - a retired member of the Politburo's all-powerful Standing Committee - follows the five-day corruption trial of ousted politician Bo Xilai, who was widely considered a key Zhou ally.The Foreign Ministry declined to comment on the report when contacted by Reuters. The State Council Information Office, the public relations arm of the government, did not respond immediately to faxed questions about the report.Zhou also could not be reached for comment on the report and Reuters could not independently verify it.He was one rank higher than Bo in the power structure and would be the first Politburo Standing Committee member - retired or sitting - to be investigated for economic crimes since the end of the Cultural Revolution nearly 40 years ago, the Hong Kong-based newspaper said.Citing sources familiar with the leadership's thinking, it said the decision to investigate was made in view of rising anger inside the party at the scale of the corruption problem and the wealth that Zhou's family has amassed.President Xi Jinping ordered officials in charge of the case to "get to the bottom of it", the paper said.Most sources and political analysts have said they doubt Zhou is under investigation because it would risk opening a Pandora's box that could lead to calls for probes into other retired Standing Committee members, including ex-premier Wen Jiabao and his wife and son.The New York Times reported last year that Wen's family had accumulated at least $2.7 billion in "hidden riches", a story China labeled a smear.Earlier this month U.S.-based Chinese news site Duowei said Zhou was being investigated for graft. However, the report was later withdrawn.Chinese authorities revealed this week a probe into China National Petroleum Corporation (CNPC), which Zhou joined as a senior manager in the early 1990s.Four top managers at the company have been named as being under investigation in recent days, including group deputy general manager Li Hualin, who once served as Zhou's secretary.The newspaper said it understood the new probe would center on Zhou's time as a party boss in Sichuan province and at CNPC.In particular, investigators would examine whether Zhou and his family benefited through oilfield and property deals facilitated by his son, Zhou Bin, and other allies, it said.Sources told the newspaper it was too early to say whether Zhou - who controlled legal and law enforcement affairs for 10 years from 2002 - would face public prosecution or an internal party probe.Three other Zhou allies are currently under investigation, including the deputy party boss of Sichuan province, Li Chuncheng, who had for many years overseen development of the province's prosperous capital, Chengdu.The South China Morning Post said party investigators typically move against top aides and underlings of a primary target first to weaken their political base.Zhou was implicated in rumors last year that he hesitated in moving against Bo.Former Chongqing party boss Bo is awaiting a verdict on corruption, bribery and abuse of power charges.The domestic security forces Zhou ran also suffered a humiliating failure when they allowed blind rights advocate Chen Guangcheng to escape from 19 months of house arrest and flee to the U.S. embassy in Beijing, which happened last year too.Such fumbles gave then-president Hu Jintao and his successor President Xi a shared motive to put a growing array of police forces and domestic security services under firmer oversight.Xi has made fighting deeply-engrained graft a central theme of his new administration, and has promised to take down "tigers" - in other words very senior people - as well as "flies" lower down on the food chain implicated in corruption.Zhou would be the most senior person caught up in Xi's dragnet to date.He joined the Politburo Standing Committee in 2007 while also heading the central Political and Legal Affairs Committee, a sprawling body that oversees law-and-order policy.That double status allowed Zhou to dominate a domestic security budget of $110 billion a year, exceeding the defense budget.But the hulking, grim-faced 70-year-old stepped down, along with most members of the Standing Committee, at the 18th Party Congress last November and formally retired in March this year.At the same time, the position he occupied was downgraded, and his successor Meng Jianzhu is only a member of the Politburo, the 25-member body that reports to the elite Politburo Standing Committee.Since the 1990s, China's efforts to stifle crime, unrest and dissent have allowed the domestic security apparatus - including police, armed militia and state security officers - to accumulate power, which worried many within the party.Still, Zhou's time in charge of domestic security saw a huge swelling in the number of "mass incidents" - China's euphemism for public protests - fuelled by frustration at a yawning wealth gap and official corruption, despite the fact that the Party cracks down hard on dissent.
BEIJING — A bulldozer killed a four-year-old girl in southeastern China after her family resisted a land grab, a major cause of unrest in the country, Chinese media reported on Thursday, sparking online outrage.Hong Xiaorou was killed in Fujian province when the bulldozer hit her on Wednesday despite her grandmother screaming for the vehicle to stop, a provincial government-run news website said.Photos on Sina Weibo, China's version of Twitter, showed Hong's parents weeping over Hong's lifeless body.Authorities said Hong's death was an accident and that they had detained those responsible, according to the website.Seizures of land across China have been fuelled by soaring prices and the government's urban expansion drive, resulting in often violent clashes between officials and villagers.Outdated laws mean farmers have little legal recourse to oppose land grabs - commonly where village leaders sell off plots to a developer with little or no consultation - or to demand fairer compensation.Hong's death has been widely discussed on Weibo, especially as it follows a series of grisly incidents involving children. Chinese police said they were hunting a woman suspected of gouging out the eyes of a six-year-old boy, state media reported on Wednesday."Recently there have been so many children who have been injured and so many reports of deaths," a microblogger wrote. "Please stop hurting children."
TAIPEI, Taiwan — Three people in Taiwan perished as a result of heavy rains spawned by a destructive tropical storm, the government said Friday.Tropical Storm Kong-Rey battered the island Thursday, dumping more than 500 millimeters (19 inches) of rain on the heavily populated west coast and causing widespread flooding.The government's emergency operations center said one of the fatalities occurred when a man in Pingtung county in Taiwan's far south drowned after being thrown into a river from his skidding motorbike. Farther to the north in Yunlin country, one woman was electrocuted in her home after heavy flooding and another woman drowned.Kong-Rey skirted the island's east coast on Thursday before heading north toward Japan.Particularly hard hit in Taiwan were the large west coast cities of Chiayi, Tainan and Kaohsiung, where flooding in some areas reached second-story levels. Officials evacuated a total of 3,600 residents and cancelled some train services.Kong-Rey is the second major storm to hit Taiwan this month. Last week, a severe tropical storm dumped up to a meter (39 inches) of rain on the southern part of the island. High winds caused the cancellation of scores of international flights and in conjunction with the rain led to the disruption of high speed rail service between the capital of Taipei and Kaohsiung.
HONG KONG — A gang-rape trial that opened in Beijing on Wednesday accompanied by a blaze of local media attention has become China's latest legal spectacle to cast attention on the lifestyles, and alleged misdeeds, of the political elite.One of the five defendants is Li Tianyi, a 17-year-old whose privileged background and past misdeeds have made him the focus of a media and Internet uproar about what many see as the sordid ways of the offspring of the political elite. Mr. Li is the son of celebrity singers for the People's Liberation Army and ran into legal trouble before the rape charges.The prosecutors allege that the defendants — Mr. Li, three other minors and a 23-year-old man — took a young woman they had met in a bar in February to a hotel room in Beijing, beat her, forced her to strip and sexually assaulted her, according to a report on the Web site of the newspaper People's Daily.Like the recent trial of Bo Xilai, the fallen former politician, the case has become an intensely watched and debated parable about the privileges and limited accountability of the Communist Party's highborn. And accusations against the woman who says she was raped have stirred discussion about how the Chinese media and courts deal with victims of sexual assault and minors accused of crimes."The factor behind why the media and everyone is so interested in this case is that it's about the so-called ugly officials and ugly rich," said Lu Pin, who helps run the Media Monitor for Women Network, an advocacy group in Beijing."Everyone wants to see them exposed in disgrace, because in the majority of cases nothing is ever revealed," Ms. Lu said in a telephone interview. "But in fact, opinion can also easily be turned so that this becomes a trial of the victim."Chinese news Web sites have devoted special subsites to the case, and they showed pictures of journalists jammed behind police cordons outside the courthouse on Wednesday, although the trial is closed to the public. The defendants, including Mr. Li, answered questions in court about the charges, the official news agency, Xinhua, reported. Mr. Li denied that he had beaten or had had sex with the woman, according to the Web site of The Beijing News. But he also said he was too drunk to know anything, the report said. The trial will continue on Thursday; Chinese courts usually give verdicts about two weeks after a trial ends.But for Mr. Li's high profile, the case probably would never have ignited the uproar. His father, Li Shuangjiang, is a highly ranked People's Liberation Army singer — sometimes, mistakenly, called a general in Chinese news reports — famed for his rousing odes to the party, patriotism and military virtues. The suspect's mother, Meng Ge, is also a well-known military singer.The cherub-faced Mr. Li was also dabbling with a musical career, but he won notoriety in 2011, when a BMW he was driving hit another car. He and another teenager stepped out and beat and threatened the couple in the other car. The police later sent him to a labor camp for juvenile offenders, and since then his struggles have been chronicled in the Chinese media much as American entertainment news outlets track the wayward children of Hollywood stars."This case caters to the Chinese people's hatred of officials, the wealthy, and celebrities," Chen Youxi, a prominent Chinese lawyer, said in an interview with Phoenix television, a broadcaster based in Hong Kong. "Any incident that involves a famous person, a wealthy person or a princeling, public opinion will be naturally inclined to hate them, to attack them."China's courts are run by the Communist Party, but both sides in the case have sought to recruit public opinion to shore up their cases. Ms. Meng accused the manager of the bar where her son met the woman of running a prostitution ring and trying to blackmail her family. A law professor in Beijing suggested that the victim was a prostitute, asserting that she had endured less harm than a "chaste" woman. News reports have said the victim worked as a secretary.The professor later withdrew the comments and apologized. Ms. Lu, the women's rights advocate, said the notion that a sex worker was entitled to less protection showed the pressures that women encounter when they file sexual assault charges."Behind this is the fact that views about sex in China are particularly unfair to women," Ms. Lu said. "If you're a victim and you want to use public opinion to defend your rights, you pay the price through having your moral reputation being torn apart."
BEIJING — An earthquake hit a mountainous area of southwestern China on Saturday, killing at least five people, destroying hundreds of residences and forcing thousands of people to relocate, the government and state media said.The quake, which also injured 21 people, shook a wide area, including scenic Shangri-La and Deqen counties in Yunnan province, and Derong county in Sichuan province, just to the north.The China Earthquake Administration said the morning quake had a magnitude of 5.9, with the U.S. Geological Survey saying it was 5.8.The China Earthquake Information Center, citing Yunnan's provincial civil affairs department, said five people died and 17 were injured in Shangri-La and Deqen counties. Six of the injured were in serious condition.Sichuan's government said four people were injured in Derong county.The official Xinhua News Agency, also citing Yunnan's civil affairs department, said the quake destroyed 600 residential units and damaged 55,500 others. More than 9,000 residents were forced to relocate.Xinhua said telecommunications and electricity supplies were affected in Deqen and Derong, hindering rescue efforts.China's mountainous areas in its southwest are prone to earthquakes. In May 2008, a powerful quake in Sichuan left nearly 90,000 people dead or missing. In April this year, another quake in Sichuan killed 193 people.
BEIJING — It all began with a smile at the wrong place and the wrong time.A Chinese work safety official who pleaded guilty Friday to corruption charges began drawing public scrutiny last summer when a news photo showed him smiling at the site of a deadly highway accident in central China. That triggered public ire not only about his facial expression but about the luxury wristwatch he was wearing.The official, Yang Dacai, said he was trying only to cheer up the rescue crew. But netizens already were scouring the Internet, and found other photos showing he had a collection of luxury timepieces. They nicknamed him "Brother Watch" and demanded explanations of how he could afford such luxury on a government salary.Communist Party officials later opened an internal investigation into Yang, the former director of the work safety bureau in Shaanxi province. He was fired from his government position in September and expelled from the party in February for "severe violations of party discipline."Yang appeared in the Xi'an intermediate court on Friday and pleaded guilty to charges of taking 250,000 yuan ($40,000) in bribes and having bank deposits of 5.04 million yuan ($820,000) from dubious sources. Yang faces several years in prison at his sentencing, which will take place at a later date, state media said.Yang had also served on the provincial party discipline inspection commission, which is the party's watchdog group against corruption.His case helped set a trend among the Chinese public to mockingly label government officials who have numerous wristwatches or real estate properties with nicknames like "Uncle Watch" and "Sister House," as an expression of disgust over endemic corruption.Chinese officials are wary of having whistleblowers and citizen sleuths looking into the corruption of public servants, preferring to do the policing on their own terms. But they have in some recent cases responded to public outcries — such as the one over "Brother Watch" — with their own corruption probes.At the same time, they have cracked down on online speech critical of officials, including arresting a journalist who alleged dereliction of duty by a senior official, and detaining scores of social media users on charges of fabricating and spreading rumors.
BEIJING — Chinese authorities have disrupted an independent film school, shut down two film festivals and harassed organizers of a third in recent months, say independent filmmakers, who see the actions as part of a general clampdown on freedom of expression.Filmmakers whose edgy themes contrast with the rosier images of the country's mainstream industry are accustomed to censorship of content deemed to show China in a negative light.But independent filmmakers say authorities now appear to be trying to chill the sharing and discussion of their films, amid a broader clampdown under Chinese leader Xi Jinping on public discourse that could potentially undermine the country's one-party rule, including the arrests of bloggers who post sensitive material and activists who have accused officials of corruption."They just want us to make films about food, clothes, entertainment. They don't want people to think, they don't want people to have the freedom to express themselves, they don't want people to have independent and free ideas," said Yang Lina, an independent documentary maker whose first fictional film — about urban Chinese women — debuted at Rotterdam's international film festival this year."We are upset, but also find it absurd," Yang said.Yang was speaking during the Beijing Independent Film Festival that runs through Saturday. Police came to last week's opening and ordered the event cancelled, although organizers kept the festival going by changing some locations and programs, said Wang Hongwei, one of the festival's creators. He said few people were coming because they didn't know it was still on or were scared."They don't like people with interesting ideas gathering together," said one of the jurors, Zhen Zhang, a cinema studies professor at New York University.Other festivals fared worse. In March, the Yunnan Multi-Cultural Festival in southwest China, an influential platform for documentaries, was cancelled. In November, attendees at the 10-year-old China Independent Film Festival in eastern Nanjing were similarly frustrated. Nanjing organizer Wang Fei said the festival's financial backers withdrew support under pressure from authorities.Last month, police ordered the closure of China's only independent film school, the Li Xianting Film School in Beijing, saying that it was "promoting anti-social ideology," said filmmaker and faculty member Cui Zi'en.Organizers of the school — set up four years ago because Chinese university film departments consider independent cinema to be a form of dissent — were forced to hold the 40-day course at two other locations, one in a neighboring province and another in an undisclosed part of the capital, Cui said.Thirty students ranging in age from their 20s to 60s were staying at a hotel in Beijing on the first day of the semester when police and officials from the Industry and Commerce bureau came and told them the school was illegal, Cui said. Police took them to train stations and told them to return home, but teachers later arranged for the students to be taught elsewhere."When I heard all the students had been taken away, I thought: 'How can China become so frightening?'" said Cui, who has made more than 30 films, most shown in the United States and Europe and none in China.The Public Security Ministry, Beijing police and the Industry and Commerce bureau did not respond to requests for comment.Authorities' targeting of film forums and festivals "is really part of a broader, civil society development that is going on in China," said David Bandurski, founder of Hong Kong-based Lantern Films and producer of four independent Chinese films."It's not just about films, it's about activism, it's about being tied in and participating in social issues and using film as a medium to explore those, so that's what they are really interested in nipping in the bud," said Bandurski.The government has detained at least 55 activists since February in a wide-reaching crackdown on dissent, including ideas such as "Western constitutional democracy" and "universal ideals," Human Rights Watch said in a report Thursday.China's mainstream movie industry is supported by the government, which sees growth potential in the world's second-biggest film market, but censorship or the expectation of it means films are often confined to safe storylines.In the 1990s, independent filmmaking was an offshoot of mainstream film culture, but a decade or so later, artists, journalists and academics started exploring digital filmmaking, bringing new themes, such as examining poverty in rural areas or exposing the country's detention system.Such films are rarely screened inside China except at small clubs. Some have gained critical acclaim outside China, such as Wang Bing's 9-hour "West of the Tracks," which documents the lives of workers in a decaying industrial area of China. Wang's latest film, "'Til Madness Do Us Part," will be shown at the Venice Film Festival next Wednesday. None of Wang's films have been screened in his own country."It's not that Chinese filmmakers are going to stop making independent films, but it is certainly worrying that these avenues inside China for screening films and for sharing and talking about films have really come under attack," said Bandurski, also a researcher at the University of Hong Kong's China Media Project.Chinese authorities "want to manage and control the perception of China and I think that's counter-productive," he said.
BEIJING — China's senior leadership has agreed to open a corruption investigation into Zhou Yongkang, one of China's most powerful politicians of the past decade, stepping up its anti-graft campaign, the South China Morning Post reported on Friday.The reported move against Zhou - a retired member of the Politburo's all-powerful Standing Committee and the former domestic security tsar - follows the five-day corruption trial of ousted politician Bo Xilai, who was widely considered a key Zhou ally.The Foreign Ministry declined to comment on the report when contacted by Reuters. The State Council Information Office, the public relations arm of the government, did not respond immediately to faxed questions about the report.Zhou also could not be reached for comment on the report and Reuters could not independently verify it.He was one rank higher than Bo in the power structure and would be the first Politburo Standing Committee member - retired or sitting - to be investigated for economic crimes since the end of the Cultural Revolution nearly 40 years ago, the Hong Kong-based newspaper said.Citing sources familiar with the leadership's thinking, it said the decision to investigate was made in view of rising anger inside the party at the scale of the corruption problem and the wealth that Zhou's family has amassed.President Xi Jinping ordered officials in charge of the case to "get to the bottom of it", the paper said.Most sources and political analysts have said they doubt Zhou is under investigation because it would risk opening a Pandora's box that could lead to calls for probes into other retired Standing Committee members, including ex-premier Wen Jiabao and his wife and son.The New York Times reported last year that Wen's family had accumulated at least $2.7 billion in "hidden riches", a story China labeled a smear.Earlier this month U.S.-based Chinese news site Duowei said Zhou was being investigated for graft. However, the report was later withdrawn.In a sign Zhou may not be in trouble, the websites of the official People's Daily and China News Service reported on Thursday that Zhou had sent flowers to the funeral of top nuclear scientist Liu Xiyao, as did Xi.State media typically do not report such stories on party figures who have fallen from grace, so the brief news items could be interpreted as a signal he remains in the hierarchy's good books.Chinese authorities revealed this week a probe into China National Petroleum Corporation (CNPC), which Zhou joined as a senior manager in the early 1990s.Four top managers at the company have been named as being under investigation in recent days, including group deputy general manager Li Hualin, who once served as Zhou's secretary.The newspaper said it understood the new probe would center on Zhou's time as a party boss in Sichuan province and at CNPC.In particular, investigators would examine whether Zhou and his family benefited through oilfield and property deals facilitated by his son, Zhou Bin, and other allies, it said.Sources told the newspaper it was too early to say whether Zhou - who controlled legal and law enforcement affairs for 10 years from 2002 - would face public prosecution or an internal party probe.Three other Zhou allies are currently under investigation, including the deputy party boss of Sichuan, Li Chuncheng, who had for many years overseen development of the province's prosperous capital, Chengdu.The South China Morning Post said party investigators typically move against top aides and underlings of a primary target first to weaken their political base.Zhou was implicated in rumors last year that he hesitated in moving against Bo.Former Chongqing party boss Bo is awaiting a verdict on corruption, bribery and abuse of power charges.The domestic security forces Zhou ran also suffered a humiliating failure when they allowed blind rights advocate Chen Guangcheng to escape from 19 months of house arrest and flee to the U.S. embassy in Beijing, which happened last year too.Such fumbles gave then-president Hu Jintao and his successor President Xi a shared motive to put a growing array of police forces and domestic security services under firmer oversight.Xi has made fighting deeply-engrained graft a central theme of his new administration, and has promised to take down "tigers" - in other words very senior people - as well as "flies" lower down on the food chain implicated in corruption.Zhou would be the most senior person caught up in Xi's dragnet to date.He joined the Politburo Standing Committee in 2007 while also heading the central Political and Legal Affairs Committee, a sprawling body that oversees law-and-order policy.That double status allowed Zhou to dominate a domestic security budget of $110 billion a year, exceeding the defense budget.But the hulking, grim-faced 70-year-old stepped down, along with most members of the Standing Committee, at the 18th Party Congress last November and formally retired in March this year.At the same time, the position he occupied was downgraded, and his successor Meng Jianzhu is only a member of the Politburo, the 25-member body that reports to the elite Politburo Standing Committee.Since the 1990s, China's efforts to stifle crime, unrest and dissent have allowed the domestic security apparatus - including police, armed militia and state security officers - to accumulate power, which worried many within the party.Still, Zhou's time in charge of domestic security saw a huge swelling in the number of "mass incidents" - China's euphemism for public protests - fuelled by frustration at a yawning wealth gap and official corruption, despite the fact that the Party cracks down hard on dissent.
BEIJING — In secret remarks on the final session of his trial, Bo Xilai, the fallen Communist Party star, denied on Monday that he had tried to upset the party's selection of top leaders or grab extensive new powers for himself, according to a court observer's written record of his closing statement.That part of Mr. Bo's statement, providing a glimpse of the power politics many believe were behind the purging of Mr. Bo in 2012, did not appear in court transcripts released online Monday. The discussion appeared to have been kept from public view because officials overseeing the trial and party leaders wanted to prevent any mention of infighting among party elites, said a person briefed on the court proceedings.Mr. Bo's testimony, in which he denied designs to become China's prime minister, was one of the few instances during the trial in which Mr. Bo appeared to stray far from the narrow parameters set by senior officials; those limits confined him to talking mostly about his family and personal matters. That remark and some others kept from the transcripts were described in a document obtained by The New York Times on Thursday.The document of Mr. Bo's final statement was written from memory by the court observer, who was among 110 or so people who had been invited by the authorities to watch the proceedings. The person briefed on the trial confirmed that the document had been written by someone inside the court. The document was being circulated Thursday within a small group of people who have ties to figures within the trial."Some say I wanted to be the prime minister," Mr. Bo, 64, said, according to the document. "That is completely untrue. As we all know, party central had determined after the 17th Party Congress that Comrade Li Keqiang should take that position."At this point a judge interrupted Mr. Bo's speech, apparently aware that Mr. Bo was treading on delicate ground.Mr. Li is the current prime minister, appointed at the 18th Party Congress in November, and the fact that he was a favorite for the position was revealed in the 17th Party Congress in late 2007, as Mr. Bo stated. Around that time, Mr. Bo was given a seat on the 25-member Politburo and selected by party leaders to be the party chief of Chongqing, in southwestern China, a move that was widely seen as an attempt to remove him from contention for the elite Politburo Standing Committee in 2012.But the charismatic Mr. Bo used his time in Chongqing to promote neosocialist policies that won him popular support from residents, even if an anticorruption campaign angered some liberal Chinese. Because of that strategy, Mr. Bo became a contender for the standing committee, until news emerged in March 2012 that his wife, Gu Kailai, was suspected in the death of a British businessman, Neil Heywood, and Mr. Bo was put under house arrest.Mr. Bo's trial on charges of taking bribes, embezzlement and abuse of power began on Aug. 22, and a verdict, likely predetermined, as in other political show trials, is expected to be announced next month."Some say I wanted to be China's Putin," Mr. Bo also said in his closing argument, referring to Vladimir V. Putin, Russia's strongman president, according to the document. "This is also completely untrue."Those elements in Mr. Bo's speech appeared to be an attempt to dispel the reputation that he had earned in Chongqing and earlier in his career that he was a ruthless, ambitious politician who would do anything to secure a top party post. Some political analysts say he was a direct rival to Xi Jinping, who, like Mr. Bo, is a "princeling," the child of a Communist revolutionary leader. Mr. Xi was appointed as party chief and the top leader in China last November.Those political rivalries are often quietly discussed among the elite in China, but are never supposed to be aired for public consumption. Mr. Bo's mention of them in the trial violated that unwritten rule.In other testimony kept from the official transcripts, Mr. Bo beseeched the residents of places he had governed to support him. "I love my people deeply," he said, according to the document. "I want to say to them: 'I did not fail you. I'm not a corrupt element. I would admit to any bit of corruption if you could find any.' "Mr. Bo also insisted that he did not have any property in his name, and that a house on Beijing's Xinkai alley was a temporary home given to him by senior officials while he was working as commerce minister before late 2007. Mr. Bo and his family were accused during the trial of taking lavish gifts from a young tycoon, Xu Ming. Prosecutors said Mr. Xu had given Ms. Gu $3.2 million to buy a villa on the French Riviera. Mr. Bo has denied knowledge of specific gifts."Money means nothing to me," he said, according to the document. "I don't want to be left with any money."A family associate said that after Mr. Bo delivered his full statement, Mr. Bo's five relatives in the courtroom stood up and clapped. "We'll always be with you," they said.
MANILA — The Philippines and China , already locked in a territorial dispute, engaged in a diplomatic tussle on Thursday. The Philippine president canceled a visit to a trade fair in China after being told to stay away, while China insisted that it never invited him in the first place.A spokesman for the Philippine Department of Foreign Affairs, Raul Hernandez, said President Benigno S. Aquino III had decided not to make a one-day visit to the China-Asean Expo scheduled for next Tuesday in the southern city of Nanning.Mr. Hernandez said China had invited the Philippines to send a high-level delegation to the trade fair a few months ago. After Mr. Aquino said Wednesday that he would go, word came from China later in the day that he should not attend the event, Mr. Hernandez said. In a statement, Mr. Hernandez said Mr. Aquino had decided not to go "taking into consideration China's request for the president to visit China at a more conducive time."A spokesman for the office of the Chinese Foreign Ministry said Beijing had not invited Mr. Aquino to attend the expo. "China never extended an invitation to the Philippine president," it said in a statement sent to The Associated Press. Speaking to reporters on Wednesday, Mr. Aquino said, "You may be surprised, I will travel next week. It's quite a long trip to China. I will leave at 5 in the morning and will be back at 5 in the afternoon.""I don't want to overstay our welcome there," he added.The Philippines is this year's "country of honor" at the trade fair, which takes place in China every year to highlight trade exchanges between Beijing and the 10-member Association of Southeast Asian Nations.The Philippines and China have been embroiled in increasingly antagonistic territorial disputes in the South China Sea. Last year, China seized a shoal near the northwestern coast of the Philippines, and this year it demanded that the Philippine Navy withdraw from Second Thomas Shoal farther south.The Philippines has incensed China by seeking United Nations arbitration to solve the disputes.
BEIJING — At the University of Chicago this summer, Yan Jielin, 17, pored over documents from the American Revolution and mastered themes in the poetry of Emily Dickinson. Her final paper discussed an obscure petition from the House of Lords to the king of England in June 1776.About to enter her senior year at a Beijing high school, Ms. Yan, a shy, serious student, is confident her summer experience in the United States will give her an extra edge in the fierce competition among Chinese students to get into a top American college."Reading the documents, I really felt that I was figuring out what happened at that time by myself," she said. "That is so different from my previous ways of learning history."By some estimates, more than 100,000 Chinese students, some as young as 10, flocked to the United States this summer to delve into American life and culture. Some studied diligently in programs intended to improve their SAT scores. Others kicked back and enjoyed more leisurely pursuits, on group tours that visited Las Vegas, New York and Disneyland. Some attended outdoor camps.The surge in students traveling to the United States for the summer is the latest iteration in China's booming multibillion-dollar overseas education business. Until recently, the vast number of Chinese education agencies that broker students' entry to American colleges and private high schools concentrated on preparing them at home in China. They coached well-off, fee-paying, and, in some cases, brilliant Chinese students in the intricacies of the American admissions process.Now, many Chinese companies are catering to the expanding ambitions of Chinese parents, and their offspring, by offering summer experiences costing $5,000 to $15,000 for several weeks in the United States, often a first step to an American college education, or a high school degree, which have become badges of prestige here.But concerns about the programs' cost, far beyond the means of most Chinese families, and their effectiveness have been the focus of a sharp national discussion since the crash of Asiana Flight 214 in San Francisco last month. About 70 Chinese students headed for American summer camps were aboard, and three were killed. The news elicited sympathy, of course, but also admiration for families who had saved enough to send their children abroad.It also stirred questions about why young Chinese must go overseas to study and — in a nation incensed by corruption and a widening wealth gap — about whose children can enjoy such expensive opportunities."It's a privilege reserved for the wealthy, or at least for families above middle class," said Zhang Yang, who has a master's degree in education from Harvard and is the director of the overseas education department of the EIC Group, an education agency in Beijing. "I don't think these study-abroad tours are things ordinary families can afford."A typical middle-class family could afford programs costing about $2,500, about half that of the least expensive summer sessions in the United States, he said.When photographs of Chinese students looking forlorn as they ate hamburgers outside an American retail outlet while their teachers shopped inside appeared in mid-July on Sina Weibo, China's equivalent of Twitter, angry citizens asked why the teenagers were left to lounge around."People feel resentful because most families do not have the financial means to offer their children the opportunity to go on such tours, and they feel jealous of the families who do," said Li Jiayu, who runs the education company USAdaxue in Beijing.Families who pay for the costliest summer programs often want to ensure that their children attend one of the 50 top-ranked American colleges, Chinese educators said, so competition for a place in one of these programs is high.A closely supervised $14,000 program run by Elite Scholars of China accepted 26 out of 100 applicants who attended a two-week academic course at Wellesley College in Massachusetts followed by a week of visits to a dozen top colleges and their admissions officers. Participants were selected on the basis of interviews, said Tomer Rothschild, a co-founder of the agency.
BEIJING — China's manufacturing strengthened in August, an official survey showed Sunday, offering hope that the country's slowdown is stabilizing.The China Federation of Logistics and Purchasing's manufacturing index rose to 51.0 percent from July's 50.3 percent, the second monthly expansion in a row. The federation said it was the highest reading and the biggest increase this year.The index uses a 100-point scale on which numbers below 50 indicate contraction.In a report accompanying the survey, analyst Zhang Liqun said the increase showed that market expectations improved and that companies were better able to adapt to changes in the business environment.But he added that while the purchasing manufacturing index shows the economy is stabilizing, "manufacturing is still weak in small and midsized businesses, meaning we need to push forward with transformation and upgrading."
BEIJING — Bo Xilai, the fallen Communist Party official, said in secret testimony during his recent trial that he was obeying orders from a powerful party agency in charge of security when he took steps to cover up the flight of his police chief to an American Consulate, according to a court observer's written record of trial statements.Mr. Bo, once the party chief overseeing the southwestern metropolis of Chongqing, said the orders instructed him to say publicly that the Chongqing police chief, Wang Lijun, had fled for health reasons, when the true reasons were connected to the murder of a British businessman, which only a handful of people knew about at that point.It was perhaps the only time in the trial when Mr. Bo said senior party officials were responsible for actions he took during the unfolding scandal. Party leaders appear to have set strict limits on what could be said during the trial in Jinan, which was closed to the public, and released only vetted transcripts via an official court microblog.Most of Mr. Bo's testimony concerned his family life. But in the secret testimony, he discussed orders from above to rebut the prosecutors' accusation that he had abused his power by creating a fake medical record to make Mr. Wang look unstable. He is also charged with embezzlement and taking bribes.Mr. Bo's assertion echoed earlier interviews with party insiders, who said powerful officials moved quickly after the consulate crisis in February 2012 in deciding whether to cover for Mr. Bo. Certain major decisions centered on how to present Mr. Wang's mental state to the outside world.Mr. Bo's argument that he was obeying orders was detailed in one of two documents written by a court observer that were obtained Thursday by The New York Times. It is perhaps the most explosive element to have emerged in the courtroom because Mr. Bo was linking central party officials to the abuse of power charge. The party has tried to isolate the murder scandal that brought down Mr. Bo last year by keeping from the public any hint of party leaders' direct involvement in the events or power struggles among themselves.The party agency that Mr. Bo said had issued the cover-up order, the Central Politics and Law Commission, was led for most of last year by Zhou Yongkang, an ally of Mr. Bo who was on the Politburo Standing Committee, which rules China. Party insiders say that Mr. Zhou was maneuvering in early 2012 to protect Mr. Bo, his potential successor, and that he was later weakened by Mr. Bo's fall.In recent weeks, people in Chinese political circles have discussed the extent to which the party is investigating Mr. Zhou's associates for evidence of financial corruption.When Mr. Wang fled to the consulate, he told diplomats he believed that Mr. Bo's wife, Gu Kailai, had months earlier murdered Neil Heywood, the Briton, and that Mr. Wang now feared retribution from Mr. Bo. After leaving the consulate, Mr. Wang flew to Beijing in the custody of central security officials.Then two mysterious things appeared on the Internet: one was a certificate from a Chongqing hospital that said Mr. Wang had earlier been given a diagnosis of "severe depression"; another was a post on an official Chongqing microblog that said Mr. Wang was undergoing "vacation-style medical treatment."During the five-day trial, which ended Monday, prosecutors said Mr. Bo, 64, had abused his power by ordering the dissemination of the fake medical certificate and telling Chongqing officials to write the microblog post. And days before Mr. Wang's flight, they said, Mr. Bo violated party rules by unilaterally removing Mr. Wang as police chief. That happened after Mr. Bo had punched or slapped Mr. Wang, whom Mr. Bo said not only confronted him with news of the murder, but also desired his wife.Ms. Gu was convicted of Mr. Heywood's murder a year ago and given a suspended death sentence, essentially life in prison. Prosecutors said she had also suggested to Mr. Bo the idea of issuing a fake certificate.But in his secret testimony, Mr. Bo said that he had received a "six-point guidance" from the Central Politics and Law Commission in dealing with the Wang case and that one point told him to "use health reasons in the name of humanitarianism" in explaining Mr. Wang's disappearance. The guidance would presumably have been approved by Mr. Zhou.Mr. Bo's argument was laid out in one section of a document written from memory by a court observer and including remarks that officials are keeping secret. The first document obtained by The Times was a fuller version of Mr. Bo's final statement.A person briefed on the trial confirmed that both documents had been written by someone inside the court.One version of the prosecution's closing statement posted online Monday did make an oblique reference to the "six-point guidance," but censors quickly excised that section. (The earlier transcript still appears on Sina.com, a popular Web news portal.)In interviews, party insiders said last year that Mr. Bo had tried to persuade powerful associates in Beijing to seize on Mr. Wang's mental health as a way of helping Mr. Bo quash the emerging murder scandal. The issue presented them with a test of their competing party loyalties.After Mr. Wang was taken to Beijing, the party's General Office, which was run by Ling Jihua, a top aide to Hu Jintao, then the party leader and China's president, secretly ordered a psychiatric examination of Mr. Wang at a military hospital in the capital. It determined that Mr. Wang suffered from intermittent psychiatric problems, according to party insiders briefed on the episode. Wider knowledge of that would have cast some doubt on Mr. Wang's murder account and other accusations."This exam could have been used to exonerate Bo Xilai," one of the insiders said.When he learned of the exam results, the insiders said, Mr. Bo asked Gen. Liu Yuan, a military ally who oversaw the Beijing hospital, to help leak the results, but he refused. Mr. Ling kept the results quiet as well. If they had chosen differently, Mr. Wang might have been discredited, and Mr. Bo could still be in power, some of the insiders said.A verdict for Mr. Bo, most likely predetermined by party leaders, is expected in early September.
BEIJING — China is investigating the head of its state assets regulator, a former top energy executive, for "serious discipline violations", the government said on Sunday in what appears to be a deepening crackdown on corruption and push for reform.A brief government announcement said Jiang Jiemin was "suspected of serious discipline violations", shorthand the government generally uses to describe graft.The investigation was being carried out by the ruling Communist Party's anti-graft watchdog, the Central Commission for Discipline Inspection, the statement said. No other details were given.President Xi Jinping has made fighting pervasive corruption a key theme of his new administration, vowing to go after "tigers", or senior officials, as well as lower-ranking "flies".Jiang was promoted to head of the Assets Supervision and Administration Commission (SASAC) in March, from his previous post as chairman of energy giant China National Petroleum Company (CNPC).SASAC is a ministerial-level body run by China's cabinet, and is directly responsible for more than 100 state-owned companies.The announcement about Jiang, much anticipated by industry insiders, comes after the government announced last week that four of CNPC's top executives were under investigation for alleged wrongdoing.Those investigations were announced shortly after the close of the trial of Bo Xilai, once a rising political star who is now awaiting a verdict on charges of graft, bribery and abuse of power.Jiang had been expected to take a major role in reforming China's sprawling state sector as the Communist Party seeks to allow private investment into important sectors of the economy, such as energy, transport and finance, over the next five years.Economists warn that China can no longer delay freeing such sectors from government control, especially if it wants its economy to keep growing by between 7 and 8 percent a year.But reform of state-owned industries has run into opposition from vested interest groups threatened by the prospect of competition and conservative elements in the party uncomfortable with more economic changes.The Communist Party will hold a meeting in November to discuss deepening reforms as leaders look to set China's economic agenda for the next decade."It seems apparent to me that the government has faced a strong level of opposition from vested interests in the state sector as it's tried to push forward changes, and I think the discipline body has essentially tried to put the foot down and start taking action," said Duncan Innes-Ker, senior China analyst for the Economist Intelligence Unit."It probably means reform will be able to move a bit faster, but one has to worry that it resembles the old-style purges of people who have disagreed with the party line," he said.Senior industry analyst Chen Weidong said CNPC was targeted because it represents one of China's biggest monopolies."The company has grown so rapidly over recent years through massive overseas expansions, and these activities are all in the name of 'shouldering state responsibility' but not putting economic returns as a key concern," Chen said.By using a handful of state giants, China has achieved desirable results like securing energy supplies for the world's top consumer and established its prominence in the global market, but Beijing has realized this is no longer sustainable."CNPC's problems have accumulated for too long and become too big," said Chen, adding that Beijing may also want to use the CNPC case as a warning for others before the party's November meeting.CNPC is the parent of Hong Kong-listed PetroChina, Asia's top oil and gas producer and the world's most valuable listed energy company after Exxon Mobil.The other four CNPC officials under investigation are Li Hualin, a deputy general manager of CNPC; two vice-presidents of PetroChina, Ran Xinquan and Wang Yongchun, and PetroChina chief geologist Wang Daofu.The government has not detailed the accusations against them. It was also unclear if they or Jiang have lawyers.Jiang, 58, who became general manager of CNPC in 2006 and chairman in 2011, is known in the industry as a man that aims for "big-ticket" deals and political status.He rose to prominence with the support of Zhou Yongkang, who retired earlier this year from the elite Politburo Standing Committee, where he was China's domestic security chief.On Friday, Hong Kong's South China Morning Post newspaper said China's senior leadership had agreed to open a corruption investigation into Zhou.The government has not commented on whether Zhou, who was also an ally of the now disgraced Bo, was being investigated.It would be an unprecedented move to investigate Zhou, as the unwritten rule in the party has always been that current and retired Standing Committee members are immune from prosecution.
HONG KONG — Jiang Kejun may be one of the few Beijing residents who see a ray of hope in the smog engulfing the city. A researcher in a state energy institute, he is an outspoken advocate of swiftly cutting China's greenhouse gas output, and he says public anger about noxious air has jolted the government, which long dismissed pollution as the necessary price of prosperity.The grimy haze blanketing Beijing and other Chinese cities comes from motor vehicles, factories, power plants and furnaces that also emit carbon dioxide, the main global warming gas from human activities. The widespread ire about air pollution has forced China's new leadership to vow firmer, faster measures for cleaner air that are likely to reduce carbon dioxide output, especially from coal, experts said. "The public concern about the air pollution has helped raise awareness about broader environmental problems," said Mr. Jiang, a researcher at the Energy Research Institute, which advises the Chinese government. "This will be a big help in pushing China."Mr. Jiang is an unusual hybrid — part policy insider, part maverick — in a growing debate among Chinese officials, policy advisers and academics about how fast and far to limit greenhouse gas pollution, which now well exceeds that of any other country. The debate, increasingly vigorous but in typical Chinese fashion playing out largely behind the scenes, pits the demands of industrialization and urban growth against the realities of global warming.Defying the habitual caution of government advisers, Mr. Jiang has developed a proposal to swiftly limit the growing volume of carbon dioxide that China produces from consuming fossil fuels, which constitute over a quarter of the world's total such emissions. In his blueprint, China's emissions would reach a peak by around 2025, at least five years earlier and at a much lower level than many Chinese experts have said is possible."I'm not saying it will be easy, but it's feasible," Mr. Jiang said. "Time for effective action is very limited."His plan appears far from winning government endorsement, but is "one of those trial balloons that wouldn't be floated unless there's serious discussion opening up about what China should do," said Barbara Finamore, Asia director at the Natural Resources Defense Council, a New York-based advocacy group.Chinese policy advisers have developed proposals to control greenhouse gases in the nearer term, government-sponsored studies show. They include a carbon tax on fossil fuels, and beginning in 2016 setting annual guiding limits for carbon dioxide emissions from energy use. China will explore expanding nascent local carbon credit markets into a nationwide plan starting in 2015, Xie Zhenhua, an official who oversees climate change policy, said in late July.In part, China is responding to international pressure, as governments negotiate a proposed new global agreement on climate change, scheduled to be settled in 2015 and go into force in 2020. In June, President Obama and President Xi Jinping agreed to discuss how to phase out hydrofluorocarbons, a potent class of manufactured greenhouse gases.But domestic economic, energy and environmental worries are also forcing China's leaders to consider policies that could limit greenhouse gases, analysts said. The new leadership wants to reinvigorate the economy by reducing reliance on heavy industry that produces high amounts of pollution. Mr. Xi and Prime Minister Li Keqiang have vowed to clean up contaminated soil, air and water, and achieving those goals could also bring carbon reductions in their wake."Air pollution was the perfect catalyst," said Wai-Shin Chan, director of climate change strategy in Asia for HSBC Global Research in Hong Kong. "Air pollution is clearly linked to health, and the great thing is that everybody — that's government officials and company executives alike — breathes the same air."There are, though, formidable obstacles facing proponents of rapidly cutting China's emissions. Robust economic growth remains imperative for leaders, who fear that slowing growth and rising joblessness would imperil the Communist Party's rule. China remains dependent on coal, the source of about 70 percent of the country's energy. And officials and companies in China are likely to resist steps they fear could jeopardize their industrial investments."They will not be happy to see that the investment in new capacity they made a few years ago may have to be scrapped," said Wang Tao, an expert on climate change and energy issues at the Carnegie-Tsinghua Center for Global Policy in Beijing. "It really all depends on how quickly China can transform the current economic structure."
HONG KONG — At least 15 people were killed when ammonia leaked from a frozen storage and logistics business in Shanghai on Saturday, according to local news reports.The leak at the business, in the Baoshan district, also left eight people seriously injured and 17 with lesser injuries, said a Chinese television news report, citing industrial safety officials.The reports did not specify how the people died or say whether they were all employees at the site. Safety officials said they were investigating the cause of the leak, which sent stinging fumes into nearby residential areas.The Chinese government has said it is trying to reduce deaths at mines, factories and other workplaces that became more dangerous in the wake of rapid industrial growth.In June, explosions and a fire set off by a gas leak tore through a poultry plant in northeast China, killing at least 119 people. Poorly placed exits and blocked doors prevented many people from escaping, survivors said. That was the worst industrial accident in China in recent decades.The government has not issued detailed data for recent industrial accidents. It has said that in 2011 the number of people killed in mines, factories and other workplaces fell to fewer than 10,000.
BEIJING — China's new leaders are asserting their authority over the country's oil giant with a corruption investigation that has netted five former and current top oil executives, including the latest — the former chairman of the company.The Ministry of Supervision on Sunday announced an investigation into Jiang Jiemin, former chairman of the country's biggest oil company, China National Petroleum Corp. It's the latest high-profile corruption case since China's new leader Xi Jinping took power in November with promises to fight corruption that fuels public anger.The investigation into Jiang, who was named in March to head the Cabinet commission that runs state companies, comes after similar probes were announced over the past week into four executives at CNPC.News reports also say China's top leaders have taken the unusual step of endorsing a corruption investigation into Zhou Yongkang, a former security czar and CNPC general manager with a power base in the oil industry. It would be the first time in decades that a current or retired member of the ruling Communist Party's inner circle of power, the Standing Committee, faced such action.Ahead of a key Communist Party meeting in November due to produce a new economic blueprint, Xi and Premier Li Keqiang appear to be making a stab at tackling the powerful state-owned industries and their allies, who reformers say have hamstrung the government.The state industries benefit from monopolies, low-cost bank loans, free land and other favors — and are therefore opposed to the market reforms that experts say China needs to prevent growth from stagnating.The crackdown on CNPC — the world's second-most valuable oil producer after Exxon Mobil Corp. — shows the new administration's determination to exert control, said Cheng Li, a Brookings Institution scholar.The leadership wants to show "that they've got a certain degree of consensus in the party's highest levels. That's not so easy to get, but they did," Li said. "There's also a clear message that Xi Jinping and Li Keqiang want to undermine these vested interest groups therefore to pave the way for more market-oriented reform."Chinese authorities said Sunday that Jiang is being investigated over suspected serious disciplinary violations. The vague term is often shorthand in official Chinese announcements for allegations of corruption by a government official or manager of a state company. Jiang left his post as chairman of CNPC in March to head the Cabinet's Assets Supervision and Administration Commission."The leadership is acutely aware that they must reel in the opposition or disarm it. They have gone on a concerted anti-corruption quest, which appeals to the general public, but is also a way of eliminating the opposition," Lombard Street Research said in a report. "A lot of the big state firms' senior managers sit on the Central Committee and they will need to be brought into line or discredited."Jiang is the first full member of the ruling Communist Party's Central Committee, which includes the country's top 200 officials, to be investigated since the ruling party's once-a-decade handover of power to younger leaders in November. Two other officials who are also under investigation were alternate members of the committeeAuthorities have announced a series of investigations into senior and lower level officials following Xi's promise to fight corruption and extravagant, wasteful work styles.A general manager at state-owned phone company China Mobile was detained last month in connection with suspected discipline violations.In July, former railways minister Liu Zhijun was given a suspended death sentence for bribery and abuse of power.Last Monday, a high-profile corruption trial wrapped up for Bo Xilai, former party boss of the megacity of Chongqing.
HONG KONG — The Chinese Communist Party announced Sunday that a senior official responsible for overseeing state-owned corporations was under investigation, and people with knowledge of that case and many others said that, according to senior officials, the inquiries were part of a larger corruption investigation encroaching on the retired chief of the domestic security apparatus.The former security chief, Zhou Yongkang, stepped down last year from the Politburo Standing Committee, the party's top decision-making body, after years as one of the most powerful and divisive figures in Chinese politics. The investigations swirling around him appear to be part of the boldest efforts yet by China's top leader, Xi Jinping, to consolidate his authority, convince officials he is serious about deterring corruption and extinguish Mr. Zhou's lingering influence.The senior official under scrutiny, Jiang Jiemin, the director of the State-Owned Assets Supervision and Administration Commission, "is suspected of grave violations of discipline and is currently under investigation," said a brief statement issued by Xinhua, the main state news agency. The term "violations of discipline" almost invariably refers to corruption or abuses of power.Mr. Jiang is the most senior central official and first full member of the elite Central Committee to be publicly singled out on such charges under President Xi, who came to power in November vowing to stamp out corruption and extravagance by Chinese officials. There has been no public announcement about any investigation of Mr. Zhou, who is a much more powerful figure, even in retirement.Before his appointment in March to the assets commission, which supervises China's biggest state conglomerates, Mr. Jiang was the general manager and then the chairman of the China National Petroleum Corporation, where four senior managers were also removed on similar charges last week. Mr. Jiang's ouster was so abrupt that throughout Sunday his picture and speeches remained on the commission's Web site even after the state news media announced the inquiry. By Monday, content about Mr. Jiang had been removed from the site.Mr. Jiang's downfall appears to follow a pattern related to anticorruption inquiries against officials who rose in the footsteps of Mr. Zhou, 70, who worked at the China National Petroleum Corporation and in Sichuan, also the scene of an expanding corruption investigation. Four people with knowledge of the inquiries, each citing comments by senior officials, said those investigations were linked to a larger, secretive inquiry in which officials had detained or questioned a son and associates of Mr. Zhou."It makes logical sense that this is aimed at Zhou," said Chen Ziming, a political commentator in Beijing. "It's all too concentrated, all follows this same line to him. China National Petroleum Corporation and Sichuan are both places he worked. It's a step by step process, questioning people associated with him, former secretaries and so on."The South China Morning Post, a Hong Kong newspaper, reported Friday that Mr. Zhou was under investigation. Chinese Web sites that focus on news and rumors have also said that an investigation is under way.The four people who spoke to The New York Times — a former senior anticorruption investigator, a Chinese businessman with high-level connections, a political analyst with ties to senior officials and a businesswoman with family ties to Chinese elites — spoke on the condition of anonymity because of the risk of recriminations for discussing secretive political decisions."The Central Commission for Discipline Inspection has established a case group to deal with Zhou Yongkang," said the former anticorruption official, who cited a conversation in recent days with a central government security official. The former official said that the investigators looking into corruption in Sichuan had questioned Zhou Bin, Mr. Zhou's son and a businessman. But he had not heard of any interrogation of Zhou Yongkang.An investigation focused on Mr. Zhou would be a departure from the unspoken norm that Politburo Standing Committee members, including retired ones, are immune from investigations on corruption charges.
BEIJING — China's factory activity expanded at the fastest pace in more than a year in August with a jump in new orders, official data showed on Sunday, raising hopes that a rapid economic slowdown in the world's second-largest economy may have been arrested.The purchasing managers' index figure, published by the National Bureau of Statistics, rose to 51.0 in August from 50.3 in July, the highest level since last April and above market expectations of 50.6 in a Reuters poll.A reading above 50 indicates expanding activity, while a reading below 50 points to a contraction.Beijing has stepped up efforts to prevent a sharp economic slowdown by quickening railroad investment and public housing construction and introducing measures to help smaller companies, which could sustain the revival of internal demand in the coming months."We are seeing clearer signs of economic conditions improving," said Haibin Zhu, chief China economist at JPMorgan in Hong Kong. "One of the reasons is the lagging effect of credit growth earlier in the year, while the second is the recent shift in the policy stance and more concrete policy announcement."As one of the first leading indicators gauging economic momentum, the improved reading could bode well for other August data, further confirming a stabilizing trend in the economy.The official survey showed an across-the-board recovery in all subindices, including new orders, quantity of purchases, input prices and employment, pointing to a positive picture for the vast factory sector."The P.M.I. figure showed evident recovery in August, suggesting the economy is further stabilizing," Zhang Liqun, an economist at the Development Research Center, a top government research organization in Beijing, said in a statement accompanying the P.M.I."The improvement in all subindices also showed market expectations are turning better and companies are adapting to the changing business environment," he added.The subindex measuring new orders rose to 52.4 in August from 50.6 in July, indicating stronger demand for Chinese goods. Export orders returned to expansionary territory, rising to 50.2 from 49.0 in July, suggesting external demand is also up.A separate P.M.I. survey sponsored by HSBC, which focuses more on small- and medium-size firms in the private sector, is scheduled to be published on Monday.Its preliminary August reading, published last week, rose to 50.1, the highest level in four months, mainly because of a rebound in new orders. Together with the official data Sunday and their focus on larger state-owned firms, the two surveys should show a broad-based stabilization in manufacturing.Chinese officials have been optimistic about the growth outlook, saying there are clear signs of stabilization emerging from the economy and that the annual gross domestic product target of 7.5 percent is achievable. Vice Finance Minister Zhu Guangyao said Tuesday there was no need for government stimulus and that growth could instead be supported through structural adjustments.The Commerce Ministry has also said China's trade flows steadied in early August, with global demand improving and measures to help exporters kicking in.Mr. Zhu said the thrust of Beijing's recent measures was to stabilize the economy to create a platform for reform.He said the government has been talking about specific policy measures, like railroad investment, which has given some clarity.Despite an uptick in manufacturing activity, analysts caution that a strong rebound appears unlikely because most Chinese companies still face relatively high financing costs, in part because of Beijing's campaign to curb shadow banking. An uncertain export environment and a strong renminbi are also risk factors.China's economy has slowed for nine out of the past 10 quarters, with G.D.P. growth dipping to 7.5 percent in the second quarter from 7.7 percent in the previous three months.Beijing has said it is willing to tolerate slower growth as it pushes reforms designed to abandon an economic model that relies on debt-financed construction and exports in favor of one driven by domestic consumption.
HONG KONG — When the Mariner of the Seas arrived in Shanghai in June, it became the largest ocean liner with a home port in China — a 138,000-ton mega-ship that boasts an ice rink, 10 pools, a rock-climbing wall and a mini golf course.But the 3,800 passengers it can carry don't get long to enjoy the array of amenities. The ocean-going giant, owned by Royal Caribbean International, mostly makes three- and four-night trips to South Korea that start at about the equivalent of $500 per person.The preference for such short cruises is one of the major challenges international cruise lines face as they focus more resources on luring Chinese customers, says Zinan Liu, the Shanghai-based managing director for China and Asia for Royal Caribbean, whose parent company is the world's second-largest operator, with slightly more than 23 percent of all cruise passengers. (Carnival Corp. is the largest, with a little more than 48 percent.)If Chinese take to cruising in the same way as North Americans and Europeans, they could provide as many as 40 million cruise guests a year, according to a 2010 market analysis by Royal Caribbean. That is twice the number of passengers expected worldwide this year.But unless they work for international companies, most Chinese take vacations only during the public holidays clustered around traditional festivals like Chinese New Year, usually a week or less at any one time.That rules out the 12-night and longer cruises popular among North Americans and Europeans."That may change as the market matures, but for now the Chinese are party cruisers rather than serious cruisers," Mr. Liu said.Guo Yan, a 40-year-old bank cashier from Foshan in southern China, is typical of the current guests. She recently took her 16-year-old daughter on an overnight voyage out of Hong Kong that takes in skyscraper-studded Victoria Harbor before heading to sea for an evening of dining, shopping and shows.It was the fourth time she had taken the trip, which is operated by Star Cruises, a regional line backed by the Malaysian travel and gambling group Genting. Ms. Guo says the cruise, at 400 Hong Kong dollars, or about $52, is cheaper than a night at many of the city's hotels and an affordable treat for a school vacation period.Tickets in hand, she said she never thought about taking a longer cruise but "if I had time I might do a longer trip."With such opinions in mind, Crystal Cruises, a Japanese luxury cruise line with two vessels that each carry about 1,000 passengers, has begun offering short cruises and plans 34 Asia-based sailings in 2014, up from just 4 in 2012."Originally, we'd market the sailing as an 11-day cruise, but now we look at the opportunity for a six-day and a five-day, so we answer to a few different markets," said Marnie Whipple, Crystal's regional sales manager for Asia and the Pacific.However, creating short cruise itineraries can be challenging, particularly in northern Asia. Chinese regulations require cruises to include international ports, explained Tony Peisley, an analyst at the London-based industry consulting firm Cruise Market Watch. So, when the preference for short cruises is factored in, a ship sailing from Shanghai to the South Korean port of Busan, or even the closer island of Jeju, must travel much further each day than ships on longer cruises to popular destinations in the Mediterranean or Caribbean.The likelihood of inclement winter weather also means that North Asia is predominantly a summer destination — for example, the Mariner of the Seas' winter base is in Singapore.Regional disputes also can create problems. Recently, heightened tensions between Beijing and Tokyo over a disputed island chain has prompted some Chinese to shun travel to Japan. Royal Caribbean said it had modified 30 sailings from Shanghai and Tianjin this year as a result.In Southeast Asia, ports of call are close enough for a variety of cruises around Malaysia, Thailand and Indonesia but a lack of cruise terminals, especially those able to accommodate large vessels, is constraining growth.
BEIJING — Chinese authorities suspect that the woman who gouged out a 6-year-old boy's eyes was his aunt who later killed herself, state media said Wednesday, adding a surprising twist to a gruesome case with conflicting details.Police in the city of Linfen in northern Shanxi province have identified the boy's aunt Zhang Huiying as a suspect because the boy's blood was found on her clothes, the official Xinhua News Agency said. Six days after the boy was attacked, Zhang killed herself by jumping into a well.Initial reports said the boy, Guo Bin, was lured by an unidentified woman with a strange accent into a field on Aug. 24 where she used an unspecified tool to gouge out his eyes.Xinhua did not cite a possible motive for the aunt to attack the boy. The police finding seemed to conflict with the family's initial comments on the boy's assailant, which cited him as saying that the woman spoke with an accent from outside the area and had hair that was dyed blonde.The boy's mother said in a phone interview that the boy was disoriented after the traumatizing attack."It is easy to understand that he wasn't clear about the situation," Wang Wenli told The Associated Press. "He said the accent was from another region, but he later amended that. He then said it was a local accent, but he did not say that it was his aunt."One of the case investigators reached by phone, a police officer in Fenxi county surnamed Liu, referred only to the Xinhua report and refused to answer further questions, saying he was not authorized to speak to the media. Calls to the city and county's police bureaus' propaganda departments rang unanswered.State media previously had raised the possibility that the boy's corneas were taken for sale because of a donor shortage in China, but police said the boy's eyeballs were found at the scene, and that the corneas hadn't been removed. At the time, though, Guo's father told The Associated Press the family had not actually seen the eyeballs.The attack horrified the Chinese public, and added to outrage over violence against children in the wake of a scandal earlier in the year over a spate of cases of school teachers sexually abusing young girls.Chinese Internet users expressed dismay as they circulated reports of the attack on the boy and links to footage showing him writhing in pain on a hospital trolley with bandages around his head, and his parents, both farmers, crying.Media reports cited police as saying the aunt had argued with the boy's parents over how much money each family should contribute to the care of his grandfather, who was paralyzed.But Wang, the boy's mother, told the AP that reports of a dispute between the families were false."There was no dispute between us and the aunt," Wang said. "I have heard that someone said we had a dispute over taking care of the grandfather, but that is just a lie."Associated Press researchers Zhao Liang in Beijing and Fu Ting in Shanghai contributed to this report.
BEIJING — The shark's fin, bird's nest and abalone are gone from the offerings at Beijing's Xiang E Qing restaurant — a favorite of Communist Party cadres just months ago. Diners are now left with less exotic fare such as shredded beef, pickled turnip and fried peanuts.China's high-end restaurants have gone into crisis under leader Xi Jinping's campaign to crack down on the kinds of party extravagances that have angered ordinary Chinese, such as dining on the public dime. To stem big losses and avoid the now-tarnished image of VIP banquet halls, these restaurants have been busy reinventing themselves."We don't do high-end! We just serve family-style food!" a jittery manager at Xiang E Qing told a visitor who wanted to see the dramatic, near-overnight transformation of one of the capital's most prestigious eateries.The Xiang E Qing restaurant in downtown Beijing — part of a national chain that has been among the hardest hit — no longer has the expensive liquors, minimum spending requirements or special fees for the private banquet rooms where government officials and business executives once gathered in seclusion. Its calling cards have been rewritten to promote a joyful, family atmosphere.Restaurants serving exquisite delicacies in banquet rooms long flourished under the lavish spending habits among all levels of public officials, who spent about 300 billion yuan ($50 billion) a year on food and drinks in recent years, according to state media. But new party rules since the beginning of this year curb spending on food and drink, and Xi himself has set the example by having a work meal of four simple dishes and one soup.Some of that wining and dining has gone underground, with officials sprucing up private clubs and government canteens with pricey booze and fancy meals or ducking into secluded locales to avoid detection, according to state media who have sent undercover reporters.Even so, China's dining market has hit its lowest point in more than two decades — barring a brief industry collapse related to the 2003 SARS epidemic — and the high-end market had suffered the most, Commerce Ministry spokesman Yao Jian said last week.To cope with the new reality, high-end restaurants are diversifying services to include fast food and take-out, or offering modestly priced homestyle dishes and hot pots with wider, common-folk appeal.The anti-waste campaign promoted in state media has not been aimed solely at party cadres, but also at members of the public, urging them not to over-order and to clean their plates."We are all remaking ourselves," said Han Fang, a manager at another high-end restaurant in Beijing. "We need to adjust to whatever the policies the country has."The Xiao Nan Guo restaurant in downtown Beijing specializes in elaborate Shanghai-style cuisine on white tablecloths with floral arrangements in private rooms behind thick, carved wooden doors. To attract more customers, it has revamped its menu to include new dishes priced under $15, said Zheng Yuming, the restaurant's general manager.Its parent company, national chain Xiao Nan Guo Restaurant Holdings Ltd. Group, reported a 43.3 percent decline in profits for the first six months of 2013, citing a slowing economy, bird flu and "the prolonged curb in lavish spending by Chinese government officials."At least Xiao Nan Guo stayed in the black.Xiang E Qing fared much worse. The national chain reported a loss of $35 million for the first six months of the year, a steep plunge from a net profit of $12 million for the same period in 2012. It cited "national policies" and the downturn in high-end banqueting in its financial report, while noting that the "mass market is stable and rising.""The weakening business of the high-end restaurants is for sure related to the new rules, and at least in the next year, that won't change or ease," said Peng Xizhe, dean for the School of Social Development and Public Policy at Shanghai-based Fudan University. "The high-end restaurants which rely on public money have to find some other ways to work it out."
BEIJING — China is investigating the head of its state assets regulator, a former top energy executive, for "serious discipline violations", the government said on Sunday in what appears to be a deepening crackdown on corruption and push for reform.A brief government announcement said Jiang Jiemin was "suspected of serious discipline violations", shorthand the government generally uses to describe graft.The investigation was being carried out by the ruling Communist Party's anti-graft watchdog, the Central Commission for Discipline Inspection, the statement said. No other details were given.President Xi Jinping has made fighting pervasive corruption a key theme of his new administration, vowing to go after "tigers", or senior officials, as well as lower-ranking "flies".Jiang was promoted to head of the Assets Supervision and Administration Commission (SASAC) in March, from his previous post as chairman of energy giant China National Petroleum Company (CNPC).SASAC is a ministerial-level body run by China's cabinet, and is directly responsible for more than 100 state-owned companies.The announcement about Jiang, much anticipated by industry insiders, comes after the government announced last week that four of CNPC's top executives were under investigation for alleged wrongdoing.Those investigations were announced shortly after the close of the trial of Bo Xilai, once a rising political star who is now awaiting a verdict on charges of graft, bribery and abuse of power.Jiang had been expected to take a major role in reforming China's sprawling state sector as the Communist Party seeks to allow private investment into important sectors of the economy, such as energy, transport and finance, over the next five years.Economists warn that China can no longer delay freeing such sectors from government control, especially if it wants its economy to keep growing by between 7 and 8 percent a year.But reform of state-owned industries has run into opposition from vested interest groups threatened by the prospect of competition and conservative elements in the party uncomfortable with more economic changes.The Communist Party will hold a meeting in November to discuss deepening reforms as leaders look to set China's economic agenda for the next decade."It seems apparent to me that the government has faced a strong level of opposition from vested interests in the state sector as it's tried to push forward changes, and I think the discipline body has essentially tried to put the foot down and start taking action," said Duncan Innes-Ker, senior China analyst for the Economist Intelligence Unit."It probably means reform will be able to move a bit faster, but one has to worry that it resembles the old-style purges of people who have disagreed with the party line," he said.Senior industry analyst Chen Weidong said CNPC was targeted because it represents one of China's biggest monopolies."The company has grown so rapidly over recent years through massive overseas expansions, and these activities are all in the name of 'shouldering state responsibility' but not putting economic returns as a key concern," Chen said.By using a handful of state giants, China has achieved desirable results like securing energy supplies for the world's top consumer and established its prominence in the global market, but Beijing has realised this is no longer sustainable."CNPC's problems have accumulated for too long and become too big," said Chen, adding that Beijing may also want to use the CNPC case as a warning for others before the party's November meeting.CNPC is the parent of Hong Kong-listed PetroChina, Asia's top oil and gas producer and the world's most valuable listed energy company after Exxon Mobil.The other four CNPC officials under investigation are Li Hualin, a deputy general manager of CNPC; two vice-presidents of PetroChina, Ran Xinquan and Wang Yongchun, and PetroChina chief geologist Wang Daofu.The government has not detailed the accusations against them. It was also unclear if they or Jiang have lawyers.Jiang, 58, who became general manager of CNPC in 2006 and chairman in 2011, is known in the industry as a man that aims for "big-ticket" deals and political status.He rose to prominence with the support of Zhou Yongkang, who stepped down last year from the elite Politburo Standing Committee, where he was China's domestic security chief.On Friday, Hong Kong's South China Morning Post newspaper said China's senior leadership had agreed to open a corruption investigation into Zhou.The government has not commented on whether Zhou, who was also an ally of the now disgraced Bo, was being investigated.It would be an unprecedented move to investigate Zhou, as the unwritten rule in the party has always been that current and retired Standing Committee members are immune from prosecution.
HONG KONG — A billionaire Chinese petrochemical entrepreneur on Monday became the fifth senior industry figure in a week to become enmeshed in a corruption investigation that continues to reach higher into China's political and economic elite.The entrepreneur, Hua Bangsong, 47, is "now assisting the relevant authorities in the P.R.C. in their investigations," according to a filing made late Monday to the Hong Kong Stock Exchange by Mr. Hua's company, Wison Engineering Services.A crackdown on corruption in China has intensified in recent weeks, focusing on the oil industry. Mr. Hua's company is one of the largest nonstate contractors to the oil and gas industry in China, and counts the China National Petroleum Corporation, or C.N.P.C., as one of its biggest customers.Last week, four senior managers of C.N.P.C. and its subsidiary, PetroChina, were removed from their positions and placed under investigation on suspicion of what an official statement called "grave violations of discipline," almost always a reference to corruption, bribe-taking or embezzlement.The investigation appeared to escalate on Sunday when Jiang Jiemin, director of the powerful commission that oversees the government's stakes in the largest nonfinancial state companies in China, was also cited on suspicion of "grave violations of discipline," according to a statement on the Web site of the party's Central Commission for Discipline Inspection. Mr. Jiang had been general manager, then chairman of C.N.P.C. until March.Mr. Jiang, a full member of the party's elite Central Committee, became the highest-ranking official to be publicly cited for scrutiny since President Xi Jinping came to power last November. Mr. Xi pledged to battle official corruption at levels high and low, taking down "tigers and flies."People with knowledge of the matter who cited senior officials said the investigations were centering on associates of Zhou Yongkang, one of China's most senior leaders, who retired in November after five years in charge of the state security apparatus and had been a longtime oil executive and general manager of C.N.P.C.In announcing that Mr. Hua, the entrepreneur, was assisting the investigations in China, Wison sought on Monday to defend its business ties to PetroChina."The company operates legally," Wison said, adding that prior to its December listing on the Hong Kong stock market, it "completed the necessary compliance check."
BEIJING — To prepare for an endless barrage of secondary-school exams, Zhang Ruifan learned to memorize entire science textbooks. So when his family sent him to high school in the United States, he was so far ahead of his fellow freshmen in math and science that he usually knew the correct answer even before the teacher had finished speaking."I'd just blurt it out," he said in an interview while back home here this summer.But Ruifan, 15, who goes by Derek in the United States, soon discovered that science was more than just facts and formulas meant to be regurgitated on tests.At school in West Des Moines, Iowa, where he lived with a host family, his science teacher donned protective goggles and used a long-reach lighter to ignite a hydrogen balloon, just so students could get a firsthand look at the element's explosive properties.Then there was the day he and his classmates went up to the roof to learn about gravity by dropping basketballs, tennis balls and other objects over the edge. "Back in China I learned about gravity from a PowerPoint slide," he said. "That's it."The United States State Department does not break down its data on visas by age and school type, but anecdotal evidence here suggests that increasing numbers of middle-class families are looking for a way out of China's test-taking gantlet."I didn't want my son to become a book-cramming robot," said Ruifan's mother, Wang Pin, explaining why she sent him to live and learn halfway across the world. American educators and politicians have been warning for years that rising powers like China and India are poised to overtake the United States in science achievement. On a 2009 standardized test that drew worldwide attention, students in Shanghai finished first in the sciences among peers from more than 70 countries, while the United States came in 23rd (right behind Hungary).But even many Chinese educators are dismayed by the country's obsession with stellar test results. Last fall they convened a conference on the topic in Shanghai."When American high school students are discussing the latest models of airplanes, satellites and submarines, China's smartest students are buried in homework and examination papers," said Ni Minjing a physics teacher who is the director of the Shanghai Education Commission's basic education department, according to Shanghai Daily, an English-language newspaper. "Students also have few chances to do scientific experiments and exercise independent thinking."That message appears to be getting through to Chinese education officials, who are moving toward the American model of hands-on science learning. This summer, the Ministry of Education launched the latest in a series of campaigns aimed at shifting the focus away from standardized testing.The ministry said the systemic fixation with testing "severely hampers student development as a whole person, stunts their healthy growth, and limits opportunities to cultivate social responsibilities, creative spirit, and practical abilities in students."But as with so many orders from the central government, it remains to be seen whether these guidelines, aimed at provincial education departments, will be adopted or ignored.Meanwhile, preparation for China's national university entrance exam continues to dominate the lives of secondary students. Known as the gaokao, or high test, the exam takes nine hours over two days, and some say it makes the SAT look like a pop quiz. Compounding the pressure, gaokao results are the sole factor used to determine university admissions.This ironclad criterion, combined with the fact that most families have only one child, gives Chinese parents little incentive to encourage extracurricular activities, lest it divert their children from the slog of gaokao memorization. Critics say it also produces poorly socialized adolescents who are ill-prepared to face the challenges of the real world. Students have their own term for describing the way their teachers impart knowledge: "feeding the ducks."As a science teacher in the northwestern region of Ningxia, Wei Jinbao has seen firsthand how China's education system transforms children into hardworking students with an impressive capacity for processing factual information. "Give them a problem and they will find the answer," he said. "However, they can't ask a good question."Like many Chinese science professionals, Mr. Wei is keenly aware that the country has yet to produce a Nobel Prize winner in the sciences whose research is homegrown. Over the years, he has tried to spark innovative thinking among his students, but he is missing a critical element: lab equipment, which most Chinese schools see as an unnecessary expense.Asked why, he sighed in exasperation. "The entrance exam doesn't test experiments," he said.
BEIJING — China's factory activity expanded for the first time in four months in August as domestic demand rebounded, a private survey showed Monday, a further sign that policymakers may have averted a sharp slowdown in the world's second-largest economy.The final HSBC/Markit Purchasing Managers' Index climbed to 50.1 in August, up sharply from 47.7 in July and in line with the flash reading last week. The survey came a day after a more optimistic official manufacturing P.M.I., which showed factory activity expanding at the fastest pace in more than a year in August, with a jump in new orders.The official P.M.I., which came in at 51 versus expectations for 50.6, is more weighted toward bigger and state-owned firms, which have easier access to credit and the scale to better cope with downturns.But a P.M.I. reading above 50 indicates growth while one below 50 demarcates contraction, so the latest data suggest the expansion in August was only modest.Indeed, the survey showed new export orders dipping from July, staying well below the 50-point threshold. New orders, which include domestic orders, showed marginal growth by rising to 50.8, a four-month high."We expect some upside surprises to China's growth in the coming months," said Qu Hongbin, an HSBC economist, noting that factory activity had picked up as companies rebuilt their stocks amid recent steps taken by the Chinese authorities to boost activity.
BEIJING — China's local governments have failed to account for the use of more than 16.5 billion yuan ($2.7 billion) in fines paid by families flouting strict family planning rules, a lawyer who has joined the call for public disclosure said on Wednesday.Wu Youshui, based in the eastern province of Zhejiang, said he asked for information about fines imposed in 2012 because he believed the system "faced unquestioned abuse of power and corruption".There has been growing public anger about the one-child policy, introduced in the late 1970s to prevent population growth spiraling out of control. The policy covers 63 percent of China, though family planning rules have been loosened over the years to allow some couples to have a second child."Not even one province can provide information about using and auditing the fines," Wu told Reuters by telephone. He said he had collected replies from China's 31 local governments by Tuesday.The "social support fee" - the fine - is meant to go towards the government budget to compensate for resources and public services the child would use."As far as I can tell, no county in China uses the fines that way," Wu said. "A lot of the money is given back to the local family planning commission and rewarded to officials who collected it."Officials at the National Health and Family Planning Commission could not be reached for comment.On Sunday, a group of 14 lawyers wrote an open letter to the National Audit Office asking whether the family planning fines were audited.The office said in a statement on its website that it could not give details as it hasn't "organized comprehensive auditing in recent years". ($1 = 6.12 yuan)
BEIJING — Western media organizations are trying to demonize China and promote revolution and national disintegration as they hate seeing the country prosper, the head of China's official Xinhua news agency said in comments published on Wednesday.China's ruling Communist Party has in recent weeks been tightening controls over the Internet and reminding state media of its responsibility to promote a "correct political direction", as President Xi Jinping dashes hopes his administration will embark on political reforms.China also needed to combat the distorted view the Western media gives of the country and reject their anti-China plotting, Li Congjun, president of Xinhua, wrote in the Party's official People's Daily."Some hostile Western forces and media do not want to see a prospering socialist China and target the spear of Westernization, separation and 'color revolution' at China," Li wrote in a column.They "use their powerful dissemination abilities to massively play up the 'China threat theory' and the 'China collapse theory', creating rumors to attack and vilify our country and party which harms our interests and national image"."Overall, global opinions are still dominated by Western media outlets, and China's capacity to make its own voice heard fails to match its international standing," Li wrote.He did not give examples of Western media organizations but China has long been suspicious of the European and U.S. media.Last year, China labeled as a "smear" a New York Times report that then-premier Wen Jiabao's family had accumulated at least $2.7 billion in "hidden riches".Li called on mainstream Chinese media to refute "untruthful reports" as part of efforts to give China a bigger say on the world stage and burnish its much-vaunted efforts at soft power."We must continue to be creative in foreign propaganda efforts ... to tell China's story well, explain China's special characteristics and proactively publicize the polices and positions of the party and government," Li said.China has poured money into trying to get its voice heard internationally, including English-language television news channels, but they are still widely regarded in Western countries as heavily slanted towards the Chinese government.While China allows several hundred foreign reporters to be based in the country, they face restrictions ranging from police harassment when covering some news, such as protests, to a lack of access to government officials.Li said China's media needed to do better at using social media and "take the initiative in leading public opinion in new media"."If we cannot effectively rule new media, the ground will be taken by others, which will pose challenges to our dominant role in leading public opinion," he said.
BEIJING — Two provincial officials have been kicked out of China's ruling Communist Party and sent for prosecution amid a spreading crackdown on corruption, the party's watchdog body said Wednesday.Wang Suyi and Li Daqiu have also been fired from their jobs after being accused of "receiving enormous amounts of money and goods in return for performing favors for others," the Central Commission for Discipline Inspection said on its website.Both are suspected of criminal offenses and will have their illegal gains confiscated, it added.Since taking office in March, Chinese President Xi Jinping has hammered away at the twin themes of reining in widespread corruption and curtailing lavish government spending on banquets, office cars and other privileges.The campaign appears to have expanded to tightening control over immensely powerful and long-cossetted state industries. Tuesday saw the firing of the head of the commission that oversees China's major state-owned companies, following an announcement he was under investigation for unspecified violations. Jiang Jiemin also belongs to the party's Central Committee, made up of its top 200 members, making him the highest ranking official caught up in the recent crackdown.The two officials whose party expulsions were announced Wednesday are lower ranked, but they still held powerful offices that provided rich opportunities for taking bribes.Wang was one of the top officials in sprawling, coal-rich Inner Mongolia as a member of the regional party standing committee, and also head of its main body for coordinating with non-party groups. Li was a vice chairman of the provincial advisory body in the southern region of Guangxi as well as head of the regional branch of China's sole legal government-controlled trade union.
BEIJING — Chinese authorities say they suspect that the woman who gouged out a 6-year-old boy's eyes was his aunt who later killed herself, adding a surprising twist to a gruesome case with conflicting details.The attack on the boy horrified the Chinese public and added to outrage over violence against children in the wake of a scandal earlier in the year involving teachers sexually abusing young girls. This time, heart-wrenching images and footage of the wailing child in hospital, his eyes bandaged and parents distraught, have circulated on the Internet as news commentaries slammed the brutality of the attack."Mama, why is the sky still so dark?" the child has been quoted as saying while recovering in hospital, his parents unable to bring themselves to tell him about his condition.On Wednesday, police in the city of Linfen in northern Shanxi province confirmed an official Xinhua News Agency report that the boy's aunt Zhang Huiying had been identified as a suspect because his blood was found on her clothes. Six days after the boy was attacked, Zhang killed herself by jumping into a well.In an interview with the Beijing News published Thursday, Zhang's husband described how the woman's mental state unraveled in her final days.Xinhua did not cite a possible motive for the aunt to attack the boy.Initial reports said the boy, Guo Bin, whose also goes by the nickname Bin Bin, had been playing outside his home on the evening of Aug. 24 when he was lured by an unidentified woman into a field where she used a tool to gouge out his eyes. Family members found the boy late at night in a remote area, his face covered in blood, eyelids swollen.The police finding seemed to conflict with the family's earlier comments on the boy's assailant, which cited him as saying that the woman spoke with an accent from outside the area and had hair that was dyed blonde.Bin Bin's mother said in a phone interview that the boy was disoriented after the traumatizing attack."It is easy to understand that he wasn't clear about the situation," Wang Wenli told The Associated Press. "He said her accent was from another region, but he later amended that. He then said it was a local accent, but he did not say that it was his aunt."She declined to talk about the police evidence against her sister-in-law, saying: "The police did not tell us anything. I do not know." She also said reports of a dispute between the families were false.Bin Bin was recovering steadily after a week of treatment, his mother said, while help has poured in from the Chinese public and elsewhere in the form of donations and gifts.State broadcaster CCTV aired fresh footage of the boy in hospital being guided by a doctor to feel his way around a room with his hands. He's seen singing a children's song to a doctor and playing with a plush toy elephant, teddy bear and other toys."He talks to me, and he plays with toys that people have sent him," Wang said. "He still doesn't know that he likely will be blind the rest of his life."One of the case investigators reached by phone, a police officer in Fenxi county surnamed Liu, referred only to the Xinhua report and refused to answer further questions, saying he was not authorized to speak to the media. Calls to the city and county's police bureaus' propaganda departments rang unanswered.Wang's brother Wang Wenjun, one of the boy's uncles, also said by phone that Zhang, the aunt, might have been mentally ill, saying it was unclear why she committed suicide.Speaking to the Beijing News, Zhang's husband Guo Zhicheng said his wife had been a timid person and that he "simply could not understand" how she could be the suspected assailant.Guo described how a full day of police questioning left his wife frazzled, with her saying she was having difficulty breathing and heard an elderly woman's voice in her head urging her to leave the house.On the morning of Aug. 30, after telling her husband she'd been taken outside of the house by "that old lady" until 3 a.m., she jumped in the well in the courtyard at home, Guo was quoted as saying.Associated Press researchers Zhao Liang in Beijing and Fu Ting in Shanghai contributed to this report.
BEIJING — Chinese police suspect a six-year-old boy's aunt of gouging out his eyes, Xinhua state news agency said on Wednesday, the latest twist in the investigation of a crime that shocked the country.DNA tests found the boy's blood on the aunt's clothes, Xinhua reported, citing a statement from police in Linfen in rural Shanxi province.The aunt, Zhang Huiying, killed herself six days after the attack by jumping into a well, the agency said.The boy was lured by a woman with yellow-dyed hair into a field while he was playing outside. She gouged out his eyes and left him in a pool of blood, Xinhua reported.Chinese media reports last week linked the crime to China's burgeoning black market for organs, as police had initially said the boy's corneas were missing.But police later reported that the corneas were not missing.Photographs and videos of the boy have circulated widely online since the attack, the most searched term on China's Twitter-like Sina Weibo microblog service on Wednesday, with internet users trying to understand what many saw as an incomprehensible act of violence."Now it turns out the person who destroyed this child's whole life may be a close relative," wrote one user. "It's hard not to feel helpless and bitterly disappointed... how painful."State media has previously reported on organized gangs that abduct and maim children from the countryside so they can work as beggars, but there was no evidence that that was the motive in this attack.
BEIJING — Amid the usual crop of Western-imported blockbuster fare (see "Jurassic Park 3D," "Monsters University," "Pacific Rim" ), two homegrown movies about four fashion-obsessed girlfriends at a Shanghai university have unexpectedly made their way to the top of China's box office here this summer.The first, "Tiny Times 1," beat Hollywood's "Man of Steel" when it opened here in late June, grossing more than $43 million its first week, according to Entgroup, a film industry research company. The sequel, "Tiny Times 2," which opened on Aug. 8, grossed more than $47 million in its first three weeks. ("Tiny Times 1" opened in select North American markets in July, and its sequel opened in New York on Friday.) Ticket sales for both movies qualified them as major hits in China.But the films, made by the fledgling director Guo Jingming and based on his series of best-selling novels, have also made an impact beyond the box office. They have become a lightning rod for this nation's evolving view of its growing youth culture. Many established Chinese cultural commentators are outraged by these works' overt celebration of materialism, and this anger has spurred a surprisingly robust counterattack by the movies' many young fans.Film critics have described the first movie as being like "The Devil Wears Prada" meets "Sex and the City" (without the sex). The Chinese critic Raymond Zhou denounced "Tiny Times" in The Beijing Evening News and in a subsequent appearance on the China Central Television show "Crossover," faulting its undercurrent of "crass" materialism and "bad taste." The New York-based media scholar Ying Zhu, writing with Frances Hisgen in The Atlantic online in an article widely cited in China, condemned the film's "twisted male narcissism."Others leapt to the defense of both movie and maker. The Global Times editor Hu Xijin called Mr. Guo "superman," while the critic Teng Jimeng, speaking on "Crossover," lauded "Tiny Times" as a "feminist film." The People's Daily jumped into the scrum with a package of three articles that offered varying assessments of the movie, followed later by a fourth that was largely critical.Meanwhile, Mr. Guo's fans, primarily young and female, have rallied with the fervor of groupies, inundating critics like Mr. Zhou with tens of thousands of condemnatory online posts and flocking to theaters."The controversy is bigger than I anticipated," Mr. Guo said.His books are stuffed with English-language brand names like Chanel and Gucci and choice phrases. ("Economy class kills me!" and "I hate Beijing!") His films show the actual designer goods and include dialogue that has also riled commentators, like this exchange in "Tiny Times 1" between two star-crossed young lovers:"I like you," the young man says, "not because you've had a driver since you were little, and not because you have designer bags, and definitely not because you gave me expensive boots. Even if you didn't have a cent, I would still like you."The woman then turns on him: "Let me tell you, love without materialism is just a pile of sand!"The movies are "like a product-placement commercial," said the opera and film director Chen Shi-Zheng, whose credits include the Chinese version of "High School Musical." "But Guo Jingming is a brand for Chinese youth."Mr. Guo's films spotlight the growing cultural influence of social and economic shifts brought about by longstanding government policy, namely the success of China's urbanization effort, which has increased the urban population to 53 percent today, from 19 percent in 1979. This shift has created a vast new cohort that can afford cultural experiences like movie theaters: China has more than 13,000 film screens, according to the Xinhua news service, with new ones added in 2012 at a rate of 10.5 a day. The demographic change is leading moviemakers and other cultural content providers to start catering to the tastes of these "new urbanites," which often differ from those of longtime residents of major cities.The franchise also reflects how wealth has become such a standard measure of value. Many articles about "Tiny Times" note Mr. Guo's ranking on the Chinese Writers Rich List — he topped it in 2011 and came in fourth in 2012 — without a trace of irony."Everything is measured by money," Mr. Chen said. "Thirty years ago, we had ideology, but now people are brought up with materialism. Consumer culture is what's valuable to them. Maybe some day, they'll come back to the meaning of life."In Mr. Chen's view, much of the controversy over "Tiny Times" stems from the comparative newness of youth culture in China. "People don't know how to take it," he said. "China is catching up with the rest of the world." Since China has about 450 million people under the age of 25, and the average age of a moviegoer here is 21.2, this catching up is likely to be fast.
NEW YORK — When Serena Williams plays in the U.S. Open semifinals Saturday, her coach, Patrick Mouratoglou, probably will pull out a pen and jot some notes in his ever-present black notebook.He does that at most of her matches, finding things to focus on so Williams can keep improving. Yes, that's right: Williams already owns 16 Grand Slam titles, is ranked No. 1, is three weeks from her 32nd birthday — and yet she still wants to get better."She's open to discussion, changing things," Mouratoglou said. "She's very open to working hard and doing things that she needs to do."To that end, Mouratoglou and Williams will sit together and watch video of her matches, going over the positives and negatives he picked out while courtside. He'll refer to his notes, which might involve tactics or technique. She speaks up, too, of course."She's working like if she was 19 years old and she wanted to win her first Grand Slam. She has the same appetite, and she's open mentally the same way to get better every day. So that makes a huge difference," Mouratoglou said. "How many players ... have the same appetite? And especially after winning so many Grand Slams?"Williams is two wins away from her second consecutive U.S. Open championship and fifth in all. Having dropped a total of 13 games through five matches — including a 6-0, 6-0 victory in the quarterfinals — she next faces No. 5 Li Na of China, the 2011 French Open winner. No. 2 Victoria Azarenka of Belarus, the two-time Australian Open champion and last year's runner-up in New York, meets 83rd-ranked Flavia Pennetta in Saturday's other semifinal.There's little doubt who the favorite is.Compare Williams' career Grand Slam haul to other three semifinalists' combined three major titles. Or note that Williams already has played in 23 past Grand Slam semifinals, more than twice the 10 previous appearances for the other trio.Williams began working with Mouratoglou shortly after a first-round loss at the 2012 French Open, the only time she's exited a major tournament after her opening match.Immediately, he knew one aspect of her game he wanted to fix."Seeing that match, and seeing her practice a few days after, I just saw that she was lacking balance. She was unbalanced most of the time. The body weight was going everywhere, except where it should go," Mouratoglou said. "So it was tough for her to be hitting well, the way she would like to — to be precise, to have her usual power."Once that was solved, he added, "it would be time to do some other things."Seems be paying off.Since being beaten at Roland Garros by Virginie Razzano, who was ranked 111th at the time, Williams has won 96 of 101 matches and earned 13 titles. That includes trophies from three of the past five Grand Slam tournaments, along with gold at the London Olympics.In 2013 alone, she is 65-4 and has matched her career high with eight titles.Never satisfied, Williams came to the U.S. Open with a new approach: She and Mouratoglou find something new to focus on each and every match."Just this tournament, I started setting different goals for myself, and it's been really working for me," Williams said. "So I just started that, and I'm enjoying it."Explained Mouratoglou: "We just say, 'Well, during this match, you have to do a certain amount of this, a certain amount of that. You have to be able to achieve this.'"It might be something as straightforward as a target number of forehand winners. Another example Mouratoglou gave was that Williams might set a goal of getting to the net at least a specific number of times, which forces her to prepare points to allow that.Mouratoglou was asked how Williams is faring with those goals so far at this U.S. Open."Not bad at all," he said, smiling. "Everyone sees that she has more tools today. Many more."
BEIJING — More than 400 million Chinese are unable to speak the national language Mandarin, and large numbers in the rest of the country speak it badly, state media said on Thursday as the government launched another push for linguistic unity.China's ruling Communist Party has promoted Mandarin for decades to unite a nation with thousands of often mutually unintelligible dialects and numerous minority languages, but has been hampered by the country's size and lack of investment in education, especially in poor rural areas.Officials have admitted they will probably never get the whole country to be able to speak Mandarin, formally called Putonghua in China, meaning "common tongue", suggesting everyone should be able to speak it.Ministry of Education spokeswoman Xu Mei said that only 70 percent of the country could speak Mandarin, many of them poorly, and the remaining 30 percent or 400 million people could not speak it at all, Xinhua news agency reported."The country still needs to invest in promoting Mandarin," it quoted her as saying, ahead of an annual campaign to promote Mandarin held every year since 1998."This year the ministry will focus on the remote countryside and areas inhabited by ethnic minorities," Xu said.The promotion of Mandarin has long been a contentious issue in China, despite the practical benefits of having the entire population fluent in one tongue, and in some cases has lead to violent unrest.Tibetans have protested against having to use Mandarin in schools, while in 2010 several hundred people took to the streets in the southern city of Guangzhou over fears the authorities were trying to marginalize Cantonese.
BEIJING — Chinese prosecutors have indicted six men in the death of a state industry executive who was allegedly dunked in ice water during questioning in a case that points to abuses during internal investigations by the Communist Party.The indictment, details of which were widely published in Chinese media, describes how 42-year-old Yu Qiyi drowned after having his head repeatedly pushed into a bucket of ice water.Yu was detained March 1 by agents from the party's corruption watchdog in the eastern province of Zhejiang and died 38 days later after being rushed to a hospital. While under questioning, he was held in a detention center run by the party's Central Commission for Discipline Inspection, a body that critics say operates without legal constraints and frequently coerces confessions from those under investigation.The six men — five investigators from the commission and one local prosecutor — were charged with intentional harming in the Aug. 30 indictment, although Yu's widow Wu Qian said Thursday she believes there is enough evidence to charge them with murder."From the start, I'd hoped the case could be resolved under the law and the perpetrators held accountable and severely punished, but sometimes that's hard to do in China," Wu said in a phone interview.Wu said at the time of his death Yu was emaciated, with bruises on his arms and thighs, dark welts on his buttocks and scrapes on his feet and shins. While that appeared to indicate that he was starved and beaten, the indictment made no mention of other forms of torture besides dunking.It wasn't clear when the case would go to trial, and a man at the prosecutor's office in the Zhejiang city of Quzhou, where the indictment was issued, said he had no information about the case and refused to transfer the call to other departments. The man refused to give his name, as is common practice among Chinese bureaucrats.Well-known Beijing human rights lawyer Pu Zhiqiang, who has advised on the case, said there was little for Wu's legal team to do but watch the case proceed. He said Yu's death was not an isolated incident, but rather part of an institutionalized culture of torture within the party investigation system."The accused believe that they were performing their duties, and as far as I know torture is widely used in interrogation by party disciplinary officials across the country," Pu said. "They had to have authorization from their supervisors for what they did, and it is not fair for only them to get blamed."Yu's death has drawn attention to the party's feared system of internal investigation under which suspects disappear into detention for weeks or months with little or no notice given to their families.Defenders of the system say it allows investigators to prevent powerful officials from using their influence to block legal action against them.Trained as an engineer, Yu did not seem to have that kind of power. A party member since 1998, he had been a rising figure in the state-owned Wenzhou Industry Investment Group and had been seconded to the Cabinet agency in Beijing that oversees China's biggest state-owned companies.He was picked up by investigators upon arriving home from Beijing on March 1. Wu was never given formal notice of his detention, but learned from private sources that he was suspected of being a middleman in a corrupt land deal that eventually fell through.
BEIJING — A Chinese provincial official whose grinning at the scene of a deadly bus crash sparked an outcry and, eventually, led to corruption charges was sentenced Thursday to 14 years in prison.Yang Dacai was head of the Shanxi province work safety administration when photographs of him smiling at the crash scene circulated online in August 2012. Outraged citizens condemned his apparent callousness and, noting the luxury wristwatch he wore in the picture, dug up more photos of him wearing pricey timepieces.They nicknamed him "Brother Watch" and demanded to know how he could afford the items on a public servant's modest salary. Communist Party officials later opened an investigation and stripped him of his official duties for "serious wrongdoing."Yang pleaded guilty last month to charges of taking 250,000 yuan ($40,000) in bribes and having bank deposits of 5.04 million yuan ($820,000) from dubious sources. He was sentenced by the Intermediate People's Court in the Shanxi capital of Xi'an, according to a court official speaking on routine condition of anonymity.Prior to his trial, Yang had defended himself on an online forum, saying his smile was an attempt to cheer up anxious rescuers on the scene of the Aug. 26, 2012 accident, in which 36 people were killed. He also claimed to have used his legal income to purchase the watches.Yang, who had also served on the provincial anti-corruption body, became yet another embodiment of the graft seen as rife among Chinese officialdom — and which is increasingly being exposed and condemned on China's microblogging services.New President Xi Jinping has tried to assuage public anger by encouraging frugality among officials and by tightening controls over the bureaucracy and long-cosseted state owned companies.However, China's ruling Communist Party is extremely wary of private citizens probing corruption, preferring to do the policing on its own terms. In recent months, scores of social media users have been detained after publicizing graft allegations or calling for officials to publicly declare their assets, amid a campaign by authorities to clamp down on 'online rumors.'Lu Liangbiao, a Beijing-based lawyer, said that under the current climate it would be more difficult to spark an investigation such as the one into Yang."If authorities had started their campaign to stamp out rumors online much earlier, then 'Brother Watch' would never have been sent to prison no matter how widely he smiled," Lu posted on his verified account on China's Twitter-like Sina Weibo.
BEIJING — China's former domestic security chief Zhou Yongkang, one of the country's most powerful politicians of the last decade, is helping authorities in a corruption probe and, contrary to media reports, is not currently the target of the investigation, sources told Reuters.The investigation could take weeks, maybe months, to complete. Even if Zhou is implicated, he is unlikely to follow in the footsteps of disgraced ally Bo Xilai and face prosecution, said the sources, who have ties to the leadership or direct knowledge of the matter.The scandal involving Bo, who is awaiting the verdict of a trial that concluded last week on charges of corruption and abuse of power, and the rumors surrounding Zhou are the most serious convulsions within the ruling Communist Party in decades. The probe Zhou is helping in has already reached deep into China's state-owned oil companies and several senior executives are being investigated for graft.President Xi Jinping, who formally took power in March, has vowed strong action against corruption, but he may not yet be powerful enough to take on Zhou, who still wields political clout through protégés he had promoted into key positions.Any action against Zhou may only be considered after the party's elite 200-member Central Committee meets at a plenum in November, the sources said. Xi will need unstinted support at the meeting, where he is likely to present wide-ranging reforms to rebalance the economy."Zhou has not been 'shuang gui'," one source told Reuters, referring to a form of internal investigation in which a suspect is required to confess within a prescribed time and place."He was merely asked to assist with the corruption investigation," the source said. All three sources declined to elaborate when asked if the probe involved Zhou's family members or allies at state oil giant China National Petroleum Corp, of which he was president in the 1990s."Unlike Bo, Zhou is unlikely to be arrested or put on trial" even if he is implicated in the probe, the source added.Media reports that Zhou was being investigated came after inquiries into at least eight allies linked to him, including the country's top regulator of major state-owned enterprises who has been sacked for an unspecified "serious breach of discipline".Hong Kong's South China Morning Post reported last week that Zhou was facing a corruption probe. U.S.-based China-watching news site Duowei said earlier Zhou was under investigation for graft but later withdrew the report for unknown reasons.While dismissing the reports, the sources said the investigations of his allies did appear aimed at marginalizing Zhou, 70, who retired as security tsar and from the Communist Party's all-powerful Politburo Standing Committee during a sweeping leadership reshuffle last November."Whether they will touch Zhou Yongkang or not is another matter, but that message is already very clear - it's undermining one of the most important vested interest groups," said Cheng Li, a senior fellow at the Brookings Institution in Washington.In a sign Zhou is not himself under investigation, major state media websites published his name on Thursday in a report on senior leaders offering condolences for the death of a former official in the southern province of Guangdong.Under the signals China provides on whether top officials are out of favor, Zhou's name would unlikely be mentioned in state media if he were in serious trouble.In a landmark move earlier this year, the Communist Party scrapped a decades-old unwritten rule that exempts incumbent and retired Standing Committee members from investigation for corruption, the sources said.The party can now open an investigation into purported evidence provided by a named - not anonymous - whistleblower against a sitting or former Standing Committee member, the sources said, requesting anonymity to avoid repercussions for discussing secretive and sensitive elite politics.But any decision by Xi to proceed to the next step - prosecution - still needs the approval of the incumbent Standing Committee, the sources said, adding that senior retired leaders would also need to be consulted."Xi cannot unilaterally decide to arrest Zhou. It would need the approval of the Standing Committee as well as party elders," a second source said.Any move against Zhou would be unprecedented since no sitting or retired Standing Committee member has been jailed for economic crimes since the Communists swept to power in 1949."The political risks are too high," the second source said. "Retired Standing Committee members would be smashing their (collective) foot with a rock if they agree to prosecute one of their own. Any one of them could be next."Zhou could not be reached for comment and the party's anti-corruption watchdog did not answer telephone calls. The State Council Information Office, or cabinet spokesman's office which doubles as the party spokesman's office, did not respond to requests for comment. A Foreign Ministry spokesman said questions on Zhou were outside his remit.The sources said Zhou's movements have not been restricted, but, in any case, travel outside Beijing by any retired Standing Committee member needs the approval of the incumbent Standing Committee.As domestic security tsar, Zhou oversaw the nation's police force, paramilitary People's Armed Police, prosecutors, judges and the civilian intelligence apparatus. During his watch, government spending on domestic security exceeded the budgets for defense, health care or education."Zhou was ranked ninth in the (previous) Standing Committee, but he wielded power second only to Hu Jintao in the security realm," another source said, referring to the former president, Xi's immediate predecessor."If Xi arrests Zhou, it would upset the balance of power at the top," the source said. "Xi sees the political risks. If he makes too many enemies, he could find himself in trouble."Xi, who is also party and military chief, has pledged to go after "tigers" and "flies" in the battle against corruption, referring to political heavyweights and lightweights.But Xi is still consolidating power less than a year into the job.Zhou had recommended that Bo succeed him as domestic security chief before the latter's dramatic downfall last year, multiple sources with direct knowledge of the matter or ties to the leadership have said.Bo fell from grace after his police chief, Wang Lijun, sought political asylum at a U.S. consulate and implicated Bo's wife, Gu Kailai, in the murder of a British businessman. Gu was later given a suspended death sentence and Wang a 15-year jail term.When Zhou stepped down along with most members of the Standing Committee at the 18th Party congress last November, the role of domestic security tsar was downgraded, reflecting leadership fears that the position had become too powerful.
BEIJING — "You Irish people are white because you eat potatoes!" a Beijing taxi driver announced to my Irish husband on a trip before moving here, about a decade ago. We all laughed, though he didn't seem to be entirely joking."Who's Irish?" asked the Chinese-American writer Gish Jen in her story collection of the same name, exploring cultural differences and misunderstandings in the United States."Who's Chinese?" is the question here.Much has changed since China began opening up to the world following the death of Mao Zedong in 1976. But deeply held cultural beliefs predating that isolationist era persist. These include that laowai, or "old outsiders," as non-Chinese are often called, are fundamentally different and can therefore never become Chinese, no matter how long their residency, recent books and interviews with writers specializing in cross-cultural issues suggest."I hate to generalize," said Ms. Jen, who recently published "Tiger Writing," a collection of essays on "art, culture and the interdependent self." "They're starting from a different place," she said of many people here. "They are fundamentally starting from very different assumptions about identity.""I think the difference is related to this: Can you even accept a foreigner as quite Chinese?" she continued, speaking by telephone from Cambridge, Massachusetts. "To some Chinese people who are quite modern, the answer is yes. But to many, they feel you have to be culturally Chinese, and that's much deeper than anything you can acquire by yourself.""As soon as you adopt something for yourself, you're not Chinese," she said. "Chineseness does not involve choice."Many Chinese have become American but few Americans have become Chinese. Of course, unlike the United States, China is not an immigrant nation. The "huddled masses" have headed for the Statue of Liberty, not the Forbidden City. Just as Irish crossed the Atlantic for America, Chinese crossed the Pacific. China does not recognize dual citizenship, and it is difficult for foreigners to become a Chinese citizen. China's version of a green-card program is not easy to navigate, Chinese lawyers and academics say.But as the economic downturn in the West continues and the global economy integrates, people are looking East to make a living, by choice or by necessity. Some bring their families. Others marry here. "Who's Chinese?" is increasingly important, a question freighted with personal and political implications.Even serious accounts of the lives of foreigners in China, who number probably in the hundreds of thousands, express doubt about assimilation.Take "Their China," a book published in Chinese by Joy Yue Xi, born in China of Manchurian descent, now living in Canada with her husband and two young children.Out in August, it contains interviews with 18 non-Chinese living here. (Disclosure: I am one of the subjects.) On the cover it says: "They are spectators. And are players. But in the end, they are still spectators.""Ouch," Ms. Jen said in an e-mail, of those lines that seem to exclude so much.Ms. Xi said by telephone from Canada: "Those words were my publisher's. I feel it shows a judgment in China about foreigners, but I wouldn't myself generalize like that. There is some truth to it, but it doesn't represent all people. But I think it does represent what most Chinese people think."Writing the book was cathartic, she said. After 10 years in Canada, she returned in 2009 and felt foreign. She sought to understand "fellow foreigners" in China — Koreans, Japanese, Americans both black and white, Europeans."China was very strange," she said. "A lot of things had changed. People's values had changed. My friends had changed, and I was very sad.""My parents thought it was very weird that I was afraid of crossing the road" in China, she said. "The roads were very broad, and at the red light the cars still drove and didn't let people cross. Chinese people felt nothing about this, but foreigners did. One said to me, 'You can only make sure you don't get hit. Don't mind the lights."'Karen Ma, author of "Excess Baggage," a novel about a Chinese family in Japan and the conflict between two sisters (one left China, the other stayed behind), says she is, and is not, Chinese.Born in China, she grew up in Hong Kong when it was a British colony and in Japan."I'm not fully accepted because I'm too Westernized," she said in a telephone interview from India, where she lives. "But I think that's not unique to China. I see it in Japan, too."If non-Chinese — or not fully Chinese, like Ms. Ma — are not truly accepted, there's a seemingly contradictory, flip side to the mind-set: Even part-Chinese are not allowed to stop being Chinese, Ms. Ma said."They," meaning the government, "have such ways, subtle and not so subtle ways, of reminding you that you may not be fully us but you are still one of us," Ms. Ma said. "They have a way of luring you back because you were once a Chinese."Being a member of the Chinese nation revolves around an idea of a "shared fate," she said, something the state and many Chinese see as rooted in race and birth.For Ms. Jen, it's all about identity, whether inherited or invented. In China, she said, it's mostly inherited, putting foreigners largely beyond the pale."Even in the U.S.A., there's a tension between the self that is invented and the self that is inherited," she said. "But in China, it's 20 percent of one and 80 percent of another," whereas in America, "it's the opposite!"
HONG KONG — Thousands of dead fish floating along a 19-mile stretch of a river in Hubei Province in central China were killed by pollutants emitted by a local chemical plant, provincial environmental officials said Wednesday.Environmental protection officials said tests on water taken from the Fu River upstream from the metropolis of Wuhan revealed that extremely high levels of ammonia in the water were caused by pollution from a plant owned by the Hubei Shuanghuan Science and Technology Company.The tests, conducted by environmental officials from Xiaogan City, revealed ammonia concentrations downstream from the plant as high as 196 milligrams per liter. The World Health Organization notes that naturally occurring ammonia appears in surface water at concentrations of about 12 milligrams per liter, while the similar figure for drinking water is around 0.02 milligrams per liter.Shares in Hubei Shuanghuan were suspended from trading on the Shenzhen stock market Wednesday pending the release of an announcement. Calls to the company's headquarters were not answered on Wednesday. Provincial officials ordered the company's plant to cease production while the cause of the leak was investigated.The plant produces sodium carbonate, used in making glass, and ammonium chloride for fertilizer, according to local news media reports. It has been cited for environmental violations four times since 2008, said Ma Jun, director of the Institute of Public and Environmental Affairs, a Chinese nongovernmental organization that tracks air and water pollution."Each time it was ordered to be corrected, but this demonstrates that enforcement is way too weak and the cost of violations way too low," Mr. Ma said.People living along the river said they first noticed fish dying on Monday morning, and a sickening stench began to fill the air, China National Radio reported. About 110 tons of dead fish have been cleared from the river, the state-run Xinhua News Agency reported Wednesday.Environmental officials said the river was not used as a source of drinking water, and they urged residents not to panic. Spills in China have often set off runs on bottled water because of fears of contaminated supplies.China's Ministry of Environmental Protection said water pollution was a serious concern, with industrial spills, farm runoff and untreated sewage all factors in degrading water quality. As of last year, nearly a third of the sections of major rivers it monitored were so degraded that the water was unfit for human contact, the ministry said in its annual State of Environmental Quality report, released in June.The Fu River flows into the Yangtze, China's longest river and the source of drinking water for millions. Spills into the Yangtze and its tributaries remain a continuing problem despite huge investments in reducing pollution, Mr. Ma said."Even though it has a large volume of water, with 40 percent of China's wastewater dumped into this watershed we are concerned about the health of this river and the quality of its water," he said.
TAIPEI, Taiwan — Pop diva Teresa Teng may not exactly have come back from the dead to perform in a widely hyped concert in her native Taiwan, but a computer-generated likeness of the legendary singer sure left that impression among many of the 15,000 fans packing a Taipei arena.Teng, who died 18 years ago, "appeared" onstage Friday night with local crooner and movie actor Jay Chou to perform three duets that enraptured the crowd. Her virtual presence was the result of a detailed recreation of Teng's mannerisms and expressions, painstakingly put together by Digital Domain 3.0, a California company specializing in digital imagery for the entertainment industry.Dressed in an ethereal looking white gown, the virtual Teng joined Chou in her own wildly popular "What Have You to Say," along with two well-known Chou standards — "Red Tavern" and "Thousand Miles Away."The crispness of the renditions and the stunning reality of Teng's appearance had many in the crowd shaking their heads in wonder.Teng, best known for folk songs and romantic ballads, had legions of fans throughout Asia and beyond when she died at age 42 of a respiratory attack in 1995. Selected by Time Magazine as one of the world's top seven female vocalists in 1986, she was celebrated for a sincere and simple style that made her voice instantly recognizable not only when she sang in her native Mandarin Chinese, but also in Japanese and English, which she also recorded in.Her songs were used in the soundtrack of Wayne Wang's acclaimed film, "The Joy Luck Club," which came out just two years before her 1995 death.
BEIJING — Former U.S. basketball star Dennis Rodman returned on Saturday from his second visit to North Korea this year where he again met the reclusive country's leader Kim Jong-un, but did not come back with jailed American missionary Kenneth Bae.The flamboyant former NBA star's visit came after North Korea abruptly withdrew its invitation to Robert King, the U.S. special envoy on North Korean human rights issues, who was expected to head to Pyongyang in a bid to secure Bae's release.Bae, 45, was sentenced to hard labour for 15 years in May for crimes against the state. He had been arrested in November after entering the North with a tour group and his health has been deteriorating since he was imprisoned.Though there had been speculations that during Rodman's visit the detained American would be released, he said ahead of his visit he was going for "another basketball diplomacy tour".Wearing his trademark dark sunglasses, the 6-foot 7-inch (2.01 metre) Rodman emerged at Beijing's international airport, a common waystation for travellers to and from North Korea, with an unlit cigar in his mouth."That's not my job to ask about Kenneth Bae. Ask Obama about that. Ask Hillary Clinton," he told a throng of reporters. "I don't give a shit."Kim and Rodman spent quality time together by having dinner and watching a basketball game during Rodman's five-day trip, the North's KCNA news agency reported.The report added Kim warmly welcomed Rodman and had a "cordial talk". Rodman reportedly expressed his thanks to the leader for spending time with him, saying Kim's greeting is "an expression of good faith towards the Americans".Rodman showed reporters in Beijing pictures of him meeting Kim, and said he had given Kim a gift of his Bad Boy vodka, which "he loved"."He is my friend for life. I don't care what you guys think about him. I don't give a shit about what people around the world think about him," he added.Kim, the third of his line to rule North Korea, is a basketball fan and appeared to get along well with Rodman on the earlier visit, with the two of them pictured laughing, eating and drinking together and watching an all-star basketball match.Rodman first visited Pyongyang earlier this year at a time when North Korea was threatening the United States, South Korea and Japan with missile strikes.
HONG KONG — A court in northwest China sentenced a former provincial safety official on Thursday to 14 years in prison for graft, a year after he became a symbol of a callous and corrupt bureaucracy when Chinese Internet users circulated photographs suggesting he had been living beyond his means.The Xi'an Intermediate People's Court issued the sentence after convicting Yang Dacai, a former safety inspection official in Shaanxi Province, on charges of taking bribes and possessing assets of unclear origin, Chinese state-run news outlets reported Thursday morning. Phone calls to the court in Xi'an seeking confirmation of the sentence went unanswered Thursday.Mr. Yang's case is one of many in China in recent years to demonstrate how local officials can be held accountable to public opinion, as ordinary citizens frequently turn to microblog posts and other online social networks to vent complaints against rampant corruption or other abuses of power.However, such complaints against senior or national-level officials remain taboo and are actively scoured from the Internet by government censors and employees of the companies that operate online forums.At the same time, the Chinese government has started a nationwide campaign in recent weeks against the spreading of so-called online rumors. Celebrity bloggers have been told to be careful what they say in online comments, dozens of microbloggers have been arrested and several Web sites and other Internet companies have been shut down.At his trial last month, Mr. Yang had pleaded guilty to charges of taking bribes worth 250,000 renminbi, or $41,000, and possessing 5 million renminbi, or more than $800,000, in funds of doubtful origin.Chinese news reports over the past year have commonly referred to Mr. Yang as Brother Watch for his habit of wearing expensive wristwatches, which was first publicly exposed by Chinese Internet users in widely circulated microblog postings and eventually led to his downfall.After a multivehicle pileup killed 36 people on a highway in Shaanxi on Aug. 26 of last year, news photos showed Mr. Yang at the scene of the accident with a smile clearly visible on his face.Offended by what they saw as an inappropriate expression, some Chinese Internet users began a collective online campaign to dig up dirt on Mr. Yang, in what is referred to in China as a "human-flesh search engine."Internet users scrutinized photos of Mr. Yang attending public functions and soon discovered one showing him wearing an expensive watch. Other photos of Mr. Yang wearing different expensive watches quickly emerged and were widely circulated on the Internet.The state-run news media then began to cover the story of Brother Watch. For example, a screenshot from a China Central Television news program that was circulated online shows Mr. Yang wearing flashy watches on 11 different occasions.Provincial party officials in Shaanxi started an investigation. In February of this year, Mr. Yang was stripped of his posts for "serious disciplinary violations," and his case was referred to prosecutors.Footage broadcast Thursday morning on China Central Television showed a judge in the Xi'an court reading out the verdict. Mr. Yang stood facing the judge, wearing an orange defendant's uniform and looking notably thinner than he had appeared in photos a year earlier. A faint smile was clearly visible on his face."History's most unfortunate smile and costliest smile belongs to 'Brother Watch' Yang Dacai," read one widely circulated posting on Thursday to Sina Weibo, China's Twitter-like microblogging platform. "Given the sentence of 14 years, I reckon in the future officials will definitely popularize sullen faces."
BEIJING — A Chinese reporter who was sentenced to prison in 2005 after Yahoo Inc. disclosed details of his email has been released, a writer's group announced Sunday.Shi Tao was released Aug. 23, 15 months before the end of his sentence, the Independent Chinese Pen Center said in a statement. There was no indication why Shi was released early.Shi was arrested in 2004 and sentenced to prison the following year on charges of disclosing state secrets. He had sent details of a government memo about restrictions on news coverage to a human rights forum in the United States.Human rights activists and U.S. legislators criticized Yahoo for disclosing details of Shi's email to the Chinese government, which led to his conviction.Yahoo, based in Sunnyvale, California, said it was obligated to comply with Chinese government demands for information. But at a U.S. congressional hearing in November, 2007, the company's chief executive, Jerry Yang, apologized to Shi's family.Shortly after that, Yahoo settled lawsuits brought by the families of Shi and Wang Xiaoning, a dissident who was sentenced to prison on subversion charges after the company's Hong Kong affiliate disclosed contents of his email account to Chinese authorities.Also in 2007, the World Association of Newspapers gave Shi its Golden Pen of Freedom award.Yahoo turned over control of its email and other services in China to a local partner, Alibaba Group, in 2005. The U.S. company bought a 40 percent stake in Alibaba.Yahoo closed its email service in China last month and recommended users switch to a service run by Alibaba.
BEIJING — Chinese Internet users have been left scratching their heads after state media issued a bizarre report on Saturday denying a story about President Xi Jinping wearing a wedding ring during the G20 summit in Russia.The official Xinhua news agency put out a one-line report stating: "Talk on the Internet about Xi Jinping wearing a wedding ring at the G20 summit is fake information." It provided no further explanation.The denial comes as China embarks on yet another crackdown on what it terms "online rumours", as the control-obsessed government tries once again to rein in social media.Xinhua's report appeared to stem from a lingering shot carried on state television earlier in the week of Xi's right hand, complete with the ring, which had been discussed on social media sites as an image of China's president wearing his wedding ring had apparently never been shown before.Chinese do not commonly wear wedding rings, though the practice is catching on amongst the newly-affluent middle classes, especially in the booming cities of Beijing and Shanghai.Xi is married to the glamorous singer Peng Liyuan, who, unlike most previous Chinese first ladies, has taken a relatively high-profile public profile, including accompanying him on foreign trips, though not his current one.State media has also carried glowing stories about how in love with each other they are, a departure from the usual practice of banning any public discussion on the private lives of top leaders.All of which has added to the mystery of why Xinhua decided to put out its unusual report, and has generated fevered discussion online, albeit with many of the posts probably falling victim to stringent censorship."If he wears a ring or does not wear one, how is this affecting China's development or the international situation? Why does anyone care - who on earth doesn't know who his wife is?" wrote one user on China's Twitter-like Sina Weibo microblogging site.
BEIJING — Former U.S. basketball star Dennis Rodman returned on Saturday from his second visit to North Korea this year where he again met the reclusive country's leader Kim Jong-un, but did not come back with jailed American missionary Kenneth Bae.The flamboyant former NBA star's visit came after North Korea abruptly withdrew its invitation to Robert King, the U.S. special envoy on North Korean human rights issues, who was expected to head to Pyongyang in a bid to secure Bae's release.Bae, 45, was sentenced to hard labor for 15 years in May for crimes against the state. He had been arrested in November after entering the North with a tour group and his health has been deteriorating since he was imprisoned.Though there had been speculations that during Rodman's visit the detained American would be released, he said ahead of his visit he was going for "another basketball diplomacy tour".Wearing his trademark dark sunglasses, the 6-foot 7-inch (2.01 meter) Rodman emerged at Beijing's international airport, a common waystation for travelers to and from North Korea, with an unlit cigar in his mouth."That's not my job to ask about Kenneth Bae. Ask Obama about that. Ask Hillary Clinton," he told a throng of reporters. "I don't give a shit."Kim and Rodman spent quality time together by having dinner and watching a basketball game during Rodman's five-day trip, the North's KCNA news agency reported.The report added Kim warmly welcomed Rodman and had a "cordial talk". Rodman reportedly expressed his thanks to the leader for spending time with him, saying Kim's greeting is "an expression of good faith towards the Americans".Rodman showed reporters in Beijing pictures of him meeting Kim, and said he had given Kim a gift of his Bad Boy vodka, which "he loved"."He is my friend for life. I don't care what you guys think about him. I don't give a shit about what people around the world think about him," he added.Kim, the third of his line to rule North Korea, is a basketball fan and appeared to get along well with Rodman on the earlier visit, with the two of them pictured laughing, eating and drinking together and watching an all-star basketball match.Rodman first visited Pyongyang earlier this year at a time when North Korea was threatening the United States, South Korea and Japan with missile strikes.
BEIJING — It would never have been allowed on the table in the home of Peking duck, but at least a giant rubber duck gracing a Beijing park will now have the taut, crisp skin required of its culinary peer after an urgent injection of air.The 18-metre (60-foot) tall duck, on show at the Beijing International Expo, appeared wrinkled and its beak drooped, prompting a barrage of ridicule on the Internet, the official Xinhua news agency said on Sunday.The duck, a copy of one designed by Dutch artist Florentijn Hofman that had been on show in Hong Kong harbor in May, was reinflated late on Friday and its beak reassembled in an eight-hour operation, the report said."There were some flaws when inflating the duck, and we have adjusted it overnight," Zeng Hui, deputy manager of the Beijing Design Week Organizing Committee, told Xinhua.The snafu prompted one netizen to joke that the duck wanted to look like a chicken so that it would avoid the city's Peking Duck restaurants, where specially bred ducks have air pumped through them after being slaughtered to help produce the dish's crispy skin.
HONG KONG — A Chinese journalist and democracy advocate who had been imprisoned since 2005 after Yahoo provided information about his e-mail account to the government in Beijing has been released, his associates said Saturday.The journalist, Shi Tao, who worked in the central city of Changsha, was arrested by the Chinese authorities in 2004 for leaking "state secrets" abroad and was sentenced to a 10-year prison term in April 2005. He had used his Yahoo e-mail account to send messages to an online forum, based in New York, about a Chinese propaganda directive censoring domestic news media coverage of the 15th anniversary of the 1989 Tiananmen Square massacre.Mr. Shi, who is also a poet, was released from a prison in the city of Yinchuan, in the northwest Ningxia region, on Aug. 23, Zhang Yu, the deputy secretary general of the Independent Chinese PEN Center, part of the PEN International organization of writers, said Saturday. Mr. Shi is now staying with his mother in Yinchuan, and in phone conversations over the past week he said he "felt generally well," according to Mr. Zhang.It was not immediately clear why Mr. Shi, who had served less than nine years, had been released before the completion of his sentence. He was transferred to Yinchuan from a prison in central Hunan Province in 2010.Yahoo was widely criticized for sharing information with the Chinese authorities on the activity of Mr. Shi's e-mail account — as well as similar information about another Chinese dissident, Wang Xiaoning. Mr. Wang was released from prison in 2012 after serving a 10-year sentence on charges of "inciting subversion of state power" after he circulated pro-democracy messages using Yahoo e-mail and online forums.The company has maintained that it was complying with Chinese law when its Hong Kong unit turned over the information on the e-mail accounts. In a November 2007 Congressional hearing into the matter, Yahoo's co-founder and its chief executive at the time, Jerry Yang, apologized to the families of Mr. Shi and Mr. Wang. Shortly afterward, the company settled lawsuits brought by the two men.In the past month, Yahoo China, which had been operated through a partnership with the Chinese Internet giant Alibaba, has discontinued its dedicated Web portal in the country, as well as its e-mail services.
HONG KONG — The former basketball star Dennis Rodman left North Korea on Saturday after visiting with the country's leader, Kim Jong-un, and unleashed an expletive-laced tirade while rejecting calls that he push for the release of an American missionary who has been detained by North Korea since late last year.The trip was Mr. Rodman's second to see Mr. Kim, whom he has called a friend. In May, Mr. Rodman had asked on Twitter for Mr. Kim to "do me a solid" and release the missionary. He also had said he planned to return to the North to try to gain the man's release, according to a video posted on the celebrity news Web site TMZ.Mr. Rodman was met Saturday by reporters at the airport in Beijing after arriving from North Korea and was asked about using his influence with Mr. Kim to urge the release of the American, Kenneth Bae, who is serving a 15-year prison sentence in a labor camp after being arrested while in the country where he has done Christian missionary work."Guess what? That's not my job to ask about Kenneth Bae," Mr. Rodman said, according to The Associated Press. Then, referring to President Obama and former Secretary of State Hillary Rodham Clinton, he added, "Ask Obama about that. Ask Hillary Clinton." Then he criticized the two with an expletive.American officials have been working recently to obtain the release of Mr. Bae as tensions have eased between the countries. North Korea is believed to be using Mr. Bae as a potential bargaining chip, but North Korea rescinded its invitation to Robert King, a senior American diplomat who had been planning to travel to the country last weekend to try to secure Mr. Bae's release.Mr. Rodman has developed a relationship with Mr. Kim, whose government just months ago called for the nuclear annihilation of the United States if North Korea was threatened and has a record of egregious human rights abuses.Mr. Rodman defended his friendship with Mr. Kim on Saturday. "He's my friend for life," he said. "I don't care what you guys think about him," emphasizing his point with an expletive.
BEIJING — Chinese authorities have further tightened controls of its social media, warning that people who post comments deemed libelous and that are reposted 500 or more times will face defamation charges and up to three years in prison.Judicial authorities have said the rules would also apply to people whose posts are viewed by at least 5,000 Internet users.The decision issued Monday comes as authorities wage a campaign to clamp down on what they term "online rumors," but which critics say amounts to curbing free speech. State media have accused some microbloggers of undermining socialism and Communist Party rule, and promoting Western values through lies and negative news.The Internet and the rise of social media have provided a rare venue for the Chinese public to speak up and to share information. Many famous Chinese — from pop stars and scholars to business tycoons — have substantial online followings and some call attention to social injustices and question government policies.But since the installation of a new leadership in March, Beijing tightened controls over online speech under the guise of fighting online rumors.In August, popular microbloggers were asked at a meeting in Beijing to agree to seven standards: obey the law, uphold the socialist system, guard the national interest, protect individual rights, keep social order, respect morals and ensure factuality.Police around the country have rounded up hundreds of web users on the charge of spreading online rumors. In one case, a journalist was detained in central China after he made allegations that a senior official had been derelict with his duties. In another case, a man was detained in southern China after he said a group of revolutionary martyrs were actually bullying bandits. In eastern China, a man was taken into police custody after he erroneously reported 16 fatalities in a car accident on his microblog. The death toll was 10.The new rules issued by China's Supreme People's Court and Supreme People's Procuratorate provide some clarity on how authorities will prosecute Internet speech-related activities deemed illegal.The rules define "serious cases" of such postings by the social and financial damage caused.The official Xinhua News Agency said in a commentary that the rules targeted those who sought to defame and blackmail others online."These cases have done greater social harm than traditional offenses, with some even disrupting social order and triggering unrest," the agency wrote.The state broadcaster, China Central Television, said the rules would safeguard freedom of speech while fighting online crimes.But critics say the new rule expands the scope of prosecution to curb freedom of speech.Xie Youping, a law professor at Fudan University in Shanghai, said the rule dangerously lowers the threshold for criminal prosecution. "The criminal code should be a hanging sword that should not fall easily. Now it can fall at any time," Xie said."This sets the standards for criminal prosecution at the lowest since the new China was founded (in 1949)," Xie said.Some bloggers have responded to the new rule by suggesting that microblogging-service providers offer the option of limiting the number of reposts to fewer than 500.
HONG KONG/BEIJING — Shares in Chinese oil producer PetroChina Co Ltd rose as much as 1.7 percent when they resumed trade on Monday, after the company said a newspaper report that more of its executives were being investigated was inaccurate.The China Business News said five executives, including vice president Sun Longde and director Wang Guoliang, had been detained, citing an unidentified source within the company.PetroChina is embroiled in a major corruption investigation but it said the report was inaccurate, adding that both Sun and Wang continued to work as usual.The shares were suspended from the morning session. They rose to as high as HK$8.85, up 1.7 percent, beating a 0.8 percent gain in the benchmark Hang Seng Index."The fundamentals of the business are likely to see very limited impact. However, the uncertainty and the potential for a lengthy legal process to unfold is likely to be a near-term overhang on the stock performance," Andy Meng, an analyst at Morgan Stanley, said in a note.Shares in PetroChina, one of the world's most valuable oil companies, were also suspended for a day on August 27.Since then, the government has said five former senior executives at PetroChina and its parent, China National Petroleum Corporation (CNPC), were being investigated. That included Jiang Jiemin, the former chairman of both entities.The four others are former CNPC vice president Wang Yongchun and three former executives at PetroChina - vice president Ran Xinquan, chief geologist Wang Daofu and board secretary Li Hualin, who was also a vice president of CNPC.Hong Kong-listed Wison Engineering Services Co Ltd, a major PetroChina customer, said earlier this month its chairman and controlling shareholder, Hua Bangsong, was assisting authorities in an unspecified investigation.The investigations come amid an anti-corruption campaign by Chinese President Xi Jinping.Local media reports have said the PetroChina probe appears to be targeting people who worked in the late 1980s at the Shengli field, the country's second-largest oil field by output and located in China's eastern Shandong province.Jiang, the highest-ranking official named in the probe, started with the company at Shengli and rose to prominence with the support of Zhou Yongkang, China's former domestic security chief, who stepped down last year from the elite Politburo Standing Committee.Sources have told Reuters that Zhou, who spent years working in the oil industry, is helping authorities in a corruption probe but contrary to some media reports is not currently the target of the investigation.
HONG KONG — In designer-obsessed Hong Kong, keeping up appearances can be hard on the pocketbook. One company has an answer: cash-strapped shoppers can get money quickly by pawning their Gucci, Chanel, Hermès or Louis Vuitton luxury handbags.Yes Lady Finance, a mortgage brokerage, offers loans within half an hour of up to 50 percent of the new bag's value, giving customers four months to repay at an interest rate of 4 percent.If the client fails to pay back the loan, the bag is sold by the company's retail arm Milan Station Holdings Ltd at one of its second-hand designer stores.But most people repay to retrieve their prized possessions, said Byron Yiu, Yes Lady Finance's chairman and chief executive."Milan Station buys handbags. We give cash to our clients to buy their items for good. And then we realized many clients attach a sentimental value to their bags," he said."They don't want to sell them for good but they need money. So we came up with the idea of running a financial company that lets people use their handbags to borrow money ... It turns out to be a very popular service."Loans start at the equivalent of around $200 and can go far higher, depending on the quality of the bag. This month, Yiu said, one client brought in a crocodile-skin handbag and got a loan for HK$250,000 ($32,200)."We have both male and female clients. The majority bring relatively posh handbags," he said. "We have seen people bringing several of these handbags here to get a big sum."Every designer bag is assessed for authenticity by an expert from Milan Station. If it is a fake - which Yiu says is seldom - staff at Yes Lady Finance do not reveal that, shielding the customer from embarrassment by making up another reason for not authorizing the loan.One client, Benson Chan, said his wife owns a dozen luxury bags and he has pawned three of them for a total of $51,500, claiming it was with her consent to get money for investments."This is the fastest way to get cash," he said. "Also, my wife wants these bags back."There are about 180 pawn shops in the Asian financial centre, the website of the Hong Kong & Kowloon Pawnbrokers' Association shows. But Chan prefers the flexibility of Yes Lady Finance's approach for his wife's bags."Why don't I bring them to traditional pawn shops? It's because those don't give you any grace period," he said. "Here I can also get my bag back any time."In central Hong Kong, surrounded by designer stores, shoppers liked the idea."I would consider pawning a handbag," said one woman, declining to give her name. She said does not buy as many bags as she used to but still gets three or four a year costing around $4,000 each.Yiu said Yes Lady Finance makes most of its money by broking mortgages but the handbag business is growing fast and carving out a niche in the pawn industry across Asia.
HONG KONG — The Argyle Pink Diamond Tender, showcasing the finest colored diamonds from Rio Tinto Ltd's mine in northwest Australia, opens its doors to about 100 carefully selected gem enthusiasts in Hong Kong this week.Jewelry makers, connoisseurs, collectors and investors - by invitation only - will view the 64 diamonds of this year's tender, which have a combined weight of 54.99 carats.Besides 58 gems in various hues of pink, the catalogue features three blue and three exceedingly rare "Fancy Red" diamonds, one the biggest ever to be displayed at the tender.Rio Tinto believes the United States will remain its key market for diamonds but China is growing fast as the increasing affluence of the country's middle-class drives up demand."The Chinese market is about five percent. We do expect, through the course of 2020, for that to be over 20 percent," said Alan Davies, chief executive of Rio Tinto's diamonds and minerals division. "So there's good growth there."Tiffany & Co said last month that demand for gems in China had lifted its global sales in the latest quarter, leading the luxury jeweler to raise its profit forecast for the year.Pink diamonds comprise just 0.01 percent of the Argyle mine's total production but they make up more than 90 percent of the pink diamonds on the global market.The rarity of the gems pushes up the price to about 20 times that of white diamonds. Argyle's diamonds in the category sell for more than $1 million per carat.As far as the Fancy Reds go, the Argyle mine has only ever produced nine of the rare gems, including the three at this year's tender."It's extraordinarily hard to put a price on (Fancy Reds) and, frankly, the imagination is the limit," said Davies.Chinese demand for diamonds reaches beyond the traditional solitaire engagement ring. It is increasingly common for customers to buy diamond-studded fashion jewelry for themselves, rather than just as gifts for others, Davies said.To develop this aspect of the Chinese market, Rio Tinto has partnered with Chow Tai Fook Jewellery Group Ltd, which has made Rio Tinto's jewelry and gems available in 1,000 of its stores across the greater China region.The flagship Australian Colors collection, which launched at the World Expo in Shanghai in 2010, has generated double-digit year-on-year growth for Rio Tinto.Hong Kong is the last leg of the tender after viewings in Sydney, Perth, New York and Tokyo.
BEIJING — China charged a well-known businesswoman, who has ties to a disgraced former railways minister, with bribery and illegal business activities on Monday, state media reported.Ding Shumiao, helped 23 businesses win railway construction contracts and funneled 49 million yuan ($8 million) worth of kickbacks to former railways minister Liu Zhijun, the official China Daily said, citing Beijing prosecutors.She also "offered sexual favors to Liu by arranging an unidentified number of women for him", the paper said.There was no immediate comment from either Ding or her family about the report.The China Daily report said Ding also intervened in bidding for dozens of railway contracts through her relationships with ministry staff and engaged in illegal business operations valued at 178.8 billion yuan ($29.21 billion).It appeared to be yet another example of the graft on which China's ruling Communist Party has been cracking down. President Xi Jinping has said graft threatens the party's survival.Ding, 58, had humble beginnings as an egg seller but over three decades built a business empire with interests in the coal business as well as China's high-speed rail system.Officials began an inquiry into Ding when an auditing authority found a state-owned enterprise paid nearly 100 million yuan ($16 million) to her company, the China Daily reported.After a high-profile trial this summer, Liu received a suspended death sentence, a uniquely Chinese punishment that usually amounts to life in prison, for taking bribes and steering contracts to associates.Ding and her relatives accumulated 4 billion yuan ($654 million) in profits over several years with Liu's help, the China Daily reported.Other ministry officials have been charged with corruption and abuse of power.Zhang Shuguang, a former senior official with the Railways Ministry, was charged last Tuesday with accepting more than 47 million yuan ($7.7 million) in bribes over 11 years.China's Railways Ministry suffered a major blow to its image when a 2011 crash between two bullet trains killed 40 people.
TAIPEI — Just two years ago, HTC, the Taipei-based mobile devices maker, was riding the crest of exploding global premium smartphone sales. It was racking up awards, a record stock price and a string of acquisitions, and was busy poaching rival executives for a continued assault on the dominance of Apple, Samsung and Research In Motion.Those days are little more than a memory. Its stock price has plummeted more than 88 percent since its April 2011 high. Profits for the second quarter, which ended June 30, were down 83 percent. The company warned that the third quarter looked bleaker still.Several of those poached executives, brought onboard to help increase shipments and work on acquisitions have walked away, and there is a growing chorus for the ouster of the embattled chief executive, Peter Chou, as reports filter out of Taipei about an autocratic leader who is out of touch with the industry.There were also the arrest last week of five departing executives accused of stealing company secrets and padding expense accounts. HTC had filed a complaint against the executives, who included the vice president of product design, Thomas Chien, and the research and development director Wu Chien-hung."We are cleaning up inventory and at the same time rebuilding our brand," said the company's chief marketing officer, Ben Ho. "If we don't, there really is no tomorrow for us. The shock came last year. This year we have tried to repent. Are we forgiven? No, the markets will punish you if you don't repent and recover fast enough."Former employees say that marketing, sales and distribution problems, along with spiraling inventory costs, have killed momentum and are dragging HTC into unprofitability.In the quick-moving mobile devices industry, a lack of momentum is tantamount to a death sentence. Just ask Motorola or BlackBerry.HTC set up shop as a contract electronics maker in 1999. Founded by Cher Wang, daughter of the billionaire former chairman of Formosa Plastics, Wang Yung-ching, it had to worry only about its margins. The clients took care of the rest. Business was good.In 2002, it listed on the Taiwan Stock Exchange, starting a run of profitable quarters that will most likely be snapped with the next earnings report. HTC has said that it expects an operating margin of zero or a loss of as much as 8 percent for the third quarter.By 2006 it had grown weary of slapping other companies' brand names onto its products and decided to go it alone. A few years later, HTC developed the first smartphone that used Google's Android operating system."HTC has always made great products," said a recently departed executive, who spoke on condition of anonymity because of the sensitivity of the situation. "There are no problems on the hardware side of the ball. It just can't sell to save itself. It's relied too heavily on operator subsidies, and those are drying up for the premium phone market HTC likes to play in."The market research firm Gartner said that HTC had shipped 24.6 million smartphones in 2010, accounting for about one in every 12 smartphones bought globally. In 2011, that share increased to 9.1 percent, with purchases surging to about 43 million units.In Taiwan, HTC was feted in the local media as the little company that could — the former contract maker now on the big stage for its innovation. Politicians urged the public to buy patriotically. HTC was an electronics flag bearer.The company went on an acquisitions binge, spending more than $700 million, including splashy purchases of the U.S. graphics maker S3 Graphics for $300 million and the premium headphone maker Beats Electronics for $309 million.Beats, founded by the hip-hop producer known as Dr. Dre, viewed it as a company on the rise when it sold HTC a 51 percent stake. Investors grumbled that HTC had overspent. Beats eventually bought back half of HTC's stake in 2012 for $5 million less than it had been paid and is looking to purchase the remaining shares.
As she drove down a busy four-lane road near her old home, Tang Huiqing pointed to the property where her dead sister's workshop once stood. The lot was desolate, but for Ms. Tang it lives.Four years ago, government officials told her sister that Chengdu was expanding into the countryside and that her village had to make way. A farmer who had made the transition to manufacturer, she had built the small workspace with her husband. Now, officials said, it would be torn down."So my sister went up to the roof and said, 'If you want to, tear it down,' " Ms. Tang said.Her voice trailed off as she recalled how her sister poured diesel fuel on herself and after pleading with the demolition crew to leave, set herself alight. She died 16 days later.Over the past five years, at least 39 farmers have resorted to this drastic form of protest. The figures, pieced together from Chinese news reports and human rights organizations, are a stark reminder of how China's new wave of urbanization is at times a violent struggle between a powerful state and stubborn farmers — a top-down project that is different from the largely voluntary migration of farmers to cities during the 1980s, '90s and 2000s.Besides the self-immolations, farmers have killed themselves by other means to protest land expropriation. One Chinese nongovernmental organization, the Civil Rights and Livelihood Watch, reported that in addition to 6 self-immolations last year, 15 other farmers killed themselves. Others die when they refuse to leave their property: last year, a farmer in the southern city of Changsha who would not yield was run over by a steamroller, and last month, a 4-year-old girl in Fujian Province was struck and killed by a bulldozer while her family tried to stop an attempt to take their land.Amid the turmoil, the government is debating new policies to promote urbanization. A plan to speed up urbanization was supposed to have been unveiled earlier this year, but it has been delayed over concerns that the move to cities is already stoking social tensions. New measures are also being contemplated to increase rural residents' property rights.In the past, many farmers chose to leave their land for better-paying jobs in the city. Many still do, but farmers are increasingly thrown off their land by officials eager to find new sources of economic growth. The tensions are especially acute on the edge of big Chinese cities. After having torn down the historic centers of most Chinese cities and sold the land to developers, officials now target the rural areas on the outskirts of cities like Chengdu.But such plans are opposed by local farmers. Many do not want to leave the land, believing they can earn more in agriculture than in factory work. Farmers on the outskirts of Chengdu, near the workshop where Tang Fuzhen committed suicide, say they can easily earn several hundred dollars a month, pay that dwarfs government compensation offers. Others, like Ms. Tang, have already made the leap from agriculture to industry.A mile north of Ms. Tang's demolished workshop is the village of Zhuguosi, whose residents have been involved in tense standoffs with the police since 2010. The village is to be torn down for Chengdu's New Financial City. The district abuts the city's extravagant new government complex, which has buildings modeled on Hong Kong's waterfront exhibition center and the Beijing Olympic stadium known as the Bird's Nest.Every night now for the past eight months, residents have formed a ring around their village to prevent demolition crews from destroying it. Some of the houses have been torn down, but others remain, and cows still graze the fertile land — a surreal sight with the new city government buildings in the background."If we don't oppose this, then we don't have anything," said Han Liang, a 31-year-old who is one of 80 to 90 villagers who keep watch each night. "We have lost our land."As in other land expropriation cases around Chengdu, government officials declined to comment. But according to deeds and correspondence provided by the villagers, most were offered compensation of roughly $1,500 per mu (one-sixth of an acre) — inadequate, in their view, because the payments amount to only what they earn in a couple of years.While none of the residents of Zhuguosi have committed suicide, they have faced off with the authorities. The police have encircled villagers and carried them off, and photographs indicate that some have been beaten.According to the Tianwang Web site, which monitors grass-roots protests, Chengdu routinely has several violent confrontations on its outskirts each day. Nationally, China has tens of thousands of similar conflicts a year, according to government estimates.The suicides, while not numerous relative to the overall population, represent the outrage that many farmers feel when their land is taken away. Suicide has been used as a form of political protest in China since at least the third century B.C., when the poet and statesman Qu Yuan drowned himself. Self-immolations have historically been practiced more by Buddhist and Daoist clergy members, and imitated by other people as a form of protest."It fits in with the historical pattern," said Dr. Michael R. Phillips, director of the Shanghai Suicide Research and Prevention Center and professor of psychiatry at Emory University. "It's a lever to change the behavior of powerful people who you don't have influence over."The deaths come even as suicides in China are declining. After being among the highest in the world, rates have dropped 50 percent over the past 20 years, according to epidemiological studies.Most of these rural self-immolations take place outside the public eye. Ms. Tang's suicide was initially covered in the local news media and on the Web, but reporters were later barred from talking to the Tang family, journalists and family members say. Other families say that even local Chinese news media were often blocked by plainclothes police officers from entering their homes to conduct interviews.That contrasts sharply with the government's efforts to publicize self-immolations by Tibetans protesting Chinese rule of their region and to prosecute people accused of helping the protesters."It is striking how differently the two are treated," said Corinna-Barbara Francis, a China researcher for Amnesty International. "They are trying to cover up the issue in the countryside."That may be because the government cannot claim, as it does with the Tibetans, that foreign forces are behind the suicides. Instead, government policies seem to be the cause of the tens of thousands of episodes of unrest recorded by the government each year. Exact statistics are not available, but Chinese researchers estimated that in 2010 the country had 180,000 protests, with the majority related to land disputes.An analysis of the suicides shows that many of those who took their lives, like Ms. Tang, tasted prosperity and were incensed that it was being taken from them. According to relatives and neighbors, the Chengdu city government had offered Ms. Tang 800,000 renminbi, or about $131,000 at current exchange rates, for her workshop. Given that commercial property in the same district sells for 20 to 30 times that amount, Ms. Tang was unwilling to sell.The exact financial details of her garment business are unclear. Ms. Tang and her husband ran the business together, and after her death he left Chengdu. But her sister estimates that Ms. Tang spent more than the government's offer on fixed assets alone, like equipment and lighting."The government said it needed the land to widen the road, but we didn't think they'd tear down the building," said Ms. Tang's sister, Tang Huiqing.After months of negotiations, Tang Huiqing said she was feeding her 8-month-old grandchild at 5 a.m. on Nov. 13, 2009, when men dressed in camouflage and carrying metal rods surrounded her sister's workshop. Family members quickly arrived to defend it. The men and the family members began quarreling, and one of Ms. Tang's brothers was beaten and suffered a broken rib, according to family members and a report on the compensation that he later received from the city.Ms. Tang retreated to the roof and shouted down at the men, according to her sister, who watched the events unfold."When she was on the roof she heard us being beaten," Tang Huiqing said. "She called out, 'Brother, sister, are you being beaten to death?' She didn't get an answer. She said for everyone to stop, for everyone to sit down and consult and negotiate. But no one listened to her."Then she doused herself and set herself on fire, an event captured by onlookers' cellphones. A few days later the workshop was torn down and family members received compensation for injuries.The impact of these suicides is impossible to measure, and there is scant evidence that the officials responsible for the land expropriations in these cases have been punished.One of China's leading newspapers, Southern Weekend, analyzed eight cases from 2008 to 2010 and found that in all instances the officials responsible were still in their posts. Certainly, the deaths continue today. The most recent self-immolation was of Hu Tengping of Zhoukeng, a village in Jiangxi Province.Mr. Hu, who worked as a migrant laborer in Changsha, returned home for the Chinese New Year this year to find that his home had been torn down for an undisclosed development. Later that same day he went to the Communist Party offices and set himself on fire. According to relatives, the family was never able to recover Mr. Hu's corpse."There is no one helping us," said Mr. Hu's sister, who asked that her name not be used for fear of retaliation. "There's no justice in the world. There's no law."After Suicides, Some ChangesA national activist who tracks unrest, Huang Qi, said cases like Mr. Hu's and Ms. Tang's have spurred the government's recent crackdown on corruption and forced it to rethink the idea that fast urbanization is the best way to stimulate economic growth. In Chengdu, at least, the party secretary behind the city's ambitious urbanization drive, Li Chuncheng, was toppled last year, a move that Mr. Huang said was partly caused by unease over the methods used to take land.Political analysts in Beijing also say that economic reforms that could be unveiled in November would increase compensation for expropriated rural land, while other measures could give farmers more rights to determine how their land is used. Currently, all land is owned by the government, and farmers have only usage rights."Li Chuncheng's problem is mainly due to the efforts of the Chengdu people," Mr. Huang said. "There have been more protests against land expropriation in this one city than in many provinces. The cases were terrible, but I think they had an effect.""My sister's sacrifice brought a change," she said. "Right now they don't dare tear down so many homes. There's more consultation. At least here, they don't tear down as much. Maybe in this village it's better."The effect on her family, however, was grim. The sisters' mother joined the Communist Party shortly after it took power in 1949, elated at its promise to take land from landlords and redistribute it to poor peasants like the Tang family. Her daughter's death broke her will to live, and she died a few months later."She was heartbroken," Ms. Tang said. "She couldn't understand how they could act like this to unarmed, ordinary people."Mia Li and Amy Qin contributed research from Beijing. Sim Chi Yin contributed reporting from Chengdu.
Hong Kong — Mitche Choi Wai-shan was 12 when she first performed, in elaborate makeup and costume, at a Cantonese opera house in Hong Kong.Amid crashing cymbals and actors performing flying kicks, she had to execute a 10-second hair-flinging maneuver — a circular swinging of the hair, tied in a ponytail — to express grief and frustration."The way to get the hair secured is to have it tightened really hard with a huge piece of fabric dampened with water," Ms. Choi said. "It felt uncomfortable and I had to keep it on for the whole show."Midway through the performance, she felt dizzy and sick; but 10 years and more than 30 opera performances later, she has learned to adapt: "I practice a lot more, so my body is more used to wearing the headgears and heavy costumes," Ms. Choi, 22, said.She now averages two or three performances a year. This month, the University College London linguistics graduate will be among the first group of students entering a new Bachelor of Fine Arts degree in Chinese, and specifically Cantonese, opera at the Hong Kong Academy for Performing Arts.The four-year program is an extension of two-year diploma and advanced diploma courses already offered by the academy. "I think it is a sign of the times," said Adrian Walter, the academy's director. "In the past, practitioners of Cantonese opera studied the art form through an apprenticeship.""Now there is a need for a degree program because that is what society demands. Without that, you are not going to get young people committing to it," he added. "Young people are smart now; they don't invest their time and their money without something at the end of it."The degree course offers two study streams. Students in the performance stream will attend acting classes, practice singing Chinese classics in the Southern Chinese dialect, and be taught the exaggerated acrobatic movements of Cantonese opera. Students in the music stream will specialize in the wind, string and percussion instruments used in the ancient art form. In their third and fourth years, students from both streams will go on internships with local opera troupes or government-run Cantonese opera promotion campaigns.The academy has 15 staff members and has invited a further 15 practitioners, including veteran performers and musicians, to conduct master classes."We all know the performing arts. You'll never get a job because you have a degree," Mr. Walter said. "But it shows that the person has been through a rigorous training program.""I think what we are doing in many ways is that we are future-proofing it, to ensure that Cantonese opera doesn't become an endangered art form, by keeping it relevant and reflecting the current times," he said.The program, with a tuition fee of 42,000 Hong Kong dollars per year, or about $5,416, will be taught mainly in Cantonese and Mandarin, with some theory and interdisciplinary classes in English. The academy has received more than 20 applications but will admit only 8 to 10 students to the course this year."We are looking for students who have some basic training in Cantonese opera," said Boaz Chow, an instructor with the academy's Center of Chinese Traditional Theater.The first cohort of students will graduate in 2017, coinciding with the completion of a 2.6 billion dollar Chinese opera center in the city's West Kowloon Cultural District. The Chinese opera, or Xiqu, center, will include a 1,100-seat main theater, a 400-seat small theater, a tea-house-style performance space, and an entire floor dedicated to education and training in Cantonese opera."The Western art forms are popular among the young in Hong Kong but I think Cantonese opera still has a great space and capacity for development," said Paris Wong Hau-wai, artistic director of the Pine Moon Cantonese Cultural Arts Center, in Hong Kong, and one of the students admitted into the degree program. "Cantonese opera has once faced the problem of dying out but I believe it has already passed that phase."Last year, the West Kowloon Cultural District Authority introduced what it hopes will be an annual event, the West Kowloon Bamboo Theater, a Cantonese opera program featuring a temporary bamboo theater, the traditional setting for Cantonese opera performances. The shows, put on to coincide with the Chinese New Year festivities, took place over a week in 2012 and three weeks in February this year."We attracted more than 100,000 people this year and quite a number of them are young people who have never seen a bamboo theater performance before," Louis Yu Kwok-lit, the authority's executive director of performing arts, said in an interview by telephone. The authority is looking to extend the season next year to two months, he said.Efforts to promote Cantonese opera among the young in Hong Kong have gained momentum since 2009, when the art form was recognized by Unesco as an intangible cultural heritage.Since 2005, the University of Hong Kong has established a program to incorporate Cantonese opera into primary and secondary school curriculums. The project started in four schools in 2007 and has since expanded to more than 50.Pupils learn about Cantonese opera through activities like reading scripts and watching live performances, as part of their Chinese language or Chinese literature studies."After realizing that Cantonese opera offers students a different learning experience, local schools began showing support for the project," said Dorothy Ng Fung-ping, an assistant professor at the Hong Kong University's faculty of education, who has been the driving force behind the project.There are at least 40 opera troupes that put on regular performances in Hong Kong, she said, and the demand for shows is rising, with a growing number of venues available. In 2011, there were 2,266 Cantonese opera productions and 1,931 performances across public venues, according to the Xiqu yearbook of the International Association of Theater Critics."My concern is how Hong Kong educates and develops top-class artists, because the top practitioners of Cantonese opera are getting old and some have passed on," Dr. Ng said. "Even if we have the audience and the venues, if we do not have the right mechanisms to produce top-level performers, then we have a problem."
HONG KONG — China's trade surplus rose in August to its highest level this year, while inflation remained under control, government data released on Sunday and Monday showed, in further signs that the Chinese economy and possibly the global economy are faring a little better as the summer ends.The General Administration of Customs in Beijing said on Sunday that China's surplus reached $28.52 billion last month, the highest level since last December, as exports accelerated. Because China is the world's largest exporter and often the first large country to release trade data each month, its trade figures are a widely watched barometer not only for the health of China's large export sector but also of the global economy.Two other worries about China — inflation at the consumer level that might fan public discontent or deflation at the producer level that might prompt companies to stop investing — seemed to be allayed at least temporarily as well by Monday morning's data.The National Bureau of Statistics announced that consumer prices were only up 2.6 percent in August from a year earlier, compared to a 2.7 percent increase in July. At the same time, deflation slowed in producer prices, which fell only 1.6 percent in August after tumbling 2.3 percent in July.The Chinese trade and inflation data, and recent surveys showing more bullish sentiment among purchasing managers in China, are starting to give hope to those who argue that the gloom these days about Asian economies, particularly China's, is excessive."China is no longer sliding, the global industrial cycle is ticking up, and, really, how high can rates go with the Fed printing money?" asked Frederic Neumann, the co-head of Asian economic research at HSBC.To be sure, China still faces high and rising levels of domestic debt, eroding competitiveness because of surging wages and other challenges.But China's exports last month were up 7.1 percent last month compared to a year earlier, and particularly strong to Southeast Asia, South Korea and Taiwan. China's trade surplus also increased because imports were virtually unchanged for the huge category of reprocessing goods — items as varied as high-end plastics and computer chips that are imported by China for use in products that are then exported.The flattening in imports of reprocessing goods reflects a broad move by many multinational companies to shift entire supply chains to mainland China, instead of merely assembling goods there from components manufactured all over the world. That trend toward procuring parts in China persists even as a growing number of export factories in low-wage sectors like garments, toys and furniture are moving to other countries, like Bangladesh, Cambodia and Vietnam.Excluding reprocessing goods, China's other imports grew strongly in August as lending increased at state-controlled banks. Louis Kuijs, an economist in the Hong Kong office of the Royal Bank of Scotland, said the import data could indicate "continued robust growth in demand and economic activity in China's own economy."But he cautioned that detailed information on domestic economic activity in China during August, including industrial production, investment in fixed assets and retail sales, was not scheduled for release until Tuesday morning in Beijing.The trade and inflation data were the latest signs that China has emerged largely unscathed from currency declines and market setbacks seen in many emerging markets this summer.As money poured in from around the world to buy Chinese goods, China's central bank allowed the renminbi to inch up 0.1 percent against the dollar last month."The market turbulence in emerging economies, especially in India and Indonesia, has made Rmb a center of stability," Liu Li-Gang, the chief economist for greater China at the Australia and New Zealand Banking Group, said in a research note, using a common abbreviation for the Chinese currency.While the renminbi's gain last month was tiny, it contrasted with declines among most emerging market currencies, as investors fretted that policy makers at the American central bank will decide at a meeting on Sept. 18 to begin slowing the pace of a program of asset purchases. That could cause interest rates in the United States to climb further, making investments there more attractive, and reducing the appeal of emerging markets.
SHANGHAI — Nearly three-quarters of a century after it was hailed for helping China's Red Army survive the tortuous Long March, fiery grain liquor baijiu has fallen down the ranks, hit by a crackdown on luxury spending that has clouded its prospects.For decades, famed baijiu makers Kweichow Moutai Co Ltd and Wuliangye Yibin Co Ltd enjoyed fat profit margins that once dwarfed those of Apple Inc, helped by the Communist Party's penchant for a brew that fuelled many a business deal and smoothed over countless egos.But at more than $300 a bottle, premium baijiu was also the perfect target for President Xi Jinping's campaign against extravagance as his administration tries to assuage public anger over corruption and restore faith in the party.Last week, market leader Moutai reported its weakest first-half profit growth since 2001, and the company is set to post its slowest annual growth since it listed, according to data from Thomson Reuters SmartEstimates. Rival Wuliangye is also struggling: analysts forecast the distiller's 2013 profit growth will be the slowest since 2005.Moutai declined to comment about its earnings or plans for the future, but a Wuliangye official, who declined to be named because he was not authorized to speak to the media, said the company was shifting its focus away from official and military channels and towards the wider consumer market.Baijiu's fall from grace, however, means it now has to jostle for unfamiliar clients in China's $76 billion a year liquor market, where it has few devotees among the thirty-year-olds who drink most frequently and where imports such as plum liqueur from Japan's Choya Umeshu Co Ltd and Chivas Regal Scotch whisky from Pernod Ricard SA are gaining popularity."Good baijiu is too expensive so I can't afford it, while bad baijiu is way too strong, and drinking it can actually harm your health," said Xu Chunhui, 26, a Shanghai-based construction engineer whose drink of choice is whisky.Prices have also tumbled, boding ill for those historically fat margins. A bottle of premium Moutai that sold for 2,000 yuan ($330) just last year could be had on cut-price website JiuXian last week at nearly half the price."The way Moutai used to be drunk until last year was always very much through government network, VIP and military networks," said Waldemar Jap, a managing director at Boston Consulting Group who works with liquor makers in China."In the mass premium market the margin is much lower so you're not going to see the good old days of being able to sell just a few bottles," he added.Kweichow Moutai's net margin hit 52.7 percent in the March quarter, more than four times greater than the drinks industry median of 11.9 percent, but analysts expect a full-year net margin of 49.9 percent, Thomson Reuters SmartEstimates data shows.Baijiu, which translates as white alcohol, is usually 40 to 60 percent proof and, depending on the palate, is often described as tasting more like paint stripper or vodka. It is usually distilled from sorghum, although wheat, barley, millet or glutinous rice are also used.The liquor is believed to have originated from Sichuan in western China and has featured in important occasions for centuries. Zhou Enlai, the first premier of the People's Republic of China and a top aide of Mao Zedong, once said the fiery spirit was key to the success of the Long March, when soldiers from the Red Army, the precursor to the People's Liberation Army, fled the rival Kuomintang in 1934-35.Before Xi came to power, the government and the military accounted for more than half of the sales of baijiu brands that cost more than 500 yuan ($82) a bottle, Jap said, with businesses accounting for a further 30-35 percent.Because of its auspicious history, baijiu distillers have had little need to appeal to a wider client base, and now analysts say they may have left it too late."Baijiu is popular among mid- and elder-aged consumers, but the younger generations don't show strong interest," said Jessie Du, an analyst at consumer research firm Euromonitor.And with more wealthy, elderly Chinese concerned about being caught splashing out on luxuries, more baijiu bottles are likely to remain on the shelf."For baijiu there is a new reality they need to adjust to," said Torsten Stocker, Hong Kong-based partner with consulting firm AT Kearney."With younger consumers adopting different drinking and entertainment habits, the underlying trend is that, in terms of market share, baijiu has nowhere to go but down."
BEIJING — He rolls up his pants in a downpour, holds his own umbrella and reminisces with villagers about the good old days. In nearly 10 months as China's leader, Xi Jinping has projected himself as a man of the people in a Mao Zedong-inspired propaganda push to connect with an alienated public.Xi's populist approach, calling for party cadres to renew their ties with ordinary people, is part of his strategy to cement control of the Communist Party, protect its image and head off any challenges to the notion of one-party rule.The strategy also features a corruption crackdown, aimed at opponents within the party who threaten cohesion, and increasingly hard-line moves to silence influential critics on the Internet and elsewhere.Whether those efforts are working, or are simply working against each other, might become clearer as senior party leaders prepare for a November meeting where they are expected to produce a new economic blueprint. Xi's administration says the country needs economic reforms, but those changes will likely chafe against vested interests within the party that are tied to China's powerful state-owned companies.A key feature of Xi's approach is the "mass line," a Mao Zedong-era ideological campaign to get the party's rank and file to reflect on their own and others' misdeeds and bind themselves to the people they say they serve. The revival of the mass line underscores the new leadership's fears that widespread corruption in its ranks has eroded its image."He's really sort of like the pope in a way, standing for some kind of ideological purity," said Kerry Brown, a China expert at the University of Sydney. "And like the pope, he has to issue these papal edicts every now and again which set out the core beliefs."Brown said, "I would see it as symptomatic of a crisis in that they are trying to demonstrate relevance and credibility where in fact that's long gone and this is a bit of an empty kind of gesture."Xi risks undermining his own exhortations to party officials to listen to the common people with his aggressive efforts to control discourse and suppress calls for political reform.Early in the year, reports began emerging of a secret document circulated among propaganda officials identifying threats to clamp down on such as constitutionalism, universal values, civil society and the Western concept of freedom of the press. Authorities have shut down critical blogs and last month started arresting influential bloggers. Civil-rights advocates also have been rounded up.Meanwhile, Xi's administration has signaled its intention to exert control over the country's mammoth state-owned companies. An anti-graft campaign has netted a number of high-level officials in the oil sector in recent weeks."His objectives so far are quite clear, which are to clean up the top levels of the bureaucracy and, at the same time, to control the most critical elements of society," said Ding Xueliang, a Chinese politics expert at Hong Kong University of Science and Technology. "That means to crack down on the two extremes: the most extreme corruption cases and the most extreme critical voices."Playing to the party base, Xi, the son of a revolutionary veteran, has paid his respects at Mao's old residences, where he proclaimed that "the color of our red country will never change." It's seen as a bid to bolster the party's legitimacy — and thus his own — by emphasizing continuity and tapping into the revolutionary legacy of its founder.Xi's evocation of Mao and the ideological assault on democratic values has disappointed liberal intellectuals in China who had seen his rise as a chance to curb the party's authoritarian rule with a fairer, independent judiciary and constitutionalism.But Cheng Li, a China expert at the Brookings Institution, said many Chinese leaders have to defend Mao's legacy to reinforce party unity, and added that it's still unclear how politically conservative Xi really is."It's a little bit too early to jump to the conclusion that definitely Xi Jinping will embrace the Maoist approach. I think he may surprise us with more positive developments in the months to come," he said.In a flurry of visits in July, Xi sought to portray himself as a no-fuss leader, rolling up his pants to talk to dock workers in the rain in the central city of Wuhan. In Zhengding county of Hebei, where he served as party chief three decades ago, he struck a nostalgic note to remind cadres how they should be spending their days."This reminds me of that time when I was with comrades every day, chatting, thinking and working together," Xi said. "I directly understood and felt the villagers' joys and sorrows."Across the nation, party cadres have made a show of responding to Xi's call, holding meetings and visiting orphanages, hospices, schools and offices where residents submit complaints.But a Maoist strategy may not prove effective on what has become a critically minded Chinese society. The hundreds of millions of users of China's popular microblogs have largely ignored the mass line campaign.Commentators have noted with cynicism that officials should have been doing the work Xi advocates in the first place. Others have invoked the campaign to bolster causes the party opposes, such as subjecting the party to the rule of law.But some are hopeful that in the absence of political reform, Xi's campaign could bring some benefits."To an extent, we're still hopeful that under Mr. Xi, the mass line will be used to protect the interests of the masses," said Huang Qi, a veteran activist who campaigns for victims of illegal land seizures and other abuses. Huang said some people he has helped have recently reported seeing progress in their complaints."Under the current system of one-party rule, even though we have been deceived countless times, we still have to have some hope," Huang said.
BEIJING — A homemade bomb outside a school in the southern city of Guilin on Monday killed at least two people and injured 17, many of them children, according to state news reports.The two who died in the explosion were a man and a woman, according to the microblog of China Central Television, the main state television network. Of the injured, 10 were children who attended the school, which housed both elementary and secondary grades.The man who died appeared to have been the bomber, the official news reports said. The bomb was in a three-wheel bicycle, which might have been electric or gas powered.A photograph taken at the scene and posted online showed two people sitting in the street, their clothes mostly shredded and patches of skin missing from their bodies. A motorbike nearby was on fire, and metal and glass lay scattered across the street. Accounts posted on microblogs said the blast shattered windows as high as the seventh floor on nearby buildings.Liu Yuping, deputy director of a local hospital, told China News Service that a 10-year-old boy's leg had been severed by the blast.The explosion, which occurred at 7:10 a.m., was certain to raise further questions among parents about security at schools. In 2010, a series of seemingly unrelated school attacks, some fatal, by people armed with knives and other household objects shocked parents across China. In one case, a man attacked children with a hammer and then set fire to himself.After that round of violence, officials promised to improve security at the country's schools, but the attacks have not stopped. Last year, a man with a meat cleaver went on a rampage in a school in Henan Province, injuring at least 23 children. Children with broomsticks tried to ward him off as he raced through the schoolyard.In several of the cases, the assailants had histories or had shown signs of mental illness, which is often poorly addressed in China's public health system. It is unclear what motivated the bombing on Monday.Providing for the safety of children has become a political issue in China, where a scandal over deadly adulterated milk in 2008 and continuing food safety issues have made many parents anxious for their children's well-being.
(Reuters) - Agriculture officials in Washington state are testing samples of alfalfa after a farmer reported his hay was rejected for export because it tested positive for a genetically modified trait that was not supposed to be in his crop.If it is confirmed that the alfalfa in question was genetically modified, it could have broad ramifications, said Hector Castro, spokesman at the Washington State Department of Agriculture.Biotech alfalfa is approved for commercial production in the United States. But many foreign and domestic buyers require that supplies not be genetically modified, and the possible presence of GMO modified alfalfa in export supplies could result in lost sales for U.S. farmers.Just this summer, Japan and South Korea temporarily stopped buying some U.S. wheat because an experimental biotech variety was found growing in a field of conventional wheat in Oregon.Alfalfa is the fourth-most widely grown U.S. field crop, behind corn, wheat and soybeans, and is used as food for dairy cattle and other livestock. The crop, worth roughly $8 billion, was grown on more than 17 million U.S. acres in 2012, according to the U.S. Department of Agriculture.Exports of hay, including alfalfa, have been rising, hitting a record $1.25 billion in 2012, according to the USDA's Foreign Agricultural Service. Washington state is one of the largest producers of alfalfa for export.The Washington farmer, who could not be reached for comment by Reuters, reported the problem to state agriculture officials in late August, according to Castro. The department began testing his alfalfa samples on September 3 and should be finished by Friday, Castro said.He said it is not clear if the farmer bought seed that was genetically modified and mislabeled or if his field was contaminated by some other means. And testing could reveal no contamination at all, he noted.Monsanto Co developed the herbicide-tolerant genetic trait that gives alfalfa and other crops the ability to withstand treatments of its Roundup weedkiller, and has maintained that its biotech alfalfa presents no danger to conventional or organic growers.Many U.S. farmers have embraced Roundup Ready crop varieties as aids to improve crop production.Genetically modified "Roundup Ready" alfalfa was approved by USDA in 2011 to be planted without restrictions after several years of litigation and complaints by critics.GMO opponents have warned for more than a decade that, because alfalfa is a perennial crop largely pollinated by honeybees, it would be almost impossible to keep the genetically modified version from mixing with conventional alfalfa. Cross-fertilization could devastate conventional and organic growers' businesses, they said.But even though U.S. regulators have deemed biotech alfalfa to be as safe as non-GMO varieties, many foreign buyers will not accept the genetically modified type because of concerns about the health and environmental safety of such crops.ACX Pacific - a major exporter of alfalfa and other grass hay off the Pacific Northwest to countries that include Japan, Korea, China and parts of the Middle East - will not accept any GMO because so many foreign buyers are so opposed to it.And domestic organic dairy farmers have said that any contamination of the hay they feed their animals could hurt their sales."This is terribly serious," said Washington state senator Maralyn Chase, a Democrat who fears alfalfa exports could be lost if it is proven that GMO alfalfa has mixed in with conventional supplies.The possibility of alfalfa contamination comes as Washington state voters weigh a ballot initiative that would require mandatory labeling of genetically engineered foods. A similar measure failed to pass in California last year.The issue also arises as USDA continues to investigate the contamination of the wheat grown in Oregon.Monsanto discontinued work on the experimental wheat variety in 2005 because of widespread industry opposition and boycott threats by international buyers. The April discovery of the GMO wheat in Oregon triggered lawsuits and led to some lost export sales of the grain.
TAIPEI — Taiwan President Ma Ying-jeou forced out speaker of parliament, widely seen as the government's second most powerful figure, over accusations of illegal lobbying on Wednesday, a move that could usher in a period of political instability.Wang Jin-pyng's expulsion was decided by a disciplinary committee formed by the ruling Kuomintang (KMT), or Nationalist Party. The move strips him of his party membership and removes him from his position as head of Taiwan's legislature.Some analysts say the move could hit the island's financial markets, predicting its TAIEX index could drop to as low as 7,800 points from 8208.99 on Wednesday.The opposition Democratic Progressive Party (DPP) is likely to make political capital out of the case amid deteriorating popularity ratings for the president after a series of cabinet departures."Many in the KMT would say Ma is making a crazy move," said Zhang Zhexin, a Taiwan politics expert at the Shanghai Institute for International Studies."With Wang kicked out of party, the DPP could make this their political card, and use Wang to challenge KMT rule."Wang was accused of pressuring prosecutors not to appeal against a not-guilty verdict in an opposition lawmaker's breach-of-trust case.Ma had condemned it as "the most serious infringement" of the independence of Taiwan's judiciary."Speaker Wang cannot avoid the most critical issue - the fact that he had lobbied the case," the president said.Wang, who returned to Taiwan late on Tuesday from Malaysia, denied the accusations and said Ma has been misled by the Special Investigation Division, which is under the Supreme Prosecutors' Office.Giant neighbor China considers Taiwan a breakaway province to be eventually unified with the mainland, by force if necessary. The two have been governed separately since the Communist Party won the Chinese civil war in 1949 and the KMT fled to Taiwan.Wang, 72, who has been the speaker since 1999, regularly undermined Ma's control of the KMT and was able to rally the DPP to oppose Ma's policies.
BEIJING — Authorities in a southern Chinese city said Wednesday that a deadly explosion was sparked while workers unloaded banned caps for children's toy guns and that the toll from the blast rose to seven dead and 36 injured.Tuesday's blast was ruled accidental, the Guangzhou Internet Information office said.Police detained three people, including a Jordanian man who owned the product, following the blast in Guangzhou, southern China's commercial hub, the official Xinhua News Agency said.The blast went off in a truck container and then set fire to a nearby warehouse, sending up huge plumes of smoke. The caps contained gunpowder in small round plastic rings, and the production and transport of such materials is banned in China, Xinhua said.It was the second deadly blast to strike China in two days.An explosion Monday on a busy street outside a school in the southern resort city of Guilin killed two people and injured 17, including 10 students. That was believed to have been caused by the detonation of explosive materials being transported aboard a flatbed tricycle, and city authorities ordered a safety crackdown in its wake.
BEIJING — China said on Wednesday that it will ditch 76 pointless official - and sometimes obscure - awards as it seeks to rein in waste and extravagance, part of President Xi Jinping's crusade against pervasive corruption.Government departments will, for example, no longer be able to award prizes for "excellent vocational education teaching materials" or "administration in accordance with the law" for tax collectors, according to the new rules."In recent years, many government departments ... have been obsessed with these kinds of awards and evaluations and formalism has run rampant," the central government said in a statement on its website (www.gov.cn)."Not only has this not had the desired effect, it has been a huge waste of personnel and resources and has even caused unhealthy tendencies, causing a strong reaction in society."A similar campaign in 2009 had resulted in annual savings of 6.4 billion yuan ($1.05 billion), the government said."The cancelling of these 76 awards is just the first step, and the project will continue and deepen," it added.Plaques marking the award of such prizes and evaluations can be seen everywhere in China from ministries to parks and subways and generally have little real meaning as they are mostly given for political rather than competitive reasons.The new rules echo demands made of officials to simplify their lives and get closer to the people by Xi since he took over as Communist Party chief last November.He has made cutting back on ostentation and waste a key theme of his administration, seeking to assuage anger over corruption and restore faith in the party.
TAIPEI, Taiwan — The disciplinary panel of Taiwan's ruling party has suspended the veteran legislative speaker, a move that portends potential problems for the China-friendly approach of President Ma Ying-jeou.Spurred on by Ma, Wednesday's decision against Wang Jin-pyng effectively strips him of his job and legislative seat. It follows claims by special prosecutors that Wang and former Justice Minister Tseng Yung-fu pressured prosecutorial officials not to appeal the acquittal of an opposition lawmaker on breach of trust charges. Tseng resigned under pressure from Ma on Friday.Ma's moves to oust Wang have provoked deep resentment among many Nationalists, who say the president is engaged in a personal vendetta. Any Nationalist split could aid the return to power of the China-wary opposition in 2016 elections, by diluting Nationalist strength.
BEIJING — A billionaire Chinese real estate developer who bought one of the biggest U.S. cinema chains last year has emerged as the country's new richest tycoon.The Hurun Report, which follows China's wealthy, said Wednesday that a surge in stock prices helped to boost the number of Chinese worth at least $1 billion by 64 to 315 this year, compared with none a decade ago. The top five saw their wealth double.Wang Jianlin, whose Dalian Wanda Group Co. operates hotels, cinemas and department stores, was ranked No. 1 for the first time on Hurun's annual list of Chinese tycoons with a fortune of $22 billion. Last year's No. 1, beverage entrepreneur Zong Qinghou, was second with $18.7 billion.Wang's company bought AMC cinemas last year for $2.6 billion in the biggest Chinese acquisition of a U.S. company to date.The latest rankings reflected the rapid changes in China's economy and shifts in wealth from one industry to the next.One in four of the 1,021 people on the Hurun Rich List made their money from real estate, which passed manufacturing to become this year's top source of wealth. Hurun said 559 of those on the list saw their wealth grow while 252 saw their fortunes shrink.Real estate prices in China have soared, driven partly by a flood of government spending and bank lending in response to the 2008 global crisis. That is despite government curbs imposed on lending and purchases to cool housing costs.The surge in asset prices has helped to widen a gulf between China's wealthy elite and the poor majority, fueling social tensions. China has more dollar billionaires than any other country except the United States.No. 3 on the Hurun list was Ma Huateng, also known as Pony Ma, founder of Tencent Inc., a popular provider of online games and entertainment, at $10.1 billion. He was followed by Wei Jianjun, chairman of Great Wall Motor Co., which has emerged as China's fastest-growing automaker on the strength of its popular SUVs, at $8.4 billion.China's richest woman was Yang Huiyan at No. 5 with $8.3 billion. Yang, daughter of the founder of real estate developer Country Gardens, was ranked No. 1 in 2007 when she took over her father's stock holdings.
Kai-Fu Lee is a Taiwanese high-tech investor who lives in Beijing and has more than 50 million followers. He attracted nationwide news media attention last week when he revealed on Weibo that he has lymphatic cancer. On Aug. 23, near the start of the crackdown on the most influential bloggers, or Big V's, Mr. Lee posted this: "Even faced with hardships and obstacles, I am full of confidence in China's social media, because I'm sure that China is now nurturing many friends with a sense of social responsibility, and they will give China a better future!"Yang Lan, a Chinese television celebrity with more than 34 million followers, usually sends messages about uncontroversial topics, including her interviews and philanthropic work. But recently, she has also criticized both restrictions on Internet expression and online attacks. She wrote on Aug. 23:"Freedom of expression on the Internet, including voicing, debating and criticizing diverse points of view, is a force for social progress. But Internet rumors and freedom of expression are two different things, and we can all become victims of irrational linguistic violence. Whether it's protecting citizens' freedom of speech or protecting citizens' rights to their reputation and privacy, both should ultimately rest on rule of law."Pan Shiyi, a property developer based in Beijing with more than 16 million followers, draws attention to the air pollution choking the city, and his messages played a significant role in forcing the government to take firmer action to reduce smog. Recently, he has also voiced misgivings about the government crackdown on Internet opinion. On Aug. 10, he posted this:"Everyone is passionately discussing whether the Internet should be controlled, cleaned up, guided, to indoctrinate the public…I personally believe that everyone should participate in society online, and the public shouldn't be passively indoctrinated. Rumors should be sanctioned under the law. Forcing the Big V's and Internet celebrities to indoctrinate the public and raise the public's level of morality will not fly."Ye Haiyan, a businesswoman and feminist advocate with about 75,000 followers, promotes women's rights and urges stronger protection for sex workers. She wrote on Sept. 10:"Looking at Weibo, there's an attitude of mutual crudeness between the public and the government – I'm rough on you, and you're rough on me – and an atmosphere of healthy communication hasn't formed. Those high up wave their big club back and forth to terrify people to death. The public's problem is that it demands that old and new problems are all tallied up, and gets worked up about small and big things. When will both sides calm down and have normal communication? I think those high up have to first give the weak a sense of security and respect."Li Houlin, a Chinese jewelry businessman with 5.6 million followers, mixes his musings on society and commerce with criticisms of government policies. On Aug. 21, he criticized the crackdown on Internet rumors:"These days when the spread of information has the capacity to have a real impact, each person must take responsibility for what he says. We must refuse rumors in the name of free speech, and must also avoid using the rhetoric about rumor to hinder freedom of speech. The most effective way to clean up rumors is not using state power to crack down, but letting the public promptly know the truth."The property developer Ren Zhiqiang has more than 15 million followers. He is one of the more outspoken voices on Weibo, using it to criticize government economic policy and take digs at rivals. Mr. Ren has also criticized government efforts to restrict comment. On Aug. 10 he wrote:"If it weren't for Weibo, how much official corruption would be covered up? If it weren't for Weibo, how much rape and seduction by school presidents and principals would be covered up? If it weren't for Weibo, how much murder by city administration officers would be covered up? If it weren't for Weibo, how much of the truth would be covered up?"
BEIJING — China has sentenced three men to death over a June attack in the restive northwestern region of Xinjiang blamed on Islamic extremists in which 24 police and civilians were killed.The official Xinhua News Agency said Friday that another man was sentenced to 25 years in prison for his role in the June 26 violence, in which 13 militants were also killed. All four were found guilty of murder and being members of a terrorist organization and sentenced Thursday by the intermediate court in the city of Turfan at the end of a one-day trial.All were identified by names common among Xinjiang's indigenous Turkic Uighur (WEE'ger) minority group, some members of which have pursued a long-simmering insurgency against Chinese rule in the vast region bordering on Central Asia.In the incident, assailants attacked police and government offices in the eastern Xinjiang (shihn-jeeahng) town of Lukqun, in one of an unusually large number of bloody clashes over the summer. Independent reports put the Lukqun death toll at as high as 46.Police said the attackers belonged to a 17-member extremist Islamic cell formed in January by a man identified by the Chinese pronunciation of his Uighur name, Aihemaitiniyazi Sidike.Chinese officials typically say that such insurgents are orchestrated by Xinjiang independence groups based overseas, although there is little evidence of a direct link.Overseas Uighur rights groups deny the accusation, saying they are working peacefully for Uighur civil rights. They also routinely criticize trials of Uighur suspects as being opaque, alleging that defendants are tortured and convictions and sentences determined on the basis of political considerations.In the latest case, authorities said cell members began gathering as early as April 2010 to "pursue illegal religious activities and promote religious extremism" by watching, listening and reading materials promoting extremism and terrorism and carrying out "violent terroristic physical training," Xinhua said.It said core cell members relocated to a private home in Lukqun at the start of this year and began selecting targets, raising funds, buying knives and preparing gasoline bombs.However, shortly after preparations were completed, one of the members was arrested, and Sidike ordered the gang to attack before the plot was discovered. The 24 victims included 16 Uighurs and eight Han Chinese. Two were women.Police wounded and captured four gang members and seized another suspect days later following a massive security operation."Their methods were extremely cruel and the nature of the incident was especially evil. Given the grave outcome, the case must be strictly punished by law, and by law the sentence was rendered," Xinhua said.Bloody clashes have killed at least 56 people — and possibly many more — over the last several months as Uighur resentment continues to simmer over heavy restrictions on Islam and Uighur culture, and a perception that Uighurs are losing out economically to Han who have migrated to the region. The death toll is the highest since a 2009 riot in the regional capital of Urumqi in which nearly 200 people were killed.
BEIJING — The iPhone's magic as China's must-have smartphone is eroding.Last year, eager buyers in Beijing waited overnight in freezing weather to buy the iPhone 4S. Pressure to get it — and the profit to be made by reselling scarce phones — prompted some to pelt the store with eggs when Apple, worried about the size of the crowd, postponed opening.Just 18 months later, many Chinese gadget lovers responded with a shrug this week when Apple Inc. unveiled two new versions of the iPhone 5. Today's market is glutted with alternatives from Samsung to bargain-priced local brands."There was no big change, no surprise at all," said Gu Lanjun, a 29-year-old employee at a Shanghai bank. Having bought the three most recent iPhone models as soon as they were released, she said, "I won't update this time."That lackluster reception suggests Apple faces a struggle in defending its shrinking share of China's crowded, increasingly competitive smartphone market and its premium prices.That matters, because China is a key part of Apple's growth plans. CEO Tim Cook told the official Xinhua News Agency in January he expects this country to pass the United States as its biggest market."Apple's market position in China has stagnated," said telecommunications analyst Jan Dawson of the research firm Ovum, in an email.One problem, he said, might be that Apple's high price limits it to targeting the top market tier, and customers in that segment who want an iPhone already have one.The two models unveiled this week "will largely be sold to existing subscribers and won't win many converts," Dawson said.Earlier iPhones became status symbols in China even before they were formally sold here.Buyers paid hundreds of dollars for handsets brought in from Hong Kong and modified to work on China's phone network. Companies treated them as luxury goods, buying hundreds at a time to give to important customers as Chinese New Year's gifts.Now, Apple faces increasing competition. Samsung has made inroads into its premium market segment. For the mass market in a country with an average annual income of only about $4,000 per person, less than one-tenth the U.S. level, newcomers such as China's Xiaomi offer smartphones that run Google Inc.'s Android system for as little as 799 yuan ($125).The rapid growth of the lower segments where Apple doesn't compete has helped to shrink its share of the overall market even as its sales grow.Apple's share of China's smartphone market fell by nearly half, from 9.1 percent to 4.8 percent, over the past year, according to research firm Canalys.Apple appeared to be trying to capture some of that lower-tier market with this week's announcement of the lower-priced 5C. But the company's website said it will start at 4,488 yuan ($712) in China, well above analysts' expectations of as little as 2,500 yuan ($400)."People were expecting a much cheaper version to expand the market to the mid-tier segment. But that didn't happen," said analyst C.K. Lu of Gartner Inc. "We don't see much is going on in the China market with this new product launch."Shares fell 6 percent in U.S. trading on Wednesday following the announcement. Apple stock has fallen nearly 30 percent since peaking at $705.07 when the last iPhone came out.Apple also disappointed observers by failing to announce an agreement with China Mobile Ltd., the world's biggest phone company by number of subscribers, though Apple had promised no deal.After this week's announcement that Japan's biggest mobile carrier, NTT DoCoMo, would support the new iPhone lineup, China Mobile is the last major holdout. A tie-up would require Apple to create an iPhone that runs on China's homegrown mobile standard but would give it a partner with 750 million subscribers.The latest iPhone release also marks an upgrading of Apple's marketing in China. For the first time, the new model will be released in China at the same time as it debuts on Sept. 20 in the United States and other major markets such as Britain, Japan and France. In more than 100 other countries, it will not go on sale until December.But advance orders for the iPhone 5S and 5C have been "much lower" than for previous models, according to Zhang Xue, a saleswoman for China Telecom Ltd., one of two Chinese carriers that support the iPhone."Customers are much calmer when they face the new iPhone lineup," Zhang said.Apple still has plenty of fervent admirers in China, but some complained the latest iPhones offer too few technical advances.Liu Guanlin, a junior at the Beijing Contemporary Music Academy, said he traded up from Samsung Galaxy to an iPhone because Apple's operating system seemed more stable. But he said the 5C didn't look like it would be worth the money."I have lots of Apple products, yet my complaint about the iPhone is it lacks innovation," said Liu. "I can't see major breakthroughs in the latest models, which is disappointing."Others complained Apple failed to live up to its stylish design standards."The covers look garish. It will take people back to 10 years ago," said Gu, the Shanghai bank employee. "I would rather wait for the iPhone 6 and if there still is not much change, I will think about switching to another brand."AP researchers Fu Ting in Shanghai and Dong Tongjian in Beijing contributed.
BEIJING — A well-known Chinese microblogger who has for years raised questions about government policies and actions — most recently a plan to build an oil refinery — has been detained on a seldom-used charge involving registering a business.Supporters of Dong Rubin say his detention Tuesday in the southern Chinese city of Kunming is retribution by authorities for his activism."If they want to punish you, they can always find an excuse," Dong's friend Zheng Xiejian said. "They could not find any wrongdoing against Dong and had to settle on this obscure charge."Dong's detention also comes amid a national campaign by China's leaders to clamp down on what they call online rumors and efforts to erode the rule of the Communist Party through lies and negative news.Dong's lawyer, Xiao Dongzhi, on Thursday confirmed his client's detention, saying he was charged with inflating the amount of his business' capital when he registered it. Xiao noted that there was no victim in the transaction and that the charge is rarely leveled against anyone.On his microblog, Dong said strangers raided his office in late August and took away three computers without providing any legal document. "What crime will they bring against me? Prostituting, gambling, using and selling drugs, evading tax, causing trouble on purpose, fabricating rumors, running a mafia online?" Dong wrote, listing possible offenses.Dong is best known for pushing for thorough investigations of a suspicious death of a young man in a detention center in 2009. Authorities initially said it was accidental but later admitted the man was beaten to death.Most recently, Dong raised safety and environmental concerns about an oil refinery project near the city of Kunming.
BEIJING — China's government will protect from retribution and attacks people who use the internet to report corruption, but only those who use an officially sanctioned website to do so, a senior official said on Thursday.President Xi Jinping has made fighting pervasive graft a central theme of his new administration, warning that the problem is so severe it could threaten the survival of the ruling Communist Party.The party has been keen to harness the power of the Internet in the fight, though it has been hampered by public suspicion that complaints will be ignored, and also by arrests of and even attacks on online whistleblowers.Speaking on a webcast on the party anti-corruption watchdog's recently unveiled website, the agency's secretary general, Cui Shaopeng, tried to set such concerns aside."Many internet users have said 'if I report a case then how will I be protected?' They fear that if they do report then they will be subject to revenge attacks," Cui said."I can tell everyone in a responsible way, all reports logged on the Central Commission for Discipline Inspection's website will receive legal protection, and we will severely deal with revenge attacks. Our attitude is very clear on this," he added.Cui said they wanted people to provide their real names and contact details, and such reports would be given priority."At the same time, we hope people can submit responsible reports, not lodge false accusations and not use gossip or hearsay to report on real issues."China set up a website in 2009 specifically for the reporting of corruption, and authorities have investigated some online accusations and jailed several low-level officials.It is unclear how many tips the site has gotten in recent months. Between 2008 to 2012, the commission said it received 301,000 whistleblowing reports online.The new website is designed to act as a centre for both reporting on corruption and carrying official statements on officials being investigated.Still, Beijing remains wary of giving people too much latitude, and does not give legal protection for whistleblowers who act outside government boundaries, by using the Twitter-like Sina Weibo service, for example."This is a laughable instruction," Zhu Ruifeng, one of China's most prominent whistleblowers, told Reuters when asked about Cui's comments."It makes no difference what they say, as they won't go after the really top corrupt officials," added Zhu, who runs a whistleblowing website called "People Supervision Net". "And I'm sure they don't have enough people to deal with all the reports coming in."Last year, Zhu released a video of Lei Zhengfu, a district party chief in the southwestern city of Chongqing, having sex with his much younger mistress.Communist Party officials are banned from having mistresses, and the video came to symbolize to many people the excesses of the ruling elite. Lei was sentenced in June to 13 years jail for bribery.The government has also gone after other officials whose misdemeanors were first reported on social media sites.On Thursday, an official in the southern city of Guangzhou was jailed for 11-1/2 years for graft after his ownership of 22 properties was exposed online, earning him the nickname "house uncle".
BEIJING — China announced Thursday that it will ban new coal-fired power plants in three key industrial regions around Beijing, Shanghai and Guangzhou in its latest bid to combat the country's notorious air pollution.The action plan from the State Council, China's Cabinet, also aims to cut coal's share of the country's total primary energy use to below 65 percent by 2017 and increase the share of nuclear power, natural gas and renewable energy. According to Chinese government statistics, coal consumption accounted for 68.4 percent of total energy use in 2011.New coal-fired power plants will be banned for new projects in the region surrounding Beijing, in the Yangtze Delta region near Shanghai and in the Pearl River Delta region of Guangdong province, the State Council said.Martin Adams, Hong Kong-based energy editor for the Economist Intelligence Unit, said coal's share of China's energy consumption already was expected to fall below 65 percent by 2017 and that utility companies had noticed approvals for coal plants weren't being given.Adams also noted that while coal would account for a smaller proportion of total energy production, the absolute amount of coal burning would continue to increase."There's less to it probably than meets the eye," Adams said of the new action plan."Of course, saying it out loud does send a signal that the government is serious about, at least, decreasing the rate at which coal consumption grows and about getting more renewables and natural gas and nuclear," he said. "I think possibly just as important, if not more important, is the signal that it sends to the Chinese people that, 'we are trying to control pollution levels on the eastern seaboard.'"The government has come under increasing pressure from the growing middle class to clean up the country's air pollution, much of which comes from the burning of coal.The State Council said the country's air pollution situation is "grim" and is "harming people's health and affecting social harmony and stability." The action plan calls for the density of fine particulate matter — a gauge of air pollution — in Beijing to drop by 25 percent by 2017 from 2012 levels and by at least 10 percent in cities nationally.It aims to raise the share of non-fossil fuel energy such as solar and wind power to 13 percent by 2017. It was 9.1 percent last year.Environmental campaign group Greenpeace welcomed the plan, saying it would set an important precedent that should be extended throughout China and followed by other major countries."China's political leadership has set an ambitious timeline to solve China's air pollution crisis, responding to the mandate set by the Chinese public, especially in the heavily polluted cities around Beijing," Li Yan, climate and energy campaign manager at Greenpeace East Asia, said in a statement."The targets can only be met by tackling China's coal consumption growth and the plan takes very important steps in that direction," she said.Associated Press researcher Yu Bing contributed to this report.
The Women's World Chess Championship got off to a fast start on Wednesday in Taizhou, China, as the challenger and former champion, Hou Yifan of China, mounted a blistering attack to take the first game from the current champion, Anna Ushenina of Ukraine.Ms. Hou is 19 years old and one of the greatest prodigies in the game's history. She has ranked among the top 10 women in the world since she was 12, she became a grandmaster at 14 years, 6 months — the 15th youngest on record — and when she won the championship in 2010 at age 16, she was the youngest player ever to win a world title, man or woman. She began play on Wednesday ranked No. 2 in the world among women, and a clear favorite to win the match; Ms. Ushenina, 28, is ranked No. 17.Though Ms. Hou successfully defended the title in a match with Humpy Koneru of India (No. 3 in the world) in 2011, she was knocked out in the second round of a 64-player elimination championship tournament last year by Monika Socko, a Polish grandmaster. Ms. Ushenina, the 30th seed in that tournament, went on an improbable run, defeating many top players to win the championship. Ms. Hou then qualified to challenge Ms. Ushenina for the title by winning the 2011-12 Women's Grand Prix, a series of six tournaments featuring most of the world's best female players.In the current match, being held in the Chunlan Hotel under the auspices of the World Chess Federation, the players earn one point for a victory and a half-point for a draw, with the title going to the first player to amass at least 5 ½ points. The winner gets 120,000 euros (about $160,000) and the loser 80,000 euros ($106,000).In Game 1, Ms. Ushenina was White and therefore had the advantage of moving first. After an odd sequence of opening moves, she controlled more space on the board than Ms. Hou, who had a knight situated on a very awkward square. But Ms. Ushenina began to use too much time to think (the players are allotted 90 minutes to make their first 40 moves, with 30 seconds added to their available time after each move; if they use up their time, they forfeit).As her time dwindled, she began to make mistakes, and Ms. Hou took advantage, starting an attack against Ms. Ushenina's king and patiently maneuvering her misplaced knight around the board to join in.Ms. Ushenina seemed to be drifting, searching for a plan, and made a couple of moves that accomplished nothing. Ms. Hou's pieces swarmed over Ms. Ushenina's king, and Ms. Ushenina resigned after 41 moves, on the verge of being checkmated.
HONG KONG — The state-backed China Shipbuilding Industry plans to raise as much as 8.48 billion renminbi through a private share sale to buy assets used for building warships, the first time Beijing is tapping the capital market to fund its military expansion.The $1.4 billion move comes as China creates its own military-industrial complex, with the private sector seen taking a main role as the country gains a new sense of military assertiveness and deals with a growing budget to develop modern equipment including aircraft carriers and drones.China, whose military spending is now second only to that of the United States, has unveiled a double-digit increase in its 2013 military budget, with spending on the People's Liberation Army set to rise 10.7 percent to 740.6 billion renminbi."The thinking of those high-ranking officials is changing," said Wang Hexu, an analyst based in Shanghai at Hwabao Securities. "Military asset securitization, or tapping capital markets for military expansion, will be the future trend, and the funding scale will also become bigger and bigger."He added, "Now aviation and weaponry may also be the next sectors for asset securitization."China Shipbuilding Industry said it planned to raise the capital by selling as many as 2.2 billion shares to as many as 10 investors.The investors include two sibling companies, Wuchang Shipbuilding and Dalian Shipbuilding, which are the main builders of Chinese warships.China Shipbuilding, a key supplier to the People's Liberation Army, said it was the first time China was going to the capital market to fund the buildup of its military."The deal will expand the financing channels for China's military defense," China Shipbuilding said in a statement posted on the Shanghai Stock Exchange's Web site. "It would also herald an overall securitization of China's military assets."Beijing issued new guidelines last year aimed at encouraging private investment in a defense sector traditionally sheltered from competition and public scrutiny.Such investment would bode well for Chinese shipbuilders that focus on the military compared with commercial shipbuilders like Rongsheng Heavy Industries Group, which fell to a first-half loss and has requested financial help from the government.China is expected to build one or more aircraft carriers over the next 5 to 10 years, with each carrier fleet costing nearly 122 billion renminbi, China Shipbuilding said, citing forecasts by experts.China Shipbuilding "has been rumored to be one of those that's going to either build, or fit out the new domestically manufactured aircraft carrier," said Gary Li, a senior maritime analyst based in Beijing at the consulting firm IHS. "Some of the companies that are going to be the main buyers of the shares are all keen to have a stake in the new carrier project," he said. "Everything from batteries to catapults. It's a big task and the Chinese shipbuilding industry is going to need as many stakeholders and investors as it can get."The Shanghai-listed shares of China Shipbuilding, which had been suspended since May pending the announcement of the deal, jumped more than 10 percent Wednesday morning. The company has a market value of 66 billion renminbi.Military-related products account for 8.3 percent of China Shipbuilding's income, according to Hwabao Securities.China currently has one aircraft carrier, the Liaoning, which was refitted from a Russian-made model.Considered by military experts to be decades behind U.S. technology, it was originally intended to serve as a floating casino but was turned to military use as a power transition approached in 2012.China has been at odds with some of its Southeast Asian neighbors over conflicting claims to strings of islets in the resource-rich South China Sea, and Beijing now has the firepower to challenge these rivals.
SHANGHAI — Behind China's aggressive drive to root out corruption is Wang Qishan, a historian-turned-economist who once felt so bad about getting free parking that he reportedly sent a colleague back to pay the fee.President Xi Jinping launched the anti-corruption campaign after becoming Communist Party chief in November.So far the party has announced the investigation or arrest of eight senior officials, including three from the 376-member elite Central Committee. Among them, former executives from oil giant PetroChina are being investigated in what appears to be the biggest graft probe into a state-run firm in years.Wang, 65, heads the Central Commission for Discipline Inspection and ranks sixth in the party hierarchy. His power far exceeds this, said Cheng Li, a fellow at the Brookings Institution in Washington and an expert on Chinese politics."I would say that Wang Qishan is the second most powerful person next only to Xi Jinping," he said.Given the secretive nature of China's Communist Party, there are few details on what Wang has done as its top graft-buster, a role he assumed when Xi became party chief.Wang keeps a low profile and his public appearances and comments, like those of all top Chinese leaders, are usually scripted. He rarely gives interviews.But observers said the fingerprints of the urbane former banker were visible in the anti-corruption campaign and in related efforts to force officials to behave less extravagantly."He is the lead actor in this," said Zhang Ming, a professor at Renmin University in Beijing.For example, it was Wang who proposed the party scrap a decades-old unwritten rule that exempted incumbent and retired members of the seven-man Politburo Standing Committee, of which he belongs, from investigation for corruption, a source with direct knowledge of the matter said.That landmark move was approved earlier this year by the Standing Committee, China's top political decision-making body, sources who have ties to the leadership or direct knowledge of the matter have told Reuters.Wang has also reorganised parts of the discipline inspection commission and added two offices so the body can deepen its investigations into provincial leaders.And one of the earliest initiatives Xi unveiled was a set of guidelines for officials that aimed to cut bureaucracy and formality."This came from the discipline commission," said Li of the Brookings Institution."He and Xi Jinping have a very, very good partnership."To be sure, China has announced corruption crackdowns before that have met with little success. Experts say only deep and difficult political reforms will move the needle."If the anti-graft campaign is sustained and expanded, it could begin to challenge the party's systemic problems with corruption, but it's far too early to say that the government is committed to that," said Duncan Innes-Ker, senior China analyst at the Economist Intelligence Unit.Like his predecessors, Xi says corruption threatens the party's very survival. He has said he wants to show he is serious by going after "tigers", or political heavyweights, not just "flies".Some questioned the wisdom of moving Wang away from his role as a leading economic policymaker. A protege of former premier and economic reformer Zhu Rongji, he was even viewed as a dark-horse candidate for premier before the new leadership lineup was announced in November.Now that the Chinese economy is showing signs of stability, the decision to deploy a man widely known as "the chief firefighter" to the corruption front might be a good call."They needed a person to deal with corruption who was strong and whose image and reputation were good, and he was that person. There was no one else they could have picked," said Jin Zhong, editor of Hong Kong's Open magazine, which follows elite Chinese politics.Wang is under no illusions as to task ahead. Graft oils the wheels of government at almost every level in China, which ranked 80th out of 176 countries and territories on Transparency International's corruption perceptions index, where a higher ranking means a cleaner public sector."The war against corruption needs to be resolute and long-lasting, and it must be a battle to the death," the Xinhua news agency quoted Wang as saying in March.Not everything has gone according to plan.State media reported last week that Yu Qiyi, a 42-year-old engineer in the eastern city of Wenzhou, drowned after being repeatedly dunked in cold water while being interrogated by corruption investigators. Six officials will soon stand trial.Wang made a name for himself in the late 1990s when he sorted out a debt crisis in booming southern Guangdong province.He then ran the island province of Hainan as governor before moving to Beijing where he tackled the deadly SARS pandemic in 2003 as mayor after his predecessor was sacked for covering it up.His most recent job was vice premier with responsibility for the economy.As an undergraduate in the mid-1970s he studied history in Shaanxi province, where he had worked on a farm at the height of the Cultural Revolution. In the 1980s Wang moved to Beijing and focused on rural policy, the forefront of China's market reforms. He later transitioned into banking.Wang is a straight shooter, sources say. When being briefed by officials he has a habit of stopping them from reading from prepared statements and asking them questions."He does not have time for nonsense and demands direct answers," a source with ties to the leadership told Reuters.The new administration has taken steps to introduce more transparency and adhere more closely to the rule of law in anti-corruption work, said Zhu Jiangnan, a professor at the University of Hong Kong who has researched corruption in China.The discipline commission held its first news conference ever in January and launched a new website at the start of this month."I suspect some of those ideas are coming from Wang Qishan," Zhu said.In May, Wang ordered disciplinary and supervisory cadres to give up club membership and VIP cards, apparently common gifts for officials, calling them "small objects (that) reflect a big problem in working style".The son-in-law of late vice premier Yao Yilin, Wang has a reputation for modesty and honesty.In a late August cover story, the influential state-run magazine, Southern People Weekly, recounted an incident in which a parking attendant insisted on letting Wang, then mayor of Beijing, park for free."The car behind started to get impatient and honk so Wang had to drive away," it said. Wang later sent a staffer to pay the fee.
BEIJING — The pharmaceutical giant Bayer AG confirmed Friday that it is being investigated in China for possible unfair competition, making it the latest foreign drug maker to come under scrutiny in the country.The Germany-based company said it is cooperating with Chinese authorities in the investigation after industry and commerce regulators visited a Bayer office at the end of August. It did not provide further details of the case or say where the office was, but said it would investigate any allegations thoroughly and take proper action."In China as in other regions around the globe, it is our responsibility to base our business models on absolute integrity," it said in a statement. "At Bayer we have very strict compliance rules in place, which clearly forbid incompliant behavior of our employees."A wave of investigations has rattled foreign drug manufacturers in China. Authorities are probing whether British-based GlaxoSmithKline PLC and French rival Sanofi SA paid doctors to encourage the use of their medications. GSK employees are also accused of laundering money through travel agencies to evade its internal anti-bribery controls.Chinese media reports say U.S.-based Eli Lilly and Co. spent millions of dollars on payments to Chinese doctors to prescribe its insulin products.In China's health system, low salaries and skimpy budgets drive doctors, nurses and administrators to make ends meet by accepting money from patients, drug suppliers and others. The practice has long been common knowledge.Bruno Gensberger, president of the European Chamber of Commerce's pharmaceutical working group, has said the investigations have only targeted foreign companies, including those with the strongest standard operating procedures, or SOPs, to prevent employee misconduct."The foreign companies that are most serious about SOPs have been the most investigated and the most discriminated," Gensberger said last week. "To my knowledge, today no Chinese company has been investigated."
BEIJING — Chinese police have detained an outspoken and well-known venture capitalist for questioning, a fellow activist said on Friday, after he helped lead a campaign for the release of another activist, as the government tightens a crackdown on dissent.The businessman, Wang Gongquan, is an old friend of Xu Zhiyong, who has pushed for greater civil rights and called for officials to disclose their wealth and who was formally arrested last month on a charge of "gathering a crowd to disturb order in a public place".Teng Biao, a fellow activist and lecturer at Beijing's University of Politics and Law, said that about 20 police came to Wang's apartment at around midday, saying he was wanted for questioning on suspicion of the same charge Xu is facing."It's worrying because Wang is very high profile and wealthy, an important person," Teng told Reuters by telephone.Police could not be reached for comment.Wang was one of the people who launched a campaign to gather signatures calling for Xu to be released.Hong Kong's South China Morning Post newspaper said that Wang had told them he was worried about being arrested amid a government push against dissent, which has shown no sign of abating during the first year of President Xi Jinping's first term in office.Xu, founder of the "New Citizens' Movement", advocates working within the system to press for change.On the Internet, he has called on officials to disclose their assets and fellow activists have gone into the streets to urge citizens to combat corruption.China has detained at least 16 activists involved in pushing for asset disclosure by officials, in what rights groups say is a new, coordinated crackdown by the ruling Communist Party against graft campaigners.Xu's arrest coincided with the opening of the trial of former senior leader Bo Xilai on corruption charges, a case which focused on Bo's alleged ill-gotten gains.Xu's case was raised by the United States in August during an annual rights dialogue with China.
HONG KONG — Beijing's top official in Hong Kong has rejected letting the public nominate candidates to run for leader, in the strongest sign yet from China that it won't allow the former British colony to freely choose its next leader.Zhang Xiaoming said in an open letter that a provision in the city's mini-constitution requires candidates to be chosen by a "broadly representative nominating committee.""There is no other option," Zhang said in the letter, written in response to a lawmaker's proposal.Since China regained control of Hong Kong in 1997, the city's leader — known as the chief executive — has been chosen by an elite panel of mainly pro-Beijing tycoons and business group representatives.Beijing promised in 2007 to allow Hong Kongers to elect their leader in 2017 and all lawmakers by 20202, but no outline has been given, adding to growing anxiety among residents that they'll be denied full democracy.Hong Kong Chief Executive Leung Chun-ying is facing growing public pressure to hold consultations on electoral reform.Hong Kong pro-democracy groups have proposed several ways to make the nomination process more democratic, including allowing candidates to run if at least 2 percent the city's 3.4 million registered voters nominate them.In July, Zhang told Hong Kong lawmakers the central government is serious about eventually allowing all Hong Kongers to vote for the chief executive. But he reiterated Beijing's insistence it would never let residents nominate their own candidates without central government approval.Zhang said in his letter that the "correct path forward" for election methods is to follow the provisions of the Basic Law — Hong Kong's mini-constitution — and the National People's Congress Standing Committee — the Chinese legislature's governing body — "rather than detouring from the law."Under the Basic Law, Hong Kong, a special administrative region of China, gets to keep its own political system and Western-style civil liberties such as freedom of speech until 2047.Zhang's letter was dated Aug. 30 and posted Thursday on the website of the Chinese central government's liaison office.
BEIJING — A Chinese businessman who supports a grassroots group promoting civil society was detained by police on Friday on suspicion of gathering crowds to disturb public order, his friends said, in a sign the government is stepping up efforts to crack down on the loosely organized movement.Xiao Shu, a family friend, said police officers took venture capitalist Wang Gongquan from his Beijing home for questioning and formally detained him several hours later."We believe this is an absurd allegation. It is impossible for Mr. Wang Gongquan to disturb order at any public place," his supporters said in a written statement, noting that Wang has been advocating peaceful social changes. Wang is known for his opposition to street protests.Beijing police did not immediately respond to a faxed request for comment on the case.Wang's detention followed the detentions of two leading members of the New Citizens movement — Xu Zhiyong and Yang Maodong. Yang is better known by his penname of Guo Feixiong."This is an important sign that Beijing wants to nip the New Citizens movement in the bud," Xiao Shu said. "In the past, the authorities were ambivalent toward civil society, but now how they are treating Gongquan will send a clear signal that they consider the New Citizens movement as a hostile force that should be suppressed."The group's members have done little more than lobby for rights of rural children and public disclosure of officials' assets, although they have urged people to meet for dinner to discuss such issues. Beijing is wary of anything it sees as having the potential to develop into a force that can challenge Communist Party rule.Wang, who is a close friend of Xu, is believed to be the first supporter — rather than active participant — of the group to be targeted.Because of his social status as a successful businessman, Wang's detention has attracted considerable public attention. Wang became the third most-searched person — behind two entertainment celebrities — on China's Twitter-like Sina Weibo on Friday despite intermittent efforts to block searches of his name.Guo Yushan, a Beijing scholar, said Wang has been targeted for his association with Xu. "In essence, this is political suppression," Guo said. "It is consistent with the political style of the new administration."Wang has openly protested Xu's detention and vowed to help move the New Citizens movement forward.He also posted online video footage a lawyer took of Xu, in which the civil rights campaigner delivered a bold message from behind bars, urging citizens to unite in pursuing democratic freedoms.Wang is among a growing group of Chinese businesspeople who have been pushing for gradual social changes in China. He has been an advocate for building a civil society and always identifies himself as a "citizen." He has lobbied for equal rights for students and urged more public involvement in social events.In a July interview with the Hong Kong-based newspaper South China Morning Post, Wang said he had feared political retribution for his social activism. "After doing it for a while, I realize I have broken no laws. I have no ill intent. Then what is there to fear? So gradually, I am no longer afraid," he said.
HONG KONG — Beijing's top representative in Hong Kong has ruled out open nominations for candidates to become its next leader, the strongest sign yet that China's pledge of democracy for the former British colony by 2017 comes with conditions.Hong Kong returned to Chinese rule in 1997 with the guarantee of wide-ranging autonomy and an independent judiciary and press under the formula of "one country, two systems".It is the freest city in China, but every year on the anniversary of the handover, thousands take to the streets demanding fully democratic elections amid mounting fears of increased meddling by Beijing's Communist Party leaders.Zhang Xiaoming, the head of Beijing's Liaison Office in Hong Kong, said open nominations for the leader, or chief executive, would not be allowed.Zhang's open letter, sent to a major pro-democracy group, the Civic Party, quoted the city's mini-constitution, the Basic Law, as saying that all candidates could only be nominated by a "broadly representative nominating committee"."There is no other option," Zhang said in the letter.That means the nominations will instead come from a small election committee stacked with Beijing loyalists who would essentially veto any opposition candidates from running.The letter was published on the Liaison Office's website - www.locpg.hk/big5/shouyexinwen/201309/t20130912_7434.asp - amid what observers say is an intensifying propaganda push by Beijing to downplay expectations for democratic polls.Zhang's comments could raise the political heat in Hong Kong, with pro-democracy groups threatening to seal off the city's central business district next year as part of a campaign of civil disobedience.The election in 2017 will still be the most far-reaching version of democracy on Chinese soil. But analysts say Beijing's hardening stance suggest a continuing conservatism towards meaningful political reforms under new leader Xi Jinping.Earlier in the year, a senior Chinese leader also played down hopes that Hong Kong's 2017 election would be democratic.Qiao Xiaoyang, chairman of the law committee of the National People's Congress, said regardless of the vote, China would not allow someone who "confronts" Beijing to become Hong Kong's leader.Hong Kong remains a beacon of civil liberties in China, which wants to see self-ruled Taiwan, an island it considers to be a breakaway province, united with the mainland, perhaps under a similar formula.
BEIJING — The Chinese government announced an ambitious plan on Thursday to curb air pollution across the nation, including setting some limits on burning coal and taking high-polluting vehicles off the roads to ensure a drop in the concentration of particulate matter in cities.The plan, released by the State Council, China's cabinet, filled in a broad outline that the government had issued this year. It represents the most concrete response yet by the Communist Party and the government to growing criticism over allowing the country's air, soil and water to degrade to abysmal levels because of corruption and unchecked economic growth.The criticism has been especially pronounced in some of China's largest cities, where anxious residents grapple with choking smog that can persist for days and even weeks. In January, the concentration of fine particulate matter in Beijing reached 40 times the exposure limit recommended by the World Health Organization.Environmental advocates, including some at Greenpeace East Asia, said the plan did not go far enough, while others praised it for at least acknowledging some of the basic causes of the country's chronic air pollution. But there was wide agreement that the ultimate test would come in how it is carried out and enforced.Chinese cities suffer from some of the worst air pollution in the world, with outdoor pollution having accounted for 1.2 million premature deaths in China in 2010, according to the 2010 Global Burden of Disease Study. Increasingly, air pollution is changing everyday life. Face masks are becoming more ubiquitous in the cities, and some affluent parents increasingly choose schools more for their air filtration systems than for their academics. The environment is emerging as a potent political issue.For years China has had an array of strict environmental standards on paper, and its leaders talk constantly about the need to improve the environment. But enforcement has been lax, and the environment has continued to deteriorate at an alarming rate."The plan successfully identifies the root cause of air pollution in China: China's industrial structure," said Ma Jun, a prominent environmental advocate. "Industrialization determines the structure of energy consumption. If China does not upgrade its coal-dependent industries, coal consumption can never be curbed." he said. "The key to preventing air pollution is to curb coal burning — China burns half of all the coal consumed in the world."Under the new plan, concentrations of fine particulate matter must be reduced by 25 percent in the Beijing-Tianjian-Hebei area in the north, 20 percent in the Yangtze River Delta in the east and 15 percent in the Pearl River Delta in the south, compared with 2012 levels.All other cities must reduce the levels of larger particulate matter, known as PM 10, by 10 percent. It is unclear why the plan calls for a looser standard for other cities, since the fine particulate matter, known as PM 2.5, is considered deadlier than PM 10 because it can penetrate deep into the lungs and enter the bloodstreamThe plan said Beijing must also bring its average concentration of PM 2.5 down to 60 micrograms per cubic meter or less. That would be two and a half times the recommended exposure limit set by the World Health Organization.For years, Chinese officials kept measurements of PM 2.5 from the public. But many Chinese in Beijing turned to a Twitter feed from the United States Embassy to see the hourly PM 2.5 reading from a monitoring machine on the embassy rooftop. That, in turn, put pressure on the government to have cities start releasing their PM 2.5 measurements. Beijing began reporting PM 2.5 levels in January 2012, and the official Xinhua news agency has reported that 74 cities are supposed to be releasing their PM 2.5 data this year.On Thursday, pollution climbed to levels that the embassy rated "very unhealthy," with a PM 2.5 concentration at 10 p.m. at 213 micrograms per cubic meter. Much of the city's downtown skyline was obscured by a thick haze.Coal consumption has grown rapidly in China, and the plan places only modest limits on consumption, with coal to account for no more than 65 percent of energy use in 2017, compared with around 67 percent last year. Some of the plan's critics said they were disappointed that there were no specific limits on coal consumption by region. The plan allows local governments to set those limits on their own."Instead of setting a goal to reduce coal burning for each province, the action plan gives each province the power to set goals for themselves, which leads to the goals being very conservative," said Huang Wei, who works on climate and energy advocacy at Greenpeace East Asia.The plan addressed vehicle emissions by removing all high-polluting "yellow label" vehicles that were registered before the end of 2005 from the roads by the end of 2015. In the three regions with heavy industry, all such vehicles are to be taken off the roads by 2015, and the same for all of China by 2017.In those three regions, gasoline and diesel of a high standard, China V, will be provided in certain cities. But the plan did not set targets for new vehicle emissions standards, which some environmental advocates say is a major omission. "We had been waiting for months for the new action plan," Ms. Huang said. "We thought it might be a pivot point in history. Now it's here, and we think it has very much fallen short of our expectations."
BEIJING — France's foreign minister was due to meet with his Chinese counterpart on Sunday in a continuing diplomatic drive to end the two-and-a-half-year civil war in Syria.Laurent Fabius was due to meet Wang Yi at China's Foreign Ministry.France firmly backs the Syrian rebels and has strategic and historic interests in the region. It urged military action after a chemical attack on Aug. 21 that it and the U.S. blame on President Bashar Assad's government.In contrast, China and Russia have consistently blocked resolutions at the U.N. Security Council aimed at sanctioning Assad's regime.On Saturday, U.S. and Russian diplomats in Geneva agreed on a deal to secure and destroy Syria's chemical weapons stockpile, averting the threat of military action for now.Fabius said the deal was "a significant step forward."In a statement on the French Foreign Ministry's website, he said he would discuss its content and implementation at a meeting Monday in Paris with U.S. Secretary of State John Kerry and British Foreign Secretary William Hague.He said a report by U.N. inspectors on the chemical weapons attack on the outskirts of Damascus would be published Monday.
BEIJING — A senior U.S. diplomat said Saturday that Washington hopes quiet diplomatic engagements between Japan and China can help keep peace and stability in the East China Sea, where the two Asian countries have a bitter dispute over the sovereignty of a group of islands.U.S. Assistant Secretary of State for East Asian and Pacific Affairs Daniel Russel told a group of reporters in Beijing after a tour of the region that the U.S. wants all sides to exercise restraint and manage the disputes through friendly diplomatic means."The global economy is too fragile and the world's interest in economic growth and stability is too strong for the world's second- and third-largest economies to remain at odds," Russel said. "Friction and tension between Tokyo and Beijing is a matter of concern to all neighbors and certainly to the United States."The uninhabited islands — known as Senkaku in Japanese and Diaoyu in Chinese — are controlled by Japan, but also claimed by China.Tensions flared a year ago after Japan moved to buy the tiny islets, and violent anti-Japan protests erupted in several cities in China, which has long harbored animosity against Japan for its military invasion during World War II.Although tensions still simmer, last week Japanese Prime Minister Shinzo Abe and Chinese President Xi Jinping met briefly on the side of the Group of 20 summit in Russia, raising hopes for dialogue."We hope that quiet diplomat engagement between Japan and China bears fruit," Russel said. "And we note with interest that Prime Minister Abe and President Xi Jinping had some form of encounter or conversation in St. Petersburg."Russel said the U.S. takes no position on the issue of territorial claims but that it is in the U.S. interest that peace and stability in the region be maintained."We are not neutral on matters of responsible behaviors at sea," he said. "It is of great concern to the United States as it is to all countries that rely on maritime corridors that there is any risk of an incident that could lead to a crisis or lead to an escalation."
(Reuters) - Korean-American Chan Kim appeared to have benefitted from his recent swing change as he carded a second consecutive bogey-free round to grab the third round lead at Asian Tour's Yeangder Tournament Players Championship in Taiwan on Saturday.Kim matched his second round score of four-under-par 68 for a three-day total of 10-under-par 206 to stay a stroke ahead of Thailand's Thaworn Wiratchant (71) and local player Yeh Wei-tze (67) in the $500,000 event.The 23-year-old Kim, who won the Tour qualifying school in January, felt his swing change, which he developed with his coach during the off-season, was finally paying off."We've been working on the timing of my swing and making it simpler. It's helping a lot especially down the stretch where you get tired. It's very easy for you to swing out of sync but this week, my swing has a good tempo," Kim said."I kind of feel a pause at the top (of the swing) and a lot of people talked about it but that's my sensation. I feel like I should stay at the top for a quick second before making my down swing."Thaworn, last season's Order of Merit winner, continued to struggle with his iron play and had two bogeys which offset three birdies at the Linkou International Golf and Country Club near Taipei."It is really hard to say what will happen tomorrow (Sunday). I haven't been hitting my irons good enough so I'm just happy to shoot nine-under," the 46-year-old, who won the tournament in 2010, said."I'll have to continue doing what I've been doing and rely on my chipping and putting."Local hope Yeh holed an eagle on his last to add to his three birdies and stayed in contention his second Asian Tour title.
BEIJING — The United States hopes that tentative diplomatic engagement between China and Japan amid their dispute over a group of islands in the East China Sea is successful as escalation is in nobody's interest, a senior U.S. diplomat said on Saturday.Ties between the world's second- and third-biggest economies have been strained over the uninhabited islets, controlled by Japan but claimed by both countries. The isles are known as the Senkaku in Japan and the Diaoyu in China.Aircraft and ships from the two countries have played cat-and-mouse in the vicinity of the islands, raising fears of conflict, perhaps sparked by an accident.Speaking after a tour of the region, U.S. Assistant Secretary of State for East Asian and Pacific Affairs Daniel Russel said the world did not want the spat to get out of hand.Global interest in economic stability, Russel told a news conference in Beijing, was "too strong for the world's second and third-largest economies to remain at odds."We hope that leaders on all sides will exercise restraint and sensitivity and will consistently pursue diplomatic and friendly moves to manage disputes or resolve outstanding issues," he said."It is of great concern to the U.S., as it is to all countries that rely on maritime corridors, that there is any risk of an incident that could lead to a crisis or lead to an escalation," he said."We hope that quiet diplomatic engagement between Japan and China bears fruit, and we note with interest that Prime Minister Abe and President Xi Jinping had some form of encounter or conversation in St. Petersburg," Russel added, referring to the brief meeting on the sidelines of the G20 summit earlier this month.Japanese Prime Minister Shinzo Abe is keen to improve ties and has called for dialogue with China, though he has rejected any conditions on talks.China has shown no inclination to respond to the overtures, aside from the short exchange between the leaders in Russia, and says it has indisputable sovereignty over the islands.China's military told the United States this week not to support Japan, nor let it do as it pleased, over the islets.China has long harbored suspicions about U.S. interest in the dispute as the U.S.-Japan security treaty commits the United States to intervene in defense of Japan if there is an attack on Japanese-administered territory.The United States also has a hefty military presence in Japan, including on the southern island of Okinawa, which is close to the disputed isles.
BEIJING — JIA ZHANGKE, China's most prominent art house director, had been preparing to make his first big-budget martial arts film, set in dynastic China, when reality intruded in the form of the Internet.Specifically, Mr. Jia discovered the world of Twitter-like microblogs, which many Chinese have been reading in recent years to get the unvarnished daily news and opinions that are all but absent from the state-run news media. He was bombarded with news from all corners of China, much of it tied to the crimes of corrupt officials or businesspeople: rape, land seizures, industrial pollution. In many of those cases, he said, frustrated ordinary Chinese had been provoked to commit acts of bloodshed."I slowly began to see the problem of individual violence in society," the soft-spoken Mr. Jia, 43, said one recent afternoon in his office in northwest Beijing. "There are many tragedies or societal problems in which people in the end rebel, resulting in a very big tragedy. So I began to pay more and more attention to this problem, because, frankly speaking, I feel like Chinese people do not really understand the problem of violence because society has never had a widespread discussion of the problem."Mr. Jia decided to put the dynastic epic aside and make a different kind of action film, one more in line with his body of work. Called "A Touch of Sin," the work had its premiere at the Cannes Film Festival in May, where it won the prize for best screenplay, and is showing this fall at various film festivals, including in New York this month. It is tentatively scheduled to open in China in November.The movie, based on news events, tells four interwoven stories of ordinary Chinese, often migrant workers far from home, who reach a boiling point under extreme circumstances and resort to violence. A mineworker in Mr. Jia's native Shanxi Province goes on a shooting rampage against the mine owner, village chief and other local bosses. A young factory worker in the south finds only despair at a company resembling Foxconn, the Taiwanese firm that builds Apple products.Unlikely as it sounds, one thing that carried over from Mr. Jia's original idea for a dynastic movie was the form of the traditional martial arts film, known as wuxia. "I thought these four stories were completely like the martial arts films from the past, with the only exception being that they occurred in contemporary China," Mr. Jia said. "So I thought I could use the traditional martial arts style to film the movie I wanted to make about today's China."The protagonists all try, in various bloody ways, to take control of their fate. One of the most striking images is that of a massage parlor worker played by Zhao Tao, Mr. Jia's wife and longtime collaborator, walking down a hallway with her white shirt soaked in blood and holding a knife in front of her. Minutes earlier, an abusive customer had tried to rape her, only to meet a grisly end."The reality is there are more and more of these violent stories," Ms. Zhao said in a telephone interview. "I think that's what touches him. That's our reality in China now."THIS is Mr. Jia's sixth full-length narrative film, and it shows how far he has come since his first three feature films, all set in his hometown, Fengyang. Mr. Jia grew up in an austere household there, where his father was a schoolteacher and his mother was a shop assistant. He once told The New Yorker that his favorite childhood movie was "Breakin'," a 1984 American film about break dancing; he even taught himself some of the moves and performed with a traveling song-and-dance troupe.After entering the Beijing Film Academy in 1993, Mr. Jia became associated with "the sixth generation" of Chinese filmmakers, who eschewed the lush cinematography and historical subjects of predecessors for cleareyed depictions of contemporary China in the throes of change. His first features mined Fengyang for gritty, intimate portraits — a pickpocket in "Xiao Wu," a musical performance troupe in "Platform," young lovers in "Unknown Pleasures."Starting with his fourth feature, "The World," released in 2004 with the approval of the state film bureau, Mr. Jia began setting his stories in other parts of China to depict the social dissonance accompanying the nation's economic transformation. "Still Life," set in a town on the Yangtze about to be flooded because of construction of the Three Gorges Dam, won the top prize, the Golden Lion, at the 2006 Venice Film Festival.
Hong Kong bowed Friday to years of pressure from environmental groups, saying it would no longer allow shark fin to be served at official functions.The authorities are "determined to take the lead and set a good example on this front," a government statement said. The initiative goes "beyond the minimum expectation laid down" in the United Nations treaty that governs trade in threatened species, the statement said, and it also applies to bluefin tuna and black moss, a type of algae popular in Asian cuisine.Scientists estimate that as many as 100 million sharks are killed each year, mostly for their fins, which are typically served in soup. The practice is widely considered cruel and wasteful, because the sharks are often thrown overboard, finless, to die. Hong Kong is the world's biggest trade hub for shark fins, representing about 50 percent of the trade.In March, member nations of the Convention on International Trade in Endangered Species of Wild Fauna and Flora, a United Nations treaty also known as Cites, called for trade in five shark species — oceanic whitetips, scalloped hammerheads, two other types of hammerheads, and porbeagles — to be carefully tracked and shown to have been conducted legally. That has put shark fin consumers in Hong Kong, on mainland China and elsewhere in an awkward spotlight.Last year, China said it would prohibit official banquets from serving shark fin soup, but the measure was expected to need as many as three years to take effect, and even then, compliance may be uneven.Conservation groups hailed Hong Kong's announcement, with Joshua S. Reichert, the executive vice president of the Pew Charitable Trusts, saying it was "particularly significant" because of Hong Kong's role in the shark fin trade.Black moss, a cyanobacterium known in Mandarin Chinese as fa cai, is being removed from official menus because of concerns that it is being overharvested in Mongolia and China, exacerbating desertification. Research has also suggested that it contains toxic amino acids.
SHANGHAI — When Peter Humphrey and his wife, Yu Yingzeng, appeared on Chinese national television recently, handcuffed and wearing orange prison vests, it was the first time in more than a month that family and friends had seen the British-American couple, well-known figures in the foreign business world here.But any sense of relief was tempered by what they saw next: Mr. Humphrey, his face electronically blurred, his head bowed, confessed to a crime and apologized to the Chinese government.The broadcast not only stirred immediate alarm among foreigners in China, but also cast a light on a murky corner of business life in the world's most dynamic economy. Until they disappeared in July, Mr. Humphrey and Ms. Yu ran ChinaWhys, one of many firms in the hush-hush industry of consultants and investigators in Beijing, Shanghai and Hong Kong that promise to guide foreign corporations through China's opaque and often treacherous business environment.The companies sell services that are considered essential to doing business in China, including background checks, financial audits, fraud investigations and trademark protection. In most of the world, such work is fairly mundane. But in China, where public records are limited and corruption is rampant, it can be tricky and dangerous.The arrests of Mr. Humphrey and Ms. Yu on charges of illegally acquiring private personal information, and the recent jailing of several other business researchers on similar charges, suggest the risks are rising. Taken together with the bribery investigation against GlaxoSmithKline, the increasing pressure on American car companies to lower their prices here, and the not-so-veiled threats against American technology companies to subcontract to Chinese companies, China appears to be throwing new obstacles in the way of foreign companies doing business in China.A spokesman for Bayer HealthCare, a pharmaceutical company based in Germany, said on Friday that Chinese officials had begun investigating the company's China operations for "a potential case of unfair competition."Representatives from a local office of China's State Administration for Industry and Commerce visited one of Bayer's offices at the end of August, said the spokesman, Oliver Renner. He added that Bayer would investigate any accusations of violation of corporate policies and "take full responsibility for appropriate measures."It is unclear whether the investigation into Bayer is related to the ones that Chinese officials have opened into GlaxoSmithKline and other foreign pharmaceutical companies. Earlier this year, Chinese officials also investigated makers of infant milk powder for price fixing; most of the companies under scrutiny were foreign ones. Officials fined several of the companies the equivalent of millions of dollars, and the companies said they would pay the fines.Foreign investors — hedge funds, private equity firms and multinational companies — typically hire consulting firms like ChinaWhys to investigate potential partners and employees or keep tabs on current ones.The goal is to uncover wrongdoing that could hurt investments, things like a hidden relationship with a supplier or a fraud that could sink a publicly listed company."Unfortunately, even as due diligence into the integrity of domestic enterprises in China has become more important in the light of perceived widespread fraud and misrepresentation, access to records has become even more difficult," said John Kuzmik, a consultant and former partner-in-charge of the law firm Baker Botts in Hong Kong. "Investigators are working in a very gray and somewhat dangerous environment."China has yet to develop a comprehensive system for collecting and assessing individual credit histories, or even accessing criminal or land records, Mr. Kuzmik said. And last year, the government began clamping down on access to corporate and household registration documents.Indeed, much of the business going to these firms comes from Western lawyers, who must perform due diligence on Chinese deals for their clients but are wary about getting their hands dirty in the process."We work with private investigators but we don't want to know where they get the information," said a lawyer in a major American law firm in China.
BEIJING — A Chinese billionaire venture capitalist who has strongly advocated more liberal political and social policies was detained Friday by Beijing police officers, friends of the businessman said.The businessman, Wang Gongquan, 51, is a close friend of Xu Zhiyong, a lawyer who was formally arrested last month on a charge of "assembling a crowd to disrupt order in a public place." Mr. Wang was detained on the same charge, according to a photograph of the warrant that circulated online on Friday. One human rights group said Mr. Wang was in Beijing No. 3 Detention Center, where more than a dozen others with ties to the New Citizens' Movement, led by Mr. Xu, are being held.Mr. Wang was taken from his home by more than 20 police officers around 11:30 a.m., said Chen Min, another well-known rights advocate, who goes by the pen name Xiao Shu. The police searched the home for more than two hours and took away a computer, two framed pictures and small "citizen pins" that Mr. Wang presumably had made at some point, Mr. Chen said.The pins might have been collected by the police as potential evidence in a case against Mr. Wang. They appear to be similar to "citizen stamps" that Mr. Wang ordered made years ago. Caixin, an investigative business magazine, reported in 2011 that Mr. Wang had commissioned 100 of the stamps, which were the same size as a one renminbi coin and bore the engraved images of the Chinese flag, an open book with the title "Constitution," and the phrase "Chinese Citizen."Few businessmen who have amassed as much wealth as Mr. Wang are as outspoken about their liberal political views. Mr. Wang began building his fortune as a real estate investor in the Vantone enterprise on Hainan Island in the 1990s, which became a springboard for other businessmen who grew affluent from the property business. Mr. Wang joined a venture capital firm and later founded his own investment company.In 2005, Mr. Wang began attending meetings held by Mr. Xu and working with Mr. Xu's advocacy group, the Open Constitution Initiative. The Caixin profile said Mr. Wang became involved in a wide range of social issues, like condemning "black jails" where security officers secretly detained aggrieved petitioners, and supporting rights for the children of migrant workers, who are usually barred from studying in public schools in the cities where their parents work.Since a Communist Party leadership transition last November, advocates of more liberal policies have urged the new leaders to follow and enforce the Chinese Constitution, which is routinely ignored by the party. Senior officials have pushed back against those calls, and editorials in official party publications in recent months have criticized supporters of constitutionalism.That attack on liberal ideas has coincided with a security crackdown on dissent. Many liberal Chinese have been detained by the police. The crackdown has extended to prominent Internet personalities who often discuss social issues on Twitter-like microblog accounts, which can have millions of followers. Chinese Human Rights Defenders, an international advocacy group, has estimated that nearly 60 Chinese involved in political activism have been detained.Mr. Xu was arrested this summer against that backdrop. At the time, Mr. Wang spoke with journalists about his plight. Reporters also contacted Mr. Wang when Mr. Chen was detained temporarily last month. Mr. Wang said in an interview: "A lot of people have asked me, after Xu Zhiyong and Xiao Shu, are you worried? I don't know. Up to now, state security hasn't contacted me. But on the day I decided to work with Xu Zhiyong, I had already prepared for the worst."Mr. Chen and Mr. Wang have helped circulate an online petition calling for Mr. Xu's release.In 2011, Mr. Wang was thrust into prominence for an entirely different reason. He posted a message on his microblog saying he was leaving his wife because he had fallen in love with another woman, Wang Qin. "I am giving up everything and eloping with Wang Qin," he wrote. "I feel ashamed and so am leaving without saying goodbye. I kneel down and beg forgiveness!"
BEIJING — Passengers on Sunday began leaving a Chinese luxury cruise liner that has been stuck in South Korea for the past two days because of a legal dispute.More than 2,300 passengers and crew members were stranded when a South Korean district court ordered the ship detained in the port of Jeju on Friday.Four flights set off from Beijing on Sunday to bring back the passengers, according to the microblog of Chinese tour operator HNA Cruise. Four chartered planes will make two trips each, which will be enough to carry all the passengers and crew, according to a woman who answered the company's emergency hotline. She gave only her surname, Zhao.China Central Television reported on its lunchtime news that 450 people had already left and were waiting at the airport.The cruise liner had set off from Tianjin, a port city near Beijing, on Wednesday and was scheduled to sail around South Korea islands and ports before returning to Tianjin six days later.HNA Cruise said the Jeju court acted upon a request of a Chinese company over legal disputes but did not elaborate. The ship was supposed to depart Jeju on Friday.South Korea's Yonhap news agency said a Chinese creditor has entrusted an unidentified South Korean company to make the court request.HNA has blamed a subsidiary of the iron and steel enterprise Jiangsu Shagang Group Co., Ltd. for the court action.Officials at Shagang Group and Jeju district court could not be reached for comment.
BEIJING — French Foreign Minister Laurent Fabius said a Russia-U.S. deal to remove Syrian President Bashar al-Assad's chemical weapons was an important first step and called for a political solution to address the mounting death toll in Syria.Fabius made the comments to reporters in Beijing after meeting Chinese Foreign Minister Wang Yi.After three days of talks in Geneva, U.S. Secretary of State John Kerry and Russian Foreign Minister Sergei Lavrov on Saturday demanded Assad account for his secret stockpile within a week and let international inspectors eliminate all the weapons by the middle of next year.
BEIJING — China on Sunday welcomed a Russia-U.S. agreement on securing and destroying Syria's chemical weapons, saying it was a peaceful solution to the stockpile issue that could ease the tense situation in the war-torn country.In a diplomatic breakthrough that averts the threat of U.S. military action against Syrian President Bashar Assad's regime for now, American and Russian diplomats in Geneva agreed Saturday on a deal to secure and destroy Syria's chemical weapons."We believe the framework agreement will ease the current tense situation that may be triggered at any moment in Syria and creates new prospects for resolving the chemical weapon issue in Syria through peaceful means," said Foreign Minister Wang Yi.He spoke at the beginning of a meeting with his French counterpart, Laurent Fabius, who was visiting Beijing in a continuing diplomatic drive to end the 2 1/2-year civil war.Fabius said later that questions over the deal remained, including what measures should be taken if the Syrian government fails to adhere to it.France firmly backs the Syrian rebels and has strategic and historic interests in the region. It urged military action after a chemical attack on Aug. 21 that Paris and Washington blame on Assad's government.In contrast, China and Russia have consistently blocked resolutions at the U.N. Security Council aimed at sanctioning Assad's regime.After Sunday's meeting, the French foreign minister said the deal on destroying Syria's chemical weapons was "a significant step forward, but it's a first stage.""On one hand, we are going to move forward with the destruction of chemical weapons — bravo — but on the other hand, hundreds of deaths every day are mounting in Syria and that's also what we must tackle, that is to say find a political solution to the Syrian crisis," Fabius said.He said he would discuss the agreement and its implementation at a meeting Monday in Paris with U.S. Secretary of State John Kerry and British Foreign Secretary William Hague. On Tuesday, he will meet with his Russian counterpart, Sergey Lavrov, in Moscow.Fabius also said a report by U.N. inspectors on last month's chemical weapons attack on the outskirts of Damascus would be published Monday.
Damien Hirst once encrusted a skull with diamonds, and Takashi Murakami has turned out canvases with cartoon versions of skulls. But when the artist Zhang Huan addresses similar iconography, he creates paintings in a style all their own. Sitting in his Shanghai studio one day recently amid dozens of Tibetan death masks, he was busy preparing for the opening on Friday of "Poppy Fields," an exhibition of new works at the Pace Gallery in Chelsea."Poppy Fields" is a fresh direction for an artist whose studio is much like a factory, with over 100 assistants churning out monumental copper sculptures of Buddhas, paintings made of ash collected at temples, doors carved with scenes from the Cultural Revolution, stainless-steel pandas, stuffed cows and horses and, on one occasion, a version of a Handel opera. His notion is that he can produce anything he imagines without regard for consistency."Unlike Western masters, who will stick with one style their entire life until they reach maturity, I am in a constant state of transformation," said Mr. Zhang, interviewed via Skype with the aid of a translator. "I am constantly abandoning old things for new ones, but there is always a thread behind these changes, and that is my DNA."His latest transformation may be the biggest one to date: turning himself into an oil painter with a keen sense of color after a career that has so far been mostly black, white and gray. The new "Poppy Field" works are a striking departure, for example, from those shown in a retrospective at Asia Society in 2007, two years after he moved back to China after almost a decade in New York.In the new paintings, the canvas's surface is covered with hundreds of skulls modeled after Tibetan masks that look like grinning faces with bulging eyes and Cheshire cat smiles. From a distance, the canvases blur into misty fields of color, in white, pink and blue in one instance, and black, red and gold in another. Yet up close, you can see each face in the crowd, as if zooming into a packed stadium from outer space. "The paintings represent the hallucination of happiness and the hallucination of fear and loneliness in this life as well as the hallucination of happiness in the next life," Mr. Zhang said.Asked about his bright hues, he said, "If there's no color in your hallucination, it won't be heaven. It would be hell."Arne Glimcher, Pace's founder, recalls a conversation two years ago in which Mr. Zhang told him that he was working on oil paintings. "I thought it was such a conventional medium for him," he said. "But he told me, 'I will make oil paintings that look different from any other oil paintings.' "It was nearly as big a surprise as when Mr. Glimcher first visited the artist's Shanghai studio in 2006. Mr. Zhang was primarily known then for his visceral performances of the late 1990s, first in the bohemian enclave of Beijing East Village and later, in museums around the United States. (One of his better-known works required him to sit motionless in a public latrine for 10 hours, covered in fish oil and honey, as flies gathered on his body.)Mr. Glimcher was astounded to discover the scale of Mr. Zhang's production line in a studio teeming with sculptures, paintings and installations. This time around, he was equally surprised that the artist could pull off the new paintings with minimal support from his assistants.According to the dealer, Mr. Zhang started each work by creating a computer drawing, planning out the placement of each mask. Given that approach, the paintings look remarkably spontaneous, as if they had evolved organically.Buddhism and death rituals have been abiding subjects for Mr. Zhang, who was ordained as a Buddhist monk eight years ago. During the antireligious oppression of the Cultural Revolution, Mr. Zhang, born in 1965, remembers watching his grandmother go to the temple and burn incense before a statue of a Buddha. In his adulthood, he went regularly to temples; even after moving to New York in 1998, he studied every weekend with the venerated monk Sheng Yen at the Dharma Drum Mountain Center in Queens and later donated statues to the Chuang Yen Monastery, designed by I. M. Pei, in Kent, N.Y.In her catalog essay for "Altered States," the 2007 retrospective at Asia Society, Melissa Chiu, the museum's director, wrote, "Zhang Huan's works from the past 15 years reflect one artist's search for an artistic voice, first in Beijing, then in New York, and finally in Shanghai."Mr. Zhang has placed "a progressive emphasis on Chinese sources with which he finds great inspiration in the shared memory of symbols, stories, and materials of his homeland," she noted. Yet it is his embrace of Tibetan Buddhism, a rare choice in Chinese contemporary art, that distinguishes him from other artists.In 2005, a trip to Tibet irrevocably altered Mr. Zhang's thinking and his art making. "One day in Lhasa, I got up at 4 a.m. and went to the Jokhang Temple, the biggest one in Tibet, and I saw men and women already lining up for miles," Mr. Zhang said. He said he was amazed by the sight of pilgrims crawling to the site in the middle of traffic, in a seeming clash between modernity and ancient tradition. "I have been to the most famous museums in the world, and I have never seen a sight as striking as this," he said.He also witnessed the Tibetan Sky burial, in which a monk eviscerates the human corpse, leaving the flesh as food for vultures and smashing the bones into a grainy dust. The process is supposed to liberate the spirit from the body for peaceful transport into the next life. "Most people, when they see this ceremony, think it is gross and they cannot bear to watch," Mr. Zhang said. "But, when I watch the ceremony, I feel this hallucination of happiness, and I feel free."He promises that at his death, the ritual will constitute his last performance piece.Asked whether Americans would understand his "Poppy Field" paintings, Mr. Zhang said: "If they are alive, they will love these works. But if they are dead, they will buy them."
GUANGZHOU, China — American qualifier Vania King advanced to the second round of the Guangzhou Open by beating 2011 champion Chanelle Scheepers of South Africa 2-6, 6-1, 6-3 Monday.Defending champion Hsieh Su-wei of Taiwan also reached the second round, beating Paula Ormaechea of Argentina 6-1, 6-2, while eighth-seeded Monica Puig of Puerto Rico defeated Nadiya Kichenok of Ukraine 7-5, 7-6 (4).Johanna Konta of Britain, Karolina Pliskova of Czech Republic, Zhang Shuai of China and Galina Voskobeva of Kazakhstan also won.
HONG KONG — China said on Monday it would not tolerate outside interference in the affairs of Hong Kong, rejecting as "thoughtless" a call from a British minister for people in the former British territory to have a genuine political choice.Hong Kong returned to Chinese rule in 1997 with the guarantee of wide-ranging autonomy and an independent judiciary and media under a "one country, two systems" formula.It is the freest city in China, but every year on the anniversary of the handover from Britain, thousands take to the streets demanding fully democratic elections amid mounting fears of increased meddling by Beijing's Communist Party leaders.British Foreign Office minister Hugo Swire, called in a weekend newspaper article for full universal suffrage, saying Hong Kong people should get a genuine choice in its first full election planned for 2017.In Beijing, Foreign Ministry spokesman Hong Lei said China was "extremely dissatisfied at and resolutely opposed to the thoughtless remarks in the article by the British minister about Hong Kong's political development"."Hong Kong's political development is an internal matter for China. Hong Kong's internal affairs will not brook any interference by outside forces," Hong said.Last Friday, Zhang Xiaoming, Beijing's representative in the city, ruled out open nominations for candidates for 2017, saying it was against the Basic Law, a mini-constitution that enshrines the city's freedoms and guides relations with the mainland.Instead, Zhang said candidates could only be selected by a "broadly representative nominating committee".His statement is expected to fuel a pro-democracy movement that is threatening to shut-down Hong Kong's central financial district next July unless the government introduces changes.The election in 2017 will still be the most far-reaching version of democracy on Chinese soil. But analysts say Beijing's hardening stance suggest a continuing conservatism towards significant political reforms under new leader Xi Jinping.
SHANGHAI — Under a black-and-white framed photo of the New York skyline, a bottle of Moet & Chandon champagne cools in the private bridal salon at Tiffany & Co's flagship Shanghai store, while white roses and love poems set the mood for China's Romeo to pop the question to his Juliet.The room, dotted with splashes of the jeweler's iconic eggshell blue, has been busy of late, as young Chinese, drawn by the allure of diamonds, increasingly choose the sparkling gems over traditional gold baubles to mark their marriage vows.China's diamond market, now the world's second largest after the United States, has more than tripled to $22.8 billion over the last five years, according to data from market research firm Euromonitor, steadily gobbling up market share from gold and far outstripping the growth rate in China's 465 billion yuan ($76 billion) jewelry sector."(In China) we now have more and more young people making their declarations and proposal ceremonies within our bridal rooms," said Stephane Lafay, Tiffany's head of Asia Pacific and Japan, who said couples were attracted to the romantic image of the jeweler's well-known "little blue box".At the center of the trend are China's 13 million brides each year, who are increasingly demanding diamonds."All along, my husband and I always thought that we would buy a diamond ring, so it never crossed my mind he might not. I think I'd have been pretty cross if he hadn't," said Zhou Lijuan, 27, an accountant in a state-owned company in Shanghai, with a 50,000 yuan ($8,200) diamond ring.To be sure, gold is still hugely popular in China, both as jewelry and as an investment. The World Gold Council said earlier this year that China was set to challenge India's position as the world's top gold consumer, with 2013 demand soaring more than 20 percent to 1,000 tonnes.But diamonds have steadily increased as a share of China's overall jewelry market, accounting for just under one third now from one quarter five years ago, according to Euromonitor. This has propelled Greater China, including Hong Kong, to the second largest diamond jewelry market after the United States, according to Bain & Co, and along with India, it is expected to be the main driver of growth for the $72 billion global market.The appeal of diamonds, long linked with wedding bells in Europe and America, hasn't always been so strong in China, where the bride-to-be's family was often responsible for supplying a gold-based dowry of rings, bracelets and other trinkets."In my mum's generation, women were really just interested in gold. The woman's family would prepare a gold bracelet themselves, and the man's side would arrange a golden betrothal gift," added Zhou, who got married in 2012.China's modern consumers have much more exposure to Western culture than their parents, including books, films and television that often involve heroines or romantic leads receiving or wearing a diamond ring."Western films have a kind of 'bridge' effect, so when Chandler buys a diamond ring for Monica in 'Friends', it really left a deep impression," said Lily Cai, 30, a civil servant in Shanghai, referring to the hit U.S. television series."A diamond ring is a symbol of love, and the larger the diamond the deeper the love," she added. She now has a diamond ring from Chinese jewelers Chow Tai Fook Jewellery Group Ltd which cost 43,000 yuan.The sparkle of China's diamond industry has tempted jewelers, miners and dealers alike.Global auction house Sotheby's is set to offer a huge white diamond in Hong Kong at the start of October, which would be the most expensive white diamond ever sold at auction if it hits its $28 million lower pre-sale target."From 2006 until now we've seen a threefold increase, close to 200 percent, of Asian buyers purchasing jewelry worldwide. What they've really focused on, of course, is diamonds," said Patti Wong, chairman of Sotheby's Asia, who added Chinese buyers were showing increasing confidence about snapping up the most expensive gems.De Beers, the largest diamond producer by value and majority-owned by miner Anglo American Plc, sees China as driving growth over the next four years. It has five diamond-focused outlets in China with more set to open this year.The incentive is clear. Tiffany's Lafay said over the last 20 years, the number of people buying diamond engagement rings has risen from less than 1 percent to more than 50 percent in urban China. More than half of the country's 1.3 billion population now live in cities.Even traditionally gold-focused jewelers, such as China's Chow Tai Fook, are looking to up exposure to diamonds. The world's biggest jewelry retailer by market value, it recently struck a deal with Russian miner AK Alrosa OAO to ensure its diamond supply."Mainland Chinese are becoming more westernized, so they tend to select diamond rings for their engagement proposal and wedding," said Chow Tai Fook's managing director Kent Wong.China will also be a critical market for Rio Tinto Plc's diamond business, after the world's No. 3 miner scrapped a planned sale of the unit earlier this year. Rio Tinto has now set up links with Chow Tai Fook, and last week invited 100 jewelry experts in Hong Kong to see its latest diamond haul."Going forward China will be the engine for growth in global retail diamond jewelry consumption," said Jean-Marc Lieberherr, managing director of Rio Tinto's diamonds and minerals division. He forecast low double-digit growth in China and said the firm was directing more of its production into the Chinese market.China's bridegrooms may not be quite so convinced as their demanding brides, but the wives-to-be usually win in the end, conceded Yu Peidi, 27, a salesman in Shanghai, who proposed to his now-wife in 2011."Women are always getting together to compare, telling friends and colleagues that their husband has bought them such and such a diamond ring. Just talking about having a diamond seems to keep them happy," he said.
GUANGZHOU, China — Bojana Jovanovski ousted top-seeded Sorana Cirstea 6-2, 6-1 in the first round of the Guangzhou Open on Tuesday.Jovanovski set up a second-round match against American qualifier Vania King, who defeated 2011 champion Chanelle Scheepers on Monday.No. 2-seeded Alize Cornet, No. 3 Laura Robson, and No. 4 Peng Shuai, an easy 6-3, 6-4 winner over 2009 champion Shahar Peer, also won their openers.
BEIJING — China's Health Ministry reminded hospitals on Tuesday that they are not allowed to push the sale of baby milk to new mothers after Chinese state television said Danone had bribed hospital staff to give its milk powder to new-born babies.China Central Television said the company's Dumex unit had paid medical staff at a city hospital in Tianjin to promote its products, allegations that the French food group said it was shocked by and would investigate immediately.The ministry, in a statement on its website in response to the report, said existing laws on promoting breast milk and not allowing medical personnel to promote the sale of baby milk must be followed."Medical establishments and their staff are banned from pushing or promoting substitute products for breast milk on mothers and families of infants ... (They must) actively promote and push breastfeeding," it added.Staff who broke the rules or accepted bribes would be severely punished, the statement said.Milk powder is a highly sensitive topic in China after a scandal in 2008 when melamine added to baby milk killed at least six children and left thousands ill.International guidelines, used in China, say doctors should promote breastfeeding unless there are medical reasons not to.Corruption in China's healthcare industry is widespread, fuelled in part by low base salaries for doctors at the country's 13,500 public hospitals.China has been cracking down in recent months on graft in various industries, with foreign companies in regulators' sights.
BEIJING — China has begun flight operations at the world's highest civilian airport in a bid to boost tourism and tighten political control over the country's restive west.At an elevation of 4,411 meters (14,472 feet) above sea level, Daocheng Yading Airport replaces the previous champion, Bangda Airport in the Tibet Autonomous Region, which sits at 4,334 meters (14,219 feet).Aircraft engines produce less thrust at such elevations because of the much thinner air, calling for longer runways. The one at Daocheng Yading is 4,200 meters (13,780 feet) long, just 242 meters (794 feet) shorter than the longest runway at New York's John F. Kennedy International Airport.Passengers are also warned of light-headedness and other symptoms of altitude sickness on arrival.State media Tuesday said flights from the new airport that began Monday will slash travel time from scenic Daocheng Yading to Sichuan's provincial capital of Chengdu from two days by bus to just 65 minutes. Other routes are to begin by the end of the month, the reports said.The region is a gateway to Tibet, one that Beijing has sought to promote for tourism as way of tamping down dissent among the native Tibetan population and stabilizing the area through economic development.Beijing has peppered the region with airports that see little business and spent $3.68 billion building the world's highest rail line over permafrost to Tibet's capital, Lhasa.Daocheng Yading is a scenic area rechristened "Shangri-la" over a decade ago in the hopes that tourists would be drawn by the reference to the mythical Himalayan land described in James Hilton's 1933 novel.However, the surrounding Garzi Tibetan Autonomous Prefecture has also been a hotbed of political unrest, including numerous self-immolations seen as protests against Chinese rule.The shortened travel time will make it far easier to send troops to the region in the event of major unrest, as last occurred across traditionally Tibetan parts of Sichuan in 2008.
BEIJING — Lawyers for the family of a Chinese man allegedly tortured to death during an internal Communist Party investigation were thrown out of the court on Tuesday at the start of the landmark, sensitive trial of six party officials accused of the crime.Yu Qiyi, 42, a chief engineer for a state-owned investment firm in the eastern city of Wenzhou, drowned in April after being dunked repeatedly in a bucket of ice-cold water, state media said last week.The accusations have shed light on the secret workings of the party's own internal judicial system, one lawyers say is rife with abuse.The officials - five from the party's corruption watchdog, the Central Commission for Discipline Inspection, and a prosecutor - were indicted on charges of intentional infliction of harm leading to death. They face a maximum penalty of death.But on the first day of the trial in Quzhou, a city not far from Wenzhou, the judge refused to allowed Pu Zhiqiang, a lawyer representing Yu's family, to question the first defendant, and then threw him and his colleague out of the court."They've expelled us and not allowed us to ask questions of the defendant, which is our legal right ... We're extremely angry about this," Pu told Reuters.Pu added that the court had also banned the use of the name of the official who probably first ordered the probe into Yu, saying he could only be referred to as "the leader"."It's totally over the top," he said. "These six people have simply been picked to take the blame."Yu's ex-wife, Wu Qian, who was allowed to remain in court, said the party was trying to protect the real instigators of Yu's death by getting the court to ban questions about who was behind the original investigation.The court did not answer telephone calls seeking comment.Chi Susheng, lawyer for Li Xiang, one of the accused, said she was equally angry at the court's behaviour, as her client wanted to use the opportunity to apologise."Li Xiang's evidence is what brought this case to court," Cui told Reuters. "He wants to be able to apologise in court to the family."Reuters was not immediately able to locate lawyers for the other five accused. Neither the government nor the party has publicly given an account of what happened. The story has received limited coverage in state-run media.It is not precisely clear why Yu was being investigated, according to his family's lawyers. Si Weijiang, another lawyer who has advised the family, said it was possibly because of improprieties related to a land deal.Yu had spent 38 days under "shuanggui", a form of extra-legal detention imposed on party officials being investigated for disciplinary violations.Ousted Chinese politician Bo Xilai was subjected to "shuanggui" for 17 months before facing trial last month on charges of corruption and abuse of power.During his trial, Bo recanted an earlier confession to party investigators saying it was made under psychological pressure. A verdict is expected in the coming weeks.Investigators put Yu's head in a bucket of ice-cold water and held it down repeatedly, eventually causing his death, according to Si. Yu was also beaten and his body scarred by what appeared to be cigarette butt marks.Yu's death comes as China wages war on corruption. President Xi Jinping has pledged to go after "tigers" and "flies" in the battle against graft, referring to both political heavyweights and low-ranked officials.Pu said Yu, who was made to strip naked before interrogators dunked his head, struggled and shouted during the questioning session, citing the indictment.Photographs of Yu taken by family members after his death showed an emaciated man who was "black and blue", Pu said.Si said authorities had worked to keep information about the trial under wraps such as preventing lawyers from photocopying evidence and restricting the number of lawyers the family could hire.The question of who authorised the harsh treatment of Yu remained largely unanswered, Pu said, adding the six officials were carrying out orders from the disciplinary commission."Who approved the use of such torture? The bucket and the ice cold water were already prepared in that place in advance," Pu said, speaking earlier. "These people have not been investigated yet."Most Chinese criminal trials are over within days, often after just a single day. The country's courts rarely acquit defendants in criminal cases.
BEIJING — China will crack down on penalties paid by families flouting strict family planning rules after a National Audit Office probe found $260 million in fines had been levied illegally, state media reported.There has been growing public anger about the one-child policy, which was introduced in the late 1970s to prevent population growth spiralling out of control.The policy covers 63 percent of China, although family planning rules have been loosened over the years to allow some couples to have a second child.The audit office's investigation of 45 counties in nine provinces and municipalities from 2009-12 found 1.6 billion yuan ($260 million) in fines had been given out in contravention of the rules, Chinese newspapers said on Thursday.The "social support fee" - the fine - is meant to go towards the government budget to compensate for resources and public services the child would use.National Health and Family Planning Commission spokesman Mao Qunan said the fines are "a means to ensure the implementation of the one-child policy", according to the official Xinhua news agency.His department is now pushing "related local family planning departments to rectify misconduct in the collection and management of such fines", the report said.The ministry "will take effective measures to address problems uncovered from the auditing process and improve the system on the collection and management of fines", Xinhua said."The commission will tighten supervision and guide local family planning departments to publish information for public scrutiny," it said.The audit office found that problems included inaccurate reports of the number of extra children parents had, fees not successfully collected and officials handing out higher fines than they should have.However, the figure reported for the amount of fines illegally collected falls far short of the more than 16.5 billion yuan activists say provincial governments have failed to account for.
GUANGZHOU, China — Qualifiers Vania King of the United States and Johanna Konta of Britain made it to the Guangzhou Open quarterfinals on Wednesday.King, a main-draw winner as a qualifier for the fourth time this year, defeated Bojana Jovanovski of Serbia 6-4, 0-6, 6-4 to reach her first quarterfinals in 14 months.Konta upset No. 4-seeded Shuai Peng of China 6-1, 6-3 to book her first career quarterfinal against another Chinese, Shuai Zhang, a 6-2, 6-2 winner over defending champion Su-wei Hsieh of Taiwan.Other second-round winners included No. 2 Alize Cornet of France, No. 3 Laura Robson of Britain, and No. 8 Monica Puig from Puerto Rico.
BEIJING — A Chinese court will announce its verdict on ousted former senior politician Bo Xilai on Sunday following his trial last month on charges of corruption and abuse of power.China's courts come under the control of the ruling Communist Party and are certain to find Bo guilty. State media, which speaks for the party, has already all but condemned him."The Jinan Intermediate People's Court hereby announces that it will announce a verdict in defendant Bo Xilai's bribery, corruption and abuse of power case on September 22, 2013, at 10 a.m. (3:00 a.m. British time)," the court in eastern China's Shandong province, where Bo was tried, said on its microblog.Prosecutors demanded a heavy sentence for Bo on the final day of his divisive, dramatic trial, saying his "whimsical" challenge to the charges flew in the face of the evidence.Hong Kong's South China Morning Post cited a source as saying the case could drag on as Bo is likely to appeal.Bo was a rising star in China's leadership circles when his career was stopped short last year by a murder scandal in which his wife, Gu Kailai, was convicted of poisoning a British businessman, Neil Heywood, who had been a family friend.Bo, who was Communist Party chief of the southwestern metropolis of Chongqing, had mounted an unexpectedly feisty defence during his five-day trial, denouncing testimony against him by his wife as the ravings of a mad woman.Bo repeatedly said he was not guilty of any of the charges, though he admitted making some bad decisions and shaming his country by his handling of former Chongqing police chief, Wang Lijun, who first told Bo that Gu had probably murdered Heywood.Wang fled to the U.S. consulate in the nearby city of Chengdu in February last year after confronting Bo with evidence that Gu was involved in the murder. Wang was also jailed last year for covering up the crime.The state prosecutor said Bo should not be shown leniency as he had recanted admissions of guilt provided ahead of the trial.Bo could theoretically be given the death penalty for the charges, but many observers say that is unlikely as the party will not want to make a martyr of a man whose left-leaning social welfare policies won much popular support.Legal experts have said they thought the details of the actual charges laid against Bo suggested he would be spared the death penalty.
BEIJING — A Chinese court announced that it will deliver a verdict Sunday against disgraced politician Bo Xilai on charges of bribery, embezzlement and abuse of power in a case set in motion by his wife's murder of a British businessman.The former Politburo member and Chongqing city party leader vigorously defended himself during his trial last month in the eastern city of Jinan, acknowledging mistakes in his leadership but admitting no guilt in the charges against him.Prosecutors accused him of interfering with the investigation into his wife's murder of Briton Neil Heywood in November 2011, as well as other corruption uncovered by investigators. However, the case against him also was widely perceived as a result of his downfall in factional infighting ahead of China's leadership transition last fall.The Jinan Intermediate People's Court said Wednesday on its Twitter-like Sina Weibo account that the verdict will be announced at 10 a.m. on Sunday, which will be a work day in China following a holiday.In a sign of the event's importance and sensitivity, a hotel near the court that served as the venue for news conferences during Bo's trial is taking reservations only from accredited journalists through Monday, in an apparent effort to keep away members of the public, where Bo continues to command considerable support.Security was tight during the five-day trial, but in a rare display of openness, the court regularly released chunks of the transcript, revealing a surprising amount of detail for such a major political trial. Legal analysts said the transparency was less a sign of legal reform than a desire by China's leadership to lend credibility to a process believed to have a foregone conclusion."The verdict may appear to be come from the court, but it is from the highest leadership," said Han Deqiang, an economist at Beijing University of Aeronautics and Astronautics and a staunch supporter of Bo. "If we simply go by the law of innocence until proven, he is clearly not guilty, but the prosecution presumed his guilt and there are other factors such as politics," Han said.Bo, who was removed from office in March and expelled from the Communist Party in September, is the highest-ranking Chinese official to stand trial since former Shanghai party chief Chen Liangyu in 2008. Convicted of financial fraud, abuse of power and accepting bribery, Chen was sentenced to 18 years in prison. Chen did not appeal the court decision.The corruption charges against Bo carry a possible penalty of death, but many observers believe he will not receive the maximum sentence.Li Zhuang, a Beijing-lawyer who was jailed in Chongqing under Bo's rule and who has been closely following Bo's case, said Bo would be sentenced to at least 20 years in jail given the charges against him. Given Bo's spirited defense in the trial, he is likely to try to appeal any guilty verdict, Li said.Prosecutors accused Bo of netting $4.3 million through embezzlement facilitated by his wife, Gu Kailai, and through bribes given to his family by a businessman, including a French villa, expenses-paid vacations and fancy delicacies such as abalone. He also was accused of interfering in the investigation into Gu, who was convicted of murdering Heywood in a separate trial last year.During court testimony, Bo denounced the prosecution's key witnesses — including his wife and his former police chief and right-hand man, Wang Lijun. Bo said his wife was crazy and that Wang was dishonest, while portraying himself as a well-intentioned official too busy to closely scrutinize the people in his inner circle. Gu testified that Bo knew about the bribes because she told him about them.Prosecutors said Bo's crimes were "extremely grave" and urged the court to hand out a severe punishment given that Bo refused to admit guilt."It was very clear that the prosecutors said there was no ground for leniency," Li said.Li Xiaolin, another prominent Beijing lawyer, said Bo is likely to be sentenced to 15 years in prison and that he may not bother with an appeal."What's the use of appealing? It would be futile," Li said. "But he may issue some statement."The scandal began to unfold in February 2012 when Wang — after having a fallout with Bo — fled to a U.S. consulate with information about the Heywood murder and unsuccessfully sought political refuge in a severe breach of Communist Party rules. Heywood's death initially had been ruled as due to excessive drinking, and Britain later demanded a renewed investigation, sparking an international diplomatic incident for the Chinese leadership.
BEIJING — North Korea's senior nuclear strategist called Wednesday for a new round of six-nation denuclearization talks without preconditions, a proposal unlikely to gain traction in Washington.First Vice Foreign Minister Kim Kye Gwan's remarks in Beijing came at a forum marking the 10th anniversary of the talks, which have been stalled since the last round in 2008 broke down over how to verify North Korea was meeting its pledges."We are ready to enter the six-party talks without preconditions," Kim was quoted as saying by South Korea's Yonhap news agency.U.S. officials have rejected holding new discussions before the North makes a clear commitment to carry out earlier promises to disarm, saying holding new talks that go nowhere will only undermine the six-party framework."The onus is on North Korea here to take meaningful actions toward denuclearization and refrain from provocations," State Department spokeswoman Marie Harf told reporters in Washington.South Korea and Japan are also suspicious of calls to restart the six-nation talks. The other two parties to the talks, Russia and China, have been more supportive of getting the dialogue back on track.In his speech to the forum, Chinese Foreign Minister Wang Yi said the parties should seize on a warming trend on the Korean Peninsula to take whatever actions are needed to restart talks."The situation on the peninsula was relatively stable when each party actively participated in negotiations. The situation was tense or even directionless when the talks stalemated," Wang said.Since the breakdown in talks, Pyongyang has ramped up tensions with a third nuclear test and a long-range rocket launch, prompting a tightening of U.N. sanctions against the isolated communist regime. Recent months have seen the North take a more moderate line as it sought to restart contacts with Seoul and repair ties with China, its most important ally.The 10th anniversary forum had been promoted as a way of highlighting the achievements of the negotiations, but there were no immediate signs that it had brought the sides any closer.The U.S. Embassy in Beijing said that it was sending a diplomat to attend only as an observer and that there were no plans to meet with any North Korean representatives.Washington is focused on building consensus among the other six-party nations to increase pressure on Pyongyang.U.S. Secretary of State John Kerry is due to meet his Chinese counterpart Wang in Washington on Thursday, and North Korea's nuclear program will be a key part of their discussions, Harf said.
BEIJING — If you want to Lean In in Chinese, you "Take One Step Forward." That's how the title of Sheryl Sandberg's contemporary feminist manifesto, "Lean In: Women, Work and the Will to Lead," has been translated here.And you do it with gusto, judging from the reactions of about a thousand students and businesspeople at two events in Beijing last week where Ms. Sandberg, the chief operating officer of Facebook, promoted the new Chinese version of her book."People were hungry for it," Allison Ye, co-founder of a "Lean In circle" in Beijing — a small group of peers who meet to talk about the book's message — said of the response to Ms. Sandberg's main point: overcome your internal barriers to success and get to the deal table.The enthusiasm suggests an intriguing possibility: As the Chinese government strikes anew against freedom of speech, detaining even mild-mannered democracy activists, civil society advocates and popular public opinion leaders, might there be a feminist revolution in China before there is a democratic one?In recent weeks, Lean In circles have set up in half a dozen universities in the capital, including Tsinghua University, Peking University and the Communication University of China, members said in interviews."I feel like this is a new stage for us," said Ms. Ye, 27, who works for a Chinese company. "I can't speak for everyone, but I feel that despite the cultural differences between America and China, the method is universal. I feel it's true that you can take responsibility for yourself, it's a good thing, and then you can change your situation."Of course, feminism in China predates Ms. Sandberg's book. But it has gained new focus with the arrival of the movement here. Ms. Ye's conversion began in March, when she chanced online upon a TED talk given by Ms. Sandberg in 2010 called "Why we have too few women leaders." She was hooked."I was shaken," she said. "I said to myself, 'Who is she?' Everything she said was, wow! So true. I watched it three times in one day. Then I bought an English copy of her book."With a friend, we said, 'Why don't we open a Lean In circle? We want to support Chinese women and help them set up their own circles."'Word spread, including to 21-year-old Carrie Huang. Two weeks ago, Ms. Huang set up a circle at the prestigious Renmin University of China, where she studies finance. "My friends and I, we all felt that we do that — we underestimate ourselves," she said in an interview. "It has to do with our education and background. Our parents tell us, 'You are girls, get yourself a stable life and don't have too much ambition."'Many young Chinese women, especially in cities, are highly educated and beginning to overtake men in some college subjects — Ms. Huang said there were 16 women and 7 men in her finance class — but deep cultural messages hold them back."We fear we aren't good enough. We lack confidence," Ms. Huang said, adding that many women in China prioritize their boyfriends' or husbands' goals. "What we need is the courage to try different things," she said. "It's about discovering what you want to do. Parents have wishes for us, and it's hard to change."At their weekly meetings, Ms. Huang said, she and her half-dozen "circlers," some of whom are male, plan to raise specific questions. "We want to talk about 'strong women' and how men see them — as aggressive or bossy?"Not everyone likes the Chinese translation of the book's impactful English title. Some snickered that it was similar to the message found in men's public urinals to "please take a step forward."Ms. Huang says it doesn't quite catch the psychological nature of Ms. Sandberg's message. "It makes it sound like it's about overcoming external obstacles, taking a step forward," she said. "But actually, this book is about overcoming your inner obstacles."Either way, experienced Chinese feminists have welcomed it."I think her message is definitely an empowering one, calling for more women to get to the deal table," said Feng Yuan, an activist for gender rights and equality.Still, it is only one response to the daunting cultural and institutional hurdles facing women in China, Ms. Feng said."I don't think the personal approach can change the fundamentally unequal gender structures," she said. "But in terms of a woman's individual situation, it's useful because a lot of women fear feminism, that kind of collective call. A personal message is workable."It may not work for uneducated, poor or rural women, Ms. Feng said, an echo of criticism that the book has received in the West. "Her target audience is educated and ambitious women, and these women are able to mobilize resources to achieve their goals," she said."But we shouldn't be too critical," she said. "You can't expect her to have a formula for all women's rights. Even the very well educated need this, and they should have it."Ms. Huang and Ms. Ye say China is ready for "Lean In," regardless of the tight political atmosphere."I think everything we do in the Lean In circle is positive," Ms. Huang said. "We're not in violation of anything, so we should be O.K."Ms. Ye said: "I've thought about it because I'm very careful. I think if the government allowed Sheryl Sandberg to promote her book, then the government supports the content of her book." Adding some irony to the situation, Facebook is barred from China's censored Internet."A lot of what she says fits with the Chinese government's message," Ms. Ye said. "I think as long as we stay within a circle, it's not threatening at all."
BEIJING — Divers have found the body of a missing U.S. stunt pilot whose plane crashed into a lake in northeast China while attempting a tricky maneuver in the rain, the head of the team searching for him said Friday.David Riggs, whose U.S. pilot's license had been suspended, had been missing since Tuesday's accident outside the city of Shenyang in which his young female Chinese translator died. Riggs was in China to take part in an air show and was apparently rehearsing one of his tricks when the accident occurred.Zhang Fang said Riggs' body was found during a search of the bottom of Lake Caihu by divers from the Dalian branch of the Beihai Rescue Bureau."It's likely he was killed on impact, but we don't know for sure yet," Fang said by telephone from the accident scene.Riggs' high-performance single-engine Lancair 320 plane broke into pieces after hitting the lake and some parts had been recovered, including one of its two seats. The cause of the accident remains under investigation. The plane was not equipped with a "black box" recorder because of its small size.Zhang said Riggs crashed while attempting a stunt in which the wheels of his plane were to drag along the lake surface at high speed. He had just taken off in a light rain, but there was no indication he had violated any flying regulations, Zhang said. Other reports said Chinese officials had urged Riggs not to take off, but Zhang said he had no information about that.Riggs was a well-known Hollywood stunt pilot, and the center of considerable controversy over a string of legal problems and penchant for self-promotion.Riggs' website touts his credentials as a holder of several aviation speed world records, but doesn't mention the fact his U.S. pilot's license had been suspended twice.The first time was after buzzing the famed Santa Monica pier in Los Angeles in his Vodochody L-39 Albatros jet trainer. Riggs was sentenced to 60 days of community service and 60 days in jail for reckless flying.He lost his license again in November for selling rides in his plane without permission. The prosecution came after a plane piloted by a business partner crashed, killing both people on board.Riggs had a stack of other legal problems, including convictions for bank, wire and passport fraud. He aroused such contempt among some pilots that a website — aviationcriminal.com — was devoted to chronicling his misdoings.His website describes him as CEO of California-based Mach One Aviation, Inc. and as a "Hollywood stunt pilot, movie producer and world aviation speed record holder." It said his aerial performances had featured in movies and television shows including "Iron Man," ''Jarhead," and the James Bond film "Casino Royale."China's official Xinhua News Agency said other U.S. flyers scheduled to take part in Friday's opening ceremony had pulled out of the show. Pilots and aircraft from Sweden, France and Lithuania were due to take part in the show.
TAIPEI, Taiwan — Thousands of people crowded the harbor of a Taiwanese city on Thursday to welcome a giant floating yellow rubber duck.The 18-meter (59-foot) duck is a huge version of the bathtub toys loved by children. It was created by Dutch artist Florentijn Hofman, who has taken various versions around the world to spread a message of happiness.The sun was shining in Kaohsiung city to the delight of fans who had feared that the duck's arrival might be delayed by an approaching typhoon. News reports said city officials hope their iconic guest will attract about 3 million visitors and generate tens of millions of dollars in revenue.It is to remain in the city until Oct. 20, when it will begin visiting other locations in Taiwan."It keeps on smiling to you, you know. It says, 'don't you worry, laugh, be happy!'" Hofman said Thursday. "This big rubber duck in your harbor, in Kaohsiung in this case, changes Kaohsiung. And it changes also your fantasy and your brain. And it's a piece of art."
WASHINGTON — Caroline Kennedy faced a friendly U.S. Senate confirmation hearing on Thursday on her nomination as President Barack Obama's next ambassador to Japan, amid memories of her father, the late U.S. President John F. Kennedy, and uncles who served in the chamber."This appointment has a special significance as we commemorate the fiftieth anniversary of my father's presidency. I am conscious of my responsibility to uphold the ideals he represented - a deep commitment to public service, a more just America and a more peaceful world," Kennedy said.She noted her father had hoped to be the first sitting U.S. president to make a state visit to Japan. John F. Kennedy, a World War Two veteran who had fought against Japan in the Pacific, was felled by an assassin's bullet when she was a young girl, as was her uncle Robert, a U.S. senator and attorney general.Members of the Senate Foreign Relations Committee asked about touchy issues such as trade policy, the thousands of U.S. troops based in Japan and relations with China, but made clear they expected Kennedy would easily be confirmed to the high-profile post."I doubt you're going to get much of a hard time here for lots of reasons," Senator Bob Corker, the top Republican on the committee, told the nominee as the hearing began.Kennedy, a lawyer, is president of the John F. Kennedy Library Foundation and chairs an advisory committee at the Institute of Politics at Harvard University. Active in Democratic politics, the 55-year-old was an early and prominent supporter of Obama in his initial quest for the presidency in 2008.If confirmed as expected by the full Senate, she would be the first woman to serve as U.S. ambassador to Japan."Ms. Kennedy, your uncle Ted was a good friend to me here in the Senate and a good friend to many of our colleagues," said Senator Robert Menendez, chairman of the panel, referring to the late Senator Edward Kennedy, who held his Senate seat for half a century.Edward Kennedy's widow Victoria attended, as did first-term U.S. Representative Joseph Kennedy, a cousin of the nominee."I know that Ted is very proud today to have you here continuing a long family tradition of outstanding service to our nation," said Republican Senator John McCain, who ran against Obama in the 2008 presidential race.Senator Ed Markey, a Democrat and former congressman elected to her late uncle's Massachusetts Senate seat this year, told Kennedy that her family had inspired him to enter politics.Japan is a particularly close and important ally of the United States. Many past ambassadors have been well-known political figures, including former Vice President Walter Mondale.Kennedy's stature as a close Obama ally and leading member of a storied U.S. political dynasty sends a strong signal about the value the United States places on the relationship. Japan's ambassador to Washington, Kenichiro Sasae, attended the hearing.The foreign relations panel will vote on Kennedy's nomination at its next business meeting, before it would be sent to the full Senate for approval.
GUANGZHOU, China — American qualifer Vania King advanced to the semifinals of Guangzhou Open on Thursday when the three remaining seeded players were upset.Also, unseeded Yvonne Meusburger of Austria upset second-seeded Alize Cornet of France 6-4, 6-1. Zheng Jie beat third-seeded Laura Robson of Britain 1-6, 7-6 (6), 6-2.King will face Zheng in the semifinals, and Shuai will face Meusburger.
BEIJING — Debt trailed Governor Rick Snyder to China last week, where he tried to entice cash-rich Chinese to invest in his state, Michigan, and its tarnished jewel, the bankrupt city of Detroit.But here's the odd thing — it wasn't just the $18 billion Detroit owes that was on everyone's lips, or the financial restructuring under way, which seemed to impress and provided the focus of much local coverage of the visit.Instead, Chinese reporters wanted the governor's advice on how China should handle its own municipal debt, the scale of which is unknown but may be large — perhaps unmanageably large in some areas. Earlier this year, a former finance minister, Xiang Huaicheng, said local government debt might total as much as 20 trillion renminbi, or about $3.3 trillion, according to Reuters."To prevent the emergence of 'reproduction Detroits"' in China, audit teams from Beijing have fanned out across the country in recent weeks to check the books of local governments and state-run companies, several Chinese news outlets quoted the Communist Party-friendly, Hong Kong-based Ta Kung Pao newspaper as saying. Ta Kung Pao called it "the biggest and most effective debt audit in Chinese history."Mr. Snyder, an accountant by training whose Twitter username is @onetoughnerd, was diplomatic about giving advice when answering the first question from a Chinese reporter at a media event at the China Club in Beijing."I am proud to say I am the token accountant governor in the United States," he said. His translator looked puzzled."Yeah. The only one," he added, helpfully. "I may not be very exciting, but we balance our books and pay our debt." Point made.Over all, "With respect to Chinese municipalities, what I would say is, I wouldn't want to speak about them specifically because one thing is, there's many ways to deal with debt questions," he said. "Detroit is relatively unique in terms of having a huge debt burden."I would say that Chinese municipalities might find it interesting to watch how we handle things in Detroit because we are putting in place a number of best practices to help better manage long-term debt as we emerge from the restructuring," he said.Earlier, in an interview with American reporters, Mr. Snyder had been a little more specific. ("Being an old accountant, I could probably put you to sleep," he said.) A key problem is that local governments frequently build budgets upon inaccurate revenue forecasting, he said."So what they'll do quite often is they'll go through a political process to come up with what their revenue estimate is," then discover it was an unreal assessment, he said. That is "the single most likely area where a municipality will blow it, on a consistent basis."As any good business manager knows, a way to get out of debt is to increase revenue. And the governor was here not to dispense advice to China but to sell Michigan, and Detroit.His pitch covered trade and tourism, and it hit the spot in cultural terms. Chinese value fresh food: Want to fish in one of Michigan's thousands of lakes, then eat your morning catch for lunch? Play golf, or buy a waiting-list-only, Michigan-made wristwatch? Import blueberries, an increasingly popular food here? How about a bigger slice of the global automotive business, summed up by the legendary persona of "Hengli Fute," or Henry Ford, a household name here. The state of Michigan and Detroit have an awful lot to offer, was the carefully calibrated message."One of the things I think is really important is to recognize the comeback of Detroit is already under way," he told the American reporters. Jobs are being created and buildings bought, and there is even a squeeze on downtown and midtown housing, he said.But there is also land for sale — more than 30 square miles, or about 80 square kilometers. That might be something real-estate-focused China would be interested in, but the governor seemed careful not to appear too needy. He pushed back on the suggestion that Detroit was a "distressed asset.""It's the value place to go," he said. "Not the distressed asset one; I wouldn't use the word distressed. It's really a value opportunity.""Detroit is going to come back in any case," he said. "What I would say is, I think Chinese investment could be an important influence and accelerator to the comeback. But again, it is not a central piece of it, but it could be a very helpful and useful piece that could be mutually beneficial."It was Mr. Snyder's third trip to China in three years, taking in Chongqing and Shanghai, too, and he had brought Michigan businesspeople with him. There was also a foray to Japan — over a week, in all.It was billed mostly as a relationship-building exercise, but there is already evidence of real Chinese investment. In December, Chongqing Helicopter Investment Company bought Enstrom Helicopter Corporation, in the city of Menominee. In May, work began on an expansion expected to nearly double the size of its facility, adding 150 to 200 new jobs, according to statements on the company Web site.But the tough edge of China's development strategy — long focused on acquiring technology from developed countries by any method necessary, whether legal, illegal or extralegal — was also on display during the governor's visit."You invited Chinese companies to invest in Detroit and Michigan," a reporter for Global Times, a nationalistic newspaper owned by People's Daily, the Communist Party flagship, said at the Chinese media event. "Do you think it is possible for the Chinese companies to get access to some key technologies in the U.S. companies, especially in the automobile sector?"Mr. Snyder didn't directly answer that question, instead underlining that he would support Chinese companies in finding talent and building their customer and supplier relationships, "the most important things for long-term business success."
BEIJING — A verdict and sentence in the case of Bo Xilai, the former high-ranking official whose downfall shook the Communist Party, will be announced Sunday, Chinese authorities said on Wednesday.A short statement from the court in the city of Jinan in Shandong Province, where Mr. Bo's trial was held in August, said it would pronounce judgment on Mr. Bo, who is accused of bribery, embezzlement and abuse of power.Political analysts said they expected Mr. Bo to be found guilty and receive a lengthy prison sentence. Estimates of his sentence ranged from 15 to 20 years at the low end to life in prison. It is highly unlikely that he will receive the death penalty, they said.Mr. Bo, the former party chief in the city of Chongqing, fell from power in March 2012, weeks after his former police chief fled to an American consulate with accusations that Mr. Bo's wife, Gu Kailai, was involved in the murder of Neil Heywood, a British family associate. Ms. Gu was found guilty last year of killing Mr. Heywood and received a suspended death sentence.During his five-day trial last month, Mr. Bo denied having received $3.56 million from two businessmen. He was allowed to defend himself, and he and his lawyers were permitted to cross-examine witnesses.Transcripts of the trial were made public, including descriptions of squabbles within the Bo family and the upscale lifestyle of Ms. Gu and the couple's son, Bo Guagua.But some sections of the transcript, in which Mr. Bo described pressure by Communist Party investigators to confess, were kept out of the public record.Since the trial, legal scholars in China have debated whether its relative transparency will contribute to any progress toward establishing an independent judiciary with due process, or whether it amounted to political theater used by the party for its own ends.Since the trial, other senior figures have been accused of corruption, including Jiang Jiemin, a Central Committee member close to Zhou Yongkang, the country's former security chief and an ally of Mr. Bo. Mr. Jiang was fired from his job overseeing state-owned corporations earlier this month.
BEIJING — Security forces in China's far western Xinjiang region last month shot and killed at least 12 men and wounded 20 others during a raid on what the authorities described as a terrorist facility, Radio Free Asia reported Wednesday.The killings took place more than three weeks ago in a small village near the city of Kashgar, but details emerged only in recent days. Local officials told Radio Free Asia that the men had been building and testing explosives at a desert encampment in the village, Jigdejay; local police officers, reached by telephone Wednesday, declined to comment or said they knew nothing about the raid.The raid comes at a time of escalating tension between the Chinese authorities and the region's ethnic Uighurs, a Muslim, Turkic-speaking people who have long complained of restrictive policies they say are aimed at curtailing their language and religious practices. Since June, at least 100 people have been killed during clashes in the oasis towns and cities that hug the vast Taklamakan Desert in southern Xinjiang, home to the majority of China's nine million Uighurs.Although some of the violence has involved Uighurs' attacking Han Chinese in what analysts describe as improvised acts of ethnic bloodletting, exile groups and human rights organizations say much of the bloodshed has resulted from harsh police tactics against protests and unauthorized religious gatherings. Chinese officials usually describe the same incidents as acts of terrorism by "separatists" or religious extremists, although they rarely provide details or evidence to back up these claims.As with much of the recent violence in Xinjiang, the Chinese state media did not cover the raid on Aug. 23 in Jigdejay, and many of the details remained murky. Local officials and residents told Radio Free Asia that dozens of armed police officers swarmed a covert munitions center where about 30 men had gathered.One resident said the police were tipped off to the presence of the encampment after a rocket launcher the men were trying to build accidentally exploded, killing one of them. "They were hiding inside there and practicing how to make some sort of explosives," Yasin Ahun-Karim, a local religious leader, told Radio Free Asia, which is financed by the American government. "Their activities were discovered by a police helicopter, and police acted immediately to clean up the place."Another resident who witnessed the raid said the dead were buried on the spot.The raid on the desert encampment followed another deadly raid three days earlier in nearby Yilkiqi township, where at least 15 Uighur men were shot and killed as they prayed together. The authorities described the dead as terrorists engaged in "illegal religious activities" and said they were training for an attack, although the only weapons recovered at the scene were knives and axes.In recent weeks, the authorities have been announcing stiff sentences for those arrested during the latest spate of unrest. Last week, three Uighur men were sentenced to death for their role in a bloody clash in Lukchun township last spring that left as many as 46 people dead. In August, two other men were given the death penalty for another clash near Kashgar that killed at least 21 people.
BEIJING — A year after their China sales were battered by protests in a territorial dispute, Japan's big automakers are finding it tough to bounce back in the Chinese market. In particular, they are struggling where demand for cars is rising fastest — in provinces where anti-Japan sentiment historically runs deepest, a legacy of Japanese occupation around World War II.In relatively more Japan-friendly parts of southern China like Guangdong, Toyota Motor, Nissan Motor and Honda Motor are returning to sales levels near those seen before a diplomatic row last September over a group of rocky, uninhabited islets in the sea between China and Japan.A tougher challenge for the Japanese brands are the coastal and northeastern provinces like Shandong, which overtook Guangdong as China's biggest car market in 2009, Zhejiang and Jiangsu — part of a large swathe of the country that Japan invaded and occupied during the late 1930s.Over the past decade, Japanese automakers set up a strong base in Guangdong, investing heavily in factories that now form an assembly cluster fed by Japanese parts suppliers in the area. According to R.L. Polk & Company, an industry consultant, Japanese cars had 41 percent of the market in Guangdong in 2011, though that share has dipped a few percentage points since the dispute last year.But northern and eastern provinces are now eclipsing Guangdong in car demand. Polk said Guangdong had been overtaken by Shandong and Jiangsu, and its ranking as third was under threat from Zhejiang and Hebei, which also were occupied by Japan more than 70 years ago."It's a smoldering brush fire today but could turn into a big five-alarm fire if Japanese automakers don't deal with it," said Yale Zhang, head of Automotive Foresight, a consultant based in Shanghai. "As demand in mega-markets like Beijing slows significantly, Toyota and other Japanese brands need to penetrate even deeper into the Chinese market."Protests erupted across China a year ago after Japan nationalized some of the disputed islets, known as Diaoyu in China and Senkaku in Japan, by buying them from a private owner. As passions ran high, thousands of Japanese-branded cars were vandalized, and dealerships were attacked by mobs in Qingdao, a major city in Shandong, as well as in other cities.In a widely reported incident in mid-September last year, a 51-year-old Chinese man with his family drove his Toyota Corolla past an anti-Japanese demonstration in Xian in Shaanxi Province. The car was surrounded by protesters and the man was so badly beaten that he was partly paralyzed, and his car destroyed.Sales of Japanese-branded cars plunged by more than half in September and October from year-earlier levels and remained weak well into the first half of this year.Though sales of Japanese cars are picking up in the south and southeast, sales executives said recovery was frustratingly slow farther north in Jiangsu, Anhui and Shaanxi. A Nissan sales executive based in Guangzhou said the attack on the driver in Xian had been especially damaging, as it had scared Chinese buyers away from Japanese cars. "Recovery in Shaanxi is the slowest for us," the executive said, asking not to be named because business was still sensitive to the issue."We also have to deal with negative campaigns by dealers representing Western brands," he said, referring to some local dealers who tell customers it is unpatriotic or unsafe to own a Japanese car in China.Song Fangjie, a 28-year-old construction supervisor from Jinan, Shandong's provincial capital, said he liked Japanese cars' fuel economy, but had chosen a Volkswagen for its safety. "If Japanese carmakers offer better service, I might think about buying one," he said, though he recounted how a friend had been refused service at a gasoline station because he was driving a Japanese car.At Toyota, some executives question whether it is wise to pour resources into competition in these hostile markets.
HONG KONG — A company listed in Hong Kong that is caught up in a corruption investigation focused on China's biggest state-owned oil conglomerate said on Thursday that Chinese investigators had questioned it about projects, seized documents and frozen some bank accounts.The company, Wison Engineering Services, disclosed the details in an announcement to the Hong Kong Stock Exchange. They are the latest public signs of a spreading corruption inquiry that has brought down one senior Chinese Communist Party official, Jiang Jiemin, and encroached on Zhou Yongkang, the retired head of China's powerful domestic security administration."As part of their investigations, the regulatory authorities made enquiries about certain projects" of Wison and its subsidiaries, and have "taken books and records and frozen certain bank accounts," the company said.Hua Bangsong, the billionaire chairman and founder of Wison, has been helping authorities in China with the investigation, the company said this month. In its latest announcement, Wison said it had been unable to contact Mr. Hua, and that Zhao Hongbin, a financial manager of a Wison subsidiary, was also "assisting in the investigation."Wison is one of several engineering and equipment companies caught up in the inquiry into the China National Petroleum Corporation, usually called C.N.P.C., and its listed subsidiary, PetroChina, which trades in Shanghai, Hong Kong and New York. PetroChina has been one of Wison's main sources of revenue.Wison, which is part of a group with headquarters in Shanghai, said the Chinese authorities had not told it what precisely they were investigating, or how Mr. Hua and Mr. Zhao were involved. The company suspended trading in its shares in early September.In late August, four senior managers of C.N.P.C. and PetroChina were dismissed as part of a party investigation into reported disciplinary violations, a term that usually means corruption. Days later, Mr. Jiang, a former chairman of C.N.P.C., was publicly accused of the same violations and dismissed from his job running the government agency that administers state-owned companies.Four people who have spoken with senior Chinese officials have said the real target of the investigation is Mr. Zhou, who retired from the Communist Party leadership at a congress in November, after a career that began as an oil technician and senior manager at C.N.P.C. Xi Jinping, who took over as party leader at the same congress, has repeatedly vowed to curtail official corruption and self-enrichment."Rather than going directly for the target, the strategy is one of encirclement, removing Zhou's people one by one from the echelons of power," Neil Beveridge, a senior analyst for Sanford C. Bernstein in Hong Kong who specializes in Chinese energy firms, said in a recent research note.
BEIJING — Police in China questioned a prominent online whistleblower over suspicions of swindling and blackmail and detained him this week for 24 hours, the activist said on Saturday, as the government steps up its crackdown on citizens' activity on the Internet.Wu Dong, better known by his online name of Huazong, or "Boss Hua", was picked up at a hotel in Beijing on Tuesday and taken in for questioning."They say I'm suspected of swindling and blackmail," he told Reuters by telephone. "Of course this is not true and I'm innocent. I think somebody has it in for me."Wu declined to say if he thought he was targeted because of his activity online, which he said the police did not bring up."I really can't speculate on that," he said.Reuters was unable to reach Beijing police for comment.Wu, who specializes in identifying the luxurious watches worn by Chinese officials in online pictures, became famous last year for his leading role in bringing down a corrupt official who first aroused public ire after he was pictured smiling at the scene of a bus accident in which 36 people died.Criticism grew when pictures of the official wearing high-end watches - as identified by Wu - that he could not possibly afford on his salary were then posted on social media sites.The official, Yang Dacai, was sacked and then jailed this month for 14 years after being found guilty of corruption.Wu said he was now in a state of legal limbo."They may decide to press charges against me, but they may also stop the investigation," he added.Chinese President Xi Jinping has made fighting graft a top theme of his new administration, and has specifically targeted extravagance and waste, seeking to assuage anger over corruption and restore faith in the party.While the party has encouraged people to use the Internet to expose graft, especially for lower-level officials like Yang, it has detained activists who have called for officials to publicly disclose their assets.Wary of any threat to its authority or social stability, the party has also stepped up its already tight controls over social media to limit public discussion of sensitive political issues.Last week the government unveiled tough measures to stop the spread of what it called irresponsible rumors, threatening three years in jail if untrue posts online were widely reposted.
JINAN, China — A court sentenced Bo Xilai to life in prison for corruption Sunday, burying the career of one of China's most up-and-coming politicians and lowering the curtain on a scandal that exposed a murder and illicit enrichment among the country's elite.The former Politburo member and Chongqing city party leader was convicted of bribery, embezzlement and abuse of power Sunday in a case set in motion by his wife's poisoning of a British business associate in late 2011. It also was widely regarded as a political prosecution and a sign that top leaders had turned against the charismatic populist.The Jinan Intermediate People's Court deprived Bo of political rights for life and confiscated all his personal assets. A lawyer with direct knowledge of the case said Bo indicated that the verdict was unjust and was expected to appeal, but observers say he has little chance of success. He has 10 days to appeal."It's a political death sentence for him," said Dali Yang, a political scientist at the University of Chicago. "As long as the current circumstances stay, he cannot come back."Despite fears of public strife or brutal political infighting spearheaded by Bo's supporters within the leadership, there has been no major groundswell of backing for Bo, either within the Communist Party or in the public — although he remains popular among many Chinese.The party deftly managed the potential aftershocks of the case partly by keeping the charges focused on Bo's corruption and keeping politics out of the trial, said Jonathan Holslag, a research fellow at the Institute for Contemporary China Studies at the University of Brussels."The leadership has been successful because it had a clear criminal case against Bo, because it deterred Bo's entourage from politicizing the trial, and because it matched Bo's populism with its own promises to rip out corruption, boost growth and build a strong country," Holslag said.In a departure from the choreographed proceedings of other recent political trials, Bo had launched an unusually vigorous defense while on the stand last month. He denied all charges and blamed the corruption on others in his inner circle, including his wife, forgoing the leniency customarily given in Chinese courts when a defendant expresses contrition.The charges had likely been tailored to offer a lighter sentence had Bo cooperated with prosecutors, but he declined to play along, said Willy Lam, an expert on Communist Party politics at Chinese University in Hong Kong."He was punished for his disobedience and defiance," Lam said.Bo also became the highest-level politician convicted for corruption under Chinese President Xi Jinping, who has staked his reputation on combatting graft among Communist Party members and cleaning up their image of luxurious lifestyles that has angered the Chinese public."The leadership wants to send a signal that this is a serious matter," Yang said.In keeping with the trial's high profile — and the remarkable degree of transparency in which the court proceedings took place — state broadcaster CCTV ran a special bulletin on the verdict and sentence at the top of the nationwide noon news report.In its coverage, it showed Bo wearing a white dress shirt and slacks as he stood in court with a resigned smile, flanked by two burly police officers. He was led out in handcuffs following the sentencing, which was announced on the court's microblog shortly before 11 a.m.The court sentenced Bo to life in prison on the bribery charges, 15 years for embezzlement and seven years for abuse of power.The court rejected Bo's defense that he did not know about the $3.5 million in bribes from two business associates in the form of cash and valuable gifts to his family — including a French villa, expenses-paid trips and fancy delicacies such as abalone. However, the court said a small portion of the bribes alleged by prosecutors, about $160,000, were not proven in court.The court also found that Bo embezzled $160,000 from a secret government project in the northern city of Dalian.The trial proceedings had been publicized through partial transcripts that gave a measure of legitimacy to a trial seen by many observers to have a foregone conclusion of guilt because of the party's control over the court system."This is a big victory for Xi Jinping's leadership, because you cannot say this is a secretive trial. It is at least a semi-open trial," said Li Cheng, an expert of elite politics at Brookings Institute. "Bo's political career is zero, and the trial really transformed Bo from a charismatic leader to a self-indulging person."Han Deqiang, a Beijing university professor and a supporter of Bo, expressed his disappointment with the verdict, saying it negated Bo's policies aimed at narrowing the wealth gap in China."If the gap continues to widen, the left will only become stronger," Han said. "He has no chance to come back under the current political system, but how long can the current political system last? Then, he may have a chance."Bo is still popular in the regions where he served, especially in Chongqing, where he was party chief from 2007 to 2012. Bo had campaigned against organized crime, built affordable housing, and promoted Maoist songs and mass gatherings as a way of building his popularity among the city's 30 million residents.His popularity was seen as a challenge to the party's leadership as they sought to guide Xi and party No. 2, Li Keqiang, into power while retaining influence for now-retired leaders.Bo's downfall was set in motion in February 2012 when his former top aide attempted to defect to a U.S. consulate with information about his wife's murder of British businessman Neil Heywood, just as leaders were preparing the once-a-decade leadership transition.Bo had been seen as a contender in the transition for China's top leadership panel, the Politburo Standing Committee, but he also had unnerved many colleagues in the leadership with self-promotion seen as running counter to their brand of consensus rule.Prosecutors later accused Bo of interfering with the probe into the murder, as well as unrelated corruption uncovered by investigators. Bo's wife, Gu Kailai, confessed to the murder and was handed a suspended death sentence last year that will likely be commuted to life imprisonment.Bo's disappearance into custody in March 2012 sparked huge public fascination with the scandal, along with wild speculation about coups and assassination attempts.Both Bo and the party leadership stuck "to a large part of the script, so to speak," steering clear of larger political issues during the trial, said Joseph Cheng, an expert on Chinese politics at the City University of Hong Kong.There was no mention of intra-party power struggles, Bo's attempts to challenge the central leadership, or any attempts to implicate other senior leaders, Cheng said.Bodeen reported from Beijing. Associated Press writer Louise Watt in Beijing contributed to this report.
By her own definition, 19-year-old Hou Yifan is an average student. She is a sophomore at Peking University, one of China's top colleges, and says she constantly falls behind on her work.But she has a better excuse than most: Ms. Hou is one of the greatest chess prodigies in history. She has been ranked among the top 10 women in the world since she was 12 and became a grandmaster, the game's top title, when she was 14 years old — the 15th youngest on record.On Friday, while most of her fellow students were in class, Ms. Hou was routing Anna Ushenina of Ukraine in the last game of their Women's World Chess Championship match in Taizhou, China.Ms. Hou won the match 5.5 to 1.5 to recapture the crown, which she lost last year in the early rounds of a championship tournament. Ms. Ushenina, who is now 28, won the tournament, and the title. Ms. Hou first won the crown in 2010 when she was 16, making her the youngest player, man or woman, to win a world title. She successfully defended the title in 2011.This year, Ms. Hou was the heavy favorite. She went into the match ranked as the No. 2 female player in the world; Ms. Ushenina's ranking was No. 17.For her victory, Ms. Hou earned the equivalent of about $160,000, while Ms. Ushenina received the equivalent of about $106,000.In a telephone interview in English an hour after the last game Friday, Ms. Hou said the match "wasn't so easy, but it also was not so difficult." Because of her schedule at the university and because she had recently played in another tournament, she said, she had had little time to prepare.Born in Xinghua, China, Ms. Hou discovered the game when she was 3 and her father took her to a store where she saw a glass chess set in a window and began staring at it. Her father bought a set, and she soon began beating him, so he found her a chess tutor. By 2003, at age 9, she was a member of the Chinese national team.Describing herself Friday as a full-time student, Ms. Hou said she did not receive any "special privileges" that allowed her to avoid fulfilling her course requirements. She also has to be in class most of the time, although she is allowed to leave for tournaments. Her travel schedule — she was recently in Norway and will soon go to Greece — is making her studies difficult, but she said she took her books with her.Ms. Hou is well known in China, so when she enrolled last year at the university, some of the other students were "a bit surprised," she said. But she said her fellow students had gotten used to having her there.Asked why she was in the university at all, she said, "I am trying to really learn something" other than chess.Now that the championship is over, she is going back to school before she competes in the European Club Cup next month. Before leaving, she has to cram for exams.
BEIJING — A powerful typhoon that slammed into southern China with winds that blew cars off the road has caused more deaths, bringing the toll in Asia to at least 33 on Monday.Typhoon Usagi, which was the season's strongest storm at its peak, forced hundreds of flight cancellations and shut down shipping and train lines before weakening to a tropical depression over the southern Chinese province of Guangdong on Monday.China said 25 deaths occurred in Guangdong, where the typhoon made landfall late Sunday near Shanwei with record sustained winds for the city of 175 kilometers (109 miles) per hour.On Saturday the storm had been a super typhoon when it passed between Taiwan and the Philippines, sparing both of them the brunt of the winds. However, Philippine officials said eight people were dead from drowning and landslides, and Taiwan authorities reported nine people hurt by falling trees.The storm wreaked havoc on travel plans just as many passengers were returning home after an extended weekend for the Chinese mid-autumn festival.More than 250 incoming and outgoing flights were canceled in Hong Kong, and an additional 200 were delayed, Airport Authority Hong Kong said. Intercity trains including the high-speed rail to Beijing, Shenzhen and Hong Kong were suspended until Tuesday, the official Xinhua news agency reported.At least 13 of the 25 victims in China were killed in worst-hit Shanwei city, where winds blew cars off the road near a gas station and houses were toppled, Xinhua said. One county's electricity and water supply were cut off.In Hong Kong, dozens of trees were reported down and 17 people had sought medical treatment and eight of these were admitted to hospital, according to the Hong Kong government's information services department.China's National Meterological Center said the typhoon would continue to weaken as it moves northwest and bring heavy rains later Monday and overnight to five southern provinces.In the Philippines, parts of the capital remained submerged Monday and classes were cancelled. The landslide deaths occurred in two villages in Zambales province west of Manila, Subic town mayor Jeffrey Khonghun said Monday. Two drowning deaths were reported previously.Associated Press writers Kelvin Chan in Hong Kong and Jim Gomez and Hrvoje Hranjski in Manila, Philippines, contributed to this report.
(Reuters) - Zhang Shuai was aware of the risks involved when she opted to "Fly Alone" two months ago but the 24-year-old Chinese now stands vindicated after winning her maiden WTA Tour title on Saturday.Li Na, the 2011 French Open champion, broke free from China's state-run training system and went independent after the 2008 Beijing Olympics in a move dubbed "Fly Alone" by the Chinese media.Peng Shuai, Zheng Jie and Yan Zi also took the plunge, to be followed this year by Zhang who won the Guangzhou Open with a 7-6 (1) 6-1 victory over American qualifier Vania King."It is no doubt the most memorable time in my life," Zhang was quoted as saying by the official Xinhua news agency on Sunday. "I hope today's victory will be a new start for me, not a destination."I know there will be many troubles ahead of my journey of 'Flying Alone'," Zhang, who won in Guangzhou without dropping a set whole week, said."In the past I was an employee, but now I am the boss. I should be responsible for all the team expenses. I can only earn more when I win more."I am experiencing a huge shift, not only in tennis, but my whole life. 'Fly Alone' is not easy. I am enjoying happy moments (but) also painful ones."
BEIJING — The writing was perhaps already on the wall for Bo Xilai, the controversial former top official of China's southwestern city of Chongqing, when he appeared at last year's parliamentary meeting, alternately chastened and combative.In earlier annual sessions of parliament, Bo had swept in, all smiles and lanky grace, preceded by a wave of TV cameras and popping flashbulbs. This time he was uncharacteristically restrained.Bo rolled his eyes at repeated questions from foreign reporters about a scandal involving then-vice mayor Wang Lijun, and the normally effusive state media and parliament delegates kept their distance.Wang, who doubled as the city's police chief before his downfall, went to ground in the U.S. Consulate in nearby Chengdu in February last year until he was coaxed out and placed under investigation."I certainly never expected this," Bo said of Wang's flight. "I felt that it happened extremely suddenly."News of his own change of fortune came just as suddenly.A few days after his news conference in March last year, a terse report from the official Xinhua news agency announced that Beijing had sacked Bo from his post, all but snuffing out his chances of rising to the top echelons of the Communist Party.Now Bo, 64, faces life in jail after being found guilty on all counts on charges of corruption, accepting bribes and abuse, though he can be expected to appeal.Bo's wife, Gu Kailai, and Wang were jailed last year over China's biggest political scandal in years, triggered by the murder of British businessman Neil Heywood in November 2011, a crime for which Gu was convicted.After first helping Gu evade suspicion of poisoning Heywood, Wang hushed up evidence of the murder, according to the official account of Wang's trial. In late January 2012, Wang confronted Bo with the allegation that Gu was suspected of killing Heywood.But Wang was "angrily rebuked and had his ears boxed".After Bo was sacked, he disappeared from public view, resurfacing only at his dramatic five-day trial last month, where he offered a spirited defense of the charges against him, and denounced both Wang and Gu, whose testimony was used against him."He has a vile character, spreading rumors here and muddying the waters," Bo said of Wang, according to the official court transcript. Gu, Bo said, is "insane, often tells lies".As the outspoken Chongqing party chief, Bo had mounted a daring bid for the nation's top political body, the party's Politburo Standing Committee.He captured national attention with a crackdown on organized crime and corrupt police officers in Chongqing, China's teeming wartime capital, and brought about stronger economic growth. But he also alienated political peers.An anti-mafia campaign netted thousands of people and tapped into popular anger over the corruption and collusion that has accompanied China's economic boom."Fighting organized crime is for the sake of letting the people enjoy peace and creating a clean social environment in Chongqing," Bo said at his parliamentary news briefing, defending his record. "We are sure of ourselves and free of regrets."Bo, a former China commerce minister and mayor of the northeastern port city of Dalian where he wooed foreign investors, once had a flair for the dramatic.His directness and independent streak impressed foreigners but annoyed peers, who prefer to rule through backdoor consensus and often stilted slogans. Analysts noted that no one in the top leadership publicly praised Bo or the crackdown on organized crime.Then-Premier Wen Jiabao told his annual news conference last year that Chongqing's leadership should reflect on the Wang Lijun incident, and also obliquely criticized Bo's drive to revive songs and culture from the heyday of Mao's Communist revolution.Bo is a son of late vice-premier Bo Yibo, making the younger Bo a "princeling" - a child of an incumbent, retired or late national leader.His wife was a lawyer and their son, Bo Guagua, was educated at an elite British private school before going on to study at Oxford and Harvard universities. The younger Bo's Facebook photos from parties caused their own Internet stir in China.While wooing investors, Bo also envisioned low-cost housing for rural poor and migrant laborers, designed to appeal to then-President Hu Jintao's goal of creating a "harmonious society".He called his vision "Peaceful Chongqing." It included text messages with Maoist slogans, and singing old-style revolutionary songs by civil servants, who also had to adopt poor families and staff petition offices where citizens can complain.But Bo had difficulty shaking off the suspicion of some critics, both inside and outside the country, that he was more concerned with his own rise than that of China.
BEIJING — With ousted senior politician Bo Xilai jailed for life, Chinese President Xi Jinping has stamped his authority on the Communist Party by effectively warning he will not tolerate dissent as he seeks to push through tough economic reforms.Bo was sentenced on Sunday after being found guilty on charges of corruption, taking bribes and abuse of power. He is expected to appeal, although since all courts are controlled by the party the verdict was likely pre-ordained."It's (like) killing one to warn a hundred," a source with ties to the leadership told Reuters.The ideological fractures exposed last year by Bo's fall from grace had hobbled Xi, forcing him to row back on an ambitious plan to rebalance the world's second largest economy, sources close to China's leadership have told Reuters.The party's fear had been that Bo's supporters, who lauded him for the old-school leftist social welfare policies he championed as boss of the city of Chongqing, could remain a brake on reforms that favor private businesses and a greater reliance on market forces.Xi needed the Bo affair settled because the next few weeks are critical for his government, which took office in March.At a party plenum in November, Xi will push for more economic reforms and he needs unstinting support from the party's elite 200-member Central Committee.The reforms Xi wants include opening up the banking sector to let in private players and interest rate reform and introducing more competition in key industries dominated by state-owned giants, such as in the energy and telecommunications sectors, sources say.Leftists are deeply suspicious of private enterprise and market reforms, believing they have led to the income inequality and the anything-goes economic growth that China grapples with today."For other senior officials, I think this is intimidating because the plenum is coming up," said Zhang Lifan, a Beijing-based political commentator and historian.Bo had been expected to rise to the top echelons of the party until his career unraveled last year following a murder scandal in which his wife, Gu Kailai, was convicted of poisoning a British businessman, Neil Heywood, who had been a family friend. She was given a suspended death sentence.After his appointment as Chongqing party boss in 2007, the charismatic Bo, a "princeling" son of a late vice premier, turned the southwestern metropolis into a showcase of Mao-inspired "red" culture as well as state-led economic growth. The leftists in the party flocked to his side.Xi has been mindful of Bo's constituency and courted neo-leftists ahead of the trial - at the expense of reform-minded liberals.Shortly before the trial, Xi paid his respects at a villa once used by Mao Zedong, and then gave a widely publicized speech calling Marxism a "must-study subject" for party members.Xi, in a sense, has already sought to assume Bo's mantle as the hero of the left."Ideologically speaking, Xi's shift to the left has been quite dramatic," said Li Weidong, a writer and former editor who has followed Bo's case closely. "Bo has been kicked to the side but his policies have remained."Bo mounted an unexpectedly feisty defense during his five-day trial last month, denying all the charges and denouncing testimony against him by his wife as the ravings of a mad woman.He erupted in anger when he was sentenced on Sunday, yelling out "unfair" and "unjust", according to the South China Morning Post newspaper, which didn't say how it knew about the outburst during the closed-door hearing.Before being taken away, Bo shouted: "The decision was not based on facts. The court is neither open nor just and didn't take the points made by my defense lawyers and me."Chinese state media said the verdict showed the party's determination to crack down on corruption and go after "tigers", or senior officials, and not just "flies".Xi launched an anti-corruption campaign after becoming party chief in November.So far the party has announced the investigation or arrest of eight senior officials. Among them, former executives from oil giant PetroChina are being investigated in what appears to be the biggest graft probe into a state-run firm in years."No matter who is involved they should be investigated to the end and punished according to the law," said the People's Daily newspaper, the party's mouthpiece.An editorial in the Global Times newspaper said the verdict showed China's anti-corruption campaign was not just "empty talk".Some experts disagreed, saying the verdict was unlikely to be a real deterrent to the rampant corruption Xi has said threatens the party's survival."This case had little to do with corruption. It's a political case," said Zhang Ming, a professor at Renmin University in Beijing.
HONG KONG — A powerful typhoon hit Hong Kong and the southern China coast on Monday, killing at least 20 people on the mainland, crippling power lines and causing flooding and gale force winds.Typhoon Usagi, the strongest storm to hit the Western Pacific this year, began pounding the Asian financial center late on Sunday. More than 370 flights were canceled.Despite earlier warnings the typhoon could pose a severe risk to Hong Kong, the city suffered only minimal damage, including toppled trees. There were no fatalities in the city. By 9:30 a.m., the local authorities had lifted the No. 8 signal warning of gale-force winds.China's National Meteorological Centre issued its highest alert, with more than 80,000 people moved to safety in Fujian province and authorities deploying at least 50,000 disaster-relief workers, state Xinhua news agency reported.At least 20 people were killed on China's southern coast, television reports said, including 13 in Shanwei in the eastern fringes of Guangdong province.The victims included people hit by debris and others who had drowned. One man was killed by a falling window pane."It is the strongest typhoon I have ever encountered," Xinhua quoted Luo Hailing, a gas station attendant in Shanwei, as saying. "So terrible, lucky we made preparations."Winds of more than 180 km/hour (110 mph) were recorded in some parts of southern China, toppling trees, cranes and blowing cars off roads in some areas.The storm had earlier brought down three major power lines in coastal Fujian, cutting off electricity supplies to about 170,000 households, Xinhua reported.In Guangdong province, a major base for Chinese nuclear power, the Daya Bay nuclear power plant just east of Hong Kong had initiated emergency response schemes, Xinhua said.Four of the six power-generating units at the plant had been ordered to operate at reduced load.Airlines canceled flights to cities in southern Guangdong and Fujian, while shipping was suspended between China and Taiwan, state media said.The Hong Kong Exchange delayed the start of trading on securities and derivatives markets due to the typhoon.Usagi lashed the east and south coasts of Taiwan on Saturday after slamming into the Philippines' northernmost islands, where it cut communication and power lines and triggered landslides.
HONG KONG — The strongest typhoon to hit Asia this year caused landslides in the Philippines and flooding in Taiwan on Saturday as it appeared headed toward the densely populated Pearl River Delta area of China, with the financial center of Hong Kong preparing for possible business shutdowns at the start of the workweek.China's National Meteorological Center issued a red alert — the highest-level warning — with the storm, called Super Typhoon Usagi, on a path to hit Guangdong Province, the industrial powerhouse at the heart of the Pearl River Delta. Coastal Zhejiang and Fujian Provinces were also covered by the alert.The storm, with a width of nearly 700 miles and carrying sustained winds of 139 miles per hour, battered the northern Philippine island of Luzon on one side while striking Taiwan on the other, moving between the two on a path straight toward Hong Kong at the foot of the delta. It was expected to make landfall in the financial hub on Sunday night, although forecasters said it could veer from that course.More than 2,000 people were evacuated from low-lying and mountainous areas of Taiwan out of fear of flooding and landslides, and powerful storm surges drenched fishing boats along the coasts of the island. In the Philippines, the typhoon caused power failures and evacuations, with landslides in the north of the country, but no fatalities were immediately reported.The Hong Kong Observatory said the storm would pose a "severe threat to Hong Kong.""Engineers, architects and contractors should make sure that scaffoldings, hoardings, windowpanes and other temporary structures are secured," the observatory said in a statement. "The public should remain vigilant, and take precautions against strong winds and flooding as early as possible."In anticipation of the typhoon, Cathay Pacific Airways and the affiliated Dragonair canceled operations at its Hong Kong hub starting at 6 p.m. Sunday and said flight disruptions would probably continue into Monday."The airline is monitoring the situation closely and will issue further advice on the resumption of flight services," Cathay said in a statement. "It is anticipated that disruptions will continue on 23 September due to the impact of adverse weather and operational constraints."As the storm barreled toward mainland China, preparations were already under way, with more than 20,000 fishing boats moved to secure locations and 4,000 people evacuated from coastal areas of Fujian Province, state news media reported.
ATLANTA — Henrik Stenson knows better than most players how it feels to go from the depths of a slump to the elite in golf.He's done it twice now.And the second time was sweeter — and richer — than ever.Not even among the top 200 players in the world two years ago, Stenson capped off the best three months of his career with a command performance Sunday in the Tour Championship. With a birdie to thwart a late charge by Jordan Spieth, followed by three pars from the sand, the 37-year-old Swede closed with a 2-under 68 on Sunday for a three-shot victory to capture the FedEx Cup.He walked away with $11.44 million — $10 million for the FedEx Cup ($9 million of that in cash) and $1.44 million for winning the Tour Championship."It shows that I never give up," Stenson said, who also moves to No. 4 in the world. "This is way beyond what I could have imagined."Even with a four-shot lead, the final round was a battle. There were two trophies on display on the first tee. He knew he could still win the FedEx Cup even if he didn't win the Tour Championship. Ultimately, he figured good golf would take care of everything, and it did.Stenson became the first player to win the Tour Championship wire-to-wire with no ties since Tom Watson in 1987, the first year of this 30-man showcase.Spieth made him work for it.The 20-year-old Texan left one last impression on his remarkable rookie season by running off four straight birdies on the back nine at East Lake to pull within one shot after Stenson went well over the 14th green and made his long bogey.Stenson could hear the cheers and knew what he faced over the last four holes."I'm not just a pretty face. I can put 1-and-1 together," the Swede said with his dry humor.He drilled a 3-wood into the fairway on the par-5 15th that set up an 8-foot birdie. Ahead of him on the 17th, Spieth was between clubs and chose to hammer a 9-iron that he caught heavy enough that it plugged in the front bunker. He made bogey and had to settle for a 64."I was just looking up and seeing that I needed more instead of being satisfied with what happened," Spieth said of his four straight birdies.Spieth wound up No. 7 in the FedEx Cup, the highest ever for a rookie. He began the year with no status on any tour and finished at No. 10 on the PGA Tour money list, and No. 21 in the world.The last challenge came from Steve Stricker, who rolled in an eagle putt on the 15th hole to get within two. Stricker saved par behind the 16th green, and then missed two birdie chances from about 18 feet on the last two holes for a 65. He tied for second with Spieth.Stricker didn't realize that making any of those last two putts would have been worth an extra $1 million for finishing second in the FedEx Cup. He only cared about winning, knowing he needed birdies and for Stenson to make a mistake."I knew the putt meant a lot. I didn't know it meant that much," he said with a smile. He finished third in the FedEx Cup and received a $2 million bonus.Stenson, who finished at 13-under 267, became the first European to win the Tour Championship and the FedEx Cup.His amazing summer began with a tie for third in the Scottish Open. Stenson followed with a runner-up at the British Open and the World Golf Championship at Firestone, third place at the PGA Championship and a win at the Deutsche Bank Championship."Obviously, the work was done before," Stenson said. "It's not like I woke up in the middle of July and played fantastic."The Tour Championship was his second win in three tournaments of the FedEx Cup playoffs."Since the Scottish Open, it's been just an incredible run," he said. "I'm speechless. It was a tough day out there. To hang in there the way I did, I'm really satisfied. ... It hasn't quite sunk in yet. I had to fight hard mentally to keep all this aside, and I managed to do that. It's going to feel better as the week goes on. I'm pretty sure about that."Tiger Woods, the No. 1 seed going into the Tour Championship, never recovered from his 73-71 start. He closed with a 67 to tie for 22nd, his worst finish ever at East Lake, and wound up second in the FedEx Cup. That still was worth a $3 million bonus.Woods wrapped up the PGA of America's points-based award for player of the year, and he captured the PGA Tour money title and the Vardon Trophy for the lowest adjusted scoring title. Next up is a vote of the players for PGA Tour player of the year. He is the heavy favorite with five wins this year.The award is to be announced on Friday.For much of the day, no one got closer to Stenson than three shots, and he answered that early challenge with an 8-iron to an elevated green to 2 feet for birdie at No. 7. The Tour Championship came to life in the final hour, though, thanks to the youngest player in the field.Fearless as ever, Spieth began a run of birdies starting on the 13th hole that not only moved him into second place, it put pressure on Stenson not to drop any shots. Stenson's only bogey came on the 14th, when he caught a flyer over the green and missed a 20-foot putt."Henrik obviously was playing phenomenal golf," Spieth said. "I felt like once a few putts started falling, we have a shot at it."Webb Simpson had the low round of the tournament with a 63 to finish fourth.Stenson, who only last week smashed a driver and his locker at the BMW Championship out of frustration brought on by playing so much golf, finally gets a break. He was headed to his home in Orlando, Fla., for a four-week break before returning in Shanghai.Next up: A chance to become the first player to win the FedEx Cup on the PGA Tour and the Race to Dubai on the European Tour in the same season.
MANILA, Philippines — Torrential monsoon rains hit the northwestern Philippines on Monday, triggering landslides and killing 20 people in areas already weakened by a powerful typhoon, and raising the death toll to 47 from storms across Asia.Philippine officials said soldiers and villagers were also searching for at least seven people missing in mountainside villages hit by the landslides Monday in the province of Zambales.In China, where Typhoon Usagi struck after passing by the Philippines, officials said the storm killed 25 people in the southern province of Guangdong, 13 of them in the city of Shanwei where it struck the coast late Sunday.The other deaths came when two people drowned when a passenger boat capsized in northeastern Aurora province in the Philippines.Subic Mayor Jeffrey Khonghun said 15 bodies were dug out in two landslide-hit villages in his town. Five people also died in landslides in two other towns in Zambales, according to army officials and police.Rescuers used their hands, pots and shovels to dig through the muck that buried a cluster of houses while relatives of two other missing residents waited in the rain in the village of Wawandue."This is the first after a long time that we were hit by this kind of deluge," Khonghun told Manila's DZBB radio network. He had to stop the interview after another body was pulled out from a muddy heap near him.Typhoon Usagi enhanced the torrential monsoon rains that drenched the main northern Philippine region of Luzon over the weekend. The powerful typhoon blew away late Saturday and a new tropical storm off southern Japan was continuing to intensify the downpours in Luzon, government forecaster Samuel Duran said.Many low-lying areas of the Philippine capital, Manila, and outlying regions were swamped Monday, prompting authorities to cancel classes and office work.In Hong Kong, flight schedules were returning to normal Monday after major disruptions from Usagi, which was the season's strongest storm at its peak. It forced about 250 flight cancellations in Hong Kong before weakening to a tropical depression over the southern Chinese province of Guangdong.Train and airline services around Guangdong also were back to normal after the storm, China's state broadcaster CCTV said.China's national weather center said the storm would continue to weaken as it moves northwest.
BEIJING — With ousted senior politician Bo Xilai jailed for life, Chinese President Xi Jinping has stamped his authority on the Communist Party by effectively warning he will not tolerate dissent as he seeks to push through tough economic reforms.Bo was sentenced on Sunday after being found guilty on charges of corruption, taking bribes and abuse of power. Since all courts are controlled by the party the verdict was likely pre-ordained although a source with direct knowledge of the case told Reuters on Monday that Bo had filed an appeal."It's (like) killing one to warn a hundred," a source with ties to the leadership told Reuters.The ideological fractures exposed last year by Bo's fall from grace had hobbled Xi, forcing him to row back on an ambitious plan to rebalance the world's second largest economy, sources close to China's leadership have told Reuters.The party's fear had been that Bo's supporters, who lauded him for the old-school leftist social welfare policies he championed as boss of the city of Chongqing, could remain a brake on reforms that favor private businesses and a greater reliance on market forces.Xi needed the Bo affair settled because the next few weeks are critical for his government, which took office in March.At a closed-door party plenum in November, Xi will push for more economic reforms and he needs unstinting support from the party's elite 200-member Central Committee.The reforms Xi wants include opening up the banking sector to let in private players and interest rate reform and introducing more competition in key industries dominated by state-owned giants, such as in the energy and telecommunications sectors, sources say.Leftists are deeply suspicious of private enterprise and market reforms, believing they have led to the income inequality and the anything-goes economic growth that China grapples with today."For other senior officials, I think this is intimidating because the plenum is coming up," said Zhang Lifan, a Beijing-based political commentator and historian.Bo had been expected to rise to the top of the party until his career unraveled last year following a murder scandal in which his wife, Gu Kailai, was convicted of poisoning a British businessman, Neil Heywood, who had been a family friend. She was given a suspended death sentence.After his appointment as Chongqing party boss in 2007, the charismatic Bo, a "princeling" son of a late vice premier, turned the southwestern metropolis into a showcase of Mao-inspired "red" culture as well as state-led economic growth. The leftists in the party flocked to his side.Xi has been mindful of Bo's constituency and courted neo-leftists ahead of the trial - at the expense of reform-minded liberals.Shortly before the trial, Xi paid his respects at a villa once used by Mao Zedong, and then gave a widely publicized speech calling Marxism a "must-study subject" for party members.Xi, in a sense, has already sought to assume Bo's mantle as the hero of the left."Ideologically speaking, Xi's shift to the left has been quite dramatic," said Li Weidong, a writer and former editor who has followed Bo's case closely. "Bo has been kicked to the side but his policies have remained."That is a path which may not be sustainable, Li added."It will create an effect of left-wing politics but right-wing economics, which will become a problem long-term."Still, Bo's verdict is unlikely to be a real deterrent to the rampant corruption Xi has sought to tackle, despite the party and state media playing up the angle that all are equal before the law."This case had little to do with corruption. It's a political case," said Zhang Ming, a professor at Renmin University in Beijing.
HONG KONG — Los Angeles has film studios and the best-known movie industry award ceremonies. Orlando has amusement parks and resort hotels. Now, one of China's richest men wants to copy them with a movie-themed real estate development in his country's most fashionable beach city.Wang Jianlin, who is chairman of Dalian Wanda Group and reputed to be China's wealthiest investor, announced plans on Sunday for the Qingdao Oriental Movie Metropolis. Costing from $4.9 billion to $8.2 billion, it would encompass film studios, resort hotels, an indoor amusement park, movie theaters with up to 3,000 seats and even a hospital.Stars like Nicole Kidman, John Travolta, Leonardo DiCaprio and Zhang Ziyi, among others, showed up on Sunday at a ceremony in Qingdao for the development, which Mr. Wang billed as a sign of China's effort to become the world leader in yet another industry: filmmaking.Dalian Wanda purchased AMC Entertainment for $2.6 billion in a deal last year that signaled China's biggest splash yet in the American movie market."It is estimated that China's film box office revenue will surpass North America's by 2018 and will double it by 2023 — that is why I believe the future of the world's film industry is in China," Mr. Wang said, according to a text of his remarks.Dalian Wanda will build a series of movie sound sets, and has reached preliminary agreements with four of the biggest Hollywood movie agent businesses to help negotiate contracts with actors and actresses for the production of 30 foreign movies a year, Mr. Wang said. It is also planning deals with 50 domestic companies for the production of 100 films and television shows a year.Chinese officials were quick to extol the Qingdao project. "Whether in terms of investment, scale or grade, Qingdao Oriental Movie Metropolis is an unprecedented project that will create history as it represents the highest level and the future of the development" of China's film industry, said Li Qiankuan, the chairman of the government-controlled China Film Association.Mr. Wang also announced plans to host an annual film festival in Qingdao every September, starting in 2016. The festival would include an elaborate awards ceremony.But the moviemaking aspects of Sunday's plans appeared to be dwarfed by the real estate project surrounding it. Mr. Wang, who made an estimated $14 billion fortune as a real estate developer, said that he planned to build eight resort hotels, an enormous shopping mall, a 300-berth yacht club, numerous apartment towers, a seaside restaurant row and even a celebrity wax museum — in addition to 20 movie sound sets and the amusement park.Famed for its gentle coastal climate and located between Beijing and Shanghai, Qingdao has some of the costliest real estate in China. But as it is everywhere in China, all land is owned by the government, and the support of local officials is needed to obtain land at low cost and get permission to build on it.In a city where even the smallest plots have set off bidding wars, Mr. Wang's vision seems to have captured the hearts of local leaders. Mr. Wang said that the project would cover 929 acres in a new development on the city's outskirts. The plan calls for constructing 58 million square feet of buildings on the site, the equivalent of 21 and a half Empire State Buildings.Qingdao's top Communist Party and municipal government officials attended Mr. Wang's ceremony but did not release financial details for the land.Until a few years ago, the best way to obtain a large plot of urban land cheaply was to agree to build an auto assembly plant. That has contributed to the development of more than 100 auto companies in China, many producing tiny numbers of cars.Even the largest automakers in China, like Geely Group, tend to have Balkanized manufacturing networks, having set up many small assembly plants on large urban sites in cities scattered all over the country instead of just a few, high-output operations.In the last five years, local governments changed tack at the direction of Beijing and began offering nearly free land either downtown or in inner suburbs to renewable energy companies. That has helped produce a huge surge in the production of solar panels and wind turbines, as China has become by far the largest manufacturer of both.
HONG KONG — With one of China's most divisive politicians, Bo Xilai, banished to life in prison on Sunday, the Communist Party stepped up its efforts to convince a scandal-weary public that the spectacle of his trial proved that national leaders were serious about rooting out official corruption.Guards took Mr. Bo away in handcuffs after a court in eastern China declared him guilty of accepting bribes, embezzling state funds and abusing his power in a failed attempt to thwart a murder investigation involving his wife. While he can still appeal the verdict, the Communist Party controls China's judiciary, and the chances are scant that any judge would overturn the verdict or reduce his sentence of life in prison.Instead, Mr. Bo is likely to disappear from public life for decades, at least, ending a career in which he defied the staid ways of Chinese politics and reinvented himself as a populist defender of socialist virtues. China's state-run news media portrayed the judgment as proof that the party leadership under Xi Jinping is determined to end the bribe-taking, graft and brazen self-enrichment that have fed widespread public disenchantment with officials."The resolute legal punishment of Bo Xilai fully demonstrates that there are no exceptions before party discipline and state law," said a commentary published Monday in the party's main newspaper, People's Daily. The commentary was repeated by many Chinese news Web sites. "No matter who is involved, they will all be investigated to the end and will all be sternly punished according to the law," the commentary said.Mr. Xi, who was appointed party leader in November, has frequently vowed to strike down "flies" and "tigers": both low- and high-ranking officials caught in corruption. Investigations into China's biggest oil conglomerate and into the military offer Mr. Xi and his allies the potential opportunity to pursue a number of such so-called tigers. But even analysts who applauded the sentence for Mr. Bo voiced skepticism about how far party leaders were willing to go."I think that with Bo Xilai, the authorities wanted to send a signal that if senior officials challenge central authority or break the law, they will be ruthlessly punished," said Deng Yuwen, a media commentator in Beijing who formerly worked for a party newspaper.Indeed, Mr. Bo's trial and conviction gave the public an unusually unsparing view into the cronyism and extravagance that many Chinese citizens assume are endemic in the party elite. Unlike other senior politicians put on trial in recent decades, Mr. Bo was given thorough coverage, through an Internet feed that the court used to provide selective but abundant details from the proceedings.Mr. Bo, 64, the former party secretary of Chongqing, in southwest China, presented himself as a business-minded and sharply-dressed exponent of socialist egalitarianism. But the court found that Mr. Bo accepted, through his wife, Gu Kailai, and son, Bo Guagua, bribes from Chinese businessmen that totaled about $3.3 million, much of it used to pay for a villa in France. The court said Ms. Gu and Bo Guagua habitually turned to a Chinese businessman, Xu Ming, to pay for travel expenses, credit card bills and novelties like a Segway.The court found that Bo Xilai's handling of murder allegations against his wife amounted to an abuse of power. It said Mr. Bo's actions played a major role in prompting his former police chief in Chongqing, Wang Lijun, to seek refuge in a United States consulate for nearly 36 hours in February of last year and then disclose the allegations that Ms. Gu was involved in the murder of a British businessman, Neil Heywood, in November 2011.Ms. Gu was convicted of the murder in August 2012 and given a suspended death sentence, meaning she is likely to spend the rest of her life in prison. Mr. Wang was convicted of defection and other crimes in September of last year and sentenced to 15 years in prison."The life sentence for Bo was a little heavier than many people expected," said Li Weidong, a former magazine editor in Beijing who often writes about party politics. "He probably angered the leaders by resisting all the charges and pleading innocent. That's not what toppled officials are generally supposed to do."Mr. Xi appears to hope that the punishment of Mr. Bo and other fallen officials will deter corruption, without the need for political changes that would subject leaders to much more intense public scrutiny, Mr. Li said."It's like the emperors who tried to cure corruption without changing the imperial court," Mr. Li said. "This is not about institutional change; it's about Xi establishing his image as a clean emperor."
HONG KONG — A powerful typhoon weakened sharply on Sunday and started veering away from Hong Kong, but local officials continued to warn residents to take precautions for extreme weather.The Hong Kong Observatory warned of possible flooding in low-lying areas, strong winds and a storm surge from ocean waters pushed higher up the shoreline than usual by the wind. At 6:40 p.m. local time, the observatory raised its No. 8 signal, which warns of gale-force winds. The top signal is 10.That was 21 minutes after the official time for sunset. But rain was already pouring down so hard that it was hard to discern more than a gradual, steady darkening as the wind rose.The storm, Typhoon Usagi, approached the straits between the Philippines and Taiwan on Friday as a category 5 storm, the most powerful on the Saffir-Simpson scale used for measuring the force of hurricanes in the Atlantic Ocean. In the Pacific, exceptionally strong typhoons are rated as severe typhoons or even super typhoons, and Typhoon Usagi, with sustained winds of more than 155 miles per hour, briefly qualified as a super typhoon before being downgraded to a severe typhoon.By Sunday afternoon in Hong Kong, Usagi had already weakened to category 2 storm, with winds of 96 to 110 miles per hour, and had veered toward the Chinese mainland northeast of the city, according to projections by Tropical Storm Risk, a forecasting service based in London. The service forecast that the storm would weaken further to a category 1 after making landfall, but was still nearly certain to bring hurricane-force winds to the territory, which Britain returned to Chinese rule in 1997.
HONG KONG — The new U.S. envoy to Hong Kong insisted on Tuesday that Washington would not be silenced by China in calling for democracy in the global financial hub, vowing to continue speaking out for core rights and freedoms.U.S. Consul-General Clifford Hart's first public speech in the former British colony came amid rising political and diplomatic tensions that have included formal warnings from China that Western nations must not meddle in the city's politics.Hart has already been targeted, with Beijing's top Hong Kong-based Foreign Ministry representative, Song Zhe, warning him against interference while Communist Party-backed newspapers rail against his "subversive" activities."The U.S. position on genuine universal suffrage is unchanged... We'll continue to speak out on it," said the career diplomat, who has served in China, Russia, Iraq and in the Pentagon."There is no mystery to it, there is no hidden agenda to it whatsoever."Hong Kong returned to China in 1997 with wide-ranging autonomy, an independent judiciary and relatively free press under the formula of "one country, two systems".Hart used his address to the American Chamber of Commerce - a reflection of a strong multinational business presence in Hong Kong - to outline Washington's hopes for the political reform promised under that model.Hong Kong's special status had been "indispensable to its stability, prosperity and growth", he said - a status that includes an undated promise from Beijing to introduce universal suffrage."We believe that an open society, with the highest possible degree of autonomy and governed by the rule of law, is essential to maintain Hong Kong's stability and prosperity," he said.Hong Kong elects its next leader in 2017 in what will be the most far-reaching version of democracy on Chinese soil - but precise arrangements have yet to be hammered out.Beijing's top representative in Hong Kong has ruled out open nominations for candidates, meaning he or she will be chosen by a committee stacked with Beijing loyalists.When asked when he drew the line between routine diplomatic work and interference, Hart said the United States respected the right of Hong Kong and Chinese people to conduct their own affairs but "we reserve our option to comment on things we consider important because they directly affect U.S. interests or touch on core values of the U.S."
BEIJING — In their widening campaign against online "rumormongers" and other putative purveyors of social disorder, Chinese authorities have netted influential rights activists, freelance anticorruption sleuths and even a billionaire entrepreneur who championed the rights of poor migrants. Many of those detained in recent weeks remain in police custody.But the enforcers of Internet propriety, it seems, were not prepared for the online outrage stirred up by the arrest last week of a 16-year-old boy who had publicly questioned investigators over the mysterious death of a karaoke club manager in China's northwest Gansu Province.On Monday, the police in Zhangjiachuan Hui Autonomous County apparently bowed to public pressure and released Yang Zhong, a middle school student who was among the first people to be charged under new regulations that criminalize the spreading of online rumors with up to three years in jail. The authorities contend the boy had simply confessed to his crimes and served his punishment. Hours after his release, he posted online a photograph of himself flashing a victory sign. His shirt read, "Make the Change."Rights defenders and free-speech advocates have embraced his release as a small but significant victory against what many here see as a draconian campaign against dissent that has ensnared dozens of people over the past two months. Those arrested include Xu Zhiyong, a prominent lawyer who had called on officials to publicly disclose their financial assets, and Xue Manzi, a Chinese-American investor who often railed against injustice to his 12 million microblog followers.Mr. Yang's arrest last Tuesday drew sympathetic coverage in the news media, and more than 10,000 people posted supportive messages, although many were promptly deleted. Lawyers from Beijing offered to defend him."With the arrest of this kid, I think the public saw this rumor campaign for what it really is: a devious attempt to crush normal online expression," said Zhou Ze, a lawyer in Beijing who sought to rally public support for Mr. Yang's case through his own account on Sina Weibo, China's most popular microblog service.A wiry boy with a fondness for Apple smartphones, online games and the occasional furtive cigarette, Mr. Yang ran into trouble two weeks ago when he stepped into a local controversy involving the death of a man whose body was found in front of the Jewel Time International Karaoke club. The police ruled the death a suicide, but relatives claimed the man had been beaten up before being tossed from an upper floor of the building. The youth, who spoke to some of the victim's relatives, questioned the official version of events and then posted a message noting that the club was owned by a local judicial official. "You don't want the world to know what happened?" he wrote. "What are you afraid of? I am not afraid of you. I took pictures, arrest me. I dare you."Last Tuesday, the police did just that, grabbing him from school and later charging him with "disrupting social disorder" because the posts, they said, inspired protesters to block a local street, snarling traffic. The police also claimed he had stolen a motorbike when he was 15, although they say he escaped punishment because of his age. His father has said the allegations are untrue.Wang Shihua, one of the lawyers who volunteered to represent Mr. Yang, said his detention was unlawful because his comments were not knowingly fabricated. "It's all right to crack down on rumors, but if such initiatives are expanded without limits or regard to principle, they become unconstitutional," he said Monday.Many analysts say the current offensive against online rumors is the latest fusillade in the Communist Party's battle against liberal ideas like democracy and human rights, and those it fears could shake its hold on power. Unlike previous attempts to rein in China's freewheeling microblogs, now estimated to include 500 million registered users, officials have been going after relatively moderate rights advocates as well as some of the most popular voices on Weibo. "We've seen an across-the-board tightening," said David Bandurski, a researcher at the China Media Project in Hong Kong.If the authorities in Zhangjiachuan thought the arrest of young Mr. Yang would chill outside scrutiny, they have been sorely disappointed. In recent days, some of China's most intrepid journalists have been taking a closer look at what ranks as one of the country's poorest counties. Bloggers have publicized lavish spending on government buildings, including nearly $3 million spent on the county's administrative headquarters, and the extravagant tastes of local civil servants, one of whom was photographed wearing the kind of luxury watch that has felled other officials.Mr. Yang, who works in his family's noodle shop, seems to have been emboldened by his ordeal. Soon after his release, he posted comments thanking his supporters. Later in the day, he was to participate in a live online interview with Sina Weibo members. But the exchange mysteriously ended just moments later, and soon afterward, the boy's microblog account disappeared, too.
CHANGSHA, China — The cavernous rail station here for China's new high-speed trains was nearly deserted when it opened less than four years ago.Not anymore. Practically every train is sold out, although they leave for cities all over the country every several minutes. Long lines snake back from ticket windows under the 50-foot ceiling of white, gently undulating steel that floats cloudlike over the departure hall. An ambitious construction program will soon nearly double the size of the 16-platform station.Just five years after China's high-speed rail system opened, it is carrying nearly twice as many passengers each month as the country's domestic airline industry. With traffic growing 28 percent a year for the last several years, China's high-speed rail network will handle more passengers by early next year than the 54 million people a month who board domestic flights in the United States.Li Xiaohung, a shoe factory worker, rides the 430-mile route from Guangzhou home to Changsha once a month to visit her daughter. Ms. Li used to see her daughter just once a year because the trip took a full day. Now she comes back in 2 hours 19 minutes.Business executives like Zhen Qinan, a founder of the stock market in coastal Shenzhen, ride bullet trains to meetings all over China to avoid airport delays. The trains hurtle along at 186 miles an hour and are smooth, well-lighted, comfortable and almost invariably punctual, if not early. "I did not think it would change so quickly. High-speed trains seemed like a strange thing, but now it's just part of our lives," Mr. Zhen said.China's high-speed rail system has emerged as an unexpected success story. Economists and transportation experts cite it as one reason for China's continued economic growth when other emerging economies are faltering. But it has not been without costs — high debt, many people relocated and a deadly accident. The corruption trials this summer of two former senior rail ministry officials have cast an unfavorable light on the bidding process for the rail lines.The high-speed rail lines have, without a doubt, transformed China, often in unexpected ways.For example, Chinese workers are now more productive. A paper for the World Bank by three consultants this year found that Chinese cities connected to the high-speed rail network, as more than 100 are already, are likely to experience broad growth in worker productivity. The productivity gains occur when companies find themselves within a couple of hours' train ride of tens of millions of potential customers, employees and rivals."What we see very clearly is a change in the way a lot of companies are doing business," said Gerald Ollivier, a World Bank senior transport specialist in Beijing.Productivity gains to the economy appear to be of the same order as the combined economic gains from the usual arguments given for high-speed trains, including time savings for travelers, reduced noise, less air pollution and fuel savings, the World Bank consultants calculated.Companies are opening research and development centers in more glamorous cities like Beijing and Shenzhen with abundant supplies of young, highly educated workers, and having them take frequent day trips to factories in cities with lower wages and land costs, like Tianjin and Changsha. Businesses are also customizing their products more through frequent meetings with clients in other cities, part of a broader move up the ladder toward higher value-added products.Li Qingfu, the sales manager at the Changsha Don Lea Ramie Textile Technology Company, an exporter of women's dresses and blouses, said he used to travel twice a year to Guangzhou, the commercial hub of southeastern China. The journey, similar in distance to traveling from Boston to Washington, required nearly a full day in each direction of winding up and down mountains by train or by car.He now goes almost every month on the punctual bullet trains, which slice straight through the forested mountains and narrow valleys of southern Hunan province and northern Guangdong province in a little over two hours, traversing long tunnels and elevated concrete viaducts in rapid succession."More frequent access to my client base has allowed me to more quickly pick up on fashion changes in color and style. My orders have increased by 50 percent," he said.China relocated large numbers of families whose homes lay in the path of the tracks and quickly built new residential and commercial districts around high-speed train stations.
CHANGSHA, China — The crash happened in an instant two years ago, ending 40 lives, injuring 192 people and casting a lasting shadow over the reputation of China's high-speed rail system.When a rainstorm briefly disabled the signaling equipment on a high-speed rail line near Wenzhou in southern China on July 23, 2011, one high-speed train stopped on a concrete viaduct and the one behind it did not. The stopped train had just started moving forward again when the trailing train smashed into it, spilling shattered cars off the viaduct and 65 feet down into the fields below.While the crash is still talked about in China today, statistics suggest that China's high-speed trains have actually proved to be one of the world's safest transportation systems so far. Less clear is how long that safety record will last.Government data shows that the system has carried about 1.8 billion passengers since the start of 2009. Rail experts inside and outside China say they are not aware of any fatal crashes other than the one near Wenzhou. They also note that obsessive attention to the rail system by social media users means that it would be nearly impossible to cover up another fatal high-speed train crash — although there have been unconfirmed reports of pedestrians killed after sneaking past fences and on to the tracks.Comparing the 40 deaths in the crash two years ago to the number of Chinese high-speed train trips completed without loss of life over the last several years suggests that the trains have been exceptionally safe overall, said Arnold I. Barnett, a mathematician at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology who is one of the world's best-known experts on aviation safety statistics."Chinese high-speed rail has so far established a mortality-risk level that equals or exceeds that of the world's safest airlines," Mr. Barnett wrote in an e-mail.The high-speed rail system's safety record is particularly good compared with the record of China's roads, which are 6 to 20 times as deadly per million registered vehicles as in the United States.China's aviation system had a poor safety record until the 1990s, when it worked very closely with the Federal Aviation Administration in the United States to revamp its procedures. The passenger death risk per flight has improved since then, but it remained nearly double the level in the United States from 2008 through 2012, according to Mr. Barnett's statistics.It is also unreliable. FlightStats, an online aviation data service, calculates that so far this year, Shanghai and Beijing have had far worse on-time departure records than major international airports in any other country that the company tracks, with as few as one in six flights leaving on time — another reason Chinese travelers are switching to high-speed trains.China's high-speed rail system faces a huge challenge in maintaining its own safety record of the last two years. And that is not just because of its sheer size, operating nearly 2,000 train trips a day.China borrowed a mishmash of technologies from major rail companies around the world and then built the system in record time, often relying on domestically produced parts for reasons of nationalism and cost. Settling and sinking of the land underneath the foundations of rail viaducts has already been a concern.Another worry is that China opted not to use expensive chemical hardening agents for the concrete viaducts, which could result in their showing premature wear and tear. That could limit top speeds, which were already reduced to 186 miles per hour from 217 m.p.h. after the crash two years ago.The government is now extending high-speed rail lines into seismically active areas of western China that have had many earthquakes since the deadly Sichuan quake in 2008. Earthquakes are a hazard for trains not just because they can move tracks out of alignment, but also because they can disrupt signaling equipment.
BEIJING — A powerful typhoon that had threatened Hong Kong brushed past the southern Chinese city on Sunday night and crashed into Guangdong Province. The local news media said at least 25 people were killed.Typhoon Usagi, described as among the region's most dangerous storms in three decades, forced the cancellation of hundreds of flights in Hong Kong and delayed the opening of financial markets on Monday. But it weakened as it approached the densely populated Pearl River Delta with winds that topped out at around 110 miles per hour.More than half of the deaths occurred in and around the coastal city of Shanwei on Sunday night. The dead included seven railroad construction workers, two people who drowned when their fishing boat capsized, and a man hit by a window dislodged by gale-force winds, the state-run media said. Flooding and strong gusts brought down power lines, leaving 170,000 people without electricity.Across Guangdong, the official Xinhua news agency said, the storm destroyed 7,100 homes and forced the evacuation of around 226,000 people. Damage was estimated at more than $500 million. In Shantou, another coastal city, rising floodwaters helped a two-ton hippopotamus escape from its enclosure at the city zoo. Photographs posted on the Internet showed the animal bobbing in a nearby canal, but it was reportedly coaxed back by zoo workers by Monday afternoon.Earlier in the week, Usagi — which means rabbit in Japanese — plowed through the Luzon Strait, which separates Taiwan and the Philippines, killing at least four people. For a while on Friday, the storm qualified as a supertyphoon, a Category 5 storm on the Saffir-Simpson scale, but it began to lose some of its punch on Sunday.According to the Hong Kong Observatory, the storm injured 13 people across the city and forced the cancellation of 370 flights, leaving hundreds of travelers stranded at the city's airport.On the Chinese mainland, high-speed train service between Guangzhou and Beijing was suspended and 540 flights were canceled just as millions of travelers were returning after a three-day national holiday. By Monday evening, the storm, still packing heavy wind and rain, was sweeping northwest to China's Guangxi Zhuang Autonomous Region.
HONG KONG — The government of Singapore announced measures on Monday that will compel companies to give priority to local residents in the job recruitment process, a move that could create more challenges for multinational firms doing business in the Southeast Asian city-state.The measures will require companies operating in Singapore to advertise vacancies to local residents for two weeks before they can apply to fill positions with overseas workers. The recruitment notices must be posted to a central job bank to be administered by a government employment agency, according to a statement released by the Ministry of Manpower."Providing better jobs and diverse opportunities to meet Singaporeans' aspirations are the ultimate objectives of economic growth," Tan Chuan-Jin, the acting minister for manpower, said in the statement. "What we are doing is to put in place measures to nudge employers to give Singaporeans — especially our young graduates and professionals, managers and executives — a fair chance at both job and development opportunities."Singapore has already taken steps this year to make it more difficult to import workers, including increasing levies on overseas hires and reducing the allowable ratio of foreign to local employees at companies in the service, manufacturing, construction and maritime sectors.Singapore is a major hub for regional and multinational companies operating in Southeast Asia, and such measures have raised concerns in the foreign business community about the ability to meet staffing needs, given Singapore's aging population. In January, nine foreign business groups, including the American, Australian, British, Canadian and European chambers of commerce, sent a letter expressing these concerns to local labor officials."Singapore's openness to foreign labor has enabled it to attract, retain and absorb the best of foreign talent, providing it with a clear competitive advantage over its neighbors," the business groups wrote. "While Singapore continues to attract significant foreign investment, we nevertheless fear current implementation of revised labor policy risks negatively impacting Singapore's economy and reputation as an open economy."While many countries impose restrictions on foreign workers, few of them depend on imported labor as much as Singapore. With a citizenry of 3.3 million and a fertility rate that falls far short of replenishing the population, tiny Singapore relies heavily on foreign labor for construction workers, service staffs and financial and legal professionals.That dependence is increasing as the economy expands. The number of foreign workers in Singapore has soared in recent years, to 1.2 million at the end of 2012, accounting for 37 percent of the labor force. At the same time, Singapore's unemployment rate has remained among the lowest in Asia, at 2.1 percent as of June.Still, opposition to imported labor has risen among locals who see themselves as missing out on opportunities, and that has become a political liability for the government. The People's Action Party, which has governed Singapore since it became an independent nation in 1965, generated its weakest level of support ever in elections two years ago.Also on Monday, the government raised by 10 percent the minimum salary required before it will issue an employment pass for a foreign worker. The new amount is 3,300 Singapore dollars, or $2,600, a month, effective in January.Companies with 25 or fewer employees and jobs that pay a fixed monthly salary of 12,000 Singapore dollars, or $9,600, or more will be exempt from the new recruitment advertising requirements, the government said. The policy takes effect next August.Mr. Tan, of the labor ministry, dismissed criticism of the measures. "The framework is not about 'Hire Singaporeans first,' or 'Hire Singaporeans only,' " he said. "What the government is doing is to help them get a fair opportunity. Singaporeans must still prove themselves able and competitive to take on the higher jobs that they aspire to."
HONG KONG — A China manufacturing index hit its highest level in six months on Monday, offering the first important measure of how the country's economy performed in September and showing that a tentative reacceleration has continued as government support and firmer demand for Chinese exports have gained traction.HSBC's manufacturing purchasing managers index — a survey that takes the temperature of China's important factory sector — rose to 51.2 in September, from 50.1, topping analysts' expectations. The index HSBC released on Monday was based on a preliminary assessment of survey responses. A final reading will be published on Sept. 30. A separate index compiled by the authorities in Beijing, more focused on larger, state-owned enterprises of the kind that benefit from state-led investment, will be released on Oct. 1.Readings above 50 indicate expansion, so the September figure provided more evidence that the Chinese manufacturing sector was growing again after several months of contraction, while the economy as a whole had stopped decelerating.The firmer reading "was supported by simultaneous improvements of external and domestic demand conditions," Qu Hongbin, chief China economist at HSBC, said in a note accompanying the data release.Faced with slowing growth, the authorities in Beijing have in recent months announced a series of measures aimed at increasing economic activity.Although China has avoided a repeat of the sweeping, large-scale stimulus of late 2008 and 2009, the smaller-scale, more targeted support measures of the last year or so have helped to put a floor under the economy, analysts have said.Measures announced this year have included tax cuts for small businesses and measures aimed at speeding up railroad construction in inland and poor areas. In a bid to raise the economy's efficiency, the authorities have also issued instructions to more than 1,400 companies in 19 industries to cut excess production capacity this year."We expect a more sustained recovery as the further filtering-through of fine-tuning measures should lift domestic demand. This will create more favorable conditions to push forward reforms, which should in turn boost mid- and long-term growth outlooks," Mr. Qu wrote.Improving demand in the beleaguered United States and European economies also is helping activity in China. New orders for exports picked up speed in September, the HSBC poll showed, echoing a trend seen in trade data for August, released this month."Looking ahead, we expect the cyclical pickup to be consolidated in the coming quarters, benefiting from the strengthening global demand outlook, which supports growth directly via stronger exports and by improving sentiment and profitability in industry and thus the willingness to invest," wrote Louis Kuijs, a China economist at RBS in Hong Kong.The latest signs of China's resilience on Monday helped push Chinese stocks higher; the Shanghai composite rose 1.33 percent.Still, many analysts continued to caution that the upturn may not last into next year, given that the leadership in Beijing will have to step up its efforts to combat issues — like overcapacity in some major industries, often poor allocation of capital, and a buildup in debt over the last few years — that haunt China's economy."The third plenary session of the Central Committee, which is to be held this November, will lay out the agenda of economic reform going ahead," said Zhu Haibin, chief China economist at JPMorgan Chase. "Addressing these problems in the coming years implies that the economic recovery tends to be limited."
BEIJING — It was 1949, and the Communists had just defeated the Nationalists in the civil war. Legend has it that during the losing army's rushed retreat to Taiwan, a high-ranking Kuomintang official living in Beijing abandoned his wife, leaving her to fend for herself as the Communists marched into the city. Devastated, the wife (some say she was his concubine) hanged herself from the rafters of their three-story French Baroque-style home.The spirit of the spurned woman, local residents say, has haunted the house ever since.Today, with its floor-to-ceiling cobwebs and crumbling floorboards, the house, Chaonei No. 81, certainly seems like the ideal breeding ground for paranormal activity. However, unlike the famously ghost-ridden Forbidden City, which hosts droves of tourists every day, the Chaonei house has sat dilapidated and deserted for years, a quiet enclave amid Soviet-style apartment blocks and glittering modern buildings.According to local legend, the Qing imperial family built the mansion as a church for British residents of Beijing. It could not be more of an anachronism, with its red brick facade, mansard roof and stone quoining. Yet, there has been a surge of interest in the house in recent years, with videos circulating online and word of mouth building about a new film set at the house.Inside, the intricate banisters and fragments of decorative tile flooring are the only remaining signs of the mansion's former elegance. Building materials, beer bottles and cigarette butts are strewn about, much of the debris left behind by the many ("too many," says a guard) young adventurers who sneak in at night. Graffiti cautions visitors to stay away."Even in the 1970s, people thought the house was haunted," said Li Yongjie, who grew up in a traditional alleyway behind Chaonei No. 81. "As children, we would play hide-and-seek in the house, but we didn't dare come in by ourselves.""Even the Red Guards who lived in the house during the Cultural Revolution got scared and left," Mr. Li, 50, added, referring to the militant activist youths loyal to Mao Zedong in the late 1960s.Despite the buildings' location in the center of Beijing, where a small courtyard home easily sells for several million dollars, there are "no official plans" to do anything with the neglected buildings, said the Rev. Liu Zhentian of the Beijing Catholic Diocese, the property's current owner.The buildings are now on a historic preservation list, so they can only be renovated, not torn down. And the church has so far been unable to find a tenant willing to undertake the cost of renovation, which church officials have estimated at more than $1.5 million.But with millions of dollars being splashed out on building construction all around the city, the long-term abandonment of Chaonei No. 81 still remains rather mystifying.It has led some to suspect that the derelict state of the home has more to do with ghosts, or at least the belief in ghosts, than with costs. Potential tenants might be shunning the home, some say, because of a tendency among many Chinese to avoid all things related to death. The superstition is so pervasive in Chinese culture that mobile numbers or apartments with addresses that contain the number 4 are often automatically devalued, since the word for four in Chinese sounds like the word for death.Even in the cities, the tradition of burning paper money (also known as "hell money") as offerings to placate ancestors and ghosts is still widely upheld, particularly during the annual tomb sweeping and hungry ghost festivals.Both the district police and the Catholic diocese have rejected the Chaonei ghost tale."In terms of the history, there is no such thing as a Kuomintang official living there," Shi Hongxi, secretary general of the Chinese Patriotic Catholic Association in Beijing, which oversees the diocese, told a local newspaper in 2009. "The whole story about the house being haunted is complete nonsense."Mr. Shi said the mansion and one other building on the property were built in 1910 as a language training center for foreign missionaries called the North China Union Language School. In 1930, the school was renamed the California College in China and broadened its teaching mandate to include diplomats, businessmen and scholars, one of whom was a prominent China historian and Harvard professor, John K. Fairbank.However, some urban historians contest Mr. Shi's account, saying that the California College was elsewhere in Beijing. They say the buildings at Chaonei No. 81 were built as a private residence for the French manager of the company that built the railway connecting Beijing to Hankou in Hubei Province.On the eve of the Communist takeover in 1949, according to those historians, the house was occupied by the Irish Presbyterian Mission, hence the home's connection to the Beijing Catholic Diocese today.Whatever the truth, the various narratives swirling around the house have only enhanced fascination with it."Death and religion — these are always good starting points for potential ghosts," said Daniel Newman, the founder of Newman Tours, which offers a ghost tour of supposedly haunted locales around Beijing.Chaonei No. 81's history is more established after 1949, when it came under government control. For decades, the buildings shifted between various states of use and disuse, as the property rights were passed between a number of government ministries."There used to be a beautiful fountain in the front and all this wild grass," Mr. Li recalled, as he walked through the house one afternoon, his first visit in many years. "I didn't think it would be as run-down as it is now."The rights to Chaonei No. 81 were handed off to the Beijing Catholic Diocese in the late 1990s. The buildings were close to being demolished when officials from the church stepped in, citing the distinctive architecture as well as the possibility of housing the Vatican Embassy there if relations between the mainland government and the Vatican were ever re-established, according to Liu Yang, an expert on religious architecture in Beijing.Since then, the house has sat neglected and serene, apart from a few occasions during which it was rented out as a backdrop for film and television productions set in China's Republican era."There are so few of these traditional buildings left," said Fu Qian, an artist living in Beijing who came to explore the house one afternoon after reading about it online."They should do something with it. It's very sad," he said.
HONG KONG — In a move that underscores the growing importance of Asia as a market for goods as varied as fast cars, fine wines and postage stamps, Spink & Sons, a small auction house founded in London in 1666, announced on Tuesday that its chief executive had relocated to Hong Kong.Olivier D. Stocker, a former investment banker who spent many years in Asia before buying the auction house in 2002, moved to Hong Kong from London this month, a step he said was aimed at galvanizing Asian growth."If you really want to focus your mind and business on the region, you have to live here," said Mr. Stocker, who is French. By basing himself and his family full time in Hong Kong, he said, "you are sending an important message to your customers and your staff that you believe in the region, that you are committed to it."Mr. Stocker's remarks echo those of a growing number of senior executives from non-Asian companies who have based themselves in cities like Singapore, Hong Kong and Shanghai, rather than in the countries in which their companies have headquarters.The phenomenon is fairly recent, but has picked up rapidly in the past few years as Asia's appetite for industrial, consumer and luxury goods has emerged as a key engine of growth for Western companies struggling at home.In 2008, for example, just 19.1 percent of non-Asian multinational companies surveyed by the Economist Corporate Network had one or more board members living and working in Asia. By last year, that figure had reached 38.3 percent. What is more, 52.6 percent of the respondents in the Economist Corporate Network's 2012 survey expected to have board members in the region by 2017.Among those who have chosen to base themselves in Asia in recent years are John Rice, vice chairman of General Electric and president and chief executive of global growth and operations, who moved to Hong Kong in 2011; Jean-Pascal Tricoirse, the chief executive of Schneider Electric, a French engineering company that derives more than a quarter of its sales from Asia, spends so much time traveling in Asia that his family has moved to Hong Kong.The auction world, too, has seen Asian spending power become a key driver of growth over the past decade as affluence has increased throughout the region, industry experts say.Hong Kong, for example, has emerged as a key venue for high-end jewelry auctions in the past six or seven years and now ranks alongside Geneva and New York as a center for such sales.Likewise, Mr. Stocker said, Hong Kong has long been an important market for the stamps, coins and other collectibles that his auction house specializes in."But you have really seen Asian buyers picking up steam and momentum over the past decade," he said. "The region is the fastest growing in the world."Asian buyers now account for about one-third of the money spent at Spinks sales, which take place in London, Hong Kong, Singapore, New York and elsewhere. That proportion, he said, could rise to about 50 percent in the next five or 10 years.
HONG KONG — Shortly before his retirement late last year, Zhou Yongkang, the longtime chief of China's domestic security apparatus, visited an office of the state oil company where he had started his ascent in the Communist Party hierarchy. He spoke of his undimmed devotion to the company, China National Petroleum Corporation, and to his fellow oilmen."Oil is a word that stays in an oilman's heart for his whole life," Mr. Zhou said in his valedictory.A year later, senior officials associated with the oil conglomerate, including longtime allies of Mr. Zhou's, are enmeshed in spreading corruption inquiries, presenting China's new leader, Xi Jinping, with one of his biggest tests so far: How far and high is he willing to go to clean up China's political elite?Since his appointment as top leader last year, Mr. Xi has promoted himself as a firm opponent of "flies and tigers": low- and high-ranking officials engaged in graft and bribetaking. On Sunday, he scored one victory when a court sentenced Bo Xilai, a former Politburo member, to life in prison after declaring him guilty of accepting bribes, embezzling state money and abusing his power.But Mr. Xi must now decide how much further he is willing to pursue other high-level corruption investigations that could either strengthen his authority or unleash risky instabilities within the political elite.Mr. Xi is eager to assert authority over the domestic security agencies and the military, said Ding Xueliang, a professor at the Hong Kong University of Science and Technology who has studied corruption in China.Mr. Zhou, who retired as a member of the Politburo Standing Committee, a rank that is widely assumed to make him effectively untouchable, will be an important test of Mr. Xi's intentions and authority."What's going on can be called shaking the mountain to scare the tiger," said Professor Ding, citing a Chinese expression meaning a show of strength to warn others."It's also about Xi consolidating control over the key parts of the system," Professor Ding said. "It says to Zhou Yongkang, 'We are in the process of collecting all the evidence of people close to you, and if you don't keep yourself disciplined, we can do more.' Others will also understand that warning."In late August, four senior managers of the oil company, known by its initials C.N.P.C., and its stock market-listed arm, PetroChina, were dismissed in a party investigation into allegations of disciplinary violations, a term that usually means corruption. Days later, a former chairman of C.N.P.C., Jiang Jiemin, was publicly accused of the same charges and then dismissed from his job in charge of the government agency that administers state-owned companies.Mr. Jiang and several other oil executives under investigation had worked under Mr. Zhou when he was a rising official at C.N.P.C. and its predecessor, a state organization. And even before the oil scandal broke into the open, a corruption investigation in Sichuan Province, where Mr. Zhou served as party chief, had taken down officials who were close to him.But this is potentially treacherous terrain for China's new leadership, observers said. From 2007 until last year, Mr. Zhou, 70, was head of the party's Legal and Political Affairs Committee, which oversees the police, courts, state security and other powerful agencies for domestic law and order. As a member of the Standing Committee, he was part of the innermost council of party power.With that background, Mr. Zhou might be able to summon support from allies and party elders, and any formal charges against him could tear up norms that for decades have insulated top leaders and their families from scrutiny and shored up elite stability. Mr. Xi and his colleagues will probably refrain from publicly pursuing or punishing Mr. Zhou, said most observers."They want to have a cleaner playground," Professor Ding said of Mr. Xi and his colleagues. "But I don't think the decision has been made to openly punish Zhou Yongkang. If they come to that decision, then the rules of the game change dramatically."But as the trial of Mr. Bo showed, corruption allegations that date back decades can be exhumed to make a case against an official. And there are signs that Mr. Zhou's past is also exposed to official scrutiny.In July 2012, C.N.P.C. held a leaders' meeting in Chengdu, the capital of Sichuan Province in southwest China. Mr. Jiang, who was then chairman and party secretary of the company, spoke, as did Li Chuncheng, who was then deputy party secretary of the province. A deputy head of the provincial legislature, Guo Yongxiang, was among the dozens of officials who attended the meeting, according to reports on the company's Web site.Now all three men are under investigation by the party's chief anticorruption agency, the Central Commission for Discipline Inspection, an ominous development for Mr. Zhou, who has career ties with all of them. In December, the Central Commission for Discipline Inspection publicly targeted Mr. Li, who had risen quickly in Sichuan while Mr. Zhou was party chief from 1999 to 2002. Probably even more unnerving for Mr. Zhou, his former secretary, Mr. Guo, was detained in June.
FOSHAN, China — Volkswagen plans to double production capacity at a newly opened factory in the southern Chinese city of Foshan, its chief executive for China said on Wednesday.Volkswagen, the top European carmaker, is attempting to grab more market share in a region dominated by Japanese rivals.VW officially opened the plant in southern Guangdong Province, which it operates under a venture with the state-owned FAW Group. The plant, capable of producing 300,000 vehicles a year, recently started to make the redesigned Volkswagen Golf.VW, one of the first global automakers to establish car production facilities in China during the 1980s, is today shifting its operations in the country."Foshan is part of our 'Go South' strategy," Jochem Heizmann, the company's chief for China, said Wednesday in Foshan. "Two years ago we launched our 'Go West' strategy, building a plant in Chengdu," and now VW is trying to repeat the feat through building a plant in Foshan and expanding it quickly. He also said that Volkswagen was in discussions with FAW to raise its stake in their joint venture to 50 percent from 40 percent."We're discussing very intensively how to expand our strategic cooperation between VW and FAW on a long term," Mr. Heizmann said. One subject in their discussions is "the possibility to increase our shares."The planned production expansion at Foshan stems from an agreement signed in May by the two companies that aims to raise the plant's capacity to 600,000 vehicles a year with an investment of 15.3 billion renminbi, or $2.5 billion.Volkswagen, which also sells the Audi, Skoda, Lamborghini and Bentley brands in China, is set to start producing the Audi A3 hatchback in early 2014 at the new plant, Mr. Heizmann said.VW has deepened its presence in the region since the 2009 inauguration of the "Go South" strategy, through which it also increased the number of retail dealerships in the area. Its efforts have focused on Guangdong, a large auto- buying province where the influence of Japanese carmakers is the strongest in China.In a sign that Volkswagen's efforts are paying off, the market share of the Volkswagen brand, excluding the Audi, Skoda, Lamborghini and Bentley brands that the company also markets, climbed to 13.6 percent in southern China in the first half of this year from 11.9 percent a year earlier, according to the consulting firm LMC Automotive.By contrast, Japanese brands — including Toyota Motor, Honda Motor and Nissan Motor — have experienced a decline of their combined market share to 23.9 percent from 29.8 percent during the period.The expansion in southern China is part of Volkswagen's plan to increase the group's annual manufacturing capacity in the country to four million vehicles by 2018. VW increased its Chinese sales 18.5 percent last year, to 2.6 million vehicles.
FOSHAN, China — Volkswagen plans to double production capacity at a newly opened factory in the southern Chinese city of Foshan, its chief executive for China said on Wednesday.Volkswagen, the top European carmaker, is attempting to grab more market share in a region dominated by Japanese rivals.VW officially opened the plant in southern Guangdong Province, which it operates under a venture with the state-owned FAW Group. The plant, capable of producing 300,000 vehicles a year, recently started to make the redesigned Volkswagen Golf.VW, one of the first global automakers to establish car production facilities in China during the 1980s, is today shifting its operations in the country."Foshan is part of our 'Go South' strategy," Jochem Heizmann, the company's chief for China, said Wednesday in Foshan. "Two years ago we launched our 'Go West' strategy, building a plant in Chengdu," and now VW is trying to repeat the feat through building a plant in Foshan and expanding it quickly. He also said that Volkswagen was in discussions with FAW to raise its stake in their joint venture to 50 percent from 40 percent."We're discussing very intensively how to expand our strategic cooperation between VW and FAW on a long term," Mr. Heizmann said. One subject in their discussions is "the possibility to increase our shares."The planned production expansion at Foshan stems from an agreement signed in May by the two companies that aims to raise the plant's capacity to 600,000 vehicles a year with an investment of 15.3 billion renminbi, or $2.5 billion.Volkswagen, which also sells the Audi, Skoda, Lamborghini and Bentley brands in China, is set to start producing the Audi A3 hatchback in early 2014 at the new plant, Mr. Heizmann said.VW has deepened its presence in the region since the 2009 inauguration of the "Go South" strategy, through which it also increased the number of retail dealerships in the area. Its efforts have focused on Guangdong, a large auto- buying province where the influence of Japanese carmakers is the strongest in China.In a sign that Volkswagen's efforts are paying off, the market share of the Volkswagen brand, excluding the Audi, Skoda, Lamborghini and Bentley brands that the company also markets, climbed to 13.6 percent in southern China in the first half of this year from 11.9 percent a year earlier, according to the consulting firm LMC Automotive.By contrast, Japanese brands — including Toyota Motor, Honda Motor and Nissan Motor — have experienced a decline of their combined market share to 23.9 percent from 29.8 percent during the period.The expansion in southern China is part of Volkswagen's plan to increase the group's annual manufacturing capacity in the country to four million vehicles by 2018. VW increased its Chinese sales 18.5 percent last year, to 2.6 million vehicles.
BEIJING — There was never any doubt that Xia Junfeng was a killer: Four years ago, in a flash of panic and fear, he stabbed to death two urban enforcement officials who had sought to punish him for operating an unlicensed shish kebab stall.On Wednesday morning, Mr. Xia, a laid-off factory worker and father of a 13-year-old boy, was put to death in the northeastern Chinese province of Liaoning.But in a country whose citizens widely support capital punishment, Mr. Xia's execution has stoked a firestorm of public anger, much of it expressed through social media. Censors were kept busy all morning as tens of thousands of messages lit up China's most popular microblog service, Sina Weibo, many of them condemning his execution.While most focused on the belief that Mr. Xia had been unfairly convicted during a trial rife with irregularities, a number of people could not help but compare his fate with that of another recently convicted killer, Gu Kailai, the wife of a fallen Chinese leader who confessed to killing a British businessman but was given a suspended death sentence, which is akin to life in prison."If Gu Kailai can remain alive after poisoning someone to death then Xia Junfeng shouldn't be put to death," said Tong Zongjin, a professor at the Chinese University of Political Science and Law in Beijing. "It might be a flimsy dream to insist that everyone be treated equally before the law, but it's nonetheless unseemly to turn this ideal into a joke."Mr. Xia's case evoked sympathetic coverage even from some of China's most reliably pro-government news media. Global Times, a tabloid owned by the Communist Party, portrayed the case as a tragedy for all those involved, and on its Web site, the official Xinhua news agency ran a series of paintings by Mr. Xia's young son, including one that appeared to depict a child running to embrace his father.While the outpouring of compassion for Mr. Xia reflects a widespread disdain for China's urban management officials, known as chengguan, it also highlights a lack of faith in China's judicial system, which is heavily weighed against defendants and often takes into account the interests of the state. Teng Biao, a lawyer who represented Mr. Xia during his appeal, suggested that the sentence was intended to send the message that any challenges to the government — even to lowly code enforcement officials — would not be tolerated. "The authorities wanted to show off their muscle," he said.Most details of the case are not in dispute. In May 2009, Mr. Xia and his wife were selling grilled meat on the streets of the provincial capital, Shenyang, when they were confronted by as many as 10 chengguan. The men grabbed the couple's gas cooking cylinder, tossed the skewers on the ground and then proceeded to beat Mr. Xia when he resisted. The beatings reportedly continued in a nearby chengguan office. It was then, according to his lawyers, that Mr. Xia pulled a fruit knife from his pocket and stabbed three chengguan, killing two.Mr. Teng said the court refused to consider testimony from six witnesses who would have made clear that Mr. Xia had acted in self-defense. In the end, the judge relied on testimony from the chengguan, as did a subsequent appeal. "This is a case of extreme unfairness under the law," said Mr. Teng, noting that a conviction of intentional homicide requires proof that the crime was premeditated.The case is among a string of violent confrontations involving chengguan, who are charged with enforcing sanitation codes and other rules. In July, a 56-year-old watermelon seller in Hunan Province collapsed and died on the street after a chengguan reportedly struck him in the head with a metal weight from his scale. But the agents say they, too, are victims of abuse, pointing to an episode last March in which an agent seeking to stop illegal construction in Hubei Province was killed by an angry villager who attacked him with a pickax.Mr. Xia's case is not dissimilar to that of a unlicensed sausage vendor in Beijing, who was convicted in 2007 of slashing to death an enforcement official who had seized his cart. The episode was closely followed by a sympathetic public but it had a different denouement: the man, Cui Yingjie, was given a suspended death sentence.In recent months, as his case awaited a ruling from China's highest court, Mr. Xia's plight appeared to be drawing a groundswell of public support, which is often a factor in high-profile judicial decisions. Donations to his legal fund poured in and media accounts sought to humanize him, describing how he and his wife, a former hotel maid, had struggled to provide art classes for their only child.A book of the boy's paintings, published to raise funds for the family, sold out its entire 5,000-copy print run.On Wednesday morning, after word came that the Supreme People's Court had rejected his appeal, Mr. Xia's wife, Zhang Jing, documented her final meeting with her husband in a series of microblog postings that riveted the country. She described how her mother fell to her knees wailing, and then recounted how the guards refused to allow one last photograph."Why won't you allow a photo for his son to look at?" she wrote. "Why do you have to be so cruel?"
BEIJING — Nineteen province-level governments in China collected a total of $2.7 billion in fines last year from parents who had violated family planning laws, which usually limit couples to one child, a lawyer who had requested the data said Thursday.The lawyer, Wu Youshui of Zhejiang Province, sent letters in July to 31 provincial governments asking officials to disclose how much they had collected in 2012 in family planning fines, referred to as "social support fees." He said he suspected that the fines were a substantial source of revenue for governments in poor parts of China."We want to shed light on how the current family planning policy works," Mr. Wu said via telephone. "Many are debating reform of the family planning policy. Learning how it works may help with that debate."Mr. Wu's findings were first published Thursday by Beijing News. Mr. Wu opposes China's one-child policy and has written on his microblog he is a Christian.Last year, some prominent scholars and policy advisers started a major effort to push central officials to fundamentally change or repeal a law that generally punishes families for having more than one child. That push comes as economists point out that China's economic growth rate is likely to slow because its pool of cheap, young workers is dwindling as the population ages.The 2010 national census showed that the average birthrate for a Chinese household was 1.181; it was lower in cities and higher in rural areas. Some scholars say that number is extraordinarily low, and the real figure is probably a bit higher.The family planning regulations are prone to abuse because local officials are often evaluated by their superiors based on how well they keep down the populations of their areas. There have been well-known cases of forced abortions or sterilizations across China. Last year, Chinese Internet users sympathized with the plight of Pan Chunyan, who said she had been abducted by officials in Daji Township when she was eight months pregnant with her third child. The officials forced her to have an abortion at a hospital. In June 2012, another woman, Feng Jianmei, was forced to abort a 7-month-old fetus in Shaanxi Province, in a case that also ignited national outrage.Parents in other parts of China have accused local family planning officials of abducting babies who are considered "extra" children in a household and selling them to orphanages, sometimes for $3,000 per baby.The Beijing News report said Mr. Wu, the lawyer, obtained data showing that Jiangxi Province had collected the most in fines of the 19 provinces that replied to him; it amassed $554 million in 2012. Sichuan was second with $400 million, and Fujian was third with $340 million. The provinces that collected the least were Qinghai, with $572,000, and Ningxia, with about $2 million. Both have low populations compared with most other provinces, and they are also home to many rural residents and ethnic minorities, who have more leeway in the number of children they can have without incurring fines.The 12 province-level governments that did not provide data told Mr. Wu that the fines were collected at the county level and used there, so the provincial governments had no information.On Sept. 18, the National Audit Office published a report on the collection and spending of the "social support fee" after it reviewed nine provinces. The office looked at five counties in each of those provinces. It found that "extra" children were not properly counted, that there were no uniform standards for collecting the fees and that management of the fees was poor.Mr. Wu said that he suspected that the fines had been "managed in a chaotic way," and that it appeared that county-level officials overseeing the punishments had been unsupervised.He said the fee should be abolished altogether, and "it should be the family's decision how many children to have."
HONG KONG — A report by Nomura said Thursday that Chinese municipal debt, a focal point of major concern about the country's economy, had grown at an alarming 39 percent clip in recent years.The report by Nomura estimated that the financing vehicles used by local governments to raise cash had created debts totaling at least 19 trillion renminbi, or $3.1 trillion, by the end of last year and posed a "major risk to the economy.""Liquidity risks are rising," said Zhang Zhiwei, chief China economist at Nomura and one of the authors of the report. He added that the bank's research — based on a survey of 869 of these local government financing vehicles, entities set up to borrow in various ways on behalf of the cities — showed that more than half of the debt would have been at risk of default last year had local governments not supported it.The number in Nomura's report roughly matches a recent estimate by Liu Yuhui, an economist in the Chinese Academy of Social Sciences, a government research organization in Beijing."I personally feel that the scale of local debt has already broken beyond 20 trillion yuan," Mr. Liu told a forum in Beijing in mid-September, according to Caixin, a Chinese business magazine. Yuan is another name for China's currency, the renminbi. "You can say there is a risk of local government debt getting out of control."Bank lending and local government debt have soared in recent years, and were a major driver of China's economic rebound after the global financial crisis. As land sales, a traditional way to raise funds, have slowed, local governments have increasingly resorted to bank loans, bonds or equity market offerings to generate cash for the infrastructure projects that have been propelling growth.The huge increase in this activity, however, has caused analysts and policy makers to worry about the financial risks accompanying it, and the new leadership in Beijing has made it clear that it wants to rein in those dangers.In one of the clearest signs to date that they are trying to get a handle on the situation, the authorities in Beijing in July ordered an audit of local government debt. China watchers expect the results to be published in the coming weeks, probably before a plenary session of the Communist Party Central Committee in November, at which more details of China's broad economic overhaul are likely to be communicated.Beijing's eagerness to combat financial risks and bring about more efficient and disciplined allocation of capital will mean slower growth and possibly isolated loan defaults in the coming years, analysts like Mr. Zhang say. But such discipline is also seen as a crucial element of China's long-term economic development, according to the International Monetary Fund."Macro conditions will deteriorate if the current pace of local government debt buildup continues," Mr. Zhang said. "The efficacy of this debt-driven investment strategy will dwindle as funds raised are increasingly used to service existing debt over new investment."He added that the government not only retained ample financial firepower to prop up ailing borrowers and contain a systemic crisis in the next couple of years, but also appeared prepared to tolerate the slower growth that reduced lending would entail."We expect some individual L.G.F.V. defaults in 2014, but a systemic default in L.G.F.V. debt in the short term is unlikely, as the fiscal cost to roll over debt is still low," he wrote, referring to local government financing vehicles. "In other words, the government is still capable of putting L.G.F.V. debt back on a sustainable path, but if it chooses to delay a resolution, the risks — and fiscal cost — may be very high down the road."
HONG KONG — A court in Beijing sentenced the teenage son of a celebrity military singer to 10 years in prison on Thursday after finding him and four other young men guilty of gang-raping a woman. The case has galvanized discussion in China about the reckless lives of some offspring of the Communist Party elite.The verdict against Li Tianyi, 17, the son of Li Shuangjiang, a senior performer in the People's Liberation Army, came nearly a month after the younger Mr. Li and the other defendants went on trial. Mr. Li's mother, Meng Ge, is also a well-known military singer, and his prominent, privileged background made his trial the focus of intense local news media attention, with citizens voicing suspicions that he would be treated leniently because of his status.The verdict appeared intended to quell such doubts. The court found that in February, the five defendants — four teenagers and a 23-year-old man — took an inebriated woman from a bar, forced her into a hotel room, successively raped her and molested her in other ways, according to a report by the state-run news agency Xinhua. The judges rejected Mr. Li's assertion that he had been asleep during the assault and so did not take part."The court determined that Li was an initiator of the joint crime, as well as a main actor in the violence," said the Xinhua report, citing the decision by the Haidian District Court in Beijing. "His status and role were clearly greater than the other accused, and he showed no remorse."Mr. Li had already gained notoriety in 2011, when a BMW he was driving hit another car; he and another teenager then stepped out and beat and threatened the couple in the vehicle he hit. The Beijing police later sent him to a labor camp for juvenile offenders.The verdict against Mr. Li was the second in recent days involving a son of the Chinese elite. When a Chinese court sentenced a fallen politician, Bo Xilai, to life in prison on Sunday, it described extravagant spending by his son Bo Guagua, who the court said was involved in spending tainted money. Bo Guagua is studying law at Columbia University and has previously rejected the allegations against his father.The court in Beijing said the sentence for Mr. Li was lighter than it would have given an adult convicted of the same crime. The adult defendant in the case received a prison sentence of 12 years, and the other minors received sentences of three to four years, Xinhua said. Before the verdict was announced, a legal adviser for Mr. Li's family said they would appeal any guilty verdict, according to a report on the Web site of the newspaper People's Daily.
SHENYANG, China — Zhang Jing was sitting on her bed, describing the final wrenching moments with her husband before the executioner's arrival, when she noticed a newly delivered funereal bouquet of white lilies."Sorry, but I need to bring these to my husband," she said, making her way to the makeshift shrine that held his ashes as a knot of news photographers and videographers jostled one another to capture that perfect moment of grief.A day after her husband, Xia Junfeng, was put to death for killing two urban management officials in a case that captivated the nation, Ms. Zhang said she welcomed the distraction provided by the crush of strangers, many of whom had traveled from the Chinese capital Beijing, 400 miles away, to this former industrial powerhouse in China's rough-and-tumble Northeast."I just don't want to be alone with my thoughts," she said.But after waging a highly public campaign to save her husband's life, Ms. Zhang said she hoped the last gasp of media attention might help achieve his last wish: to clear the name of Mr. Xia, an unlicensed street vendor whose lawyers contend was acting in self-defense when he stabbed to death the men who were beating him. "As long as I am breathing, I will fight to establish his innocence," she said.Even if government censors in the end blocked most sympathetic media coverage of Mr. Xia's death, they failed to dampen public sympathy for him. In the hours after he was administered a lethal injection, Chinese social media were swamped with emotional messages that described Mr. Xia's execution as a miscarriage of justice. Many postings sought to compare his unlucky fate to that of Gu Kailai, the daughter of a Communist revolutionary hero and wife of a once-powerful Chinese politician who was spared death last year despite her conviction for murdering a British businessman.In denying Mr. Xia's last appeal on Wednesday, China's highest court offered no insight into its decision, although many analysts suspect it was designed to affirm the authority of China's chengguan, the widely reviled army of low-paid code enforcement officials charged with keeping urban order."To many people, this was a political decision: killing a chicken to scare the monkeys," said Zhong Guolin, one of the volunteer lawyers who worked on the case.Hu Lifu, a documentary filmmaker who has spent the past year capturing Ms. Zhang's quixotic battle to save her husband, said that Mr. Xia, a middle-aged laid-off factory worker who sold grilled meat kebabs to survive, had become a vessel for pent-up fury that many Chinese feel toward a government capable of arbitrary cruelty. "Many people, myself included, have been drawn to his case out of a sense that any of us could be in his shoes," Mr. Hu said. "Supporting him has become a way of venting their anger."That public support has taken many forms, including generous financial help for Ms. Zhang and the couple's 13-year-old son, whose emotionally fraught paintings helped cultivate even greater public sympathy. A hardcover collection of his works quickly sold out, and scores of his paintings have sold at underground exhibitions in cities across the country.On Thursday afternoon, a stranger climbed the six flights of stairs to the family's cramped apartment to buy a canvas that depicted a lonely fish trapped in a bowl floating in a sea full of colorful, happy fish."I just wanted to show my support," the man said before leaving.In the four years since her husband was arrested, Ms. Zhang, 39, has been transformed from a shy, self-described politically naïve peasant into an eloquent voice for the downtrodden. With nearly 100,000 followers on Sina Weibo, China's equivalent of Twitter, she has become fluent in the details of Chinese criminal law and the well-publicized abuses wrought by loosely regulated chengguan. She laughed when she recalled that she did not even know how to type two years ago when she was first introduced to a computer, a gift from one of the lawyers who worked on her husband's case."Before, the only thing I cared about was my own family," said Ms. Zhang, a middle-school graduate who used to work alongside her husband. Her main job, she said, was looking out for the chengguan, who would confiscate the carts of those who didn't run fast enough and then demand hefty fines.Throughout the afternoon, as supporters and strangers drifted in and out and a recorded Buddhist dirge looped in the background, Ms. Zhang maintained a frail smile. Emotions, she was always taught, were best kept out of public view.But then she recounted her last moments with her husband on the day of his execution, the first time she had seen him in two and a half years. The tiny room was packed with a dozen guards, and Mr. Xia was shackled to a chair, unable to move his arms and feet; a chain-link barrier separated the two sides. They were given only 30 minutes to say goodbye, Ms. Zhang said.Mr. Xia made a plea to have his name cleared after his death, and out spilled a cascade of tender words and apologies — until a guard began a haunting countdown. With just a few minutes left, she recalled, they made a final, desperate attempt at physical contact. He strained his body forward, she reached through the gate and was able to stroke his gaunt face with one finger.It was only then, while recalling that final moment, that she began to weep. "One minute I was touching him, and then a few hours later, I was collecting his ashes in a bag," she said, "These are the images I just can't get out of my head. This is why I don't want to be alone."
Prime Minister Shinzo Abe of Japan on Friday rejected any concession in a standoff with China over a group of islands claimed by both countries, declining to even acknowledge that the islands are disputed.At a news conference following his attendance at the United Nations General Assembly, Mr. Abe said he was open to dialogue with China about the islands, known as the Senkaku in Japan and Diaoyu in China, and that he did not want their disagreement to infect the broader relationship between the two countries.But Mr. Abe, a conservative who wants to strengthen Japan's military, made clear that for Japan the question of who owned the uninhabited islands in the East China Sea was not open to negotiation."Concerning the Senkaku islands, Senkaku is an inherent part of the territory of Japan in light of historical facts and based upon international law, and the islands are under the valid control of Japan," he said through an interpreter. "However the invasion by Chinese government vessels in our territorial waters are continuing, to our regret."He also said "Japan would not make a concession on our territorial sovereignty" regarding the islands but that "having said so, we do not intend to escalate this issue any further."Mr. Abe appeared to be responding in part to remarks by Wang Yi, China's foreign minister, who said at an appearance last week at the Brookings Institution in Washington that China wanted to resolve the issue peacefully but that Japan had to first acknowledge that ownership of the islands is in dispute.Japan has administered the islands for decades, but China regards Japanese claims to the islands as a resonant reminder of Japanese militarism in the late 19th and early 20th centuries. Japan counters that China did not express interest in the islands until recent decades after reports that the seabed nearby might contain oil and gas.Japanese officials have expressed growing concern about China's sovereignty assertions over the islands. For months, the two countries' patrol boats have played cat-and-mouse games near the islands. A few weeks ago, at least seven Chinese patrol ships entered waters surrounding the islands, and Japanese air force jets were scrambled after a drone aircraft was detected in the region, which Japanese officials have suggested was dispatched by China.Mr. Abe, who came to power in December, has said he might place government officials on the islands, which could further escalate the confrontation with China. While Mr. Abe did not reiterate that possibility on Friday, his chief cabinet secretary, Yoshihide Suga, told reporters in Japan a few weeks ago that it was among the options under consideration.
HONG KONG — On the first floor of a hulking residential building, at the end of a dimly lighted corridor, a narrow door opens up into Hong Kong's economic underbelly.Twenty-two men live in this particular 450-square-foot apartment in the neighborhood of Mong Kok, in cubicles each hardly larger than a single bed, stacked above one another along two narrow passageways that end in a dank toilet and shower room.Each cupboardlike cubicle has a sliding door, a small television, some shelves and a thin mattress. Most of the men have lived here for months, some for years."Luckily there is air-conditioning. If not, sleeping would be impossible," said Ng Chi-hung, 55, who is unemployed and occupies one of the bottom bunks. "If you live in such environment, you have to adapt to everything."Cheng Tin-sang, 59, occupies the bunk above, which is reached via a short metal ladder. Unable to work because of a heart ailment, Mr. Cheng wanders the streets all day."I sit in places like McDonald's," he said. "Anywhere with air-conditioners will do."Hong Kong's per-capita gross domestic product is higher than that of Italy, and not far short of those of Britain and France, according to World Bank figures. But for unskilled or semiskilled people like Mr. Ng, the city is a tough place to be, said Wong Hung, an associate professor at the Chinese University of Hong Kong specializing in urban poverty and employment.Hong Kong's economy underwent a major change in the 1980s, when much of the manufacturing activity that made the city famous in the 1950s and '60s moved across the border to mainland China. In its place came banking, insurance, trading, logistics and real estate — service sectors that now employ nearly 90 percent of the work force but that have been unable to absorb many less educated workers, Mr. Wong said.At the same time, Hong Kong has some of the highest living costs in the world, a huge and growing burden on those at the bottom of the income ladder.Mr. Ng, for example, has worked on construction sites and made deliveries. His last job, as a waiter, paid 7,000 to 8,000 Hong Kong dollars a month, about $900 to $1,000. The monthly rent on his 15-square-foot bunk in Mong Kok is 1,440 Hong Kong dollars.At least 170,000 people live in such dwellings in Hong Kong, according to Policy 21, a research unit tasked by the government to take stock of the situation. Such housing can be found all over the city, in units fenced off with plasterboard or cagelike wire mesh, carved out of apartments that once housed a family each but that have since been subdivided multiple times. This subdividing of privately owned apartments is legal as long as safety and sanitation requirements are met."It is quite hard to know how many there are," said Sze Lai Shan, who works for the Society for Community Organization, a nongovernmental organization that campaigns for social equality. "We hear about them from the people we work with — they tell us of new flats that have been subdivided or old ones that have closed down."While tiny housing of this kind has existed in Hong Kong for many years, it has expanded as soaring property prices have pushed more and more low-income earners out of the market for regular housing in recent years. Rent on these spaces has risen nearly 20 percent in the last four years, and now gobbles up about a third of the residents' incomes, a report released by Ms. Sze's organization this month showed. On a per-square-foot basis, the spaces cost at least one-third more to rent than regular apartments that are not subdivided, which average about 22.70 Hong Kong dollars, or $2.93, a square foot per month."It is very expensive to live here, so I have to be more frugal, and I cut my food expenses," said Yuen Luen-yuk, 49, who moved to Hong Kong from Zhanjiang, on China's south coast, eight years ago and has a low-paying job looking after the residents at a home for people of retirement age.Her living space, with a ceiling too low for an adult to stand, is part of a subdivided apartment in the neighborhood of Kwun Tong. Nine other people live there; they share a dim kitchen, a basic bathroom and a narrow corridor cooled by humming electric fans."I've not thought about renting something better," Ms. Yuen said, "because that means all your salary will be given to the landlord."Hong Kong's housing situation is now one of the reasons the government of Leung Chun-ying, who took the helm of the city's administration last year, is deeply unpopular. Mr. Leung has pledged to add 20,000 units a year to the city's already large stock of social housing for low-income earners.And a committee tasked with reviewing housing strategy this month made numerous recommendations to deal with Hong Kong's housing problems, including a proposal to set up a licensing system for subdivided apartments in a bid to better regulate safety and health conditions.Housing experts fear, however, that such measures will not be nearly enough. New government-subsidized housing — with small but far more comfortable apartments than the tiny spaces in which Mr. Cheng and others live — will take years to build, the government acknowledges.The waiting list for public housing has been lengthening steadily as rising prices have squeezed more and more low-income earners out of regular apartments. About 230,000 are now on the list, according to government figures, up from 165,000 two years ago.With families and older people given priority for government housing, single people like Mr. Ng, Mr. Cheng and Ms. Yuen face a seeming interminable wait, and their hopes for moving out of their tiny bunk spaces are waning."If I were younger, I could work hard to save for a down payment" to buy an apartment, Ms. Yuen said. As it is, she said, "I do not have much hope in the future. I am just living from one day to the next."
HONG KONG — Alibaba, the Chinese Internet company whose potential initial public offering is one of the most fervently awaited in the world, has fired back at Hong Kong's exchange, saying its stance on Alibaba's unusual management structure puts the exchange at risk of being overtaken by the rest of the world.This week, Alibaba abandoned plans to list in Hong Kong after the exchange declined to change rules that discourage companies from organizing in a way that favors dual-class shareholding over individual shareholdings or gives one shareholder a disproportionate say over how a company is run.Alibaba, which is run by a 28-member partner committee, insisted that it be allowed to continue to nominate a majority of its board of directors. It is now moving forward with plans to list in New York, a person close to the Chinese company has said.In a blog post published late Thursday, Joe Tsai, a co-founder and executive vice chairman of Alibaba, vigorously defended the structure, saying that its lack of hierarchy and bureaucracy was key to preserving the company's success and innovation."Our governance structure is a creative way to address the core issues that matter to shareholders while staying true to who we are — which we cannot, and will not, change," Mr. Tsai wrote."We understand Hong Kong may not want to change its tradition for one company," Mr. Tsai continued. "But we firmly believe that Hong Kong must consider what is needed in order to adapt to future trends and changes. The question Hong Kong must address is whether it is ready to look forward as the rest of the world passes it by."Charles Li, the chief executive of Hong Kong Exchanges and Clearing, has defended the stock market operator's stance, saying it is in the broader public interest of Hong Kong.But some bankers say Alibaba's decision to spurn Hong Kong is a major setback for the Asian financial center, which was the world's biggest market for new share offerings from 2009 to 2011, but has seen a sharp drop in deal offerings since then.With a profit of $668.7 million in the first quarter, and a commanding share of China's rapidly growing e-commerce market, Alibaba's I.P.O. could raise as much as $15 billion, making it one of the biggest and most highly anticipated debuts since Facebook raised $16 billion in May 2012.
BEIJING — During the George W. Bush era, North Korea and Iran were joined together as the Axis of Evil, but with President Obama's phone call to President Hassan Rouhani of Iran last week, that pairing — already out of favor in some quarters in Washington — was no longer so tight. It is virtually impossible, analysts say, to imagine Mr. Obama reaching out anytime soon to the leader of North Korea, Kim Jong-un, who has already tested a nuclear bomb and threatened to stage a nuclear attack against the United States.North Korea became even more of an outlier last week. China, its longtime patron, produced a list of equipment and chemical substances it banned for export to North Korea, fearing that the North would use the items to speed development of an intercontinental ballistic missile with a nuclear bomb on top.The publication of the 236-page list of banned items came as a surprise to many who follow North Korea and China, given China's longstanding reluctance to do anything that might destabilize the North and allow the United States any more power on the Korean Peninsula.Both Chinese and Western analysts called the export ban an important development — if it is implemented fully — especially since the list appeared to have been approved at the highest levels of the Chinese government. Either the Politburo, or the group's seven-member Standing Committee, the apex of Chinese power, gave the green light, they said.The compilation of the items, down to their measurements in both inches and millimeters, was probably months in the making, and almost certainly involved the expertise of China's nuclear and military bureaucracies, they said. The export ban would give a boost to United Nations sanctions imposed this year that were meant to starve the North's increasingly sophisticated nuclear programs. The North gets many important materials from China, and American officials had long said sanctions would not work without more Chinese cooperation.The release of the list came after new signs of the North's continued nuclear buildup. Recent satellite photography showed steam emerging from a newly reconstructed nuclear reactor, suggesting that the North might be making good on its promise to resume the production of plutonium for nuclear weapons. Last week, two American arms-control experts said that a wide-ranging analysis suggested that the North had learned to produce crucial components for uranium enrichment without obvious foreign help.Roger Cavazos, a former United States Army intelligence officer who specialized in China's military, said an initial reading of the long list of banned items suggested that China was targeting important aspects of North Korean nuclear programs, including the ceramics needed to protect a warhead as it re-entered the earth's atmosphere atop a missile.Despite the North's underground tests of crude nuclear devices, experts say it has not yet tested a vehicle that can withstand the heat of re-entry, an important step in building a deliverable nuclear bomb. Experts also say that North Korea has most likely not yet mastered the difficult task of miniaturizing a nuclear bomb to fit atop a missile.Since China's new leader, Xi Jinping, came to power earlier this year, Beijing has been tougher toward North Korea on its nuclear abilities, even as it has continued business investment there in a bid to help stabilize the impoverished country.Chinese analysts say Beijing is increasingly frustrated at Mr. Kim's unpredictable behavior since he ascended to the leadership after the death of his father two years ago, including his decision to proceed with a nuclear test this year despite China's disapproval.The publication of the banned items for export was described by these experts as a sign of further exasperation, and a desire for China to fall in line with the United Nations sanctions that it voted for earlier this year.The diplomatic opening between the United States and Iran on Friday would give China another opportunity to "put the squeeze" on North Korea, said Zhu Feng, the deputy director of the Center for International and Strategic Studies at Beijing University. "Now Beijing can say to North Korea: 'If you want to breach your isolation, you should do more.' "A senior official in the Obama administration said American analysts would be poring over the list to determine if China was implementing the sanctions it approved or was rattled enough about North Korea's nuclear progress to go even further.The timing of the export controls helped China to show a "balanced" public policy toward North Korea, the official said.
BEIJING — To millions of Chinese, the enterprising banker from the gritty northern province of Shaanxi is known by the nickname House Sister, and it is not exactly a term of endearment.On Sunday the woman, Gong Aiai, who was accused of amassing dozens of high-end properties by forging or illegally purchasing documents, was sentenced to three years in prison, according to the state-run Xinhua news service.After her exposure earlier this year by online whistle-blowers, Ms. Gong and her voracious appetite for real estate became a lightning rod for the frustrations of poor and middle-class Chinese who have been priced out of the nation's booming property market. To many detractors, her case also provided further evidence of how government officials and executives at state-owned enterprises can use their positions to grow unimaginably rich.Ms. Gong, a former vice president of the Shenmu Rural Commercial Bank, was accused of accumulating 41 apartments in Beijing and several others closer to home by presenting illicitly obtained national identity cards and hukou, the coveted residency permits required when buying residential property. Prosecutors say her real estate portfolio was worth $160 million.Having multiple identity cards and hukou allows a person to skirt restrictions aimed at dampening real estate speculation and rules that bar out-of-towners from buying property in overheated markets like Beijing. During a brief trial last week, Ms. Gong denied the charges, according to the state news media.Her downfall follows that of a number of other figures with grotesque spending habits. There was Brother Watch, a midlevel civil servant known for his large collection of luxury timepieces who was convicted of bribery last month, and Grandpa House, a former police chief in Guangdong Province who was accused of using fake identity cards to purchase 192 homes.Although these and other cases were exposed by muckraking Internet sleuths or rivals of the accused, they have been viewed through the lens of the antigraft campaign started by President Xi Jinping, who has promised to take down "tigers and flies" in his war on self-dealing, bribery and official extravagance. In September, Bo Xilai, once one of China's most powerful officials, was sentenced to life in prison for crimes that included bribe-taking and embezzlement of funds worth $4.4 million.Ms. Gong's downfall, however, did little to mollify the public's anger. Writing on the nation's most popular microblog service, Sina Weibo, many people criticized the court for failing to address how Ms. Gong had accrued the money to buy so many properties. Others simply thought the sentence of three years was too short. "The law is like a prostitute," said one posting. "Both the rich and the powerful can have fun with it."
Hong Kong — Trapped in black rock beneath China's mountains and deserts lies a resource that could be a way of supplying some of the country's insatiable demand for energy, while reducing the toxic air pollution that cloaks many of its cities.Like the United States, China is thought to have vast quantities of natural gas locked in shale rock. If it can be produced, this gas would be a much cleaner source of energy than the coal the country relies on for 70 percent of its energy.According to the U.S. Energy Information Administration, or E.I.A., China has the world's largest technically recoverable reserves of shale gas — almost as much as Canada and the United States combined.The government has set ambitious targets to increase the share of natural gas in the country's energy mix. These goals, along with subsidies, make shale exploration attractive for Chinese and international companies with the expertise and financial resources to help the country to achieve its goal.But exploration for shale gas is at an embryonic stage, and China faces many challenges, above and below ground, if it hopes to emulate the shale production boom that has transformed the U.S. energy picture."Shale could be very big in China," says Neil Beveridge, a senior energy analyst at Sanford Bernstein in Hong Kong. "Good data is not easy to come by, resulting in a wide range of perceptions on the viability of shale."Several factors stand in the way of shale development. Most of China's shale deposits lie in the earthquake-prone and mountainous southwest or the remote arid deserts of the far west.These rugged areas make it more difficult for vehicles and equipment to operate than in the flatter landscapes of Texas, North Dakota and Pennsylvania where America's shale success has unfolded.The gas deposits are also deeper — often 4 kilometers, or 13,000 feet, below the surface, compared with 2 to 4 kilometers in the United States.According to the E.I.A., the first horizontal shale well drilled by PetroChina, the Chinese oil and gas firm that has been exploring shale most aggressively, took 11 months to drill compared with the usual two weeks in North America.The rough terrain, lack of paved roads and need to drill deeper "will require additional investment and higher upfront costs," says Fei Kwok, a Shanghai-based lawyer at Norton Rose Fulbright who has advised foreign companies looking to invest in the sector.The most likely region to see early shale gas success is the Sichuan basin in southwest China. Flow rates on test wells in the Changning block being explored by PetroChina reached 150,000 cubic meters, or 5.3 million cubic feet, per day in June, according to Mr. Beveridge. This rate is comparable to U.S. wells, he says.Unlike the deserts where much of China's shale deposits are located, the Sichuan basin has ample supplies of the water needed for the hydraulic fracturing process, better known as fracking, that unlocks the gas deep underground in the rock.Still, Mr. Beveridge believes that the biggest risk to shale gas development may be conflict over water. The steep-sided valleys where early drilling is now taking place are dotted with villages and hamlets and intensively farmed, which could lead to clashes between the drillers and developers with farmers and other water users. Farmers are also likely to demand high compensation for giving over their plots to shale development.According to Ms. Kwok, companies must reach a compensation agreement with the landowner before work can begin. There are national minimum standards, but, in her experience, compensation in shale exploration is higher than in other cases.In Shangluo, the town nearest the Changning block, residents understand the potential for water and soil contamination from fracking, which pumps millions of gallons of pressurized water, chemicals and sand to break the rock and release the gas.The town is home to 30,000 people who make their living growing rice, tobacco and mulberries. "It's by no means Houston. You're paying $10 for the best room in town," says Mr. Beveridge, who visited in June. "But the locals are very aware of the presence of shale and the drilling that's begun."
HONG KONG — The Asian Development Bank lowered its growth forecasts for emerging nations in the region on Wednesday and called for more structural changes to support the local economies.In its twice-yearly economic overview of developing Asia — which includes India, China, the Philippines and Vietnam, but not Japan — the bank said it now expected the region to grow 6 percent this year and 6.2 percent in 2014.Those numbers were down from the 6.6 percent and 6.7 percent, respectively, that the development bank had projected in its previous outlook report, in April. Last year, the region expanded 6.1 percent.Much of Asia enjoyed a sharp rebound in the years immediately after the global financial crisis, buoyed by an aggressive stimulus program in China and the cash that flowed in as investors and businesses looked for higher returns than those available in the languishing United States and European economies.Those drivers have faded since last year. China's economy has cooled as policy makers in Beijing have sought to put growth on a stable footing. And the prospect of reduced monetary stimulus in the United States, whose economy is perking up, has prompted a big exodus of Western cash from emerging markets in Asia and elsewhere in recent months."Developing Asia is challenged to sustain its growth momentum as the pace in its two largest economies moderates," the Asian Development Bank said, referring to China and India. The "prospective tapering of quantitative easing in the United States destabilized emerging economy financial markets, including in developing Asia."At the same time, the bank said, the upturn in the U.S. economy and signs that the euro zone and Japan are turning the corner have "yet to translate into revived orders for exports from developing Asia."India — where poor infrastructure, crippling bureaucracy and policy squabbles have long presented huge hurdles to doing business — has been especially hard hit by the souring investor sentiment toward emerging markets. A sharp drop in the rupee since May has worsened some of the challenges facing the economy, many analysts have warned, and the biggest downward revision the Asian Development Bank made in its update on Wednesday was to the India forecast. The bank now expects the Indian economy to grow 4.7 percent this year, down from its previous estimate of 6 percent. For 2014, India is forecast grow 5.7 percent, down from 6.5 percent.For China, the bank lowered its forecasts to 7.6 percent growth this year and 7.4 percent next year, from 8.2 percent and 8 percent.But unlike in India, China's slowdown, from an average of 10.5 percent growth a year over the past decade, is a "healthy" and "intentional" adjustment as the authorities work to rebalance the economy, Changyong Rhee, chief economist at the bank, said in a news conference in Hong Kong. He added that he expected growth in China to average about 7 percent over the next decade.He stressed that, despite the murkier outlook, Asia remained in a stronger position than during the 1997 financial crisis, thanks to larger reserves of foreign exchange and the current-account surpluses that many countries now run. Slower growth in China and India, he said, hampers but does not hobble growth across Asia.Still, the Asian Development Bank's report said, echoing the remarks of other analysts, the recent financial turmoil has demonstrated the need for structural overhauls to support growth."As Asia transitions toward a more sustainable growth path, governments must watch out for volatile capital flows and financial market disruption," the bank said. "They must also continue to pursue sound macroeconomic policies that include building up fiscal space during good times. Priority areas include foreign direct investment, industrial diversification, infrastructure and human capital, fiscal consolidation, and social protection."The impact of the U.S. government shutdown, meanwhile, is likely to be limited beyond the United States, whose economic recovery is led by the private rather than the public sector, Mr. Rhee said.By far the bigger worry, he said, is the debt ceiling deadline this month. If Congress cannot agree to raise the government's borrowing limit, the government on Oct. 17 would technically default. This could severely undermine global investor confidence in U.S. Treasury bonds and generate major market volatility and outflows from Asia, Mr. Rhee said. He added that he believed policy makers would work to avoid such an outcome.
BEIJING — A Chinese specialist in Sino-Japanese affairs who has been living in Japan appears to have been detained by the Chinese government since late July and is being questioned about his activities, according to Chinese academics and a Japanese newspaper.News of the apparent detention comes as relations between China and Japan have hit their lowest point in decades, and has sent tremors of fear through the small communities of Chinese and Japanese academics who live in each other's countries.The Chinese government hinted but declined to confirm that the specialist, Zhu Jianrong, a professor at a university near Tokyo, was in custody after he traveled to his native Shanghai for a meeting July 17.In a statement released in September, the Foreign Ministry said: "Zhu Jianrong is a Chinese citizen. China is a country ruled by law, and will protect the legitimate rights and interests of Chinese citizens. While at the same time, all Chinese citizens should abide by the law."The Japan Times recently reported his detention in an editorial on Sept. 29, without citing a source. A group that Mr. Zhu helped found, the Society of Chinese Professors in Japan, said Monday that it was almost certain Mr. Zhu was being held and was "currently responding to questioning."The society described him as "very active" in his role as "a bridge between China and Japan." He was chairman of the group for nine years, and often appeared on Japanese television discussing the soured relations between the two countries.There were some suggestions that Mr. Zhu met with Chinese military officials this year in connection with his research, and that the Chinese authorities were suspicious of his subsequent use of the information.The Japan Times editorial said that China was looking into the meetings and whether they constituted an illegal collection of information.The editorial also noted that in 2009, a former deputy director of the Institute of Japanese Studies at the Chinese Academy of Sciences, Jin Xide, was imprisoned for 14 years on charges of selling Chinese state secrets to Japan and South Korea. It also reported that Su Ling, chief editor of Xinhua Shibao, a Chinese-language newspaper published in Japan, has been missing since he came to Beijing from Japan in May.Willy Lam, adjunct professor at the Chinese University of Hong Kong's Center for Chinese Studies, said that the Zhu case could further fracture the "quasi-cold-war relationship" between China and Japan, setting off fears among Chinese academics and visitors to Japan that they could be susceptible to similar treatment.Noting the other cases, Mr. Lam, who has worked in Japan, said: "These folks are not famous people. Inevitably it will affect people-to-people exchanges, popular diplomacy and people-level diplomacy between the two countries."In his appearances on Japanese TV, Mr. Zhu was resolute in defending China's case on the bitter dispute over the islands in the East China Sea, known as the Diaoyu islands in China and as the Senkaku islands in Japan. The dispute involves patrols by naval vessels, as well as air sorties, by both China and Japan. China most recently was reported to have sent a drone over the area.Mr. Zhu married a Japanese researcher in the 1980s, and moved to Japan in 1986, where he worked at the Toyo Gakuen University.The Society of Chinese Professors in Japan expressed concern for Mr. Zhu, saying it hoped he would "return to normal life as soon as possible." The group praised him for trying to improve the relationship between the two countries.
BEIJING — Horse racing may be the sport of kings, but not of Communists. Not here in China , anyway.Sixty-four years ago this week the Chinese Communist Party seized power and banned the sport. And despite the many racecourses built in the past two decades by overseas and Chinese investors hoping the government will have a change of heart, despite breathless reports in the domestic and overseas news media predicting the advent of an industry here, despite the showcase races that do take place, the odds are, well, very long that anything will change anytime soon, insiders say."There's been no refusal," a horse trainer based in China said, speaking on the condition of anonymity because of social and political sensitivities. "The government never promised to do it. It's been their bottom line since 1949. Gambling is illegal. There's no structure, no income to sustain it, because of the ban on betting. You can race all you like. You just can't bet."But horse racing, like baseball, is a field of dreams. "China champs at the bit," ran a recent headline in the state-run newspaper China Daily, increasing the hopes of enthusiasts here and around the world.From time to time, rumors circulate that the government will relent and introduce large-scale "horse lotteries," a toned-down form of betting. But such reports are generally quickly denied, though the proposal is believed to be technically under consideration.On Sept. 21 in Hohhot, the capital of the Inner Mongolia Autonomous Region, there was some racing at the China Equine Cultural Festival, including a purse of 1 million renminbi, or $163,000, for the winner of the National Cup, according to the Web site of the China Horse Club, an organizer. It was a "maiden step" toward a "renaissance of racing in mainland China," the club said."High-level racing does not necessarily rely on betting," Teo Ah Khing, a Malaysian entrepreneur and architect and initiator of the event, told China Daily. "If the purse is high enough, the competition can also be very attractive."So the dream lives on. In Wuhan last week, a prerevolution hotbed of horse racing, I visited the track at Orient Lucky City, home of the Wuhan Jockey Club, backed by Jacky Wu, a Hong Kong investor (slogan: "Dreaming is Believing").For days I had gotten polite but vague promises of an interview, including a "please send us your questions by fax." It all faded into nothing. At one point a person answering the telephone of Ms. Lu, my interlocutor at the Orient Lucky Horse Group, said my request was not convenient because she was "in hospital." Nobody seemed willing to meet me, to put it mildly.I went anyway. Located in the Dongxihu district north of the Yangtze River, the racecourse is enormous, with a high, gray viewing stand and light green seats overlooking a sweeping track of 1,620 meters, or about 5,300 feet.It was also deserted. Doors labeled "Wuhan Jockey Club" were padlocked. Grass lined steps and access roads. The entrance to an underground parking lot was sealed off with a makeshift blue-and-white tarpaulin. Water stains and broken slabs provided a disconsolate decoration.I walked in through a single open gate, keen to see the equine field of dreams. "Where are you going?" shouted a security guard. After some negotiating I continued through a covered passageway, determined to see the sandy track that shone up ahead. And there it was, running around a tree-filled park where birds hopped. For Wuhan, a raging megalopolis of construction sites, the peace was inviting.But the security guard was at my elbow. "You must leave," he said. I asked what happened there."Not much — entertainment," he said, referring to events where some horses run, but not for money. Ms. Lu had said there would be such an event two days after my visit, on a Saturday, from 1 p.m. to 4 p.m."No money," he said. "No tickets. Free in. But you must leave." He escorted me out.Why all the investment? Orient Lucky City alone cost more than $200 million to build, according to its Web site (the sum includes other types of investment like real estate)."It's got to do with being the first one to get racing going in China," said the trainer based in Beijing. But for now, despite intense interest among wealthy Chinese, the sport here is largely limited to pleasure horses and private clubs, he said, and that is not likely to change anytime soon.With revenues falling in many parts of the world, that is bad news for racegoers."There are so many people around the world, especially in America and Australia, who are waiting for this, because the bottom is falling out of the market there," the trainer said. "They think the Chinese will be the saving of the horse all over the world."
BEIJING — Chen Guangcheng, the blind legal activist whose headline-grabbing odyssey included an improbable escape from house arrest in China, a mad dash for refuge inside the United States Embassy in Beijing and several rocky months as a visiting scholar at New York University, has found a new job with a conservative research institute in New Jersey.At a news conference in Washington, Mr. Chen announced Wednesday that he had accepted a three-year fellowship with the Witherspoon Institute in Princeton, N.J., which has taken conservative stands against abortion and same-sex marriage. Although Witherspoon will provide Mr. Chen financial support, he will maintain affiliations with the Catholic University of America and the Lantos Foundation for Human Rights and Justice, a liberal advocacy group named for Representative Tom Lantos, a California Democrat and Hungarian-born Holocaust survivor who died in 2008."We will make a concerted effort and move forward to courageously defend the freedom of the Chinese people, human freedom, human dignity and other universal values," Mr. Chen said, according to a copy of his remarks.The announcement ends several months of speculation over where Mr. Chen would land after a high-profile falling out last spring with N.Y.U., during which he accused the university of forcing him to leave at the behest of the Chinese government. Mr. Chen claimed N.Y.U. administrators were worried that his continued presence would jeopardize plans to open a campus in Shanghai, although he did not offer any evidence to back up his assertions. N.Y.U. officials denied the allegations and said Mr. Chen's visiting scholar position was always meant to last one year.The controversy had a polarizing impact on his supporters and led a key donor to withdraw the financial support that would have allowed Mr. Chen to take a three-year fellowship at Fordham University.Last summer, as news emerged that Mr. Chen might accept a position at Witherspoon, some of his friends expressed concern that an association with a stridently conservative organization might diminish his effectiveness as an advocate for human rights in China. Mr. Chen, who is not Christian and has not taken a public stand on abortion, brushed aside such concerns, saying that the institute shared his passion for democracy and free speech.In an interview, Luis Tellez, Witherspoon's president, said Mr. Chen would have the freedom to do his work unimpeded. "We don't expect him to represent our issues, only to do the important work he does," he said. "He's a person who tells the truth as he sees it, so we don't think there will be any serious conflict."John Garvey, president of Catholic University, said he expected Mr. Chen to lecture at the Washington campus while working on his autobiography. He said Mr. Chen's opposition to China's coercive family-planning policies and his advocacy on behalf of the disabled dovetailed with the values espoused by the university. "We didn't ask him for a complete inventory of his views, but these are the most prominent ones we want to draw attention to," Mr. Garvey said in an interview. "I'm sure there are things we won't agree on as well."He said Mr. Chen and his family would relocate to Washington from New York.A self-taught legal advocate, Mr. Chen, 41, spent more than four years in prison as retribution for challenging a government campaign that led to thousands of forced sterilizations and abortions in China's eastern Shandong Province. In April 2012, he made a dramatic escape from house arrest, and eventually found his way into the United States Embassy in Beijing, prompting a diplomatic standoff that was resolved through negotiations between senior Chinese leaders and Hillary Rodham Clinton, then the secretary of state.Jerome A. Cohen, a law professor at N.Y.U. who helped shepherd the Chen family through their dizzying first year in the United States, said he was pleased that Mr. Chen would be affiliated with three institutions, but said he was still uncomfortable with his decision to accept a post at Witherspoon."It puts him in a more partisan category than I would have felt comfortable with, but my hope is he will continue to be a vibrant voice for human rights in China," Mr. Cohen said. "I wish him well."
SHANGHAI — Swarms of giant hornets have killed 42 people in Shaanxi Province and injured more than 1,600 in recent months, according to Xinhua, the official news agency. Government officials have yet to figure out why their attacks have been so widespread and deadly.Officials said on Thursday that 206 people were being treated in hospitals in Shaanxi Province and that emergency response teams were working to locate and destroy the nests of Asian giant hornets, the species involved in the attacks. Their venom is highly toxic and can cause shock and renal failure, experts say.Hornet attacks have been reported elsewhere in China as well. Last month, a swarm attacked a primary school in the Guangxi Autonomous Region in southern China, injuring 30 people, including 23 children. But the most serious attacks, according to the state-run news media, have taken place in rural areas near Ankang City, in the southeastern part of Shaanxi Province.The brown and gold Asian giant, or Vespa mandarinia, is the world's largest hornet species. It can grow up to two inches long, and its stinger can extend nearly one-quarter of an inch.
All the art in the photographer Christopher Makos's modest four-room apartment in a six-story walk-up building in the West Village is by friends or fellow scene-makers, a roll call of the New York art world of the '70s and '80s: Andy Warhol , Roy Lichtenstein, Bruce Weber, Cindy Sherman, Jeff Koons, Donald Baechler, Keith Haring. Mr. Makos lives much as he did in that era, a bohemian who brushes his teeth in the kitchen sink because his bathroom has only a toilet and a cast-iron tub."I've been here for 40 years," he said, "and the only way I am ever going to leave is when they park a casket in the hallway. This apartment has history. All sorts of people have hung out here: Tennessee Williams. Debbie Harry. Tony Perkins. Roseanne Barr. Calvin Klein."Although the walls can't talk, Mr. Makos can, and he's well qualified to analyze the metamorphosis of his once raffish neighborhood. "People like me can't afford to live here anymore," he said. "Today, they have to live in Bushwick."Mr. Makos loves how the narrow, named side streets of the West Village look the same as they always have. "It's a landmarked neighborhood," he said, "and the view out my window will never change."However, he is nonplused by the well-groomed suit-and-tie types who now call the Village home. "When I came to New York," he recalled, "they lived on the Upper East Side, which was then the center of everything. People don't remember that. Even Warhol lived on East 66th Street."When Mr. Makos arrived in New York from Southern California in the late '60s, he gravitated to the Village because it was cheap. "I was a hippie," he said. "I came to New York because I'd met a C.P.A. who was driving a new Mustang cross-country and I thought, 'Why not?' I had no plans or ambition. It was all about living in the moment. It's still about the moment."Mr. Makos goes with the flow. His rent-stabilized lease keeps him sanguine, and he doesn't mind that his 103-year-old building has a new owner who is renovating everything, turning empty apartments into luxury rentals. "This building is as old as the Titanic and so was the plumbing," he said. "They are doing a nice job of updating it."What Mr. Makos loves best about his apartment is that it has given him freedom. "I could have bought a big loft or a country house, but then I would have high overhead," he said. "I don't like overhead, and I have friends with country houses. I don't need more than this. I travel all the time. What can I say? I have a very good life."He doesn't dwell in the past, although he profits from it. While always working on new projects — he is heading to Macau in November to photograph the boxing superstar Manny Pacquiao, and he collaborates on digital diptychs with Paul Solberg under a made-up name, the "Hilton Brothers" — he earns a steady income from selling his old photographs of Warhol, especially his pictures of Warhol in drag.He explains that he was never a Warhol acolyte or member of the Factory. "Andy was my friend," he said. "He was friends with me because I was so much fun. He wanted to be me. People never get it."They were frequent traveling companions, too. "I first went to China with Andy in 1981," said Mr. Makos, whose book "Andy Warhol in China" is about a trip they took in 1982. "Now I spend a lot of time in China. They want to have everything we dreamed of having in the '70s and '80s — nightclubs and cars and summer homes. The Chinese love Warhol and everything Christopher Makos does. They are building over 200 museums, and they are going to need content. I am on the ground floor of that."Every time he visits China, he has five custom suits made. "It's my new favorite thing to do," he said as he stepped into his windowed dressing room, where dozens of suits hang on a rod and scores of professionally laundered shirts are stacked on Metro shelving."This must have been a small bedroom at one time," he said, explaining that the previous tenants were two sisters who made sure he could take over their lease. "I've been lucky that I have never had to look for an apartment or deal with real estate agents."Mr. Makos's bedroom is quite simple: a bed pushed up against the wall and a TV hanging over it, hospital-style; a Thonet chair that he uses as a nightstand; two Italian lamps; a trapezoidal dresser on wheels by James Evanson that he considers a postmodern masterpiece."I only live with things I like to look at," he said.His spotless living room — he professes to be a vacuuming fanatic — is furnished with timeless pieces, including a pair of Russel Wright bentwood armchairs, a Corbusier armchair and a black leather sofa by Jean-Michel Frank. "It was designed in the '20s or '30s," he said. "It could not be more modern."Nor could Mr. Makos, who exudes a boyish charm and manic energy that seem remarkable for a 65-year-old. He credits a healthy diet for his vitality as he walks into the charcoal-gray kitchen that he renovated himself, adding a Bosch dishwasher. "Two of my favorite possessions are my juicer and my shredder, which I use to make kale salad," he saidHe stays fit by riding everywhere on his bicycle, which is parked in his foyer/office. "I love the new bike lanes, but I have one bone of contention — many people think they were designed for staring at your phone," he said with dismay. "People don't make eye contact anymore. They're looking at their phones instead. Remember when people used to cruise on the street and how much fun that was? I don't mean that in a salacious way. If you can't make eye contact, you are missing out on so much."After 40 years in the Village, Mr. Makos is not easily shocked, but he was astonished by what he witnessed the other day. "I looked out the window and for the first time in the history of the building I saw golf clubs on the sidewalk," he said. "Young banker kids and four bags of golf clubs! To see that here is unbelievable."
HONG KONG — Iron Man has proved his might at the Chinese box office. Now Disney is betting that the Marvel superhero has enough muscle to complete a turnaround at its underperforming theme park here — a task of crucial importance as the company hurtles toward the opening of a mega-resort in Shanghai.An Iron Man-themed thrill ride, photo pavilion and shopping area will open at Hong Kong Disneyland in late 2016, said Thomas O. Staggs, Disney's theme park chairman. The Iron Man Experience, which analysts say will cost at least $100 million, will be Disney's first ride based on Marvel. Disney bought the comic book company for about $4 billion in 2009.At its core, the expansion is about shoring up a resort that Disney is counting on to act as an engine in Southeast China for its broader portfolio of merchandise and movies. Hong Kong Disneyland, criticized for its small size and locked in heated competition with nearby Ocean Park, has lost hundreds of millions of dollars since opening in 2005 because of smaller-than-expected attendance.Hong Kong Disneyland reported its first profit — a slim $14 million — for its last fiscal year, a signal that turnaround efforts, including a torrent of new rides and retooled marketing campaigns, are working. But the park remains a work in progress, and Disney needs to prove, to itself and others, that it can find the right success formula for Hong Kong Disneyland as a prelude to the much bigger undertaking in Shanghai.An exclusive Iron Man offering could greatly increase Hong Kong Disneyland's momentum. "Iron Man 3" took in $121.2 million in China this year. The related "Avengers" movie took in $84.1 million."It's important for us to have a story for our Hong Kong guests, a little bit of bragging rights that they have something that nobody else has," said Bill Ernest, the president of Disney's theme parks in Asia.The decision to deploy one of its mightiest assets at Hong Kong Disneyland reflects the delicate balancing act that Disney faces as it prepares to open the Shanghai resort in 2015. To achieve its growth goals in China, Disney needs both beachheads to thrive. Disney must also fend off competition in the booming Chinese theme park market, including an $8.2 billion movie-themed resort and real estate development announced late last month for the seaside city of Qingdao.Disney insists that its two Chinese parks will draw from different population bases, much like its resorts in Florida and California do. "We are confident that Hong Kong Disneyland and Shanghai Disneyland will complement and reinforce each other," Mr. Staggs said in an e-mail.Some economists here agree. But Disney at the very least faces a very local challenge: Hong Kong leaders, already feeling a bit insecure about the ascension of Shanghai as a financial capital, do not want their Disneyland to be viewed as less than successful and are counting on it to help fuel tourism growth to the city. The Hong Kong government owns 52.44 percent of Hong Kong Disneyland, with Disney controlling the balance.Disney has 11 major parks worldwide that recorded 126.5 million visitors last year and delivered profit of $1.9 billion.Disney gave few details about the planned Iron Man ride, saying only that it will allow guests to take flight with the superhero as he fights alien invaders across the streets and skyline of Hong Kong — a tease that will surely make Marvel's rabid fan base salivate. Even without specifics, the announcement will also help to end what has long been Hong Kong Disneyland's biggest question: Is it big enough?After building a theme park complex outside Paris in the early 1990s that was much bigger than demand ultimately warranted (and is still causing the company headaches), Disney pursued the opposite strategy with Hong Kong, where plans called for growth in phases. "We wanted to get our bearings when it came to our Asian consumers," Mr. Ernest said, noting that Chinese children have not traditionally grown up with Mickey Mouse and his cartoon friends.But the park's small size annoyed many local guests, who wanted more rides to go with the extravagant landscaping.
KASHGAR, China — Job seekers looking for opportunities in this ancient oasis town in China's far western Xinjiang region would seem to have ample options, based on a quick glance at a local help-wanted Web site. The Kashgar Cultural Center has an opening for an experienced dance choreographer, the prefectural Communist Party office is hiring a driver and nearby Shule County needs an archivist.But these and dozens of other job openings share one caveat: ethnic Uighurs, the Muslim, Turkic-speaking people who make up nearly 90 percent of Kashgar's population, need not apply. Roughly half of the 161 positions advertised on the Civil Servant Examination Information Web site indicate that only ethnic Han Chinese or native Mandarin speakers will be considered.Such discrimination, common across the region, is one of the many indignities China's 10 million Uighurs face in a society that increasingly casts them as untrustworthy and prone to religious extremism. Uighurs are largely frozen out of the region's booming gas and oil industry, airport jobs are mostly reserved for Han applicants, and truck drivers whose national identity cards list their ethnicity as Uighur cannot obtain the licenses required to haul fuel, an unwritten rule based on the fear that oil and gas tankers could easily be turned into weapons, according to several trucking companies.Despite its name — the Xinjiang Uighur Autonomous Region — this strategically pivotal expanse of desert and snow-draped mountains that borders several Central Asian nations is tightly controlled by Beijing. Top government positions as well as critical spots in the sprawling security apparatus are dominated by Han Chinese, many of them recruited from the eastern half of the country."The bottom line is that the Chinese don't trust us, and that is having a corrosive impact on life in Xinjiang," said Ilham Tohti, a prominent Uighur economist in Beijing. "And the way things are going, it's going to get worse."After a summer of violence that claimed at least 100 lives, analysts, human rights advocates and even a handful of Chinese academics are raising alarms over what they call repressive policies that are fueling increased alienation and radicalization among Uighurs, many of whom subscribe to a moderate brand of Sunni Islam. These policies have been tightened since ethnic rioting four years ago left at least 200 people dead in Urumqi, the regional capital.The Chinese government blames outside agitators, among them members of a separatist movement it contends has links to global jihadists, for much of the unrest. While there have been a number of unprovoked attacks on Chinese police officers or soldiers in recent years, most experts say the threat from Islamic militants is far less potent and organized than that portrayed by Beijing.In August, paramilitary police officers not far from Kashgar shot at least 32 men, killing a dozen, during a raid on what was described as a secret "munitions center"; a few days later at least a dozen other Uighurs were killed as they prayed at a farmhouse in Yilkiqi township, according to Radio Free Asia. The authorities said the men were taking part in "illegal religious activities" and training for a terrorist attack, but did not provide further details.Other episodes include a shooting outside a police station in Aksu Prefecture that wounded 50 and left three dead, and a violent skirmish in Hotan, another Silk Road outpost, during which dozens of men were reportedly shot while protesting the detention of a local imam. The Chinese state news media described these and other episodes as "terror attacks"; exile groups say they were peaceful demonstrations crushed with brute force.Local residents say these and other clashes have been fueled by the dispiriting realities of daily life here: the institutionalized job discrimination, the restrictions that prohibit those under 18 from entering mosques and the difficulty that many Uighurs face in obtaining passports. Those Uighurs lucky enough to travel abroad say they are often interrogated upon their return by security officials who demand to know whether they have engaged in separatist activities.
BEIJING — It was, arguably, the trial of the year in China . No, not the showpiece event that last month sent Bo Xilai, the political princeling and challenger to the throne of Xi Jinping, China's president, to jail for life.It was another trial in September, at which a court jailed another member of China's elite, Li Tianyi, the 17-year-old son of prominent entertainers in the military, to 10 years in prison for gang rape, with four others. An important detail in the court's ruling may improve the lives of millions of Chinese, feminist legal scholars say.Essentially, the Haidian District Court in Beijing ruled that even if a woman is a sex worker, as Mr. Li alleged, that doesn't mean it's O.K. to rape her."The court didn't go along with a quite widespread attitude, and an argument of the defense, that women in this line of business, women who are not virgins, deserve what they get," said Zhang Rongli, a professor of law at the China Women's University."I feel the court's decision is a very good answer to that argument and to that prejudice that you can divide women into good and bad women," Ms. Zhang said. "That was really well done of the court."Of course, this isn't to say the trial of Mr. Bo, a former Communist Party secretary of Chongqing and son of one of the most famous revolutionaries, Bo Yibo, was not very important. It was.But ask any well-informed Chinese and they will tell you it was also politics as usual, the outcome of a bitter "palace struggle" for power by members of the ruling circle. The accusations of corruption and abuse of power, upheld by the court, are numbingly familiar to ordinary people as they go about the daily business of raising their families and getting by.The case against Mr. Li and his friends, on the other hand, has set an important and highly visible legal precedent and highlighted the welfare of the women who work in China's illegal but widespread sex industry as well as the arrogance of China's well-connected, gilded youth, scholars said.Here are the facts, according to a document on the court's Web site. (Ms. Zhang said the verdict has not yet been released in its entirety. The case was heard in a closed court since four of the five defendants are juveniles.)In the early hours of Feb. 17, Mr. Li and his friends were drinking, singing and playing games with the victim, identified as Ms. Yang, and another person surnamed Xu, in a bar in the basement of the Dongyuan Building in Haidian district, the capital's university area, in a party arranged by a Ms. Zhang, who worked at the bar. According to local news reports, Ms. Yang worked at a company and was a part-time university student and a bar hostess.Later, they left in a car with an intoxicated-appearing Ms. Yang who, realizing that she was alone with the men, asked to leave. They refused and, using violence, brought her to a hotel room in the Hubei Building, where they raped and assaulted her between 5:50 and 7:30 a.m., the court said. Mr. Li was the main perpetrator and showed no remorse, it said.To provide some context: In a report released last month by four U.N. agencies, titled "Why do some men use violence against women and how can we prevent it?" 22.2 percent of 998 Chinese men reported that they had raped a woman, including a partner; 2.2 percent said they had taken part in a gang rape.The survey, of more than 10,000 men in six Asian countries, put China's gang rape figure behind those of Papua New Guinea (14 percent) and Cambodia (5.2 percent), but ahead of Sri Lanka (1.6 percent) and Bangladesh (average 1.65 percent, urban and rural.)Zhang Rongli, the law professor, said that about 30,000 rape cases are reported annually to the police in China but that the figure is presumed to be a small percentage of the actual crimes.Across Asia, the U.N. report said, most men who commit rape go unpunished: "The study found that the vast majority of men who had perpetrated rape (72–97 percent in most sites) did not experience any legal consequences."
When the Hong Kong billionaire Li Ka-shing announced succession plans last year for his vast collection of business holdings, he set an example for other wealthy Asian families grappling with similar issues.Under the plans announced by Mr. Li, 85, ownership and management of his Cheung Kong Group will be transferred to his elder son, Victor. Mr. Li's younger son, Richard, will receive funding to continue to build up his own assets.Though Mr. Li, Asia's richest person, said he had no plans to retire, he also made it clear that the arrangement was made to avoid any "conflict" between his two sons.Asian family firms whose founders are preparing to pass the baton to a new generation will all, sooner or later, confront the need to plan not only for management succession, but also for ownership succession. The two are not always the same, and decisions can be fraught with emotion and tension, according to financial advisers and private bankers.Common mistakes family patriarchs make — and in this generation it is usually a patriarch — include failing to plan ahead, failing to appreciate that ownership and management succession are connected and must be dealt with in tandem, and lack of involvement of and communication between the generations."Planning succession is not a one-off exercise, but an ongoing process," said Mario Marconi, global head of family services at UBS Wealth Management."I think it's common sense, but you should start early and start pragmatically and learn as you go on," Mr. Marconi said. "Don't try to over-engineer." He cited the example of a family who came to him recently with a 40-page "family constitution, which clearly they hadn't fully understood," he said.Families should "start simply and fine-tune as you go," Mr. Marconi said, but they cannot avoid "the big decision" — whether the family business will be managed by a member of the family or by a professional, and who will be in charge."It doesn't mean you need to decide from the start who your successor will be, but you need to have general structure in place," he said. "You need to have some clarity."One of the most critical junctures for a family firm is the "need to distinguish and manage separately the family, business and wealth," Mr. Marconi said.Founders of family firms are used to holding a three-pronged leadership role: chief executive of the business, controlling shareholder and head of the family."As business families move into the next generation, it is common to see the founder seek to place the same three leadership roles on a single member of the next generation. But success here requires three things to be aligned," said Bernard Fung, head of family office services and philanthropy advisory in the Private Banking Asia Pacific division of Credit Suisse."First, the person must be able and willing to assume the three roles. Second, there needs to have been a systematic preparation of the individual for the various roles well in advance. Third, the chosen individual needs to have the support of the generational peers to lead in all these areas."Founders fail to realize that if succession is to fall to an individual next-generation member, all three aspects of leadership are necessary — and that this is a highly idealized situation," Mr. Fung said. "If one or more aspect is absent, this model of succession is unlikely to succeed."Another common mistake that founders make is trying to divide leadership responsibility equally among siblings by, say, giving each an unrelated business area or division to run."In such cases, there is the semblance of an orderly succession for a period of time and everyone is running their own area for the collective good," Mr. Fung said. But "often the next-generation successors are unable to actually work together towards decisions — for example, to decide how family funds are to be deployed across various businesses that differ in return profile and demand for capital."
HONG KONG — As investors fret about the budget standoff in the United States and slowing growth in Asia, the confidence of the world's superrich to splurge on top gems and works of art appears intact, judging by a string of Sotheby's auctions in Hong Kong in the past five days.One of the highlights — a white diamond the size of a ripe plum, weighing 118.28 carats — went for 212 million Hong Kong dollars, or $27.3 million, on Monday. Including fees, the price came to 238.68 million Hong Kong dollars, the highest price ever paid for a white diamond at an auction.The hammer price was at the lower end of the preauction estimate, and a 7.59-carat blue diamond, estimated at $19 million, failed to sell. Still, the jewelry auction, and Sotheby's sales of art, watches, ceramics and fine wines, showed strong demand, with many lots beating presale estimates or setting new auction records."There is a slowdown happening in Asia's economies," said Quek Chin Yeow, deputy chairman of Sotheby's in Asia, "but at this level of collecting, there is an echelon of buyers who are still very wealthy and looking to add to their collections." The mood at the sales, he said, was buoyant and underlined the generally strong appetite for top works of art and other items.A 2001 painting by the Chinese artist Zeng Fanzhi, "The Last Supper," sold for 180.4 million Hong Kong dollars, including fees, on Saturday, the most ever paid for the work of a contemporary Asian artist at auction. On Monday, a work by Zhang Daqian sold for 34.84 million dollars, nearly seven times the presale estimate, and a sale of contemporary ink paintings on Saturday fetched 25.4 million dollars, nearly four times what Sotheby's had expected. On Tuesday, the last day of the auction series, a small white-and-blue porcelain Chinese bowl from the 15th century sold for 141 million dollars, well above the presale estimate of 80 million.In total, the Sotheby's sales this month topped the preauction estimate of more than 2.8 billion Hong Kong dollars and underscored how important Hong Kong has become as a venue for auctions of this kind.Sotheby's and Christie's twice-yearly auctions in the city have gained in importance over the past decade, as increasingly affluent Asian buyers have joined their peers from other parts of the world in the bidding for often ultra-high-end items. The latest auction series "puts Hong Kong among the strongest auction markets in the world," alongside London and New York, said Nazy Vassegh, chief executive of Masterpiece London, an international art, antiques and design fair that takes place in the British capital every June. "It is testament to the strength of the market here."Asian collectors, she said, are especially active buyers of Asian art and antiques, but they are also diversifying into other categories, like modern masters and blue-chip contemporary art from around the world. "People at the top end of the market are after masterworks and are willing to bid aggressively for them," Ms. Vassegh said.Similarly, the money spent by Asian buyers at Sotheby's gem and jewelry sales has soared in recent years, said Mr. Quek, who auctioned the giant white diamond and other items on Monday. Hong Kong has pulled up "alongside Geneva and New York" as a center for high-end jewelry auctions in the past few years, thanks to demand from buyers all over the region, he said.The sale of the white diamond "proves we can sell major diamonds in Hong Kong," he said, despite the failure of the blue diamond to achieve its reserve price.Sotheby's said nine of the bidders for the 10 most expensive lots sold at the event were "Asian private" buyers. It listed the 10th as "anonymous."
HONG KONG — India's trade deficit dropped to its lowest level since early 2011, data released Wednesday showed, providing a rare piece of good news from an economy that has been weighed down by inadequate infrastructure, a gaping current account deficit and a currency that has plummeted in recent months.India's trade deficit contracted to $6.7 billion in September, from $10.9 billion in August, the Ministry of Commerce and Industry said, as exports jumped 11.2 percent from a year earlier. The export number represented the third consecutive month of double-digit expansion, as demand from overseas was buoyed by a weaker rupee, which has helped make Indian goods cheaper for purchasers outside the country.At the same time, imports plummeted 18.1 percent as a string of government measures aimed at curbing demand for imports like gold took effect."The government has taken conscious steps to curtail imports of nonessential commodities, essentially precious metals. That is working out as the government intended," India's top trade civil servant, S.R. Rao, told Reuters.Heavily dependent on imports of oil, gold and other items, the Indian economy has long run a trade deficit — a phenomenon it was able to support as long as foreign investors, lured by years of growth and the market potential of 1.2 billion consumers, poured into the country.But the picture has changed dramatically in recent years. Investors have grown increasingly frustrated with the government's inability to tackle age-old problems such as creaking infrastructure and stifling red tape. Decision-making has been complicated further by elections scheduled for next year. And growth has dropped from more than 9 percent in 2010 to less than 5 percent this year.This, combined with a widespread exodus of foreign cash from emerging markets around the world, has dragged down the rupee sharply in recent months, prompting several government steps to prop up the currency and avert a wider crisis.The measures, and a degree of confidence instilled by the new governor of the Indian central bank, who took office last month, have helped stabilize the rupee in recent weeks.On Wednesday, the rupee was trading at 61.83 per U.S. dollar — much firmer than at its low point of nearly 69 per dollar, reached in late August. But it remains far weaker than a year ago, for example, when $1 bought only 53 rupees.Although this has helped exports, analysts cautioned on Thursday that the trade deficit could widen again in coming months as demand for gold picks up in advance of a key festival season, which begins this month."The September data has come as a big positive surprise. However, we do not expect such a trend to continue, given that seasonally the ongoing quarter tends to witness a higher trade deficit," Upasna Bhardwaj, an economist at ING Vysya Bank in Mumbai, told Reuters.Also reflecting the drag on India's economy, the Asian Development Bank last week slashed its growth forecast for the country to 4.7 percent for this year, from the 6 percent it had forecast in April, before the sell-off in emerging markets sent the rupee skidding lower. For next year, the ADB now forecasts growth of 5.7 percent, rather than the 6.5 percent it had projected in April.
HONG KONG — When the United States government was borrowing heavily four years ago to cover costs related to the global financial crisis, Wen Jiabao, then the prime minister of China, strongly and publicly warned Washington to make sure that Chinese investments in Treasury securities were safe.When Congress and the White House faced off two years ago over increasing the ceiling on the United States' debt, raising worries about a possible default, Chinese Internet users poured scorn on their own government for having invested so much of their country's savings in Treasuries.The current round of brinkmanship between Republicans in Congress and the White House over avoiding a default on the national debt has led to considerably less hand-wringing in China or across Asia. A round of negotiations at the White House ended with no agreement Thursday evening.The Chinese media have actively covered the standoff, and a vice minister of finance expressed concern about it on Monday, but the Chinese Internet has not lit up with the same energy as in past budget struggles in Washington. China's top leaders have stayed silent in public, but Prime Minister Li Keqiang raised the issue briefly in private with Secretary of State John Kerry on the sidelines of a meeting in Brunei on Thursday, according to an American official and Chinese state media."We understand this is a crisis, but we think they will work out a deal," said Sun Zhe, a politics professor at Tsinghua University who specializes in Chinese-American relations. "The Chinese people are also getting used to it."Stock markets in Asia have been mostly resilient over the last week, with a mixed performance on Thursday and rising on Friday morning. But there has been little sign of investors' moving out of dollars and into yen or other Asian currencies as interest rates on short-term Treasury bills rise."The media is trying to get people interested in the possibility of a debt default, and the market isn't interested," said Marshall Mays, the founder and managing director of Emerging Alpha Advisors, an asset management and advisory firm in Hong Kong that specializes in fixed-income markets and private equity. "Nobody believes it will happen."Mr. Mays predicted that Washington would find a way to avoid a debt default. "There are lots of accounting tricks, and just because the federal government is not good at accounting does not mean it can't be done," he said.The same view is prevalent in Singapore and Tokyo. "The prospects of the U.S. not making payments on Treasury securities are effectively zero," said Thomas Lam, the chief economist for industrialized nations at OSK-DMG, a Singapore investment bank and brokerage firm."This time, people are not so concerned with the default risk compared to 2011," said Hajime Takata, the chief economist at the Mizuho Research Institute in Tokyo. "At that time, the U.S. economy was very weak and everybody was seriously worrying about the default. The U.S. economy has been recovering since then, so they are not seriously worrying."The Hong Kong futures market took a step on Thursday to make it more expensive and less attractive to use Treasury bills to underpin bets here on futures contracts. The market announced that Treasury securities with a maturity of less than a year would be accepted as margins for futures contracts only with a discount of 3 percent to their value, compared with a previous discount of 1 percent.The move has the effect of insulating the market somewhat from the effects of any possible delay in interest payments by the United States in the coming weeks. But Hong Kong Exchanges and Clearing Limited, which operates the market, took pains Thursday evening to say that it was not predicting a default."The additional risk management measures don't indicate HKEx's expectation on the likelihood of a possible U.S. default," Hong Kong Exchanges said in an e-mail statement. It did not increase the discount for longer-term Treasuries.
HONG KONG — The air cargo market is showing signs of life after years of pain following the global financial crisis, senior executives of the European plane maker Airbus said in a news media briefing on Thursday. The officials forecast solid growth powered by demand for freighters from emerging markets over the next 20 years.Airbus, which on Monday secured a breakthrough in Japan with its first order of passenger aircraft by Japan Airlines, is a major player in the market for passenger aircraft, but holds less than 10 percent of the global market for freighters, which is dominated by its American rival, Boeing. It is hoping to expand that share in coming years, in large part through sales of midsize planes, which are increasingly popular with air cargo operators servicing regional routes.Demand for global air cargo — and the planes involved — slumped five years ago, forcing many airlines to scale back."Recent years have not been very kind to air cargo," said Andreas Hermann, head of freighters at Airbus. "We are not yet over the crisis, but there are now signs that world trade is improving again."Air cargo services' health is closely linked with economic growth, and a recent gradual pickup in the United States and European economies is helping to increase trade again, Mr. Hermann said.The International Air Traffic Association said last week that global freight demand had risen 3.6 percent in August, compared with a year earlier, but that it expected full-year cargo revenue, projected at $59 billion this year, remained far below the peak of $67 billion reached in 2011, because jet fuel prices have risen.Longer term, Mr. Hermann said, demand from emerging markets in Asia, Latin America and elsewhere will help expand the industry and reshape some of the established routes.Airbus said it expected worldwide air freight traffic to grow an average of 4.8 percent a year over the next 20 years, almost doubling the required global freighter fleet to about 3,000 aircraft by 2032.This growth, and the fact that many of the aging aircraft in service will need to be replaced, will generate demand for 2,700 aircraft, about 870 of which will be new freighters worth about $234 billion, Airbus estimated.Much of the growth will come from emerging markets, where rising affluence and relatively rapid expansion will bolster demand. A continued shift of production centers to regions like Asia, where labor costs are rising but low compared with those in the developed world, also will ensure more traffic involving emerging markets, Airbus said.The company expects the Asia-Pacific region's share of global freight traffic to increase to 42 percent by 2032, from 32 percent now, and China's share to rise to 22 percent from 15 percent.
HONG KONG — Chinese Communist Party leaders' vows of a new era of humble austerity in government may have met their most exotic adversary yet: an $11 million, 2,300-ton, 295-foot-long puffer fish .The brass-clad statue, which shimmers golden in the sunlight and switches into a garish light show at night, was built by the city of Yangzhong, in Jiangsu Province in eastern China, to lure visitors to a monthlong gardening expo that opened in September. The "puffer fish tower" has an elevator to take visitors up the equivalent of 15 stories into the sculpture's belly to view the lush scenery near the Yangtze River.But news reports and pictures online of the creature, floating on scaffolding with its mouth agape and eyes glowing green, have prompted many Chinese citizens to wonder: Why devote 70 million renminbi, about $11.4 million, of government money for a giant metal fish, especially when the party leader, Xi Jinping, has demanded an end to frivolous spending on officials' vanity projects?"Just how much of the 70 million went into officials' pockets?" said one of the many mordantly outraged comments on Sina Weibo, a popular Chinese microblog service that is similar to Twitter. "The sculpture is so that we'll have something to pay our respects to after the puffer fish becomes extinct," said another.The sculpture garnered nationwide attention last month, after a Jiangsu newspaper, Modern Express, described its costs and size, citing Yangzhong government officials. The project is flamboyant, even by the bigger-is-better expectations of Chinese state-sponsored art. It uses 8,920 brass plates for the fish scales and is covered in lights that can pulsate in changing colors at night, the newspaper reported."A miracle of the architectural world," the Yangzhong government Web site exclaimed. "This is also an extreme rarity in the whole world."That may well be true, but not everyone sees it as a virtue. Chinese news outlets said the brass and steel for the fish cost about $1.7 million, raising questions about where the rest of the money went. Construction of the fish tower began on a previously isolated and undeveloped river island in March, four months after Mr. Xi was appointed party leader."There will have to be more openness about whether there was any overstatement in the puffer fish tower project," the report in Modern Express said. Other Chinese media comments were less restrained."Yangzhong in Jiangsu is known as the Little Venice of the Yangtze River," said a commentary on the Web site of Yangtze News, a newspaper published in the central Chinese city of Wuhan. "How could its image be a bloated puffer fish? For a vanity project that might apply for a place in the Guinness World Records, 70 million was thrown in without so much as a blink of the eye."But China is speckled with outlandish works of official art that vie with even a giant, glow-in-the-dark puffer fish for attention and outrage.Critics berated a county in Guizhou Province for building "the world's biggest teapot," a 243-foot-high teapot-shaped tower, complete with spout, that was part of a $13 million project.In Henan Province, in central China, a government-backed charity has been accused of corruption in spending about $19.6 million on a vast, unsightly sculpture of Song Qingling, the widow of Sun Yat-sen, a revered founder of modern China. Zhengzhou, the capital of Henan Province, is also home to a sculpture of two pigs in a frolicking embrace. From certain angles, the pigs might appear to be mating.The river puffer fish is an expensive delicacy in parts of Jiangsu Province, and Yangzhong officials have promoted the pleasures of eating it, despite the risks of poisoning if it is not properly prepared."Enjoy the rich puffer fish culture of Yangzhong, savor the delicious fare of the puffer fish," a city official said at a news conference in December, according to the city's Web site.Officials who answered calls to the Yangzhong city propaganda office claimed ignorance about the sculpture or suggested calling other offices, which gave similar responses.But after the uproar, the Yangzhong government offered a new explanation for the monument. A city official denied that money had been misspent, and said the puffer fish tower was built as a plea to save the environment, said the state-run China News Service. The official told the news service that the metal fish is "a call to protect the ecological resources of the Yangtze River."
HONG KONG — This city has one of the world's most highly regarded subway systems, with spotless stations, cellphone service on trains and even computers with free Internet access on some platforms. Getting from one side of Hong Kong Island to the other takes a mere 25 minutes for the eight-mile journey on trains that have a 99.9 percent on-time record.The subways of the Mass Transit Railway system, called the M.T.R. for short, were once thought to augur the death knell for a much slower and less comfortable mode of transport above ground: the century-old Hong Kong tram, which snakes slowly through the city's heavy traffic, its passengers suffering through the tropical humidity without the air-conditioning that cools the underground transit network.But the trams, perhaps surprisingly, are holding their own."I take the tram very often — it's convenient, economical and efficient," said Derik Wong, 42, who works in the food and beverage industry and takes the tram 5 to 10 times a week. "If you plan your time well, the tram's speed is not a problem."Called the ding-dings by locals for their pedestrian warning bells, the trams draw 200,000 riders a day for a price of 2.30 Hong Kong dollars, or 30 cents, a ride, regardless of distance traveled. Seniors pay half price.By comparison, fares on the subways of the M.T.R., which carries 5.1 million passengers a day, range from 4.10 to 7.50 Hong Kong dollars, or 53 to 97 cents, on the Island line.But just as important is the ease of the on-and-off commute on an island with a dense string of business and retail districts along its northern coast.The trams may be old and slow, with typical speeds of six miles per hour, but their popularity shows how in this ever-modernizing city, old habits survive. The system is privately run by a French operator and does not receive any money from the local government, unlike in New York City, where major modes of mass transit like the similarly aged subway system and the buses rely on large subsidies from Albany and City Hall.Studies show that it is not just longtime Hong Kong residents who rely on the 109-year-old system."We're very representative of Hong Kong," said Emmanuel Vivant, the general manager of the system. "The old and the young use us. And a lot of white-collar people take trams during lunchtime," shuttling, for instance, from the city's huge financial towers to restaurants in nearby neighborhoods for meals.The tram operator, Veolia Transport, has enough confidence in the trams' place in Hong Kong that it is investing roughly $20 million to update the system, mainly with more durable aluminum cars to replace the old wooden ones. The new cars are designed to last five times longer — up to 20 years — before they need an overhaul. Perhaps belatedly, Veolia is also introducing audio and visual announcements of coming stops, improvements that tram systems elsewhere instituted years ago.Still, the trams face increasing challenges from the well-financed M.T.R., which is expanding its reach around Hong Kong Island with a new line to the southwest coast, while extending its main Island Line to an area where the tram now faces no underground competition. Mr. Vivant acknowledges his company is "very much concerned about the future" because of the M.T.R.'s expansion.The M.T.R. system benefits not only from fare revenue, but from the more lucrative profits generated by the property it develops above railway station sites, which include office towers and some of the famous high-end shopping malls that make Hong Kong a world tourist magnet.To compete, Veolia must rely on some innovative ways to eke out money, not only by leasing billboards on the sides of the cars, but also by renting out antique trams for party rides. At the same time, Veolia has low fixed costs and does not outsource operations, and with trams coming by about every 90 seconds and generally packed standing room only with up to 110 passengers per car, the money keeps coming in.Veolia also benefits from its route simplicity. The M.T.R. has a labyrinthine underground network that can be time-consuming to navigate.The nostalgic pull of the trams keeps many riders loyal. The system was Hong Kong Island's first mode of mass transit, running along the waterfront until land reclamation into Hong Kong Harbor effectively pushed the tram service inland. When Hong Kong considered eliminating the system in the 1980s, public support helped to keep the trams alive."Trams are a symbol of Hong Kong," said Peter Wong, 59, a retiree who said he had been taking them "since I was a kid."The cost is hard to criticize."I don't mind trams are not air-conditioned, because it's good value for the money," Mr. Wong said as he waited for a tram at Western Market. "You can't demand everything with such a low fare. Also, Hong Kong culture is preserved in trams."
SOMETIMES I can be on the road for two or more weeks, traveling to several countries, and it can get very tiring, but traveling is a huge part of my job as president and founder of Iredale Mineral Cosmetics .Since I'm not a great flier, I have some rules. I drink plenty of water and always wear comfortable clothing. When we go through turbulence, I play bridge on my iPad, which helps take my mind off the bumps. I used to love to chat with people on planes, but now I use it as my time to catch up on e-mails. But it's not all work. On a recent trip, I downloaded 24 hours of Damian Lewis's old TV show, "Life." It was a wonderful show and Damian Lewis proved to be a great travel companion.Events are a big part of promoting the brand, and even though I don't enjoy flying, I love doing events and meeting people. To make sure I get to an event once I land, I've decided to stop doing yoga while traveling. I was in Tokyo recently and I pulled a muscle after doing a shoulder stand in my hotel room. I was in a lot pain, and missed two events. The hosts asked me to make a video call to the audience apologizing for my absence. The wireless reception was so weak in my room that I had to go out into the hallway to get a connection. I had a blouse pulled over my pajama top. I'm sure I was a picture.When we do events, we start with a light lunch, followed by a presentation, demonstration and a question-and-answer period. People enjoy it, and everyone goes home happy. But low-key isn't always the best approach.I was scheduled to speak at an event in Hong Kong, which my distributor set up with a local organizer. A translator was booked and the location was lovely. I thought everything would be great. I knew things would be slightly different than what I was used to when I saw the amount of food that was being served. It was a feast, and the courses just kept coming. Everyone seemed to be enjoying themselves and I figured if they managed to stay awake after eating so much, everything would work out.The event organizer motioned to me to come with her to an area behind the stage. People were still eating and more courses were still coming, so I thought her needing me so early was a little strange. I really got concerned when I saw this large, semi-opaque plastic ball that looked like an egg with a zipper.I couldn't imagine what it was for, and then I realized it was for me when the event organizer gestured that I should step inside it. I just looked at her and couldn't believe this was happening. She gently pushed me into the ball, handed me a large pink wand, and zipped me up. Then I heard this booming rock music as the lights dimmed. The curtains opened and some costumed dancers pushed the egg, with me in it, onto the stage. Strobe lights were flashing as the dancers unzipped the egg. And there I was with my pink wand. I wasn't sure what to do, so I just waved the wand at the crowd, most of whom weren't paying attention to me since they were still being served food.After the event ended, the distributor said I did a great job. I didn't believe him. But I changed my mind after a few people asked me for my autograph.
The year is 2023, or '33, perhaps. You're having a rough morning. The alarm clock is silent, the coffee maker cold. Your iPyjamas, which promised to manage your routine, have let you down again. Maybe they failed to recognize your fingerprints.Never mind. You check your e-mail (yes, we still use it) and read the headlines. They scroll by on the flexible screen on your sleeve, translated instantly into Burmese, your native tongue: "China threatens U.S. with semiconductor embargo if it reneges on debt"; "Brazil-Indonesia deal creates global technology giant"; "Nigerian sitcom a sensation in Europe." You blink twice to signal yes when the Kellogg's ad asks about automatically replenishing the depleted supply of cornflakes in your pantry.Finally, as you are whisked to work in your driverless car, you have a minute to watch highlights of the soccer matches last night. Remember when you could watch sports only when and where the broadcasters wanted? For that matter, remember when we used to call it "television"? How quaint.The seers predicted some of these changes when they promised, back in 2013 or so, that digital technology would transform the world. Within a few decades, they promised, advances in information technology would give us better government, better health care, better media and better education — even, wrote Eric Schmidt and Jared Cohen of Google, in "The New Digital Age," "automated and machine-precise haircuts."Politicians and human nature have proved to be more resilient than barbers. But the futurists were certainly right about one thing. Media, as a business and a cultural force, has been transformed.Predicting the outcomeof a revolution is a fool's game. Still, a few things are clear, even today, about the changes we are living through in the world of information, entertainment and communications.The convergence of digital media and technology, under way since the dawn of the Internet, will accelerate. Distinctions between old and new media will fade; most media will be digital. Mobile devices, already the preferred media and Internet platform for many people, will continue to proliferate. We may wear them on our bodies or weave them into our clothing.Globalization of the media business will advance, creating new markets. The old centers of media creation and consumption, the United States and Europe, will feel new competition from faster-growing regions: Asia, of course, but also Latin America, Africa and others. When that happens, media content, still dominated by Western notions of what constitutes news and entertainment, will have to adapt, too."Geography and technology will be the key drivers," said Martin Sorrell, the chief executive of the advertising giant WPP.A recent study by Cisco Systems, a provider of networking equipment, underlines the uncertainties. By 2017, it says, revenue in the media industry — defined broadly as everything from the sale of content to the provision of Internet access — could do anything from shrink slightly from the current level of just under $1 trillion to more than double. That is only four years from now.Some industries, like music and newspapers, have already been through the wringer. While the recording industry showed its first revenue growth last year after a decade of decline, the upheaval in the newspaper business continues, as reflected in the sale of The Washington Post to Jeff Bezos of Amazon, announced this past summer.Will television be next? Until now, it has held up better. TV audiences have fragmented as channels have proliferated, but overall viewer figures and advertising remain strong in much of the world.But there are signs that this could change. Studies show a rise in "cord cutting" — that is, cancellations of pay-TV subscriptions — by American households. Instead of watching scheduled channels, more people are using on-demand services like Netflix, or simply doing without TV, as they log longer hours on the Internet.Television, in other words, is starting to look more like the Internet, even as the Internet starts to look more like TV.
BEIJING — China's annual consumer inflation rate rose to a seven-month high of 3.1 percent in September, as poor weather drove up food prices, limiting room for the central bank to maneuver to support the economy, and exports unexpectedly declined.But few analysts expect a further sharp rise in inflation or policy tightening in coming months as China faces a weak global environment and Beijing tries to reduce credit-fueled investment.The inflation rate was higher than a median forecast of 2.9 percent in a Reuters poll and the 2.6 percent rate posted in August, but it was still below the official target of 3.5 percent for 2013.Zhiwei Zhang, China economist in Hong Kong for Nomura, said that he expected inflation to rise further in the fourth quarter and saw "rising risks that it may rise above 3.5 percent for some months in 2014." The rise of inflation, however, leaves little room for policy easing, he said, because benchmark interest rates are already low. At the same time, analysts see little risk of a credit-tightening effort, given that inflation was below the full-year target.Month-on-month, consumer prices rose 0.8 percent, the National Bureau of Statistics said. Food prices increased 1.5 percent in September from August as a result of droughts and floods in some areas, pushing consumer inflation up 0.51 percentage point, Yu Qiumei, a senior statistician at the bureau, said in a statement. In annual terms, food prices jumped 6.1 percent.Li Huiyong, an economist at Shenyin & Wanguo Securities in Shanghai, said he thought inflation was still under control and would not be a concern this year, "especially when the economy is struggling with overcapacity problems."China's exports dropped 0.3 percent in September from the level of a year earlier, against expectations of a 6 percent rise, data showed on Saturday.Deflation in prices of goods leaving the factory gate eased further in September, although in annual terms prices still recorded a 19th consecutive fall. Producer prices fell 1.3 percent from a year earlier, a smaller fall than the 1.4 percent expected by the market and the 1.6 percent drop in August.There was some relief, however, for manufacturers struggling to cope with profit-eating price declines, as producer prices rose 0.2 percent from August.After slowing in nine of the past 10 quarters, the economy looks to have stabilized since midyear after Beijing acted to head off a sharper downturn with increased spending on public housing construction, railroads and tax cuts for smaller firms.Annual economic growth is forecast to have accelerated to 7.8 percent in the third quarter from 7.5 percent in the second quarter, but the recovery could fizzle toward the end of the year, the Reuters poll showed.Third-quarter figures on the gross domestic product, along with industrial output, fixed-asset investment and retail sales, is due on Friday.Beijing has a growth target of 7.5 percent for 2013, which would be the weakest rate in more than 20 years, and has repeatedly said it would accept slower growth as it tries to wean the economy from dependence on investment and exports in favor of domestic consumption."The economy faces some downward pressures, especially by looking at the export data," said Zhou Hao, China economist in Shanghai for ANZ Bank. "Full-year G.D.P. growth could be 7.6 percent."
BEIJING — A wood sculpture of a larger-than-life man's head whose gaping mouth is stuffed with a plug — a piece of Chinese protest art from more than 30 years ago — was supposed to be a star attraction at a retrospective here.The startling visage, called "Silence," born as a cri de coeur against the censorship of the period after the Cultural Revolution in China, was shown briefly during an artistic spring in Beijing in 1979 and 1980, before being banished.Even today, says the creator of the work, Wang Keping, who lives in exile in France, his signature sculpture is too hot. "Silence" is notably absent from the exhibition of his works from his years abroad at the Ullens Center for Contemporary Art in the fashionable 798 Art Zone in Beijing."If it were part of the exhibit, there would be no exhibit," Mr. Wang said as he showed a visitor dozens of dark-wood abstract sculptures, some of them hinting at the bodies of men and women, made in his studio outside Paris.These newer pieces, including two towering black sculptures that in style and shape faintly recall the heads on Easter Island, proved acceptable to the Beijing Municipal Bureau of Culture. The bureau must see in advance the number and subject of artworks imported for exhibits.The Chinese authorities were in fact never given a chance to judge "Silence" anew.The Ullens Center decided that the current chill on expression in China — most obvious in the detentions in recent months of freewheeling commentators on China's microblog sites — made it unlikely that "Silence" would be accepted, said the director of the center, Philip Tinari. The entire show would have been put at risk if "Silence" were submitted for approval, he said.Similarly, the organizers of a current show of Andy Warhol's works at the Central Academy of Fine Arts in Beijing said they decided in advance not to hang Warhol's well-known depiction of Mao.Mr. Wang comes from an illustrious Communist background. His father was a writer, and his mother was an actress, and both were favored by the party. From that standpoint, he has an acute antenna for China's changing political moods, and he assesses the current atmosphere as more depressing than the heady days when he led an avant-garde art movement and marched in the streets bearing a banner that said "Demand for Artistic Freedom.""One big difference between now and then is that in 1979 and 1980, artists actually believed there was going to be great change in society," he said. "Nowadays, artists believe there won't be any change in the next 20 or 30 years. The artists don't believe they have the strength to change. Their lives are comfortable, but they feel they don't have any freedom of expression."In the fall of 1979, Mr. Wang, then a 30-year-old fledgling sculptor, was the leader of a daring group of artists who detected a slight thaw in the atmosphere after the horrors of the Cultural Revolution, a period when social realism was the only permissible art form.With two dozen friends — many of them, like him, self-taught — Mr. Wang organized an impromptu and illegal art exhibit in September 1979 outside the National Art Museum of China that has gone down in the annals of modern Chinese art as the "Stars" show.The artists propped their paintings against an iron fence and hung some from trees, and Mr. Wang strung his sculptures across the top of the fence.Photographs show curious onlookers, dressed in drab Mao-style suits, with one man with flashy sunglasses peering intently at the paintings, woodblock prints and sculptures. There were run-ins with the police, but the museum directors at the time supported the artists.On Oct. 1, 1979 — National Day — Mr. Wang led a demonstration of about 1,000 protesters that ended up with a speakers' platform on the steps of the Beijing municipal party committee building.A month later, the artists persuaded the authorities to move the exhibit to a less secretive place at Beihai Park, the largest park in Beijing at the time. The Beijing bureau chief of The New York Times, Fox Butterfield, wrote that it was Mr. Wang's "brazenly political, often grotesque sculptures that stole the show."In August 1980, the artists secured a show inside the halls of the National Museum. In the 18 days of the exhibit, an astonishing 80,000 visitors showed up.But soon, another political chill swept through Beijing, and the fleeting liberty vanished. Mr. Wang married a French teacher at Peking University, Catherine Dezaly, and moved to France in 1984, taking with him "Silence," an unflattering sculpture of Mao called "Idol" and dozens of other radical pieces. At about the same time, the now-famous maverick artist Ai Weiwei, a young member of the Stars group, moved to the Lower East Side of Manhattan.The exhilaration has long since dissipated, Mr. Wang said. "We felt in those days some people in the Communist Party would support us," he recalled. "Control over the lower ranks was more relaxed."It was a period when the government was seeking foreign investment and was worried, at least a little, about rebuke from the outside world."Now they don't need foreign approval; now they are not afraid," he said. "If they were afraid, they wouldn't do stupid things like arrest Ai Weiwei and crack down on the Internet against people critical of the government."As the opening of his current show approached, he was tempted, he said, to smuggle the sculptures "Silence" and "Idol" in his luggage on the flight to Beijing from Paris. But he was persuaded not to. "I didn't want to bring trouble onto the Ullens Center for Contemporary Art," he said.The two pieces were displayed at the Asia Society in Hong Kong this year at an exhibit of art from the Cultural Revolution. Now they are back in his house in France, where he keeps them in a bathroom, safe from theft.What would have happened if he had stayed in China? "My life would be a lot better," he said. "I would have a big studio, a lot of assistants, a driver and mistresses. Chinese artists all live very comfortably, as long as you don't oppose the government."
GUANGZHOU, China — With nearly as much floor space as five McCormick Places in Chicago, the sprawling Canton Fair, which opened in Guangzhou Tuesday morning, is a monument to China's industrial versatility and export prowess.But although the 12 million square feet of exhibits still offer products as varied as wheelbarrows and Segway knockoffs, the autumn session of the fair hints at the broader malaise now afflicting exporters across China and other East Asian nations.For the first time in recent record-keeping, the number of companies with exhibits has declined in both the spring and autumn sessions of the 56-year-old Canton Fair compared with a year earlier. Even during the global financial crisis in 2009, the number of exhibitors dropped in the spring but rebounded in the autumn.Buyers from all over the world still milled through the cavernous exhibition halls on Tuesday, but they appeared less numerous than during previous fairs."It's slower than this time last year — today is opening day, and there are not many people here," said Ding Jiajun, the general manager of the Laizhou Toptool and Machinery Company, a 50-employee manufacturer of wrenches and vises in Yantian, in the eastern province of Shandong.China announced on Saturday that its exports dropped 0.25 percent in September in dollar terms compared with a year ago, below economists' expectations of 6 percent growth and far below the double-digit growth that China enjoyed for most of the last decade. In terms of the Chinese renminbi, which is what counts for Chinese exporters and overall Chinese economic output, exports fell a startling 3.6 percent last month.Nor is China alone in its difficulties. South Korea and Taiwan have already announced their export figures for September and fared even worse. South Korea fell 1.5 percent and Taiwan 7 percent in dollar terms from a year ago; Japan has not yet released its figures but has also been struggling, although recent weakness in the yen may have helped its exports."Exports are what powered Asia to prosperity," Frederic Neumann, the co-head of Asian economic research at HSBC, wrote in a research note on Tuesday. "But the engine is showing signs of serious defects."The export environment for Asian exporters may grow worse before it gets better. A growing concern for Asian exporters lies in what effect the fiscal crisis in Washington might have on the American economy, and therefore on demand for Asian goods."I am worried about what is going on in the United States right now with the looming debt crisis," said Li Shenggao, the sales manager at the Cangnan Keegao Arts and Crafts Factory, a manufacturer of gift bags and labels based in Wenzhou, China. "If no solution is found, sooner or later the U.S. economy will slow down, which will weaken the U.S. dollar and in turn reduce the competitiveness of our products."The American difficulties occur just as a combination of strengthening currencies and spiraling costs is eroding the competitiveness of Asian manufacturers, particularly in China, the world's largest exporter.The slow but steady rise of China's renminbi against the dollar, at about 3 percent a year, is another concern among Chinese exporters. Mr. Li said his costs for plastic and other raw materials were also rising 5 to 10 percent a year, while a shortage of blue-collar labor was driving up workers' wages 15 percent a year."Skilled workers with some technological know-how are still hard to come by," Mr. Li said.Mr. Ding at Laizhou Toptool, who sat in a booth with walls covered with tools in a rainbow of hues, said the cost of steel for his products had finally dipped this year. But wages in his area are climbing more than 20 percent a year as more young people go to college instead of factories, and prefer white-collar jobs when they graduate.Nicholas Kwan, the research director at the Hong Kong Trade Development Council, an advisory group created by the Hong Kong government that works closely with local chambers of commerce, said the Pearl River Delta region around Hong Kong and Guangzhou would continue to lose low-end manufacturers like garment producers to even lower-wage places like Bangladesh. But he predicted they would retain higher value-added manufacturers, like those in the electronics sector.
HONG KONG — Communist Party investigators have detained the mayor of Nanjing, a major city in eastern China, on allegations of "grave disciplinary violations," a term that almost always refers to corruption and abuses of power, state-run news media reported on Wednesday.The mayor, Ji Jianye, appears to be the latest official affected by party leaders' efforts to convince citizens that they are serious about stifling official bribetaking and graft, a major source of disenchantment with the party. The brief report by the state news agency Xinhua announcing that Mr. Ji was under "organizational investigation" did not specify what allegations he faces.In recent years, Nanjing, the provincial capital of Jiangsu Province, has sought to cast itself as a modern, progressive-minded city, drawing on the economic growth of nearby Shanghai and the Yangtze Delta region. But some Chinese news reports suggested that Mr. Ji had used that growth to illicitly enrich himself.After becoming Nanjing's deputy mayor in 2009, and mayor in 2010, Mr. Ji, 56, oversaw sweeping building projects across the city that aroused public ire and created opportunities for graft, according to a report on the Web site of the People's Daily, the main newspaper of the Communist Party. The report cited Nanjing news media claims that the allegations against Mr. Ji involve sums of about 20 million renminbi, or about $3.3 million. Before moving to Nanjing, Mr. Ji served in other parts of Jiangsu Province, one of China's most prosperous regions.Since assuming the leadership of the Communist Party in November, President Xi Jinping has repeatedly vowed to staunch corruption. He is overseeing a "mass line" political campaign intended to instill traditional communist virtues in officials. But he and other party officials have also indicated that they have no appetite for the sweeping political changes that liberal critics say are needed to restrain the power of officials and rein in abuses.In China, officials accused of corruption and other misdeeds are almost always first investigated by party operatives, who decide whether to recommend criminal investigations that often lead to trials and convictions.
HONG KONG — The famine that gripped China from 1958 to 1962 is widely judged to be the deadliest in recorded history, killing 20 to 30 million people or more, and is one of the defining calamities of Mao Zedong's rule. Ever since, the party has shrouded that disaster in censorship and euphemisms, seeking to maintain an aura of reverence around the founding leader of the Communist state.But with the approach of celebrations of the 120th anniversary Mao's birth on Dec. 26, some of his supporters and party polemicists are stepping beyond the longstanding official reticence about the famine to argue for their own, much milder version of the disaster and to assail historians who disagree.They deny that tens of millions died in the famine — it was at most a few million, some of them say — and they accuse scholars who support higher estimates of fanning anti-party sentiment."The big rumor that 30 million people starved to death in the three years of hardship," said a headline in September in The Global Times, an influential party-run tabloid.The headline accompanied a commentary by a mathematician, Sun Jingxian, who has won publicity for his claim that at most 2.5 million people died of "nutritional fatalities" during the Great Leap Forward. He argues that bigger estimates are an illusion based on flawed statistics.Mr. Sun asserts that most of the apparent deaths were a mirage of chaotic statistics: people moved from villages and were presumed dead, because they failed to register in their new homes.A new book, "Someone Must Finally Speak the Truth," has become a touchstone for supporters of Mao, who deny that the famine killed tens of millions. The author, Yang Songlin, a retired official, maintains that at most four million "abnormal fatalities" occurred during the famine.That was indeed a tragedy, he acknowledges, but one for which he mostly blames bad weather, not bad policies. He and other like-minded revisionists accuse rival researchers of inflating the magnitude of the famine to discredit Mao and the party."Some people think they have an opportunity, that as long as they can prove that tens of millions of people died in the Great Leap Forward, then the Communist Party, the ruling party, will never be able to clear itself," Mr. Yang said by telephone from his home in Zhengzhou, a city in central China.China's leaders have not publicly commented on the controversy. But Mao's reputation remains important for a party that continues to stake its claims to power on its revolutionary origins, even as it has cast aside the remnants of his revolutionary policies. And Xi Jinping, the party leader installed in November, has been especially avid in defending that legacy, even though his family suffered more under Mao than did the families of his recent predecessors.The Great Leap Forward started in 1958, when the party leadership embraced Mao's ambitions to rapidly industrialize China by mobilizing labor in a fervent campaign and merging farming cooperatives into vast — and, in theory, more productive — people's communes. The rush to build factories, communes and communal dining halls into models of miraculous Communist plenty began to falter as waste, inefficiency and misplaced fervor dragged down production.By 1959, food shortages began to grip the countryside, magnified by the amount of grain that peasants were forced to hand over to the state to feed swelling cities, and starvation spread.Officials who voiced doubts were purged, creating an atmosphere of fearful conformism that ensured the policies continued until mounting catastrophe finally forced Mao to abandon them.Beginning in the early 1980s, restrictions on studying the famine began to ease. Historians gained limited access to archives, and sets of census and other population data gradually became available, allowing researchers to build a more detailed, albeit still incomplete, understanding of what happened.
HONG KONG — The former general manager of China operations for the pharmaceutical multinational GlaxoSmithKline has returned to China and remains there to help the authorities investigating corruption and bribery allegations, a spokesman for the company said Wednesday.Mark Reilly was general manager when he left China in late June after the police raided Glaxo offices there as part of an inquiry that has exposed allegations of using bribes and illicit payments to win customers in the country's intensely competitive market for drugs and other medical products. Mr. Reilly, who went to London, was replaced in July.Mr. Reilly is "working closely with the Chinese authorities to conduct a thorough investigation and voluntarily returned to China to help them," Mark Steel, a Glaxo spokesman in London, said in an e-mailed statement. "At no point was he detained. Mark remains in China to help further with the investigation should it be required." He said Mr. Reilly went back to China several weeks ago.A British newspaper, The Daily Telegraph, reported on Tuesday that after his return, investigators ordered Mr. Reilly not to leave China. Mr. Steel would not comment on that report and referred to his statement.The Chinese authorities said in July that investigators had found that Glaxo employees used local travel agencies to organize fictitious conferences, overbill for training sessions and file other sham expenses to pay off doctors, in a bid to win more prescriptions for the company's drugs. Senior executives for Glaxo in London have apologized to Chinese officials for any misdeeds and vowed to cooperate with the investigators.
HONG KONG — China's economy expanded by 7.8 percent in the third quarter, compared with a year earlier, the government said on Friday, indicating a firming of economic activity after slower growth in the first part of the year.The Chinese government has set an economic growth target for 2013 of 7.5 percent. China's leaders have said that the double-digit growth of the past must be abandoned to make urgently needed adjustments to the economy. A Communist Party leadership conference next month is likely to unveil broad plans for economic change.But tepid data in the first half of the year had left some observers wondering whether even that lower target might be missed. China's economy grew by 7.5 percent in the second quarter, compared with a year earlier, and 7.7 percent in the first quarter. The latest figures announced by the National Bureau of Statistics showed that the economy grew by 7.7 percent in the first nine months of 2013."Economic activity has been relatively stable, with the main indicators within bounds of forecast targets," Sheng Laiyun, a spokesman for the bureau, told a news conference in Beijing that was broadcast on Chinese television. "Indicators for investment, consumption and exports all showed some uptick."Louis Kuijs, chief China economist for the Royal Bank of Scotland, said in a research note that the latest data reflected a recovery in China's industrial growth that started in July, as well as renewed expansion of investment in infrastructure and manufacturing."We expect G.D.P. growth to be above the government's bottom line in 2014, thus alleviating pressures to stimulate the economy," said Mr. Kuijs.He said China was likely to achieve G.D.P. growth of 7.7 percent for 2013 as a whole.China's Communist Party is trying to achieve a delicate balance. The government wants to keep economic growth robust enough to stave off risks of widespread unemployment and stagnating income growth. But leaders have also said they want to temper growth so they can enact changes, like weaning the economy off inefficient and heavily polluting industries and cutting excess production capacity.Last week, the Chinese president, Xi Jinping, said he was confident that his government had struck the right balance."China's economy is basically doing well," Mr. Xi told business leaders during a meeting in Indonesia, The People's Daily reported. "Economic growth and other major indicators are all staying within the range of forecast targets," he said.He added: "The slowdown in the pace of China's economic growth was the outcome of our own adjustment initiative."Next month, Mr. Xi will preside over a meeting of the Communist Party Central Committee that he and other senior officials have said will flesh out plans for economic changes.Chinese policy advisers and newspapers have indicated those could include some financial liberalization and adjustments in land policy to make it easier for farmers to lease out land.
WUHAN, China — Chinese automakers are starting to ask some of the largest Western auto parts companies to supply parts that meet American and European regulatory standards, according to senior executives at the parts companies.The requests are the clearest sign yet that after more than a decade of preparation, Chinese manufacturers are starting to feel the confidence to begin high-volume auto exports to the West.In another sign of shifting policy, a senior Chinese Commerce Ministry official said at an auto industry conference here on Thursday that Chinese automakers should prepare for the lowering of steep tariffs on imported cars. That change has never been stated by a Chinese official. Chinese automakers "may have a very huge impact from this reduction of tariffs," said Chen Lin, the Commerce Ministry official who oversees international automotive investment policy.Mr. Chen also said that Chinese automakers should be ready for China to reduce its requirement that foreign automakers set up assembly plants in China only through 50-50 joint ventures with local partners, instead of as wholly foreign-owned factories.Lower tariffs would make it much easier for multinational corporations to import cars into China, while the removal of the joint venture requirement would allow multinationals to streamline the management of their Chinese operations. Their Chinese joint venture partners have insisted on assigning managers and engineers to these projects so as to gain insights into Western technology and management.Although Mr. Chen did not say so explicitly, reducing China's trade barriers now would make it harder for Western countries to impose reciprocal restrictions later on Chinese car exports. Mr. Chen acknowledged this point indirectly when he noted that unlike China, most countries do not require joint ventures with local partners to own any assembly plants built in their markets."We are seeing this imbalance of policy," he said in a panel discussion at the Global Automotive Forum here, an annual conference that draws chief executives from all over the world.Wang Xia, chairman of the automotive committee of the China Council for the Promotion of International Trade, a government-controlled group, said in a brief interview that he expected Chinese carmakers to enter the United States market in five years.Jeffrey J. Owens, chief technology officer and executive vice president of Delphi, the largest auto parts company in the United States, said in a separate interview that Chinese automakers were starting to order parts for delivery three years from now that meet American and European regulatory standards. The orders tend to be for parts for midsize cars and sport utility vehicles, Mr. Owens said.This suggests that Chinese automakers plan to go after the most profitable parts of Western markets, instead of starting in the overcrowded markets for compact and subcompact cars.Jay K. Kunkel, the president for Asia and the Pacific at Lear, another large American auto parts supplier, said his company was also starting to see more Chinese orders for parts that meet Western regulatory standards.Mr. Owens and Mr. Kunkel declined to identify which Chinese automakers were most interested in exports. Mr. Owens said auto parts designed to Western regulatory standards would also meet Chinese standards but would tend to be more expensive.Parts meeting international standards can be made in China. Delphi has opened three factories in China this year and is building six more.Recent public statements suggest that newer automakers in China and those with mostly private sector owners, like Geely and Great Wall, are the most interested in exporting to Western markets. Older, state-controlled manufacturers have been less enthusiastic.Zhou Langhui, vice president of SAIC Motor, which is controlled by the Shanghai municipal government despite an initial public offering of stock three years ago, said in a brief interview that his company was not interested in exports.
HONG KONG — Hutchison Whampoa, controlled by Asia's richest man, Li Ka-shing, has scrapped a plan to sell its Hong Kong supermarket business, ParknShop, and will instead focus on expanding in China, it said Friday.The sale of ParknShop, which operates 345 stores in Hong Kong, China and Macau, had been expected to fetch $3 billion to $4 billion, with prospective bidders including prominent retailers like the state-owned China Resources Enterprise, Aeon of Japan and Woolworths of Australia.Hutchison abandoned the sale after a review with its advisers, Goldman Sachs and Bank of America Merrill Lynch, it said in a filing to the Hong Kong stock exchange Friday."The company has decided not to pursue a private sale of its ParknShop business at this time and will continue to implement an accelerated growth strategy with a particular focus in mainland China," Hutchison said, adding that selling ParknShop would not deliver maximum value to its shareholders.Hutchison also said that it planned to conduct a strategic review of its health and beauty retailing business, A.S. Watson & Company, with possible options including public offerings of all or some of those businesses in appropriate markets.Established in 1973, ParknShop had a 40 percent share of the Hong Kong market for supermarkets in the 12 months through June, according to the research firm Nielsen.
HONG KONG — China's economy steadied in the third quarter, expanding by 7.8 percent compared with a year earlier, the government said Friday, indicating that the economy has pulled out of a jittery period of slowed growth thanks to revived investment, consumer spending and factory production.Economists disagree over how robust that economic uptick is, with some arguing that a boost provided by a rise in bank credit could soon fade. But the third-quarter data are likely to give policy makers in Beijing more confidence that, for now, they can maintain adequate growth without resorting to major stimulus initiatives, several economists said."We're seeing this recovery in consumer confidence," said Stephen Green, head of Greater China research for Standard Chartered, and based in Hong Kong. "We're seeing continued grinding out of the housing market recovery. So we're relatively happy that we've got at least another couple of quarters of fairly plain sailing. Credit growth has decelerated a little bit, but not enough, we think, to slow us down now."The Chinese government has set an economic growth target of 7.5 percent for 2013. China's leaders have said that the double-digit growth of the past must be abandoned so that resources and revenues can be directed toward urgently needed adjustments to the economy. A Communist Party leadership conference next month is likely to unveil broad plans for economic change.But tepid economic indicators in the first half of the year had left some observers wondering whether even that lower target might be missed without aggressive policy moves. China's economy grew by 7.5 percent in the second quarter, compared with a year earlier, and 7.7 percent in the first quarter.The latest figures from the National Bureau of Statistics showed that the economy grew by 7.7 percent in the first nine months of 2013. A spokesman for the bureau said they showed the economy is on the right footing."Economic activity has been relatively stable, with the main indicators within bounds of forecast targets," Sheng Laiyun, the spokesman, told a news conference in Beijing that was broadcast on Chinese television. "Indicators for investment, consumption and exports all showed some uptick."Mr. Sheng and other officials have said that China's economy is already benefiting from adjustments taken by the government that was installed in March. But growth still relies heavily on a long-established recipe of infrastructure investment and building projects. Investment contributed over half of the growth in the third quarter, Mr. Sheng said."If anything, some of that growth we had in the third quarter was on the domestic side coming from support from policy stimulus," said Louis Kuijs, chief China economist for the Royal Bank of Scotland. China's fixed asset investment in the third quarter grew by 20.3 percent, compared to a year before. In the second quarter, fixed asset investment grew by 19.7 percent."It was good old-fashioned policy stimulus, with credit leading to more investment," said Mr. Kuijs. China was likely to achieve G.D.P. growth of 7.7 percent for 2013 as a whole, he said. "I think we can look forward to steady growth, not like a very sharp recovery, but enough compared to their bottom line."China's Communist Party is trying to achieve a tricky balance. The government wants to keep economic growth robust enough to stave off risks of widespread unemployment and stagnating income growth. But leaders have also said they want to temper growth so they can enact changes, like weaning the economy off inefficient and heavily polluting industries and cutting excess production capacity.China's leaders will also be paying close attention to external conditions. The contention in the United States' Congress that brought the country to the edge of a potential debt default was a reminder of the risks of nasty shocks, which could hurt China's exports.China's exports fell 0.25 percent in September in dollar terms compared with a year ago, well below most economists' expectations. But China is likely to see some improvement in export demand as the U.S. and Western European economies improve, said Tao Wang, the chief China economist at UBS Investment Bank in Hong Kong.Last week, the Chinese president, Xi Jinping, said he was confident that his government had the right economic fundamentals."China's economy is basically doing well," Mr. Xi told business leaders during a meeting in Indonesia, The People's Daily reported. "The slowdown in the pace of China's economic growth was the outcome of our own adjustment initiative."Next month, Mr. Xi will preside over a meeting of the Communist Party Central Committee that he and other senior officials have said will flesh out plans for economic changes. Chinese policy advisers and newspapers have indicated those could include some financial liberalization and adjustments in land policy to make it easier for farmers to lease out land."Right now we are still on the path of the old model," said Ms. Wang, the UBS economist. "If the government continues to push through some of the reforms – in particular, about opening up the services sector and expanding social benefits to a wider population – that should help boost consumption and employment."
HONG KONG — A politically outspoken Chinese economist, Xia Yeliang, will lose his professorship at Peking University, one of China's most prestigious and internationally prominent schools, after a committee voted to dismiss him, Professor Xia said on Saturday. The decision came after months of contention over his future, which his supporters have said reflects the Communist Party's efforts to deter liberal political views on campuses.Professor Xia said the School of Economics at the university notified him on Friday that an evaluation committee had voted last week against renewing his contract, which runs out in late January. The Associated Press previously reported the decision."To me, the decision is deeply unreasonable, but there's little I can do," Professor Xia said in a telephone interview. On Friday, he said, "a head of the school told me that if I keep saying to the international media that this is a political case, not an academic one, then my situation will become even worse." He declined to name the faculty leader.Professor Xia, 53, must now find new work, with virtually no prospect that another Chinese university will dare to employ him.The decision may complicate Peking University's extensive ties with universities and academics in the United States and elsewhere. Repeated calls to the university's School of Economics and Office of International Relations were not answered on Saturday, which was not a working day in China.China has plenty of academic economists who, like Professor Xia, favor unfettered free markets and see them as allied to liberal democracy. But more than others, Professor Xia has spoken out in support of democratization and against the Communist Party's restrictions. He believes that is why the university decided against him, although, he said, university leaders had not spelled that out in discussions over his impending dismissal.Last year, Professor Xia issued a call on the Internet for Chinese intellectuals to gather in public spaces to discuss and promote political reform. Before that, he mocked a propaganda minister for having a degree from a technical school.In 2008, he put his name to a petition demanding sweeping political changes that would amount to an end to one-party rule. Liu Xiaobo, one of the main organizers of that petition, Charter 08, was arrested soon after it appeared and is serving an 11-year sentence on subversion charges. Mr. Liu won the Nobel Peace Prize in 2010.Peking University, in the northwest corner of Beijing, has traditionally been among China's more liberal campuses, but like all universities in the country it comes under party control. Senior appointments are made by the party's organization department, and a network of party committees operates throughout the campus.Peking University also has an abundance of international partners. American schools with ties to it include Stanford University, which opened a research center on the Peking University campus last year, as well as Cornell and Yale.The threat to Professor Xia's job had already aroused opposition abroad. Last month, more than 130 faculty members at Wellesley College signed a petition urging their school to reconsider its partnership with Peking University if he was dismissed. Professor Xia said universities would have to decide for themselves what to do."My personal view is that I wouldn't like to see this incident lead to American universities stopping exchanges or cooperation with Chinese universities," he said. "That wouldn't help Chinese students and academics."Professor Xia said he would finish teaching two courses before his contract expired and was not sure what work he could find after that."In China, life can be a very big headache without a work unit," he said. "I told my wife not to fret. Something will come up."
BEIJING — From the moment Turkey announced plans two years ago to acquire a long-range missile defense system, the multibillion-dollar contract from a key NATO member appeared to be an American company's to lose.For years, Turkey's military had relied on NATO-supplied Patriot missiles, built by the American companies Raytheon and Lockheed Martin, to defend its skies, and the system was fully compatible with the air-defense platforms operated by other members of the alliance.There were other contenders for the deal, of course. Rival manufacturers in Russia and Europe made bids. Turkey rejected those — but not in favor of the American companies. Its selection last month of a little-known Chinese defense company, China Precision Machinery Export-Import Corp oration, stunned the military-industrial establishment in Washington and Brussels.The sale was especially unusual because the Chinese missile defense system, known as the HQ-9, would be difficult to integrate with existing NATO equipment. China Precision is also subject to sanctions from the United States for selling technologies that the United States says could help Iran, Syria and North Korea develop unconventional weapons. A State Department spokeswoman said this month that American officials had expressed to the Turkish government "serious concerns" about the deal, which has not yet been signed.Industry executives and arms-sales analysts say the Chinese probably beat out their more established rivals by significantly undercutting them on price, offering their system at $3 billion. Nonetheless, Turkey's selection of a Chinese state-owned manufacturer is a breakthrough for China, a nation that has set its sights on moving up the value chain in arms technology and establishing itself as a credible competitor in the global weapons market."This is a remarkable win for the Chinese arms industry," said Pieter Wezeman, a senior researcher at the Stockholm International Peace Research Institute, which tracks arms sales and transfers.In the past, Chinese companies have been known mainly as suppliers of small arms, but that is changing quickly. From drones to frigates to fighter jets, the companies are aggressively pushing foreign sales of high-tech hardware, mostly in the developing world. Russian companies are feeling the greatest pressure, but American and other Western companies are also increasingly running into the Chinese."China will be competing with us in many, many domains, and in the high end," said Marwan Lahoud, the head of strategy and marketing at European Aeronautic Defense and Space, Europe's largest aerospace company. "Out of 100 campaigns, that is, the commercial prospects we have, we may have the Chinese in front of us among the competitors in about three or four. They have the full range of capabilities, and they are offering them."The Stockholm institute released a report this year on global weapons transfers that found the volume of Chinese conventional weapons exports — which included high-end aircraft, missiles, ships and artillery — jumped by 162 percent from 2008 to 2012, compared with the previous five years. Pakistan is the leading customer. The institute now estimates that China is the fifth-largest arms exporter in the world, ahead of Britain. From 2003 to 2007, China ranked eighth.China's foreign arms sales are also rising fast in dollar terms. According to IHS Jane's, an industry consulting and analysis company, Chinese exports have nearly doubled over the past five years to $2.2 billion, surpassing Canada and Sweden, and making China the world's eighth-largest exporter by value.The total global arms trade revenue in 2012 was estimated to be $73.5 billion, and the United States had a 39 percent share, according to IHS Jane's.Xu Guangyu, a retired major general in the People's Liberation Army and director of the China Arms Control and Disarmament Association, said in an interview that the push by Chinese companies to develop and sell higher-tech arms was "a very normal phenomenon.""In arms manufacturing, China is trying to increase the quality and reduce price," he said. "We're driven by competition."Mr. Xu said that besides pricing, Chinese companies had another advantage: they do not "make demands over other governments' status and internal policies." He added: "Our policy of noninterference applies here. Whoever is in the government, whoever has diplomatic status with us, we can talk about arms sales with them."Chinese officials know that China's encroachment on Western-dominated military markets raises concerns. When asked about the missile-defense sale to Turkey, a Chinese Foreign Ministry spokeswoman said, "China's military exports do no harm to peace, security and stability," and do not "interfere with the internal affairs of recipient countries."
The intense competition will be highlighted on Tuesday, as Apple, Nokia and Microsoft each introduce new tablets.Those devices will be competing for consumer attention against several others recently released by other tech heavyweights, including Amazon, Google and Samsung Electronics.The stakes are high, and getting higher, as demand for tablets has exploded in the last few years. About 120 million tablets were shipped in 2012, nearly seven times as many as in 2010, when the Apple iPad was first released and generated wide interest, according to Gartner, a market research company."Getting on an airplane it's amazing the number of iPads that you now see that used to be either notebooks or portable DVD players," along with smaller tablets and e-book readers that are replacing books and magazines, said Ross Rubin, an independent analyst for Reticle Research.Apple has maintained a clear lead, but with the tablet offerings from manufacturers almost as abundant as those for smartphones, the market has become more fractured.In the second quarter, iPads had the largest share of the worldwide tablet market, with 32 percent, according to IDC. Samsung, the No. 2 tablet maker, is quickly gaining traction, with 18 percent of the market in the second quarter, up from 7.6 percent in the period a year earlier.Apple is expected to announce significantly upgraded versions of its iPad and iPad Mini devices on Tuesday. The iPad Mini is expected to have a higher-resolution display, while the bigger iPad is expected to have a slimmer design, weighing about a pound. Both iPads will also most likely get Apple's new processors, but not the fingerprint sensor that is in the latest high-end iPhone.On the same day, Microsoft will release new versions of its Surface tablets. Nokia, the mobile device maker Microsoft is in the process of buying much of, is expected to introduce a new tablet in Abu Dhabi.Mr. Rubin said each manufacturer had developed slightly different approaches with tablets. Microsoft, for example, is largely going after professionals by offering tablets that double as PCs. Samsung sells a large variety of tablets, some that include a stylus for drawing and taking notes, to cater to different professions and interests. And Apple markets its iPads as versatile devices that can be used for both work and play.Amazon offers low-priced tablets to get people to buy content from its stores — one of several less expensive tablets that have emerged to challenge the iPad. Amazon's Kindle Fire costs as little as $140, and Google's Nexus tablet starts at $230. Apple's iPad Mini starts at $330.Many new tablets have already failed or struggled. Hewlett-Packard's TouchPad tablet was killed after 48 days of slow sales. BlackBerry's PlayBook was a dismal failure. And Microsoft's first Surface tablets, released last year, sold so poorly that the company took a $900 million write-down for unsold inventory.Some of the tablets may not be catching on because people are not finding them very useful. A Gartner survey found that 80 percent of people with iPads use their tablets at least 10 times a day, much more often than people with other kinds of tablets. That gives iPad owners more time to be exposed to buying more apps, movies and games. And the more apps they buy, the more likely they will keep buying Apple hardware in the future."Other tablet providers need to understand why owners of their tablets spent significantly less time on their devices," said Annette Jump, research director at Gartner.Despite the difficulties of breaking into the market, device makers push hard, knowing that future profits could depend in large part on tablet sales.That is especially true for companies like Hewlett-Packard and Microsoft, which have traditionally been closely tied to the PC market. Sales of PCs have softened considerably in recent years, and one reason is that consumers have turned to more mobile tablets for basic computing tasks, like Web surfing and casual game playing. That trend is expected to accelerate.Gartner predicts tablets will outship PCs on an annual basis in two years. About 184 million tablets will be shipped in 2013, Gartner says, versus 303 million PCs. But by 2015, manufacturers will ship 331 million tablets and 272 million PCs.Timothy D. Cook, the chief executive of Apple, remarked on the rapid growth of the iPad in an earnings call last year."Just two years after we shipped the initial iPad, we sold 67 million," Mr. Cook said. "It took us 24 years to sell that many Macs, and five years for that many iPods, and over three years for that many iPhones."For now, at least, Apple continues to be the standard to beat."It's the reference point," said Mr. Rubin of Reticle Research. "It was a pioneer in making tablets more popular and more accessible."Even Apple, though, faces challenges, particularly in emerging markets. In China, for example, generic unbranded tablets that are occasionally knockoffs sell for as little as $80 and are extremely popular. Yet there is a bright side for Apple in China: the Chinese are buying either the cheap white-box tablets or an iPad, not much in between, according to Carolina Milanesi, research vice president at Gartner.In such a fast-changing market, however, that could quickly change. What appears certain is that consumers will be hearing much more about tablets this fall, and particularly this week."A new iPad launch always piques consumer interest in the tablet category," Tom Mainelli, a research director at IDC, said in a statement. "And traditionally that has helped both Apple and its competitors."
HONG KONG — General Motors now sells far more Buicks in China than in the United States, partly by playing on its history as the brand in which Dr. Sun Yat-sen, the founder of modern China, was chauffeured around.It turns out, however, that the Ford Motor Company had a chance nearly 90 years ago to become Dr. Sun's favorite brand — and missed it.Dr. Sun, a medical doctor and revolutionary who briefly became the first president of China in 1912, wrote to Henry Ford in 1924, in an exchange of letters released in Hong Kong by Ford Motor on Sunday night.A top Nationalist Party official in southern China by then, Dr. Sun invited Mr. Ford to create an industrial empire in China even bigger than his operations in the United States, where Ford Motor was still the market leader.But an assistant in Mr. Ford's office sent Dr. Sun a terse rejection, acknowledging receipt of the invitation but saying, "We desire to advise, however, that Mr. Ford has made no plans for visiting China in the very near future."Dr. Sun spent many years of his youth in Hong Kong, attending medical school here and becoming deeply involved in organizing revolutionary activities. The territory was then a British colony, beyond the reach of imperial China's law enforcement and intelligence apparatus. Britain returned Hong Kong to China in 1997.Ford Motor released copies of Dr. Sun's correspondence from the archives of the Henry Ford Museum in Dearborn, Mich., ahead of the company's planned bid on Monday for regulatory approval to become a government-approved provider of taxis in Hong Kong.The city has nearly 18,000 taxis, 98 percent of them supplied by Toyota, with Nissan providing virtually all of the rest. Ford Motor is trying to win approval of the Ford Transit Connect, a compact minivan manufactured in Valencia, Spain.Ever since China's civil war ended in 1949 with a Communist victory and the retreat of the Nationalists to Taiwan, one of the few points both sides could agree on was that Dr. Sun played a central role in the founding of modern China. Although Dr. Sun was a Nationalist, the Communists have also revered him as one of their intellectual forefathers.Ford has bet heavily on the mainland Chinese market and is rapidly expanding there, but also continues to do well in Taiwan. Releasing the documents in Hong Kong, where Taiwanese and mainland Chinese officials sometimes meet secretly at a nearly neutral location, may allow Ford Motor to sidestep sometimes acrimonious arguments from both sides over who are the true modern political heirs to Dr. Sun.G.M. has thrived in China, thanks mainly to its Buick brand, which the company frequently ties to Dr. Sun in its marketing. G.M. shipped 71,002 Buicks to dealers in China last month — compared to only 15,623 Buicks in the United States.Ford Motor has lagged far behind in China, mainly because G.M. was ahead of most rivals in winning regulatory permission in 1997 to open a Buick assembly plant in Shanghai. Foreign entry into the Chinese auto market was still severely restricted then. G.M. relentlessly emphasized its connection to Dr. Sun at the time, portraying Buick as returning to a market where it had a big presence in the 1920s and 1930s. G.M. mentions less often that the preferred car of China's last imperial ruler, Emperor Pu Yi, was also a Buick.But Ford has begun catching up, with sales in China up 61 percent in September from a year earlier, compared to a gain of 14 percent for G.M.As for Dr. Sun's letter, it may have been prophetic in warning that China needed help to address its weak economy, or else it could attract foreign intervention that would sow the seeds of another world war. Japan grabbed part of northeastern China in 1931 and a full-scale war began between China and Japan in 1937.The war set off a spiral of hostility in East Asia, with an American trade embargo against Japan followed by the Japanese bombing of Pearl Harbor in 1941. The bombing drew the United States into World War II and turned the Pacific into one of the theaters of that war.Ford has a negligible market share in Japan and no assembly plants there. In addition to the highly competitive auto factories that are already there, extensive regulations in Japan set unique standards for even mundane equipment like headlights. These nontariff trade barriers have made it largely uneconomical for international automakers to ship cars to Japan.
HONG KONG — A provincial court in eastern China said Monday that it would deliver its decision on Friday on an appeal against the prison sentence for the former politician Bo Xilai.China's judiciary is controlled by the Communist Party, and there is little chance that the appellate court, the Shandong Province High People's Court, will overturn or revise the guilty verdict and sentence of life in prison that a lower court reached a month ago. Mr. Bo was convicted of taking bribes, embezzling public money and abusing power in an attempt to silence murder allegations against his wife.Mr. Bo, a combative former member of the Politburo, an elite leadership council, had fought the charges and then lodged an appeal of the court decision.His trial lasted five days and attracted intense attention in China, where many people followed a running account of the colorful proceedings that the court issued on Sina Weibo, a Chinese microblog service similar to Twitter.The Shandong court, which announced the appeal decision date on its Web site, will make its judgment without having held additional hearings. In China, courts often decide appeals based only on written submissions.
HONG KONG — A large trade deficit and a disappointing increase in exports announced on Monday underlined some of the challenges facing Japan as it seeks to reinvigorate its economy after years of listless growth.Aggressive monetary stimulus and fiscal stimulus measures called for by the central bank and the government of Prime Minister Shinzo Abe have succeeded in weakening the persistently strong yen and lifting growth this year. Plans have also been announced to raise Japan's sales tax next year in a bid to tackle the national debt pile, which earlier this year topped 1 quadrillion yen, or $10 trillion, for the first time.The trade data announced by the Finance Ministry on Monday, however, showed that export growth had dropped back in September — and that, with imports still strong, the nation had logged a sizable trade deficit for the 15th month running.The yen has weakened about 20 percent over the past 12 months, providing a boost to exporters by making their goods less expensive for purchasers abroad. But export growth of 11.5 percent in September fell well short of expectations and also was a slowdown from the previous two months.The slowdown was most marked in exports to other parts of Asia, whose once buoyant growth has slowed over the past year thanks, in large part, to slowing growth in China.Exports to Asia rose 8.2 percent from a year earlier, the Finance Ministry data showed, but that was down from an increase of 13.5 percent in August. Export growth to China, likewise, slowed to 11.4 percent, from 15.8 percent in August.Meanwhile, Japan's imports have been posting large gains, in part because the country's need to import fossil fuels has risen since the shutdown of most of its nuclear reactors in the wake of the 2011 earthquake and tsunami that triggered the lingering crisis at the Fukushima nuclear plant.In the foreseeable future, economists at Nomura commented in a research note, the yen weakness since last year should help underpin a recovery in the Japanese economy. "With imports also continuing to grow on the back of rising domestic demand, however, we anticipate no appreciable contraction in the nominal trade deficit for the time being," they wrote.
HONG KONG — The police in Beijing have formally arrested a prominent Chinese businessman who turned his energies and wealth to supporting human rights causes, his lawyer said on Monday. The arrest of the businessman, Wang Gongquan, was another step in the Communist Party's drive to deter dissent, supporters said. Notice of the decision comes a day before China is scheduled to defend its human rights record at a United Nations hearing.Mr. Wang's lawyer, Chen Youxi, said in a brief telephone interview that a police officer had called him to say that on Sunday Mr. Wang had been formally arrested on charges of "assembling a crowd to disrupt order in a public place." Mr. Wang was detained on the same charges last month, and the decision to formally arrest him will give the police more time to hold him and to build a case, on that or other charges.Mr. Chen later wrote on a popular Chinese microblogging site, Sina Weibo, that Mr. Wang's family had received the arrest notice, and he posted an image of the notice. Calls to Mr. Wang's wife, Cao Yuping, were not answered. Officers at a detention center in Beijing where supporters have said Mr. Wang is being held would not answer any questions.Mr. Wang, who turns 52 on Tuesday, is an unusually prominent and established target for Chinese police officers seeking to stifle political activism: a wealthy venture capitalist who made a fortune investing in real estate, high-tech firms and other ventures.Several years ago, however, Mr. Wang shed the typical reluctance of many Chinese businessmen to openly criticize the government and began supporting advocates seeking broader legal rights, equal treatment of citizens and checks on state power. He is a friend of Xu Zhiyong, a prominent legal advocate in Beijing who was detained in July on the same disruption charges. In neither case have officials publicly explained the specific charges.Although the Communist Party leadership under Xi Jinping has promised major economic policy changes, it is wary of any political steps that could invite challenges to one-party rule. On Friday, Xia Yeliang, an economist who has bluntly criticized the party and advocated democratic change, was told that he would lose his professorship at Peking University, one of China's most prestigious universities, after a committee voted to dismiss him.Mr. Wang developed a large following on the Sina Weibo, where word of his arrest spread quickly. Unlike most politically charged arrests and detentions, Mr. Wang's have been reported by Chinese news outlets. Even before the arrest was widely reported, 18 prominent liberal Chinese academics, writers and businessmen issued a petition on Monday, over the Internet and by e-mail, demanding Mr. Wang's release."No matter what the name of the crime the authorities try to impose on Mr. Wang Gongquan, it is plain to all that this is nothing more than political persecution," the petition said.The government appears to have been alarmed at the example that Mr. Wang set by using his great wealth to support controversial causes, like campaigning to erase discriminatory barriers that put rural children at a disadvantage in education, said one of the signatories, Liu Suli, a bookstore owner in Beijing who is a friend of Mr. Wang."One of the main reasons for arresting Wang Gongquan was that he was using money to support public interest causes," Mr. Liu said in a telephone interview."In the view of the party, they may see that as politics, but in my view that's a public interest issue," he said. "A businessman then has to think that if he might be arrested and given a heavy sentence for supporting such issues, then how can I be sure that the cause I support won't lead to my arrest?"Chinese officials may be asked to explain the detention and arrest of Mr. Wang and dozens of other politically active citizens at a United Nations meeting in Geneva on Tuesday. The meeting is part of a process, a "Universal Periodic Review," in which United Nations member states offer their plans to improve human rights and answer questions from other member states.In reports submitted to the review, many independent Chinese groups and international organizations have deplored what they say is the continued use of arbitrary powers to stifle dissent, despite some improvements in China's legal procedures.
TIANJIN, China — In northern China, near the Mongolian border, radioactively contaminated leaks from two decades of rare earth refining have been slowly trickling underground toward the Yellow River, a crucial water source for 150 million people.In Jiangxi province in south-central China, the national government has seized control of rare earth mining districts from provincial officials after finding widespread illegal strip-mining of rare earth metals.And in Guangdong province in southeastern China, regulators are struggling to repair rice fields and streams destroyed by powerful acids and other runoff from open-pit rare earth mines that are often run by violent organized crime syndicates.Communities scattered across China face heavy environmental damage that accumulated through two decades of nearly unregulated rare earth mining and refining. While the Chinese government has begun spending billions of dollars to clean up the damage, the environmental impact is becoming an international trade issue, with a World Trade Organization panel in Geneva expected to issue a crucial draft report on Wednesday.Arriving three years after an international tempest over the rare earths trade and 19 months after the World Trade Organization litigation was actually filed, the coming decision may not make a big difference to the rare earth industry itself, industry executives and officials said. But the case does seem to have had the unintended effect of helping to goad China into a major environmental cleanup.China, the world's dominant producer of rare earth metals, quietly and unilaterally imposed taxes and annual tonnage limits on its rare earth exports seven years ago. It then gradually raised the taxes and lowered the tonnage limits in subsequent years, slowly throttling supplies to overseas manufacturers.China contends that these export restrictions are needed to protect its environment. The United States, the European Union and Japan have challenged China's taxes and quotas at the World Trade Organization. They note that China has done little to limit rare earth consumption within its borders.The rare earth case "will be a landmark case in terms of both export restrictions and the environment," said James Bacchus, the former two-term chairman of the W.T.O. appeals tribunal in Geneva.China has made ample supplies available to manufacturers within China that produce crucial components for a host of products like laptop computers, compact fluorescent bulbs, wind turbines and electric cars. Some Western and Japanese companies have moved factories to China to make sure that they have access to rare earths.The W.T.O. panel faces some of the trickiest issues in international trade. Environmentalists have been wary of the trade organization ever since its predecessor, the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade, rejected an American ban in the early 1990s on the import of tuna caught in ways that are hazardous to dolphins.The Chinese export restrictions have become less important over the last several years for two reasons. Alternative rare earth mines have gone into production in the United States and Australia, reducing China's share of global production to 85 percent, from 95 percent three years ago. And companies have become much more efficient about economizing on rare earths, especially the costliest ones, the so-called heavy rare earths like dysprosium.The change is visible in the supply warehouse here of one of the world's few factories producing rare earth powders for use in very powerful magnets. Whether in smartphones or missiles, the most advanced applications for rare earths tend to involve the manufacture of miniature but crucial components using the powerful magnetic qualities of rare earths.The rare earth complex here in Tianjin is owned by Molycorp, an American company, although the factory buys its processed rare earths almost entirely from Chinese refineries. The warehouse has neatly arranged stacks of barrels of rare earths. The bright blue barrels holding neodymium, another highly magnetic rare earth, are only two feet high and a little more than a foot in diameter, but weigh more than 550 pounds because of the material's extraordinary density.Sitting by itself on a wooden pallet is a single gray can of dysprosium, a rare earth that sells for $243 per pound. Dysprosium prices soared as high as $1,135 per pound two years ago in a speculative bubble that followed China's imposition of an unannounced embargo on rare earth shipments to Japan from September to November 2010, during a territorial dispute.
HONG KONG — Prices of new homes in China continued to soar in September, defying government efforts to cool the market and highlighting some of the challenges Beijing faces as it seeks to rebalance growth and rein in risks that have built up in the economy during the past five years.Rising affluence, relatively cheap credit and the gradual urbanization of Chinese society, in which millions of people have moved from the countryside to cities, all have contributed to demand for new homes, pushing up prices.Data from the statistics bureau, which tracks changes in China's 70 biggest cities, showed that prices had risen or remained at their current highs in nearly all of those cities in September. On average, home prices in the places studied rose 9.1 percent from a year earlier.As in previous months, the sharpest gains were in Beijing, Shanghai, Guangzhou and Shenzhen, metropolises whose populations have ballooned as workers from other parts of the country have flocked there in search of jobs.Home prices in Beijing leaped 16 percent in September from a year earlier, picking up from the already large increases of previous months. Prices in Shanghai jumped 17 percent, and new homes in Shenzhen and Guangzhou were one-fifth more expensive. Gains in other cities were less drastic — prices in cities like Urumqi, Wuhan and Nanjing, for example, rose about 10 percent, and those in Haikou, on the southern island of Hainan, edged up 1.1 percent.The government has sought in recent years to rein in property price growth, taking measures like imposing higher down payment requirements. But it has steered clear of more drastic constraints, like property taxes, for fear of depressing a sector that is hugely important to the economy. At least 10 percent of China's gross domestic product comes directly from the construction and real estate sectors — and far more when the industries that supply them and the consumption linked to the purchases of homes are taken into account, analysts estimate."The housing market performance has been much stronger than the market had expected at the beginning of the year," China economists at JPMorgan's offices in Hong Kong wrote in a research note on Tuesday.While this has been an important engine of economic growth, particularly at a time when overall growth has been flagging, it has also created problems. Investment in real estate has crowded out investment in other industries, the JPMorgan analysts wrote, and the high prices in major cities had become a major source of social dissatisfaction. This and the wide range of price increases within the China have complicated the government's efforts to cool the market."In terms of policy, we see no grand tightening in the offing, except that banks are extending fewer mortgages," said Yao Wei, China economist at Société Générale. Long-term solutions, including property taxes, land reform and sustainable funding sources for affordable housing, she said, will be slow to come.
HONG KONG — Prices of new homes in China continued to soar in September, defying government efforts to cool the market and highlighting some of the challenges Beijing faces as it seeks to rebalance growth and rein in risks that have built up in the economy during the past five years.Rising affluence, relatively cheap credit and the gradual urbanization of Chinese society, in which millions of people have moved from the countryside to cities, all have contributed to demand for new homes, pushing up prices.Data from the statistics bureau, which tracks changes in China's 70 biggest cities, showed that prices had risen or remained at their current highs in nearly all of those cities in September. On average, home prices in the places studied rose 9.1 percent from a year earlier.As in previous months, the sharpest gains were in Beijing, Shanghai, Guangzhou and Shenzhen, metropolises whose populations have ballooned as workers from other parts of the country have flocked there in search of jobs.Home prices in Beijing leaped 16 percent in September from a year earlier, picking up from the already large increases of previous months. Prices in Shanghai jumped 17 percent, and new homes in Shenzhen and Guangzhou were one-fifth more expensive. Gains in other cities were less drastic — prices in cities like Urumqi, Wuhan and Nanjing, for example, rose about 10 percent, and those in Haikou, on the southern island of Hainan, edged up 1.1 percent.The government has sought in recent years to rein in property price growth, taking measures like imposing higher down payment requirements. But it has steered clear of more drastic constraints, like property taxes, for fear of depressing a sector that is hugely important to the economy. At least 10 percent of China's gross domestic product comes directly from the construction and real estate sectors — and far more when the industries that supply them and the consumption linked to the purchases of homes are taken into account, analysts estimate."The housing market performance has been much stronger than the market had expected at the beginning of the year," China economists at JPMorgan's offices in Hong Kong wrote in a research note on Tuesday.While this has been an important engine of economic growth, particularly at a time when overall growth has been flagging, it has also created problems. Investment in real estate has crowded out investment in other industries, the JPMorgan analysts wrote, and the high prices in major cities had become a major source of social dissatisfaction. This and the wide range of price increases within the China have complicated the government's efforts to cool the market."In terms of policy, we see no grand tightening in the offing, except that banks are extending fewer mortgages," said Yao Wei, China economist at Société Générale. Long-term solutions, including property taxes, land reform and sustainable funding sources for affordable housing, she said, will be slow to come.
HONG KONG — An important gauge of manufacturing activity in China showed a larger-than-expected uptick for October, suggesting that the economy may have picked up some steam.The early reading of a survey of purchasing managers, released Thursday morning by HSBC and compiled by the research firm Markit, reached a seven-month high at 50.9. That was up from 50.2 in September and higher than many economists had expected. Readings above 50 indicate expansion.The poll provides a closely watched indication of how the giant Chinese economy is performing each month. Although many economists caution that the renewed growth momentum may peter out in coming months and that the booming expansion rates of previous decades are a thing of the past, the rise in the purchasing managers index provided some reassurance that the pickup of recent months had extended into October.The reading "implies that China's growth recovery is becoming consolidated into 4Q following the bottoming out in 3Q," Qu Hongbin, chief China economist at HSBC, said in a statement accompanying the index's release. "This momentum is likely to continue in the coming months, creating favorable conditions for speeding up structural reforms."Faced with a marked deceleration last year and early this year, the Chinese authorities have announced a string of targeted measures in recent months aimed at putting a floor under the economy.Next month, the Communist Party Central Committee is meeting. It could outline some broader, structural changes that are part of the authorities' broader goal of shifting the economy away from its dependence on exports and investments in heavy industry toward more domestic demand and more efficient, sustainable growth. Changes could include adjustments in land policy to make it easier for farmers to lease out land.
BEIJING — Emergency measures came swiftly in Harbin, the northeastern city blanketed with hazardous smog this week: Schools were shut down, buses ordered off the roads, the airport closed, police roadblocks set up to check tailpipe emissions from cars. City officials even fanned out in the surrounding countryside, ordering farmers to stop burning the cornstalks left in their fields after the harvest.They were reacting to the first notable surge of air pollution in China this autumn. Residents across the nation's north fear that the smog is a sign of things to come. With winter approaching, cities north of the Huai River are turning on their coal-fired municipal heating systems, whose emissions were found in one study to shorten residents' life spans by an average of five years.In Harbin, moist air trapped the pollution at ground level, leaving people to walk through a gray miasma wearing face masks. Visibility was so bad that two buses got lost plying their routes.But the emergency measures showed that the government was trying to address the problem rather than merely cover it up, as it might have done in past years, some environmental activists said.Action plans in Harbin, Beijing and other cities, along with broad national policies meant to curb air pollution announced last month, signal that some officials are serious about tackling the chronic problem. On Thursday, the Ministry of Environmental Protection said it was sending inspection teams to cities across China for the winter to ensure that environmental regulations were enforced.Awareness of various kinds of pollution — air, water and soil — has risen quickly this year, especially among middle-class urbanites. Chinese news media, including official state outlets, are reporting more aggressively on the causes and effects of pollution. An editorial in Beijing News on Wednesday took note that last week the World Health Organization had classified air pollution as a leading cause of cancer, and said that on days when the air is hazardous, "containing the pollution and protecting the health of residents is the highest priority."But the advocates say enforcement is often a weak point, even when leaders understand that cleaning up the environment has become critical to maintaining social and political stability."I give credit to the local government for taking these measures," Ma Jun, an environmental advocate, said of the emergency actions in Harbin. "Of course, they will have some problem with their image, the city's image — but on the other hand, it shows they put people's health ahead of saving face."Having said that, I think it's not enough," he added. "I think people won't be satisfied with just knowing which day to put on face masks or not go to school or keep their children indoors. They really want blue-sky days."Under pressure from the public, Beijing in 2012 became the first Chinese city to announce levels of an especially hazardous category of particulate matter, known as PM 2.5, in the air. Since then, 113 other cities have followed suit. The data can be seen online in real time, which was how much of China followed the crisis in Harbin.On Monday and Tuesday, air-quality monitoring stations in some parts of the city reported PM 2.5 concentrations that exceeded 1,000 micrograms per cubic meter — 40 times the level deemed safe by the W.H.O.Since 2007, the Ministry of Environmental Protection has published an annual list of high-polluting industrial plants around China. The latest identifies 4,189 factories that, together, release 65 percent of China's total industrial air pollutants. "We need to know where they are, what kinds of pollutants they discharge, the volume and whether they are in compliance with discharge standards," Mr. Ma said, adding that local governments gather that data but do not release it.Advocates hope that identifying the polluters publicly will help to shame them into improving, Mr. Ma said, with pressure coming from "whoever invests in the polluting factories, the banks giving them loans, the brands that source from these polluters."The central government is apparently stepping up pressure as well. One goal of the national plan announced last month was to reduce the concentration of PM 2.5 in three heavily populated industrial regions by 15 percent to 25 percent, compared with 2012 levels. Prime Minister Li Keqiang said last month that the cities of Beijing and Tianjin and the province of Hebei, all in northern China, would cut down their use of coal, the main source of air pollution, by 80 million tons a year in the near future.Still, environmentalists worry that growth-minded local officials and businesses will be reluctant to go along. "Chinese leaders have produced an impressive flurry of policies on air pollution this year, but regulators still suffer from insufficient authority; rapid economic growth means that a steady stream of pollution sources come on line every day; and vested business interests are sure to scream bloody murder every step of the way," Alex L. Wang, a scholar of Chinese environmental policy and a law professor at the University of California, Los Angeles, said in an e-mail."It's one thing to have a strategy, and another to execute it well," he added.Huang Wei, who works on climate and energy issues at Greenpeace East Asia, said officials needed to focus on bigger solutions, not stopgap measures. "The situation will not change as long as China has an over 70 percent energy dependency on coal," she said. "The long-term solution is to get rid of heavy energy-consuming industries."Until that happens, Chinese citizens are bracing for many more days of heavy pollution, and officials are announcing a wider array of emergency measures for the worst days. On Tuesday, the Beijing government adopted a plan for emergencies when the forecast calls for three or more days with pollution rated as serious. A "red alert" would be issued, schools would be shut down and use of private cars would be limited to alternate days, depending on their license plate numbers.Skeptics point out that wealthier households can buy extra vehicles to get around that rule. And Beijing News said in its editorial that on "red alert" days, everyone should stay home, not just children. "Faced with the increasingly serious pollution levels in Beijing," it said, "coupled with the carelessness of residents in protecting themselves against pollution, the emergency plan is still inadequate."
XIAHE, China — Buddhist monks in flowing burgundy robes hurried along the dirt paths of the Labrang Monastery, trying their best to ignore the scrum of Chinese tourists following their every move, many with cameras fit for paparazzi.Pilgrims and those less spiritually inclined wandered through the ornate complex here in the mountain town of Xiahe to gaze upon towering Buddha statues bathed in incense. Some tourists held back to indulge in distinctly unenlightened pursuits, smoking cigarettes and pouting at smartphones in the high-tech vanity ritual known as the selfie.One of the most important sites in Tibetan Buddhism, Labrang presents an idyllic picture of sacred devotion that is carefully curated by the Chinese government, which hopes to convince visitors that Tibetan religion and culture are swaddled in the Communist Party's benevolent embrace.But behind closed doors, many of the monastery's resident monks complain about intrusive government policies, invisible to tourists, that they say are strangling their culture and identity."Even if we're just praying, the government treats us as criminals," said a young monk, who like others interviewed recently spoke on the condition of anonymity to avoid government repercussions.Such frustrations, many monks say, are what have driven more than 120 Tibetans to set fire to themselves since 2009, including 13 in the Labrang area, in a wave of protests that has gone largely unreported in Chinese news media.International human rights advocates say that rather than address the underlying grievances — including Beijing's deeply unpopular campaign to demonize the Dalai Lama, the exiled Tibetan spiritual leader — Chinese authorities have responded with even harsher policies that punish the relatives of those who self-immolate and imprison those who disseminate news of the protests to the outside world.Exile groups and analysts say Labrang and a handful of other monasteries across the vast Tibetan plateau in Central Asia have become showcases for Beijing's strategy, which seeks to stifle dissent in well-trafficked tourist sites without scaring away visitors.Monks here describe a largely unseen web of controls that keep potential troublemakers in line: ubiquitous surveillance cameras, paid informers and plainclothes security agents who mingle among the busloads of tourists. Hidden from the throngs are the political education sessions during which monks are forced to denounce the Dalai Lama. Stiff jail sentences await those who step out of line. "If we don't obey, it will be terrible for us," the monk said.Founded in the early 18th century, the Labrang Monastery is tucked into the dusky hills of northwestern Gansu Province. Each day, hundreds of Chinese tourists arrive to spin colorful prayer wheels lining the monastery perimeter and sip tea at hotels designed to resemble Tibetan nomadic tents. Along the town's main street, they buy turquoise-encrusted amulets, dress up in monks' robes and take turns trying on the ceremonial yellow hats that resemble mohawk-style haircuts. Officials hope that a recently completed airport will draw even bigger crowds.In a monastery courtyard surrounded by whitewashed mud walls, a Chinese family from the provincial capital, Lanzhou, knelt down to pray to Buddha. "If you ask nicely, he'll make your wish come true," said the mother, Ming Yang, who acknowledged that her understanding of Buddhism ended there.With an eye on the lucrative prestige of a Unesco World Heritage listing, the central government is giving the monastery a $26 million face-lift. Around 1,000 monks and 65,000 volumes of Buddhist scripture are housed in the sprawling complex, which local officials say is in dire need of structural improvements.Yet locals complain that much of the construction is aimed at increasing tourism, rather than benefiting Tibetans. "It looks fancy, but in reality all the improvements are for Chinese people," one said.
HONG KONG — An important gauge of manufacturing activity in China, released on Thursday, showed a larger-than-expected uptick for October, suggesting that the economy may have picked up steam just as the Communist Party leadership was preparing to flesh out plans for an overhaul.The early reading of a survey of purchasing managers, released by HSBC and compiled by the research firm Markit, reached a seven-month high of 50.9. That was up from 50.2 in September and higher than many economists had expected. Readings above 50 indicate expansion.The poll provides an indication of how the giant Chinese economy is performing each month, and the rise provided some reassurance that the pickup of recent months had extended into October.The reading "implies that China's growth recovery is becoming consolidated into 4Q following the bottoming out in 3Q," Qu Hongbin, chief China economist at HSBC, said in a statement accompanying the index's release. He referred to the third and fourth quarters of the year. "This momentum is likely to continue in the coming months, creating favorable conditions for speeding up structural reforms."Faced with a marked deceleration of growth last year and early this year, and eager to contain some of the risks that have built up in the financial system amid a surge in lending following the global financial crisis, the Chinese authorities have announced a series of measures aimed at supporting the economy and reducing inefficient or risky lending activities.In August, for example, the authorities announced plans for a body to coordinate financial supervision, in an apparent bid to reduce risk and wean the economy from easy credit and steer it toward slower, more sustainable expansion.Steps to support the quality of future growth have included tax cuts for small businesses — which the government is eager to promote in its bid to diversify business activity — and instructions to companies in certain sectors to cut excess production capacity.The measures reflect the difficult balance that Beijing must strike as it seeks to steer a path between maintaining sufficient growth to generate jobs and social stability, yet reducing the risks that accompany headlong growth.Although a boom in lending was crucial to ensuring growth after the global financial crisis, it also helped fan a worrying buildup of local government debt and contributed to soaring property prices across much of the nation.This week, in an apparent bid to clamp down on inflation risks, the central bank drained cash from the financial system, causing money market rates to rise sharply.The Communist Party Central Committee meeting next month is expected to outline some broader, structural changes that are part of the authorities' goal of shifting the economy away from its dependence on exports and investments in heavy industry toward more domestic demand and more efficient sustainable growth.These steps could include making it easier for farmers to lease land, planning to revitalize private enterprise, and addressing a range of financial overhauls, analysts say.Economists at Bank of America Merrill Lynch wrote this week that they expected the leadership meeting to signal steps to ease the longstanding one-child policy, to start pilot projects to overhaul rural land rights, to centralize some government functions, and to promise aggressive cuts in government rules and regulations.On the financial front, they added, there could be plans to allow local governments to sell bonds — which they are currently prohibited from doing — and pledges to further open up interest rates, foreign exchange rates and capital flows to market forces.Details on many of these targets, however, will probably remain sketchy and elusive for now. And some sensitive areas, like changes for the giant state-owned enterprises, are unlikely to be addressed at all."The benign economic outlook in the near term provides favorable condition for structural reforms," Zhu Haibin, chief China economist in Hong Kong for JPMorgan, wrote about the purchasing managers' index Thursday. Regarding next month's Central Committee meeting, he said that although there was "no question" that new leaders were determined to push forward economic overhauls, "actions and implementations are more important at this stage."
BEIJING — China introduced a new benchmark lending rate on Friday in another step toward letting markets set the cost of money and reducing distortions that have led to the excessive investment and overcapacity now dogging its economy.The new rate, called the loan prime rate, will guide commercial bankers in setting interest rates when lending to their best customers, said the People's Bank of China, the central bank.China has been gradually moving away from rate controls in favor of a market-driven system. In July, it abolished all controls on bank lending rates.However, China maintains a ceiling on deposit rates, and removing the ceiling is seen as the most critical step for Beijing to take to let market forces take over and introduce more competition in the banking sector, which is dominated by big, state-owned institutions."I think this is a major logical step following a series of moves toward liberalized interest rates," said Qu Hongbin, China economist at HSBC in Hong Kong.He said that since China eliminated the cap on lending rates, and along with that the official base rate for bank lending, commercial banks have been asking for a guidance rate. "The middle-sized banks are saying, 'How do I know what I should charge my customers now?,' " Mr. Qu said. "I hear many regional banks in China are asking for this since they removed the cap."The loan prime rate will be announced every business day by the Shanghai-based interbank market and supplement the Shanghai interbank offered rate, or Shibor, the central bank said in a statement published on its Web site. The new rate, which has a one-year duration, was set by nine commercial banks, including China's four biggest, and was quoted for the first time on Friday at 5.71 percent.China introduced the Shibor system in 2007, modeled after the London interbank offered rate, or Libor, hoping to develop it into China's benchmark rate for the interbank system, in which banks lend to one another. Concerns over outsize influence by the top banks have slowed the market's development. The Shibor is now based on quotes supplied from around 20 market makers for their lending to financial institutions in the interbank market, and has been used in pricing debt issues.But up to now China did not have a market-based benchmark for loans to corporate clients."The loan prime rate is aimed at further promoting market-oriented interest rates, improving the benchmark rate systems and guiding the pricing of credit market products," the central bank said in the statement.The rate reform is part of a broad reform agenda that China's new leadership is expected to outline at a policy meeting next month, promising to steer the economy from its reliance on debt-fueled investment to a balanced model driven by consumption, services and innovation.
The Food and Drug Administration proposed rules on Friday that would govern the production of pet food and farm animal feed for the first time.The regulation would help prevent food-borne illness in both animals and people, officials at the agency said, as people can become sick from handling contaminated animal food and from touching pets that have eaten it.The proposal comes six years after the biggest pet food recall in history, when a Chinese producer contaminated dog and cat food with melamine, a compound used in plastics, causing the deaths of animals across the United States.The public outcry helped lead to the inclusion of animal food in the Food Safety and Modernization Act, a landmark food safety bill, which passed with broad support in 2010 and was the first major overhaul of the Food and Drug Administration's food safety laws since the 1930s. It gives the F.D.A. more control over food imports as well as broad new powers to set standards to prevent contamination of produce and processed food. The rules proposed Friday offer details on how this would be accomplished.Jerky treats have also caused pet deaths. Since 2007, the F.D.A. has counted about 580 pet deaths, nearly all dogs, connected to chicken, duck and sweet potato jerky treats, nearly all of which were imported from China. It is not clear if the new regulations could have prevented the deaths because the F.D.A. is not sure yet what the hazard is.The agency had received more than 3,000 complaints about the jerky over five years. The reports involve more than 3,600 dogs and 10 cats. One sickness associated with the treats, an illness of the kidneys known as Fanconi syndrome, appears to be concentrated more in smaller dogs, the agency said.The proposal is open for public comment for 120 days. If passed, it would regulate the production of feed for millions of farm animals, including cows, pigs and chickens, as well as pet food. In all, there are about 78 million dogs and 86 million cats as household pets in the United States.Much like regulations proposed for human food this year, the rules would require makers of animal food sold in the United States to develop a written plan to prevent food-borne illnesses, like salmonella, and to put it into effect. Producers would need to put protective procedures into place at critical points in the production process where problems are likely to arise.For example, for canned dog food, producers might have to set up a system to monitor whether the food has been cooked long enough at the right temperature, said Michael R. Taylor, deputy commissioner for foods and veterinary medicine. They would also need to keep records to document it."We know from experience that when the system doesn't deliver, people get irate," Mr. Taylor said. "It's all about having a systematic plan to make the food safe."The rules would also require producers to correct problems that arise and re-evaluate their plans at least every three years. And they would require them to maintain standards of cleanliness for the facilities and people who work in them. Smaller businesses would have more time to comply with the rules, once they become final. If companies do not comply, the agency said it could take any number of actions, including issuing warning letters, advising consumers, and in some cases, seizing products and prosecuting producers.The proposal does not address the use of antibiotics given to animals, sometimes in feed. Public health advocates warn that the practice is contributing to dangerous levels of antibiotic resistance in humans.
BEIJING — He lectured students about the trespasses of the Communist Party, publicly belittled the country's mighty propaganda minister and issued frequent demands for an end to single-party rule in China.But in voting two weeks ago to dismiss Xia Yeliang, an economist, from his teaching post at Peking University, university officials say, they weighed only one criterion: his performance as an academic."He just wasn't a good teacher," Sun Qixiang, dean of the school of economics, said Friday in an interview. "Politics had nothing to do with this decision."In the week since Professor Xia was dismissed, university officials have been buffeted by criticism that their decision was in retaliation for his activism against the government. The Committee of Concerned Scientists issued a letter condemning the vote, and faculty members at a number of educational institutions around the world have been questioning their colleges' cooperative arrangements with one of China's best universities."A university is an open forum for exploring truth, and sharing opinions and academic freedom is the foundation for its existence," a group of professors at National Taiwan University wrote in an open letter this week. "Suppressing that freedom by political means constitutes a major obstacle to exploring truth and destroys the spiritual cornerstone of a university."But Professor Xia's colleagues say such criticism is unfair, and insist that politics played no role in their decision. The vote was 30 against renewing his contract and three in favor, with one abstention, according to officials.On Friday, three economics professors along with Ms. Sun, the dean, gathered in a university conference room to defend their votes, saying Professor Xia, who had been teaching at the university for a decade, had been repeatedly urged to improve his teaching style, which they described as deeply unpopular with students. In recent years, they said, he had racked up more than 340 negative student reviews, earning him the worst teaching record among the university's 60 or so instructors during three evaluations. They added that he had published only one paper in recent years, an important factor in determining whether to renew faculty contracts every three years."We had hoped he could improve his teaching and research," said Li Qingyun, a professor of economics who has taught at the university for more than three decades. "This is from the bottom of my heart."In an interview on Friday, Professor Xia, 53, defended his academic performance and maintained his insistence that the vote was politically motivated, citing warnings from the university's Communist Party secretary that mentioned his online pro-democracy writings. He said he was notified only once about his bottom ranking in teaching evaluations, not three times as university officials assert, and noted that 340 negative evaluations represented a small portion of the thousands of students he had taught over the years."All such records are in their hands right now, so they can say whatever they want," he said of administrators. He added that his name had appeared in a number of publications since 2008, including two articles that are readily available online. "They are lying," he said.There is little dispute that Professor Xia's classroom style could be polarizing. Most of the 30 anonymous reviews posted on a popular teacher evaluation Web site, Pinglaoshi, or Judge the Teacher, were positive. "He's a good professor with a conscience," said one comment posted in 2007. "He's brave and knowledgeable," read another.But in recent days, a number of former students have come forward, most of them anonymously, to defend the university's refusal to renew his contract. Valentina Luo, a former student who attended his class on principles of economics, said Professor Xia had spent more time boasting about his time as a visiting scholar in the United States than lecturing about the fundamentals of finance and market economics."I don't remember much of his political rants against the government, but he gives the impression that he doesn't prepare for his classes," said Ms. Luo, who posted her criticisms online. "He just reads the textbook word by word."Another student who took the same class agreed. "There are many Peking University teachers who are also outspoken about their political views, but Xia is one of those that students don't really like," said the student, who asked that only his surname, Sun, be used.Such criticisms, coupled with Peking University's strenuous defense of its decision to let him go, are unlikely to quell the widespread perception that politics played a role in his termination. Given the Communist Party's control over the country's universities and a continuing crackdown on dissent — including an ideological campaign against Western-inspired liberalism — Professor Xia's supporters say it is naïve to rule out politics.Thomas Cushman, a sociologist at Wellesley College, which entered into an educational partnership with Peking University this year, said he remained suspicious, noting that the economist was the first professor to be dismissed from his department in more than a decade — a fact confirmed by university officials."There are plenty of people who are bad teachers but who don't get terminated," said Professor Cushman, who helped organize an open letter in support of Professor Xia that drew the signatures of more than 140 faculty members. "What troubles me is that there is no verifiable information about his so-called bad teaching."Although the letter calls on Wellesley to reconsider its arrangement with Peking University, Professor Cushman said he was more focused at the moment on helping Professor Xia. He said an interdisciplinary program he runs, the Freedom Project, plans to offer Professor Xia a two-year fellowship pending final approval from Wellesley administrators."Given how vulnerable Xia is right now, I think the best thing we can do is to follow through on bringing him here," he said.But officials at Peking University say Professor Xia has damaged its image at a time when it is trying to ascend to the ranks of the world's top universities."Beida didn't consider politics when dealing with this issue, but now he is using politics to hijack Beida," said Ms. Sun, the dean, using a common shorthand for the school. "We feel badly hurt."
HONG KONG — Three grass-roots rights advocates face trial in eastern China on Monday, with the main charge against them stemming from a group photograph snapped in the courtyard of an apartment block. That brief gathering will be at the heart of the first courtroom test of how far the government will go to extinguish the New Citizens Movement, which has pressed the Communist Party leadership under Xi Jinping to embrace democratic change.The three residents of Xinyu City in Jiangxi Province — Liu Ping, Wei Zhongping, and Li Sihua — face charges of illegal assembly for gathering below Ms. Liu's second-floor home in April with other friends to take a photograph to make a political point, said Ms. Liu's daughter, Liao Minyue, and lawyer, Zhang Xuezhong. The group displayed signs urging the release of detained protesters and the disclosure of officials' wealth, and released the picture on the Internet. The police detained the three about a week after the photograph was taken."If that counts as an illegal assembly, then it would also be an illegal assembly for school students to gather for a graduating photo," said Mr. Zhang, the defense lawyer, in a telephone interview from Shanghai.The previously little-known trio has attracted widespread attention as the first detainees associated with the New Citizens Movement to face trial since the government started to round up supporters in March. The movement is a loose network of legal advocates, human rights campaigners and disgruntled citizens that began to coalesce into a more coordinated effort last year. It has demanded greater political rights, equal educational rights for all, and the disclosure of officials' assets at a time when the comfortable lives of some officials have become a source of intense public resentment."I'm personally convinced that, in fact, this is part of a coordinated nationwide campaign to attack and break up the New Citizens Movement," Mr. Zhang said of the trial."They hope to use this Jiangxi case as an opening," said Mr. Zhang, a law lecturer who was suspended from teaching after he publicly called for democratic constitutional reforms. "They want to test the public reaction, and also test how, internally, the legal system responds."The Chinese police have detained, and in some cases formally arrested, 18 participants in and supporters of the New Citizens Movement, according to Human Rights Watch. The most prominent are Xu Zhiyong, a legal advocate who was detained by the police in Beijing in July, and Wang Gongquan, a wealthy investor detained in Beijing in September. Both men are being held on charges of assembling a crowd to disrupt public order, and both have been formally arrested, making it likely they will be indicted. The police have not specified the basis of those charges"Liu Ping, Wei Zhongping, Li Sihua — they were supporters and participants in the New Citizens Movement, and played a major role in attracting attention in their area," said Mr. Zhang, the lawyer. When police interrogated them, he said, many of the questions were about Mr. Xu and the movement.As well as the illegal gathering accusation, Ms. Liu and Mr. Wei face two other charges: "assembling a crowd to disturb the public order" and "using a cult organization to undermine the law," said their lawyers.The public order allegation is based on the two handing out leaflets for independent candidates for a local People's Congress election in 2011, and the cult allegation is based on comments that the two sent on an online messaging service in 2012, calling on friends to pay attention to the trial of a follower of Falun Gong, a banned spiritual group. Lawyers for all three defendants said they intended to plead not guilty to all the charges.The trial suggests how worried the Chinese Communist Party leadership is about potential challenges to its hold on power, even from citizens who have seized on the leadership's own promises of less corruption, greater candor and greater respect for the law, said several rights lawyers and advocates. What particularly worries the government, they said, is how some disgruntled ordinary citizens, like Ms. Liu, have increasingly turned personal grievances into political demands.A 48-year-old former steel mill worker who was laid off, Ms. Liu embodies that transformation. Her activism started about eight years ago when she began petitioning the government for redress after the police beat her uncle, according to her daughter, Ms. Liao. Over years of complaining, however, Ms. Liu became drawn to broader demands. She unsuccessfully tried to stand as an independent candidate in elections for a local party-controlled assembly in 2011, and last year joined the emerging New Citizens Movement.Her fellow defendants, Mr. Wei and Mr. Li, also started off as petitioners with specific grievances and became drawn into political activism, said their relatives."The New Citizen Movement went beyond individual cases to focus on broader demands about civil and political rights," said Maya Wang, a researcher in Hong Kong for Human Rights Watch. "It's O.K. for citizens to report injustices, but when you start organizing and issuing petitions, that becomes sensitive."Chinese courts come under Communist Party control, and there is little likelihood of the trio's escaping conviction and prison sentences, especially given the political environment.Since Mr. Xi became Communist Party leader in November, he has demanded that officials strengthen and defend the ideological sinews of party rule, and he also endorsed a directive identifying human rights activists and advocates of civil society as threats to the party. This month, a commentary in a party journal, Red Flag Manuscripts, amplified that warning, and accused hostile Western governments of fomenting subversion inside China by sponsoring dissidents.The charge of illegal gathering against the trio of activists could bring a prison sentence of up to five years. The other charges could also each bring several years in prison.But Mr. Zhang, the lawyer for Ms. Liu, saw some hope that the Yushui District People's Court in Xinyu might reject the charge of illegal assembly. There were no police officers present at the photo shoot, so there was no order to disperse, one of the elements used to define the crime, said Mr. Zhang. The court's delays in setting a trial date, and the shifting accusations against the defendants, suggested that some officials might be uneasy about prosecuting on the assembly charge, he said.
This pattern of nonpayment was repeated for expensive works sold across mainland China in 2011.In the same auction session, buyers failed to fully pay for nearly half of the most expensive works sold.But two years after the auction, Qi Baishi's masterpiece is still languishing in a warehouse in Beijing. The winning bidder has refused to pay for the piece since doubts were raised about its authenticity.When the hammer came down at an evening auction during China Guardian's spring sale in May 2011, "Eagle Standing on a Pine Tree," a 1946 ink painting by Qi Baishi, one of China's 20th-century masters, had drawn a startling price: $65.4 million. No Chinese painting had ever fetched so much at auction, and, by the end of the year, the sale appeared to have global implications, helping China surpass the United States as the world's biggest art and auction market.SOURCE: China Association of Auctioneers (Payment status as of April 15, 2012); "Eagle Standing on a Pine Tree" via Agence France-Presse, other images via ArtronIn fact, Zhang Daqian, a 20th-century artist known for his landscapes, is one of several Chinese painters who have joined Picasso and Warhol as the best-selling artists in the world even though their names hardly register outside collecting circles."A majority of Chinese people do not trust the Chinese stock market," said Melanie Ouyang Lum, a consultant on Chinese art. "The housing boom has slowed tremendously. A lot of people are looking to art for investment."The Chinese auction industry and the government have taken notice, and say they are looking to clean up the abuses and stem further damage to consumer confidence, especially since the art market is actually perceived by many as one of the safer places to invest.Concern about fraud and a cooling economy seem to have tempered enthusiasm in the Chinese art market. After peaking in 2011, reported revenues dropped off 24 percent last year, according to Arts Economics, a research company that studies the international market. This year is expected to be modestly better than 2012."There's always been forgers on the market, but it's a matter of proportion," said Robert D. Mowry, a former curator of Asian art at Harvard who is now a consultant for Christie's.Even more embarrassing was the government's decision last July to close a private museum in Hebei because of suspicions that nearly everything in it — all 40,000 artifacts, including a Tang dynasty porcelain vase — were fake.For years, much of the forgery went unnoticed as works passed from buyer to buyer, their prices spiraling up. But, increasingly, high-profile scandals are exposing the extent of the fakery and sowing doubts about the larger market. In one case, three years ago, an oil painting attributed to the 20th-century artist Xu Beihong, which sold at auction for more than $10 million, turned out to have been produced 30 years after the artist's death by a student during a class exercise at one of China's leading arts academies."This is the challenge right now," said Wang Yannan, the president and director of China Guardian, the nation's second-biggest auction house. "In the mind of every Chinese, the first question is whether it's fake."This very reverence for the cultural past is now contributing greatly to the surge in forgeries. Artists here are trained to imitate the old Chinese masters, and they routinely produce high-quality copies of paintings and other works, such as ceramics and jade artifacts. That tradition has intersected with the newly lucrative art market, in which reproductions that so many have the skills to create are often offered as the real thing. It would be hard to create a more fertile environment for the proliferation of fakes.While the luxury-buying habits in China often mimic those in the West, the demand for art reflects uniquely Chinese tastes. While the rest of the world bids up Pollocks and Rothkos, Chinese buyers typically pursue traditional Chinese pieces, some by 15th-century masters, and others by modern artists, like Zhang Daqian, one of many who have chosen to work in that old style.In fact, few areas of business offer as revealing a view of this socialist society's lurch toward capitalism as the art market. Like many luxury businesses in China, the explosion of buyers for art here has been fueled by the pent-up consumerism of the newly rich. The demand is so great that last year, in a country that barely had an art market two decades ago, reported auction revenues were up 900 percent over 2003 — to $8.9 billion. (The United States auction market for 2012 was $8.1 billion.)Fraud is certainly no stranger to the international art world, but experts warn that the market here is particularly vulnerable because, like many industries in China, it has expanded too fast for regulators to keep pace.Just as problematic, the market is flooded with forgeries, often mass-produced, and has become a breeding ground for corruption, as business executives curry favor with officials by bribing them with art.Indeed, even as the art world marvels at China's booming market, a six-month review by The New York Times found that many of the sales — transactions reported to have produced as much as a third of the country's auction revenue in recent years — did not actually take place."The market is in a very dubious stage," said Alexander Zacke, an expert in Asian art who runs Auctionata, an international online auction house. "No one will take results in mainland China very seriously."Source: Artprice.com , based on fine art sales at 4,500 auction houses worldwide; Bacon, Basquiat, Chagall, de Kooning, Fontana, Giacometti, Hirst, Klein, Léger, Matisse, Picasso, Rothko and Warhol are represented by the Artists Rights Society.Now Sotheby's has a joint venture with a state-run company, and Christie's won a license this year to become the first international auction house to operate independently in China — developments that may serve to foster competition and higher standards in the market. Ms. Zhang, the head of the auction association, said bringing in the Western auction houses was like putting a crocodile in a pond.The interest in addressing the market's weaknesses may have played a role in China's recent decision to loosen longstanding rules that restrict Western auction houses from access to the Chinese market.Even when you factor in faulty revenue reporting, the rise in art buying over the past decade has been meteoric, with Chinese banks, state-owned companies and business tycoons continuing to invest in the boom. Art has become a kind of currency, and collecting is so popular in China now that auctions are often mobbed. On Chinese television, more than 20 programs offer tips on collecting and on identifying cultural relics, and late-night infomercials promise quick riches to viewers who purchase a $2,500 collection of works by former students of renowned masters. Purchase today, the ad declares, and you can immediately secure a profit of $100,000. With so much at stake, Chinese art dealers have rushed to Europe and America to buy back Chinese relics. There has also been a rash of museum thefts involving Chinese antiquities. And a black market in artifacts has emerged, with so-called tomb raiders digging up buried treasures that they can sell.Other explanations for the wave of defaults and late payments, experts say, include instances in which bidders got buyer's remorse or just bid up a price to increase the value of works by a particular artist they collect."It has something to do with the general environment in China," said Zhang Yanhua, the association chairwoman. "As you know, China is still trying to build the rule of law in this country."The forgery problem helps account for the soaring number of payment defaults. In the past three years, a study of sales at mainland auction houses by the China Association of Auctioneers found that about half the sales of artworks worth more than $1.5 million — a major portion of the market — were not completed because the buyer failed to pay what was owed. (For major auction houses in the United States, the default rate for works of the same value is negligible, several experts said.)China has identified culture as a core area for economic growth, and a vibrant art market as a useful tool of soft power, promoting a view of Chinese society as a center of aesthetics and beauty and deflecting the international focus from political and human rights issues. The Chinese are handicapped in cleaning up the art market, though, by a weakness in their laws, which absolve auction houses of any responsibility if a work turns out to be fake.Less than a decade ago, the Chinese art market was still quite sleepy, a legacy of the Cultural Revolution when luxury items were viewed as bourgeois and the Red Guards raided homes, seizing and destroying art.Ma Weidu, a major collector based in Beijing, recounted how easy it still was in the 1980s to secure small artifacts. People gave them to him for nothing, he said, or traded them for a few cigarettes. Occasionally, he would pay a small fee."They'd say: 'Take it all. All I want is a washing machine,'" he recalled.The auctioning of art remained rare until the early 1990s, when the government lifted restrictions on the sale of cultural relics. Still, the art market did not begin to take off until 2004, fueled by rising incomes.Now there are more than 350 Chinese auction houses that deal in fine arts. The two largest — Poly International Auction company, and China Guardian — are billion-dollar enterprises with offices in several cities, including Tokyo and New York, and close ties to the country's ruling elite.But as the market has grown, so has its dark underbelly. Price manipulation is rampant, analysts say, as collectors and investors, perhaps an art investment fund with large holdings in a particular artist, bid up a work to boost the value of their entire inventory. Sometimes, experts say, auction houses themselves throw in fake bids. The Chinese have a name for the price-boosting process. They call it "stir frying."While some collectors care deeply about their art, even exhibiting it in their own elaborate private museums, many buyers are primarily investors looking to flip a work for profit, experts say. Objects are sold and resold. One painting by Qi Baishi, "Fish and Shrimp," sold four times at auction in the 10 years ending last December, the price climbing to $794,000 from $30,000 in 2002, before trailing off last year to $552,000.Resale opportunities are a priority for many buyers. At an auction in Beijing last month, four men from Guangzhou bought several paintings worth tens of thousands of dollars. "Most people you see here, we don't have a real job, we are traders," said one of the men, in a white bomber jacket. "We buy them and resell them to educated, wealthy people."Analysts say that flipping artwork contributes to the market's nonpayment problem. Before an auction, a buyer might find a collector interested in a piece and bid successfully for it, but refuse to pay if the deal with the collector falls through.And then there are the payment problems that arise because China's art market is, economically speaking, so young, and its rich are so recently minted."There is still a big difference between East and West in understanding whether raising a paddle at an auction is actually a binding contract or not," said Philip Tinari, director of the Ullens Center for Contemporary Art in Beijing. "Some young starlet buys a bunch of paintings at an auction, walks out and says, 'Nos. 13, 11, 7, 6, 5 those are the ones I don't want.' It happens all the time."Auction houses have typically papered over the nonpayments, reporting aborted transactions as true sales, even posting record prices and seldom correcting the record. This has misleadingly burnished their revenues, making the market seem hotter and propping up prices, industry experts said.The practice has so alarmed the Chinese authorities, who worry that it could undermine the credibility of the market, that the auction association and state bodies like the ministries of commerce and culture stepped in a few years ago.As part of a larger program of reforms, the association now collects nonpayment data and publishes its findings in an effort to expose malefactors. It not only encourages auction houses to blacklist buyers with a history of not paying, but also recommends that the houses require steep deposits from potential bidders. The government has canceled or suspended the licenses of 150 auction houses between 2008 and 2011 for a variety of problems, including the sale of fake items.Even with the fraud and fakery, many collectors and investors say there is too much excitement and profit in the market to warrant dropping out, especially when new money keeps showing up at auctions, ready to buy."In the newspapers, there are always stories of someone buying something for a dollar and selling it for a million," said Rui Zhang, who runs the art market and management programs at Tsinghua University in Beijing. But Jiang Yinfeng, an artist, critic and curator, said that the people who suffer in such an overheated market are often those with little experience in such matters. "Some of my friends use their houses as collateral to buy art items," he said. "Some of them take high-interest loans."One engine driving the Chinese art market has been the culture of gift-giving, which prompts provincial officials to arrive en masse in Beijing during the Mid-Autumn Festival in September, further clogging the congested streets as they ferry presents of art, alcohol and other items to senior government officials.But art is also used in more elaborate bribery schemes. In some cases, an official will receive a work of art with instructions to put it up for auction; a businessman will use it as the currency for a bribe, purchasing the art at an inflated price and giving the official a tidy profit."Unlike cash, the value is less obvious," said Zhang Pingjie, a curator at the Himalayas Art Museum in Shanghai.Whether the given work is real often doesn't matter, experts say, because the buyer intends to spend lavishly anyway. And were the scheme to be discovered, the minimal value of a fake would mean a lesser punishment.The bribery of public officials with art is so widespread that the Chinese have coined a term to describe this kind of aesthetic corruption.They call it "yahui" or "elegant bribery."One such bribery case occurred several years ago when the city of Chongqing cracked down on the gangsters who controlled its buses, taxis and gambling parlors.In 2009, the authorities detained the man who had protected the criminals: the city's own deputy police chief, Wen Qiang.Searches of Mr. Wen's properties turned up watches, wine and other items typical of graft around the world, including $3 million in cash wrapped in oil paper and submerged in a fish pond.But investigators also discovered a surprisingly expansive and expensive collection of art at Mr. Wen's mountainside villa and another home he kept at the Crabapple Moon Residences. He had been given, they said, more than 100 works, including fine ivory sculptures and a Buddha head carved from stone. Valuable calligraphy scrolls were stored in a ceramic container. A painting attributed to Zhang Daqian rested on a bookshelf.Mr. Wen was executed for his crimes the next year."Who is in the auction market?" asked Li Yanjun, an art expert and authenticator at Beijing Oriental University."Government officials," he said. "They hide and have people bid for them, or buy up their works."
BEIJING — Five people were killed and 38 were injured on Monday when a speeding vehicle careered along a crowded sidewalk in the ceremonial heart of the Chinese capital and burst into flames at the entrance to the Forbidden City, billowing black smoke that obscured the iconic portrait of Mao Zedong.Three of the dead were the driver and the two passengers riding in the car, and the other two were pedestrians — a Filipino woman and a man from Guangdong Province in southern China — according to the authorities. They quickly sealed the area around Tiananmen Square and the Forbidden City, which is normally packed with thousands of tourists.Late Monday night, the police sent a notice to hotels in Beijing seeking information about "suspicious guests" and naming two suspects from Xinjiang, the troubled region in China's far west whose ethnic Uighur population has become increasingly disenchanted with Chinese policies.Hypersensitive to any unscripted news happening in the center of Beijing, the government had sought earlier to restrict coverage of the episode and promptly deleted witness photographs and related postings on social media. A Foreign Ministry spokeswoman declined to respond to a question about whether the episode had been a terrorist attack.But witness accounts suggested the driver had deliberately steered the vehicle more than 400 yards along the sidewalk and had rammed into a marble railing of the Jinshui Bridge, built to traverse the moat that encircles the vast imperial residence that served generations of Chinese rulers."This was not some driver who took a wrong turn and accidentally ended up on the sidewalk," one witness said.Southern Metropolis Daily, a newspaper based in Guangdong, quoted a Filipino tourist as saying the driver had repeatedly honked the car's horn, suggesting an attempt to alert pedestrians.Ringed by steel barriers, heavily policed by plainclothes officers and watched over by countless security cameras, the entrances to the Forbidden City and the adjoining Tiananmen Square have long been a magnet for political protest, most notably the 1989 student demonstrations that were crushed by force.In 2011, a man protesting the unfavorable outcome of a legal grievance set fire to himself near the Jinshui Bridge. Two years earlier, a man set fire to himself near the same spot. In 2001, two people died and three others were injured after they set fire to themselves in the square, although details of that episode remain murky.In 2009, three people set themselves and their car on fire at Wangfujing, a shopping street just east of the square, in what has been described as a protest against illegal land seizures.In recent years, the police have introduced increasingly tight security around Tiananmen Square that includes searching the belongings of visitors and questioning those they believe fit the description of petitioners, the aggrieved citizens who flock to the capital in what is often a futile quest for justice. Fire extinguishers can be seen arranged at lampposts across the square.The episode on Monday occurred shortly after noon, when the sport utility vehicle made a sharp turn onto the sidewalk alongside Chang'an Avenue and raced toward the southern entrance to the Forbidden City. One man who happened upon the area minutes afterward described an eerily quiet scene, with a half-dozen people lying motionless on the pavement."It almost felt like performance art, with people standing around in shock, unsure of what had just happened," said the man, a foreign visitor who declined to give his name.In locking down the area, the police immediately closed a busy subway station, shooed away tourists and detained several foreign journalists, including two reporters for Agence France-Presse, who were forced to delete images from their cameras. Armored vehicles and paramilitary police officers swarmed the area, and bomb-sniffing dogs roamed a broader zone that included Zhongnanhai, the walled compound that houses the Chinese leadership, and the Great Hall of the People, home to the legislature. Witnesses said municipal workers had arrived quickly with long-handled brushes to wash away the pools of blood.Photographs posted online showing a vehicle engulfed in flames were quickly deleted; one subsequent photograph showed the police erecting green panels of fabric in an effort to conceal the charred wreck from passing traffic.The police notice issued to Beijing hotels Monday night suggested that the authorities were looking for additional cars that may have been involved in the episode. It asked for help identifying suspicious guests and "illegal vehicles" that might have been spotted as early as Oct. 1 , and listed four license plate numbers with the regional prefix for Xinjiang.For hours after the episode, crowds of disappointed tourists milled outside police barriers waiting for the street to reopen. When asked why the sidewalk was closed, one police officer said, "It's a special kind of activity, but we don't know what kind."Then he added: "Don't worry. It will be over tomorrow."
HONG KONG — A court in eastern China adjourned the trial of three human rights activists on Monday after their lawyers unsuccessfully challenged the authority of the judges to hear the case, according to two of the lawyers and a daughter of one of the defendants.The trial of the three activists — Liu Ping, Wei Zhongping and Li Sihua — has drawn attention as a gauge of how far the Chinese Communist Party will go to stamp out the nationwide New Citizens Movement, which the three defendants supported. The hearing on Monday, conducted in Xinyu City in Jiangxi Province, attracted supporters of the movement as well as three Western diplomats, including one from the United States.The New Citizens Movement is a loosely organized group that has sought to expand legal rights and encourage civic engagement in China by demanding disclosure of officials' wealth and equal education for all children, and by holding dinner gatherings for like-minded people. Since March, the government has detained and in some cases formally arrested 18 people who are part of the movement, according to Human Rights Watch.The three movement members in Xinyu City are the first to be put on trial. They are charged with illegal assembly, based on a gathering they attended with some friends in April where a group photograph was taken. The photo, later posted on the Internet, shows them holding placards urging the release of detained protesters and the disclosure of officials' wealth. In court on Monday, all three defendants rejected the charges, as well as separate allegations lodged against Ms. Liu and Mr. Wei.Through an acrimonious day in court, the defense lawyers tried without success to challenge the fitness of the three judges to hear the case, the fitness of the prosecutor to handle the case, and the legal basis for detaining the defendants, said Zhang Xuezhong, a lawyer for Ms. Liu. Late in the afternoon, the three defendants said they would dismiss their lawyers, forcing the court to adjourn the hearing, according to Mr. Zhang and Pang Kun, a lawyer for Mr. Wei.The step was a tactical one by the defendants, to show their lack of confidence in the fairness of the hearing, and not an indication that they were dissatisfied with their lawyers, said Ms. Liu's daughter, Liao Minyue, who attended the hearing."When the lawyers raised their hands to make points, the presiding judge ignored them," Ms. Liao said in a telephone interview from Xinyu City. "The defendants found that their lawyers weren't allowed to speak and effectively defend them, so the lawyers agreed with this step."Mr. Zhang and Mr. Pang said the trial was likely to resume after a delay of at least 15 days, and that the defendants could choose to reappoint the same lawyers.Raphael Droszewski, a first secretary of the European Union diplomatic delegation to China, said that he traveled to Xinyu City from Beijing, along with diplomats from the American and Canadian Embassies, in the hope of observing the hearing, but that they were refused entry to the courtroom on Monday.
BEIJING — The Chinese authorities investigating a deadly episode near Tiananmen Square appeared Tuesday to focus on suspects from Xinjiang, the region in China's far west that has been the scene of increasingly violent resistance to Beijing's hard-line policies.Across the capital, officials beefed up security at pivotal intersections, subway stations and tourist sites on Tuesday, but they remained conspicuously silent about the episode, which many Chinese believe was a deliberate attack on the political and symbolic heart of the nation.Five people were killed and 38 were injured on Monday when a sport utility vehicle plowed through a crowd of pedestrians and burst into flames at the foot of one of the nation's most hallowed monuments, Tiananmen Gate. The dead included all three occupants of the vehicle.Government censors on Tuesday continued to vigorously delete photographs and commentary on social media, reflecting the Communist Party's unease about the risk that it could worsen relations between China's ethnic Han majority and the Muslim, Turkic-speaking Uighur minority, which is concentrated in Xinjiang. Many Uighurs complain about religious restrictions and the flood of Han migrants that has drastically shifted the demography of the region.By Tuesday morning, all evidence of the mayhem caused by the vehicle, which hurtled more than 400 yards along a sidewalk thronged with tourists, had been cleared away. Some witnesses said the driver had warned pedestrians by honking as the car sped forward. Reuters quoted a witness who said the vehicle had been trailing a white banner with black letters.The vehicle exploded near a row of marble bridges that once provided access to the former imperial residence known as the Forbidden City. But there was no sign of that around the bridges Tuesday, suggesting that the explosion had been caused by a combustible substance ignited by the vehicle's occupants after it came to a stop.Indications that investigators were focusing on Uighurs emerged from a police notice sent to Beijing hotels on Monday night, warning them to be on the lookout for two ethnic Uighurs. The notice, which was posted online, included the names and home counties of two suspects. One suspect was said to be from Shanshan County, the scene last summer of a violent clash between protesters and the police that left dozens dead. The other was said to be from Pishan County, near the jade-trading city Hotan, where seven people, including two women, were killed during a 2011 clash between residents and the police.The South China Morning Post, citing several hotels in Beijing, said the authorities were seeking information about five license plates from Xinjiang and as many as eight people, all but one with Uighur names.The Beijing Public Security Bureau did not respond to telephone calls or to a faxed request for comment.An official who answered the phone on Tuesday at a police station house in Pishan said one suspect, Yusupu Aihemaiti, had been living on a farm affiliated with the People's Liberation Army but left in September. Pressed for further details, the officer hung up.A police official in Shanshan County, the home of the second named suspect, Yusupu Wumaierniyazi, declined to discuss the case.If the Tiananmen Square episode proves to be the work of Uighur assailants, it will suggest that the region's seething discontent can no longer be confined to China's far-off frontier, a vast expanse rich in oil and gas that borders Pakistan, Afghanistan and several Central Asian countries. Yang Shu, a professor who heads the Institute for Central Asian Studies at Lanzhou University, said he thought the event had the hallmarks of a suicide attack.He said it was only a matter of time before the violence that plagued the region seeped into the Chinese heartland. "There is a spillover effect from these terrorist acts that extends beyond Xinjiang," he said. "This should be a warning for authorities that the sphere of their activities is expanding."But Ilham Tohti, a Uighur scholar in Beijing, warned against drawing conclusions about the identity and motives of those responsible for Monday's attack. He said the 20 million Uighurs living in China already faced widespread discrimination and unwritten restrictions that limited employment opportunities and their ability to travel abroad.Acts of violence by petitioners and other disgruntled Han are not uncommon in China, he said, noting that the public often views such behavior as misguided outbursts of desperation, not acts of terrorism, and that the government finds them easier to control. "There is already tremendous hatred between the Han and Uighurs, so calling these people terrorists before all the facts are established is only going to make things worse," Mr. Tohti said.The Beijing episode follows several months of escalating violence in Xinjiang that has taken more than 100 lives, most of them in the heavily Uighur south, a thinly populated expanse of desert flecked with ancient, largely poor oasis towns.Much of the bloodshed last summer occurred during protests that turned violent. Exile groups, for example, say the June clash in Lukqun, a township in Shanshan County, was incited by public discontent over religious restrictions that limit public prayer or discourage women from wearing head scarves. The authorities, however, described the violence as a "terrorist attack" and last month sentenced to death three Uighur men involved in the episode, according to the state news media.
HONG KONG — Nearly a year after the Japanese began to hope that their economy could turn around under new leadership, a sense of realism is replacing the euphoria.Economists and investors have grasped just how difficult it will be for Prime Minister Shinzo Abe to sustain the growth of the last few months. Nowhere is that sentiment more evident than the Japanese stock market. The Nikkei 225 index is now nearly 40 percent above where it started the year, but the gains during the last four months have been slight — just 3.4 percent.The economic recovery Mr. Abe engineered during the last year has been remarkable given the decades Japan in which languished. Buoyed by a big pickup in public works spending and a Bank of Japan policy of flooding the economy with low-interest money, growth has accelerated markedly. Deflation, the country's biggest economic problem, seems to have disappeared.The Japanese central bank said on Thursday that it now expected the economy to expand 1.5 percent in the year starting next April, up from a previous forecast of 1.3 percent.The yen, whose persistent strength weighed on Japan's important export sector for years, has fallen, making Japanese goods more competitive. That has helped corporate earnings recover, too.For many ordinary Japanese and small businesses, however, the benefits so far are less tangible. "There is no Abenomics effect at all here," Wakana Otake, the owner of a shop that sells ties in the Ginza shopping district of Tokyo, said Thursday. "We heard luxury items sell well in department stores and so on," but her shop had seen no benefit so far, she said. "It's actually worse than last year, and last year was worse than the previous year."Economists say some of the hardest work remains. Japan's leaders still have not taken on the far-reaching structural changes to make the country's businesses more competitive. The economists worry that without reform, Japan could slide back into the deflation mode that had dogged it for more than a decade.Nicknamed the "third arrow" of Mr. Abe's economic policy, these include efforts to make the labor market more flexible, improve productivity in the service sector and bring more women into the work force. Under a growth strategy laid out in June, Mr. Abe also set the goal of creating special economic zones that would relax some regulation and attract foreign investors.Many of the plans laid out in June, however, lack detail and risk being watered down, analysts said. Similarly, plans to lower corporate taxes — a move seen as crucial to bolstering Japan's competitiveness and encouraging more foreign companies to bring operations to the country — will not be completed until December."There is a sense that the series of strong announcements earlier has been replaced by mere holding statements," said Gary Dugan, chief investment officer for Asia and the Middle East for the wealth management company Coutts.The third arrow of the recovery plans seems to be "veering off target," he said. "We have scaled back our optimism on Japanese equities until there are clearer signs that measures to help the economy are being brought back on track."Izumi Devalier, Japan economist at HSBC, said, "The third arrow has not even been fired yet." She said, "Investors were hoping for really game-changing chances. But that's not how politics works in Japan. You need to build a consensus between cabinet and the bureaucracy."The likelihood now, she said, is that "there is not going to be a lot of progress on the third arrow in the next few months." Another problem is that the economic improvement of the last year has yet to directly affect many of Japan's households. Although the job market is tight and unemployment is low, companies have so far largely resisted making large investments or raising salaries.Government data released on Thursday underlined this point. Workers' total earnings edged up just 0.1 percent in September, compared with a year earlier, and summer bonus payments, an important indicator of whether companies are willing to pay more, rose just 0.3 percent.Consumer prices rose 0.7 percent in September, compared with a year earlier. That means real wages actually fell, Masamichi Adachi, an economist at JPMorgan in Tokyo, said in a research note. "While there is anecdotal information that labor shortages are pushing up the wages of certain types of workers" including construction-related workers and part-timers, he wrote, "average wages remained weak."And even though the wages of large companies are likely to increase in the next fiscal year along with profits, "it looks difficult to see a material rise in the average wages of all workers in the near future."
HONG KONG — The gradual recovery in the United States, Europe and China filtered through to much of the rest of Asia in October, data released Friday showed, lifting manufacturing activity and easing concerns about the region's flagging growth.Emerging Asia's economic expansion, red hot in the years immediately after the financial crisis, has slowed in the past few years amid persistently weak demand from the West and a sharp deceleration in China and India, two of the region's largest economies. Growth in the region slowed from 9.1 percent in 2010 to about 6 percent this year, according to estimates from the Asian Development Bank.But recent numbers show a more optimistic picture. In South Korea, for example, trade data showed October exports climbed 7.3 percent, compared with those of a year earlier, far more than expected, reflecting better demand from the rest of the world."It's looking reasonably solid," said Klaus Baader, a regional economist at Société Générale in Hong Kong, adding that South Korea is the first country in the region each month to report on its trade performance and that its export data serves as a bellwether for global demand. "It reflects the pickup we've seen in China during the third quarter — but it also reflects what is going on in the rest of the world, including the better tone in Europe, which has at least left recession now."Surveys of purchasing managers in manufacturing also showed that sector had regained some momentum.The indexes, compiled by the research firm Markit and published by HSBC, rose to their highest levels in several months in China, Taiwan, Indonesia and South Korea. In the case of Taiwan, the reading jumped a full point, to 53.0, its highest level since March 2012. And in China, a similar index published by the Chinese statistics bureau climbed to 51.4 in October, an 18-month high. The exception was India, where the index came in at 49.6, reflecting that country's slowing growth. Readings above 50 represent expansion.At the same time, the picture in Japan has improved significantly in the past few months, as a package of aggressive stimulus measures implemented by the government of Prime Minister Shinzo Abe has injected vigor into an economy that had been languishing for years."Japan has ceased to be a drag on the rest of Asia," Mr. Baader said. "You have to remember, Japan is still the world's third-largest economy, so if it is back in the ballgame, it makes a significant difference to the rest of the world — and especially for Asia."The improved global backdrop has created demand in disparate areas, including air transport, with the International Air Transport Association saying on Thursday that global demand for passenger traffic had risen 5.5 percent in September from a year earlier. Asia-Pacific carriers reported an increase of 8.5 percent.Many corporate giants in the region have reported better earnings in recent days.The South Korean carmaker Hyundai Motor, for example, reported a 4 percent profit improvement for the quarter that ended in September, and Samsung Electronics' quarterly profits jumped 25 percent."It does look like the developed world environment is a bit more comfortable than it has been for the past couple of years," said Richard Jerram, chief economist at Bank of Singapore. "This is helping to provide an offset to the fact that domestically driven growth has been flagging a little bit."Mr. Jerram cautioned that the slight pickup in the October purchasing managers indexes did not necessarily herald a sustained or sharp reacceleration in the region.Growth in many of Asia's developing economies is closely tied to that of China, whose expansion has slowed from more than 10 percent before the global financial crisis to about 7.5 percent this year as the authorities have sought to put the economy on a more sustainable and balanced footing. Few analysts think the Chinese economy will manage more than 8 percent growth next year, and some believe it could sag below 7 percent.Faster growth in Japan could help increase demand from that country, but the weaker yen also means Japanese manufacturers have become more competitive, relative to their foreign rivals.And the Federal Reserve will probably pare back its support of the U.S. economy next year — a move that is likely to cause inflows of Western cash into emerging Asian economies to drop off.Rob Subbaraman, chief economist for Asia outside Japan at Nomura in Singapore, said that would be painful in Asia, which has become "addicted" to the easy money and foreign capital of the past few years.Although he expected exports from Asia to improve next year as Japan and the United States picked up steam, an ailing Europe and slower growth in China meant that exports would remain "subdued," he said."It would be rash to suddenly get bulled-up on Asia," Mr. Subbaraman said. "Investors will become increasingly more discerning, differentiating between different countries' economic fundamentals. It has become increasingly hard to generalize across the region."
China's hospitals are a battleground — not just for the war on illness but also for the one between physicians and their patients.If that statement seems extreme, consider these data points from state-run medical organizations:Medical staff are attacked by patients or their relatives at a rate of once every two weeks per hospital, according to the China Hospital Association, Chinese news agencies reported.  In the last two weeks there have been at least six serious incidents, including in Guangdong Province on Oct. 21, when a Dr. Xiong Xuming was left with a damaged eye and ruptured spleen after being beaten up by a patient's relatives for refusing to allow them into the intensive care unit, and in Zhejiang Province on Oct. 25, when Dr. Wang Yunjie was stabbed to death by a patient unhappy with his treatment.Since 2002, attacks have risen by an average of nearly 23 percent a year, the China Hospital Management Society said in a paper published in December in Chinese Community Doctors, a medical journal.On Thursday, Prime Minister Li Keqiang addressed the issue, in a sign that the Chinese government is seriously concerned by the mounting violence.Mr. Li was "paying utmost attention" to the situation and had written "important comments" requesting all government departments to take seriously the problem of conflict between doctors and patients, according to a post on the government's official Tencent Weibo, or microblog, account. He had ordered government departments to take measures to "protect medical order," it said.The reasons for the problems in China's health care system are, by now, well known: a widespread lack of trust in doctors and hospital administrators, the high cost of care, long waiting times and short appointments — and corruption, at every level. A public that lacks basic knowledge about medical problems and outcomes is also a factor, commentators say.But why turn to violence? One reason is illness can bankrupt a family. People who exhaust their savings on care want to see positive results and blame doctors when that's not possible, commentators say.While violent incidents in major cities and well-known hospitals receive the greatest attention, the problem is actually more severe in smaller or local hospitals, said Deng Liqiang, the head of the legal department of the Chinese Medical Doctors Association, in an interview with Yanzhao Metropolitan News, based in Shijiazhuang, the capital of Hebei Province."It's not hard to discover that third-tier hospitals and regional medical centers are the disaster ground for medical conflicts," said Mr. Deng.Underfunding by the government is a major problem, Mr. Deng said."In the late 1980s, the state provided about 60 percent of investment in most public hospitals and then it fell from there," the newspaper quoted him as saying. "After medical reforms, by 2009, they were providing 20 percent, and the remaining 80 percent had to be covered with revenue generated by the hospitals."While the government has made few comments on the substance of the problems in the health care system, experts say another complaint of ordinary Chinese — the concentration of good hospitals in big cities and shortage of medical services in local communities — arises because the state is reluctant to decentralize medical care, fearing the rise of poorly trained medical personnel or outright quacks.After the death of Dr. Wang, the Chinese Medical Doctors Association and three other professional groups issued a statement urging the government to better protect medical staff members."Why are doctors being injured without cease?" it asked. "In order to save lives, doctors and patients should become friends, not enemies," it said.Meanwhile, the central government's National Health and Family Planning Commission has announced emergency measures: Hospitals should assign one security guard per 20 beds, and guards should account for no less than 3 percent of the total medical staff.
WUHAN, China — The two-story employment complex here, like job centers across China, is crowded with educated young people who are trying to figure out their futures in a country where the job market still prizes assembly-line workers willing to labor monotonous hours on backless stools.Among them is Zheng Yilong, who graduated from a university three months ago and refuses to consider a factory job even though his degree is in machinery design. He seeks a desk job instead. Sitting at the employers' booths are much older factory managers like Jin Tao who despair of finding the workers they need."I see the problem mostly as an education mismatch problem," Mr. Jin said. "I'm willing to pay more than 3,000 renminbi a month, which is more than what fresh college graduates are getting." (That's about $500.) "I'm also willing to give training, but the young people now with college degrees just don't want to work in factories."Addressing the mismatch in skills and expectations here and across China is a central issue facing the country's leaders as they gather on Saturday in Beijing. They will be convening for a four-day meeting, the Third Plenum, that is expected to set the tone for Chinese economic and political policy making for the next five years.They will discuss whether to cut consumption taxes, deregulate banking and currency markets, and break up state-owned monopolies that have slowed growth in high-end sectors like telecommunications. The common theme of all the policies: how to create a consumer-led economy and arrest a steep increase in unemployment among young, educated Chinese.China has relied for the past three decades on unrelenting, even manic, construction of ever more factories, bridges, roads and apartment towers. But that is producing chronic overcapacity together with an acute shortage of blue-collar labor.In a speech to trade union officials published on Monday, Prime Minister Li Keqiang said securing enough jobs for citizens was his government's top economic priority."Employment is the biggest thing for well-being," Mr. Li said. "The government must not slacken on this for one moment, and we must constantly focus on this point. For us, stable growth is mainly for the sake of maintaining employment."Similar plenums in 2003 and 2008 produced calls for a shift to a more sustainable economy based on more consumption, more high-end services like finance and more high-tech jobs. The meetings carry their name because they are the third gatherings of the Communist leadership in each five-year term of the party's Central Committee; the first two plenums mainly involve personnel changes.Actual changes in economic policy have been slow despite vows of reform. A big impediment to creating a consumer economy are the low incomes of a generation of China's young people, the country's would-be consumers.Born in an era of ever-rising prosperity and mostly only children because of the government's "one child" policy, young people across China consistently say in interviews that they tend not to share their parents' compulsion for saving for retirement and children's educations. Even so, they seldom have the incomes to consume on the scale of the young Americans and Europeans whom they admire and envy.Mr. Zheng spends almost as much on new clothes each month as he does on food or rent, he says. But as is common for a generation facing high jobless rates — 25 percent or more for recent college graduates — he relies on family and savings to pay for his lifestyle while looking for the right job. That puts a limit on his overall spending. "I want a job for which I was trained, or else my education will be wasted. I don't want to work in a factory," he said.Complicating matters is that many young people are avoiding lower-end service jobs as well as factory jobs. The high school graduation rate in China is rapidly approaching three-quarters of young people, similar to the United States. The number of university graduates in China has nearly quintupled since 2000.
HONG KONG — China's president, Xi Jinping, is about to plunge the country and himself into a risky experiment: an attempt to carry out market-driven economic overhauls while reinforcing the Communist Party's pillars of political and ideological control. This mixed agenda has magnified doubts about whether he can deliver on his promises of transformation.At a meeting, or plenum, of the party's Central Committee that starts Saturday, Mr. Xi will enumerate his plans for an economic overhaul, and state-run news media has promoted the event as a turning point. Mr. Xi and Prime Minister Li Keqiang have indicated that they want to nurture healthy, sustained growth by encouraging more market competition, private business, financial liberalization and individual consumption, leaning away from the state-focused policies of the past decade.Yet, Mr. Xi wants to achieve this economic shift away from the state while strengthening the ruling party, which derives power and wealth from its extensive role in the economy. Many analysts say a fundamental overhaul would require a top-down campaign to change prevailing notions about state control over crucial sectors like finance that Mr. Xi shows no signs of embracing.In fact, for much of this year, he has pursued campaigns to reinforce ideological conformity, tighten censorship of the Internet and mass media, and expunge liberal political ideas."There are inescapable contradictions that Xi Jinping will have to face," said Wu Wei, a former aide to central party leaders who was involved in planning China's market overhauls in the 1980s."In one hand, they're holding up the leftist banner. On the other hand, they say there must be reform," Mr. Wu said. "They don't show any desire to take on political issues, but if you don't take on issues at the political level, most of these economic reform measures will fall apart before they're completed."Mr. Xi and Mr. Li do appear eager to reconfigure China's economy. Their predecessors — the party leader Hu Jintao and his prime minister, Wen Jiabao — made similar pledges a decade ago, but many economists say they failed to make enough headway. Rapid growth has been accompanied by choking pollution, worrisome local government debt, inefficient and corrupt monopolies, and residency and landholding rules that make it hard for rural residents to share in the nation's urban-centered prosperity.Since Deng Xiaoping's time as party leader in the 1980s, the economy has expanded rapidly under a mixture of state sponsorship and market opportunities. But Chinese society is now much more diverse and divided than it was under Mr. Deng. Big bureaucracies, state-owned conglomerates and their patrons in the Communist Party elite derive enormous wealth and influence from a more state-centered system of power, and they tend to be wary of proposals to open protected industries to market competition.If Mr. Xi is serious about remaking the economy, his hard-line political positions will stand in the way of attracting ideas and support, said Minxin Pei, a professor of government at Claremont McKenna College in California who studies Chinese politics."I don't see a political strategy," Mr. Pei said. "If there is one, it is counterproductive. It is to limit the voices of the liberals; it is to limit grass-roots pressure for reform."The Central Committee meeting is likely to endorse broad objectives to loosen government controls over capital flows, interest rates, natural resource prices, the leasing and development of farmland, and the settlement of people from villages in towns and cities, according to several investment analysts' reports and Chinese newspaper articles."It's really fundamentally about the role of the state in a modern economy," said Fred Z. Hu, the chairman of Primavera Capital Group, who has advised the Chinese government. "The Chinese state is still just way too powerful, with too much excessive, unchecked, opaque power occupying the commanding heights."The goals endorsed at the meeting will be made public only after it ends on Tuesday. The government will then begin to formulate policies to accomplish those ideas. The reaction to the meeting will essentially be a referendum on whether officials, investors and citizens believe that Mr. Xi can achieve measured economic liberalization in the coming years.Some think the need for change will overcome political misgivings and resistance.
Two Chinese banks that sold nearly $2 billion worth of shares in Hong Kong stock market listings received lukewarm receptions on Wednesday from investors concerned about how China's financial system would cope with a potential deluge of bad debt that could swamp the country's economy.The Huishang Bank Corporation, a regional banking group based in eastern Anhui Province, priced its initial public offering at the bottom end of the marketed range on Wednesday, raising 9.2 billion Hong Kong dollars, or $1.19 billion, according to two people with knowledge of the deal, who declined to be identified because the information was not yet public. Also on Wednesday, shares of Bank of Chongqing closed down slightly on their first day of trading in Hong Kong after the company raised 4.2 billion dollars in a share sale.Although both banks had boasted net profits that grew at more than 25 percent annually during the last three years, and had reported bad loan levels that were well below the industry average, they were able to list only after pricing their shares at practically no premium to the value of their assets.That implies investors are skeptical about the quality of the loans on the banks' books and their ability to increase future earnings — an extension of a growing wariness toward Chinese banks and a reflection of broad doubts about the health of the country's financial system."There are growing concerns that the government is becoming less tolerant of egregious lending, and that examples may be made among smaller or poorly capitalized lenders," said Ben Simpfendorfer, an economist and the managing director of Silk Road Associates, a financial consulting firm in Hong Kong. "Those fears may play out across the sector more generally."In the five years since the global financial crisis, China's economic resilience has been driven by a doubling of bank lending and the rapid rise of so-called shadow banking.Local governments were responsible for much of that borrowing, as they plowed money into hulking infrastructure or pet projects in an attempt to create jobs and increase gross domestic product.Now, as growth slows and the new leadership in Beijing searches for ways to rein in wasteful investment and reckless lending — topics that analysts say are on the agenda of a crucial Communist Party planning session that begins on Saturday — some analysts and investors see big trouble ahead, especially for the financial institutions that bankrolled local government spending sprees.Because local governments in China are barred from taking loans or issuing bonds directly, and cannot guarantee such debt, they have relied on specially created holding companies called financing vehicles. At the end of June, total bank debt accumulated by these local government financing vehicles amounted to 9.7 trillion renminbi, or $1.6 trillion, equal to about 13 percent of all bank loans in China, according to a report published this week by the credit rating agency Moody's Investors Service.Moody's surveyed nearly 400 local government financing vehicles in June, concluding that only 53 percent of them had enough cash available to meet their debt and interest payment obligations in 2013 without resorting to refinancing or taking on new debt to pay off the old. "The stand-alone financial profiles of many L.G.F.V.'s are very weak," the ratings agency concluded.Ted Osborn, a partner at PricewaterhouseCoopers in Hong Kong who specializes in restructuring bad debt, described the problems at small city commercial banks and regional banks as "the biggest issue that China needs to overcome.""The big banks will of course always be supported by the government, but if you take a look at these smaller banks, they have lent probably half of that financing to the local government vehicles," he said on Tuesday at a financial forum in Hong Kong organized by the law firm Latham & Watkins and the Asia Securities Industry and Financial Markets Association.Mr. Osborn cited a side effect of a wide-ranging anticorruption campaign China is conducting at the behest of President Xi Jinping: The many midtier government officials who have been implicated are often the same people who approved and directed the loans to local government projects that are raising concerns among investors."If these loans are bad and more loans go bad than expected, these smaller banks don't have the capital — and don't have the ability to raise capital — that the larger banks have," he said. "That's where I see a potential crisis growing somewhere down the road."Gaining the ability to raise capital is one factor that has driven China's smaller banks to seek I.P.O.'s. In its filings for its Hong Kong listing, Huishang Bank disclosed that its lending to local government financing vehicles was equal to 10.7 percent of its total assets as of June. For Bank of Chongqing, the figure was 12.9 percent.Because local governments cannot offer guarantees for such borrowing, the loans are often backed by the projects they are intended to fund. Doubts have been raised about the quality of that collateral and whether it can generate the returns needed to pay back the debt.As an example of such a project, Mr. Simpfendorfer of Silk Road Associates cited an international marathon course that was built by officials in Changde, in the central province of Hunan. The course, which partly surrounds a lake, was paid for in part by the proceeds from a bond that was issued by a local government financing vehicle."It is one of those headline-grabbing projects that makes good press," Mr. Simpfendorfer said, but he added that it appeared unlikely to generate much of a financial return.Indeed, even the banks making loans to local government entities have raised doubts over the viability of the projects they are ultimately financing, and whether the debts will be repaid."Many projects sponsored by local government financing vehicles are carried out primarily for public interest purposes and are not necessarily commercially viable, and therefore, the operating cash flows generated from such projects may not be sufficient to cover the principal and interest on the relevant loans," Bank of Chongqing said in a risk disclosure in its I.P.O. filing."The ability of a local government financing vehicle to repay its loans may depend to a significant extent on its ability to receive financing support from the government, which support may not always be available due to the government's liquidity, budgeting priorities and other considerations."
TOKYO — In 2008, Toyota Motor was at giddy heights. Profit soared to a record high. The Japanese company knocked General Motors off its perch as the world's largest automaker.Then an extraordinary run of bad news — the global economic crisis, a huge recall scandal and a devastating earthquake and tsunami — led Toyota's chief executive, Akio Toyoda, to declare the company a step away from irrelevance.After five difficult years, Toyota is picking up where it left off. The automaker said Wednesday that net income for the quarter ended in September jumped 70 percent and that it expected profit to rebound to a near-record high for its full financial year, which runs through next March, thanks to favorable exchange rates and a more streamlined cost structure.Toyota raised its net profit forecast for the full year to 1.67 trillion yen, or $16.9 billion, up from a previous estimate of 1.48 trillion yen. The automaker — again the world's largest by number of vehicles sold — said it expected net sales of 25 trillion yen and operating income of 2.2 trillion yen.If Toyota meets its guidance, it will be almost back to its best year on record, which ran through March 2008, when it earned 1.72 trillion yen in net profit on sales of 26 trillion yen.For the three months through September, net income jumped 70 percent to 438.4 billion yen, Toyota said. Sales grew 16 percent to 6.28 trillion yen. Operating profit grew almost 74 percent to 251.4 billion yen.Nobuyori Kodaira, an executive vice president of Toyota, attributed the strong results to a weaker yen, which increases the value of the automaker's earnings overseas. He also credited the change in fortunes to a concerted undertaking to reduce costs, both within Toyota and at its suppliers."Of course, the weakening of the yen worked in our favor," Mr. Kodaira told reporters in Tokyo. "But the effort we and our partners put into driving down costs also led to this turnaround."Toyota shares rose 0.5 percent to 6,350 yen in Tokyo on Wednesday before the after-close earnings announcement. Shares in the automaker have climbed almost 60 percent this year, outperforming the benchmark Nikkei 225-share index, which has risen about 40 percent.The yen has weakened by 12 percent against the dollar during the same period, thanks to an aggressive monetary easing policy by the Japanese central bank, at the urging of Prime Minister Shinzo Abe's government."The cyclical and intensely competitive nature of the global automotive industry may once again spoil the picture," Clive Wiggins and Kelly Zou, auto analysts at Macquarie, said in an Oct. 21 report on Toyota, "but there are also reasons to remain bullish on returns — namely, a renewed commitment to operating efficiency in the wake of the lean post-global financial crisis years."Still, Mr. Wiggins and Ms. Zou warned that a slowdown in Asia, as well as a weakening market share in the increasingly competitive United States and China, could pose risks to Toyota's return to hefty earnings. So could a loosening in cost discipline now that profits are rolling in, they said. Toyota and other exporters have come under government pressure to raise wages to spread the benefits of a weaker yen.Toyota is outshining its domestic rivals. Last week, Nissan slashed its profit forecast because of slowing demand in emerging markets and mounting recall costs. Honda said that sales were brisk in the United States and Japan but that its profits had been weighed down by heavy investment in new production lines.At the heart of Toyota's cost savings has been a strategy called the new global architecture, led by Mr. Toyoda, a scion of Toyota's founding family. The program involves sharing the same parts across a wider range of models, and adopting standardized parts used by other global automakers. The 2015 Prius gas-electric hybrid is to be the first model fully manufactured under that new initiative.With a return to big profits in sight, Toyota is also on the offensive again in next-generation green technology. The automaker, a pioneer in hybrid cars, said Monday that it would show a prototype hydrogen fuel-cell vehicle at the Tokyo Motor Show later this month. The four-seat sedan has a driving range of 500 kilometers, or about 300 miles, and can be refueled in minutes, according to Toyota. The automaker hopes to sell its first fuel-cell car in 2015.During its difficult years, Toyota raised eyebrows by going all out to winnow even its executives' pay. In the thick of the global economic crisis, Mr. Toyoda's pay came to 116 million yen. In 2013, Mr. Toyoda got a raise to 184 million yen, according to company filings. That's still about a tenth of what is received by Ford's chief executive, Alan R. Mulally, including stock options.The gap led Mr. Toyoda to joke at a talk with Japanese university students in September that Toyota's commitment to cost cutting and efficiency went beyond its cars."I've been called the world's most fuel-efficient chief executive," Mr. Toyoda said.
BEIJING — The Lenovo Group , the world's top supplier of personal computers , said on Thursday that its latest quarterly profit rose 36 percent as sales of smartphones and tablet computers more than doubled.Lenovo earned $220 million, or $2.12 a share, in the three months ended Sept. 30, the company said. Revenue rose 13 percent from a year earlier to $9.8 billion.The results reflect the shift underway as people switch to going online wirelessly and manufacturers that had counted on the bulk of their revenue from desktop PCs scramble to keep up.Lenovo said its sales of smartphones, tablet computers and other mobile devices rose 106 percent over a year earlier, to $1.5 billion. Mobile's share of revenue expanded to 15 percent from the previous quarter's 9 percent.Sales of traditional desktop PCs fell 3 percent, to $2.7 billion, while laptop sales rose 8 percent, to $5 billion."We are optimistic about the industry's outlook," Lenovo's chairman and chief executive, Yang Yuanqing, said in an earnings announcement."The PC market is recovering, and tablet growth continues shifting to mainstream and entry-level segments, as well as emerging markets. These are Lenovo's strength areas," Mr. Yang said. "We are confident that we will capture these opportunities and continue our strong growth."Lenovo, which is based in Beijing and in Research Triangle Park, N.C., has said it expects mobile devices to make up the bulk of its business in the coming years.In the Chinese market, Lenovo's revenue rose just 1 percent, to $3.8 billion, reflecting a steady decline in economic growth. It said smartphone and tablet sales in China rose 45 percent.Lenovo was declared the No. 1 personal computer maker in the previous quarter by the research firms Gartner and IDC, surpassing Hewlett-Packard. But that success was tempered by data that showed sales of desktop computers steadily declining.
HONG KONG — Surprisingly strong exports reported by China on Friday bolstered the view that the global economy is improving, just as Chinese leaders were set to hold an important policy meeting to flesh out their economic agenda for the coming years.Exports rose 5.6 percent in October from a year earlier, reversing a 0.3 percent slide in September and beating expectations for a much more modest rise, according to data from the Chinese customs administration. Imports confirmed that domestic demand was solid, rising 7.6 percent from a year earlier, a little more rapidly than the 7.4 percent recorded in September.After a rocky patch earlier this year, China's economy has stabilized in recent months, echoing improvements in the United States, Japan and the long-beleaguered euro zone. Friday's data confirmed that the steady — though not stellar — expansion in the Chinese economy in recent months has continued into the start of the fourth quarter.The data "restores the export growth momentum that was evident in July and August export figures," Rajiv Biswas, Asia-Pacific chief economist at IHS Global Insight, said in a note. It "signals that China's export growth engine will continue to contribute to the moderate economic recovery underway."Combined with improved October export figures from South Korea and Taiwan in recent days and a batch of business activity measurements released last week, the numbers also supported the view that global demand has firmed as the United States and European economies picked up speed during the past few months, analysts said.The global reacceleration remains modest, however, and it remains to be seen whether the momentum can be sustained.In Japan, growth has picked up because of aggressive stimulus measures announced by the government this year. Important structural changes, however, have yet to be pushed through.Europe has emerged from recession, but concerns of a potentially drawn-out period of stagnation remain, and the European Central Bank cut interest rates on Thursday, highlighting the bank's concern.And in the United States, data released Thursday showed that the American economy expanded significantly faster than expected during the third quarter, at an annualized rate of 2.8 percent. But last month's government shutdown could undermine the pace of growth during the current quarter, analysts cautioned.A swath of economic support measures announced by Beijing over the past few months have helped put a floor under the Chinese economy. Still, the country's growth prospects are unclear as its leadership wrestles with the challenge of overhauling an economy that has depended for decades on exports, heavy industry and state-sponsored investment.China's leaders have signaled that they want to raise living standards, diversify the economy and reduce the risks that have come with a buildup in lending in recent years.They are expected to flesh out these broad goals at a policy meeting that begins Saturday.The meeting is unlikely, however, to produce a detailed rundown of planned changes, and it remains to be seen how effectively and quickly the overhauls will actually be implemented, analysts have cautioned."The outcome of the meeting is important since it will give a sense of the priorities," analysts at ABN Amro wrote in a note on Friday.But they added that no details concerning the implementation of these changes were expected and that policy makers in Beijing were likely to "opt for a cautious approach, while they consolidate their power base, by using pilot programs before spreading critical reforms nationwide."
After plowing through the Philippines, Typhoon Haiyan took a right turn over the South China Sea on Sunday, avoiding the central coast of Vietnam, where hundreds of thousands of people had been evacuated to emergency shelters. Instead, it made landfall early Monday much farther north, near the Chinese border.About 500,000 people were allowed to return to their homes on Sunday, according to state media in Vietnam.Weakened to Category 1 strength, the typhoon came ashore near the port of Haiphong, the Hong Kong Observatory reported. It was expected to weaken further as it moved inland toward Nanning, China.Three people were killed and more than a dozen were injured in accidents in Vietnam during preparations for the typhoon's arrival, the state-run Vietnam News Agency reported.
Sports apparel retailers like Li Ning, Anta Sports Products and 361 Degrees International have thousands of stores around the country. The Alibaba Group, founded in 1999, has swelled into an e-commerce giant, with more than 20,000 employees and sales of $1.7 billion in the second quarter of this year. And Tencent, which runs Web portals and chat services, has a market value of nearly $100 billion.This is China's economy growing up, maturing into a state where services play an increasing role as the population grows richer. China's services sector has been growing steadily, and nonmanufacturing activity now accounts for about as large a percentage of the economy as the manufacturing sector – about 45 percent. (The remainder is agriculture.)The development is being encouraged by the policy makers who are gathering in Beijing this week for a four-day meeting on how to overhaul China's economy. Their goal is to reduce the dominance of heavy industry, manufacturing and investment in infrastructure, which for decades were the driving forces of China's sizzling growth.They have aimed to diversify the economy and foster more productive growth by raising the share of activity generated by the service sector, which spans areas as diverse as logistics, tourism, engineering, health care and information technology."The direction is pretty clear," said Jian Chang, the China economist at the British bank Barclays. "They want to invigorate the service sector, which they see as a key source of future growth."China's service sector is still small, in percentage terms, compared with those of Britain and the United States, where a vast array of services makes up almost 80 percent of the economy. But the sector has about doubled its share of the Chinese economy since 1980, according to the World Bank."The rebalancing of the economy," Ms. Chang said, "is already underway."The swing has been driven largely by three decades of rapid economic growth that have left many of China's 1.3 billion inhabitants able to spend more money well beyond necessities. Much of this extra spending power has gone into cars and refrigerators. But it has also fanned demand for movies, better health care, meals at fast-food restaurants, education and tutoring."Manufacturing will remain a key pillar of the economy, but at the margin, future growth will come from the services industry," said Wang Tao, the economist for China at UBS. "As people get richer, they want more quality of life."More recently, the economic turmoil in the West has accentuated the shift by undermining demand for the toys, shoes, machinery and other goods that are churned out by the country's export-dependent manufacturing sector. At the same time, the new leadership's eagerness to rein in the excess capacities that plague parts of the Chinese economy has hit sectors like steel making.Business surveys produced by the national statistics bureau have highlighted this divergence in recent months. While the index measuring activity in the manufacturing sector has been languishing for the past year, the nonmanufacturing index has held up relatively well.The October reading, released this month, came in at 56.3. A reading above 50 signals expansion.One of the biggest beneficiaries of this spending power is the tourism sector, which has exploded as China's middle class has embraced domestic and foreign travel. Visitor numbers at the Great Wall, the karst mountains around Guilin and the seaside resorts of the island of Hainan have soared in recent years, as have the flights, hotels and bars that cater to travelers.Air China, one of the country's largest airlines, now carries more than twice as many passengers per month than it did five years ago.Other areas have also grown.International Sunshine Home, a day care center for children, which opened in the southeastern city of Xiamen in 2010, recently opened a second branch and is aiming to add one new branch a year over the next few years."The education sector is fairly recession-resistant," said David Powell, principal of the daycare center. "Our customers think of education as an essential service."The flurry of activity is positive, not just from the point of view of rebalancing the economy, but also from the perspective of job creation, economists say.Already, service sector companies employ more people in China than manufacturers. And the jobs generated by logistics centers, hotels, software companies and airlines tend to be not just numerous but also generally more suited to the millions who graduate from high schools and universities every year and who are reluctant to take jobs on factory assembly lines.What is unclear, analysts say, is how fast the growth of the services sector will continue to be.
Mayor Michael R. Bloomberg on Tuesday insisted that Bloomberg News, which he owns, did not censor itself by killing two articles related to China. But he also asserted that, for at least a couple more months, he is not involved with the news service because of his role as mayor.Responding to a question from a reporter at a news conference, Mr. Bloomberg criticized an article that was published by The New York Times on Friday, which reported that editors at Bloomberg News, a division of his company, Bloomberg L.P., had decided not to publish two investigative articles that might have been embarrassing to China's leaders."Bloomberg did not do that; the editors said that was just not the case," Mr. Bloomberg said.According to an unidentified Bloomberg News employee quoted in The Times article, Matthew Winkler, the longtime editor of the news agency, said of one of the articles, "If we run the story, we'll be kicked out of China." The Times article also included a comment from Mr. Winkler disputing that account and saying that the articles had not been killed.At the news conference Tuesday, Mr. Bloomberg cited Mr. Winkler's response, and defended the news service. "No one thinks that we are wusses and not willing to stand up and write stories that are of interest to the public and that are factually correct," he said.The websites of Bloomberg News and The New York Times have been blocked in China because of articles about the wealth of the country's leaders and their families.Under guidelines from New York City's conflicts of interest board, Mr. Bloomberg's assets are managed like a blind trust. As he noted at the news conference, that will no longer be necessary after he leaves office."I don't work for Bloomberg," Mr. Bloomberg said. "I've recused myself from anything to do with the company. After Jan. 1, that restriction will go away."
What business makes no money, has yet to pass its third anniversary and just turned down an offer worth billions of dollars? Snapchat, a social media service run by a pair of 20-somethings who until last month worked out of a beachfront bungalow in Venice, Calif.Thanks to today's rabid rat race for the hottest social media start-ups, Snapchat has joined the list of tech companies — like Tumblr and Instagram — with no money coming in but multiple sky-high takeover offers. So far, Snapchat's leaders have balked at the offers, according to three people with knowledge of the overtures, including a recent multibillion-dollar proposal from Facebook, the biggest social network of them all.It's not that they don't want billions of dollars. In part, it's because they think making a deal now would leave many billions more on the table.The service, started in 2011 by Evan Spiegel, 23, and Bobby Murphy, 25, two former Stanford fraternity brothers, lets users send photo and video messages that disappear after they are viewed. Snapchat quickly gained a reputation as an easy way to send sexually suggestive photos, but it also picked up steam as a fun and easy way to trade photo messages.The company has in recent months become one of the most sought-after businesses in the tech industry, getting attention from top Silicon Valley companies and venture capital firms, as well as international technology companies.In the past, several start-ups found even greater success by passing up a billion dollars or more, including Facebook and Twitter. Even Twitter, with its red-hot debut on the public market, still has skeptics who question whether it can grow enough to justify its current market capitalization of more than $20 billion.But Silicon Valley is littered with many more entrepreneurs whose big dreams went unfulfilled, people who were at the helm of the next big thing and lost momentum before they could cash out."I think this is classic bird-in-hand versus bird-in-bush," said Julie A. Ask, an analyst at Forrester Research. "Snapchat must believe the bird-in-bush is bigger."There are some suggestions about why Snapchat thinks it will be worth far more later than it is now. For one thing, Snapchat's leaders think it might be one of the first social media companies in the United States to build its business largely around revenue beyond advertising.On stage at an industry event in September, Mr. Spiegel said that he wanted to duplicate the success of overseas chatting applications like WeChat.Many such companies, particularly WeChat and Line, have found ways to make money from their applications through virtual goods and games. WeChat, which is based in China and operated by a company called Tencent, allows its users to subscribe to brands like Starbucks and Nike and receive messages from them. Line, a Japanese messaging app, has $10 million a month in revenue from selling stickers that users can send to each other while chatting with friends.But the decision appears to have also been influenced by one of Snapchat's big venture backers, Benchmark Capital, according to a person close to the talks. Before leading an investment in Snapchat, Benchmark led an early bet on Instagram, a photo service, and was disappointed when Instagram's founders decided to sell to Facebook for $1 billion last year. Despite the high price tag, the firm thought Instagram could have succeeded as a stand-alone company, or at least could have brought a higher offer.Eight months after the Instagram sale, Benchmark switched tactics and placed an initial $13 million bet on Snapchat. Benchmark executives thought they might be able to profit from Facebook fatigue by investing in services like Snapchat that offered users — particularly teenagers — greater privacy.It is those teenagers who most interest Facebook. In an earnings call this month, Facebook said that its youngest users were using its service less.Still, the news about Snapchat rejecting Facebook's offer, first reported by The Wall Street Journal on Wednesday, sent a small shock through the industry. Both Snapchat and Facebook declined to comment.Snapchat and applications like it represent a coming sea change in social media, one not necessarily defined by shared or public interactions. These services present an antidote to mainstream services that are meant to capture life moments so they can be shared, liked and commented on. Snapchat's appeal lies largely in the lack of permanence. It offers a reprieve from worrying about awkward or unflattering photos turning up unexpectedly.Snapchat recently said that it now processed upward of 350 million messages a day. In February, the company was processing only 60 million a day.Other messaging services similar to Snapchat are also quickly gaining in popularity. WhatsApp, KakaoTalk, Kik, WeChat and Line, to name a few, have added hundreds of millions of users in the last few years, and each continues to grow.That rocketlike growth has emboldened Snapchat's leaders to hold out for a better deal, and with a suitor of their choice, at least for now. One person with knowledge of the talks, who would speak only on the condition of anonymity, said one roadblock in the talks with Facebook was that Mr. Spiegel questioned whether he wanted to work for Mark Zuckerberg, Facebook's young billionaire chief executive.In addition, Snapchat relishes being a successful company outside Silicon Valley. In December, when the company was still getting its footing in the social media market, Mr. Zuckerberg requested a meeting. But he traveled to Venice, Calif., to meet with the company, according to Snapchat's founders, instead of them visiting him at his headquarters in Northern California.Shortly after the meeting, Facebook started a similar product called Poke. But Poke never took off. Even Facebook's stand-alone messaging product, called Messenger, has struggled to attain the same kind of momentum that rivals have gained. Facebook released a new Messenger mobile app on Wednesday.And in Silicon Valley, where something new could pop up at any time, tech companies and investors are often compelled to act when they can — sometimes with fear and little regard for the number of zeros involved.Another potential suitor for Snapchat is Tencent, one of the three Internet giants in China. In September, Pony Ma, one of the founders of Tencent, spoke of that constant tension when discussing his interest in Snapchat."I'm facing a crisis in this industry, said Mr. Ma. "Young people, the things they like on the Internet, increasingly I don't understand it. This is my biggest worry."
BEIJING — China's new national security committee is mainly based on the Washington model. It will put at the disposal of the Chinese president, Xi Jinping, a highly empowered group of security experts who can work the levers of the country's vast security apparatus — and presumably respond more nimbly than the country's multilayered party, police and military bureaucracies have been known to do.But the Chinese body, which was announced at the conclusion of a party meeting this week, will apparently differ from the American National Security Council in one crucial aspect: The Chinese version will have dual duties with responsibility over domestic security as well as foreign policy, Chinese experts say.That means the new body will deal with cybersecurity as well as the unrest in China's Tibet and Xinjiang regions, where resistance against the Han majority population is continuing, according to Shi Yinhong, a professor of international relations at Renmin University in Beijing and an occasional adviser to the government."In China, the security question is largely domestic: cyber, Xinjiang and Tibet," Mr. Shi said. The focus will be on foreign policy with a considerable domestic component that will call for the Public Security Bureau to participate on the committee when it discusses matters of internal security, he said.The decision by Mr. Xi to push ahead with the national security committee drew special attention because although two of his predecessors, Jiang Zemin and Hu Jintao, had contemplated forming such a coordinating policy group, bureaucratic resistance, particularly from the military, had prevented its creation, the experts said.Over the years, Chinese officials have asked their American counterparts about the workings of the National Security Council, established after World War II by President Harry S. Truman, to advise presidents on national security and foreign policy and to coordinate policies among government agencies.In the United States, the president is chairman of the National Security Council, and the regular attendees include the vice president and the secretaries of state, defense and the Treasury. The chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff is the military adviser to the council, and the director of national intelligence is the intelligence adviser.It seemed clear from the Chinese announcement that Mr. Xi would head the new Chinese agency and that his position at the helm would serve to increase his already firm grasp on power, said Zhao Kejin, an associate professor at Tsinghua University in Beijing, who is an expert on China's diplomacy.The precise membership of the new committee was not specified in the statement. It may take some months and considerable political jockeying before the exact composition of the new body is defined, Mr. Shi said.Another obvious difference between the American model and the new Chinese agency is the dominant role of the Communist Party in China. "The Standing Committee will still be king for all important things," said Mr. Shi, referring to the seven men, including Mr. Xi, who are decision makers of the Politburo.At Sunnylands, the California estate where President Obama and Mr. Xi met for a two-day summit meeting in June, an official in Mr. Xi's entourage asked an American official about how the National Security Council was staffed, according to an American official who declined to be named because of the sensitivity of the matter."I know of specific inquiries key Chinese officials were making as recently as a month ago about how the U.S. N.S.C. has evolved," said Kenneth G. Lieberthal, a senior fellow at the Brookings Institution who was on the National Security Council staff during the Clinton presidency. "My understanding was that this was on behalf of the highest levels of the leadership."The Chinese version of the National Security Council would most likely borrow elements from the Department of Homeland Security, the agency created after the September 2001 attacks to manage terrorism threats in the United States, said Xie Yue, a professor of political science at Tongji University in Shanghai who is an expert on Chinese domestic security policy.
HONG KONG — The Asian business community's initial reaction on Wednesday to the highly anticipated pronouncement of China's Communist Party leaders on how to overhaul China's economy was basically this: "long on goals and short on details," "broad-brushed," falling "some way short" of expectations.President Xi Jinping of China emerged late Tuesday after the four-day closed-door meeting of party leaders with a mandate to give markets a "decisive role" in the world's second-largest economy and for reaching "decisive outcomes" for overhauls by 2020. China also plans a new top-level working group that will push through changes.But the seemingly investor-friendly talk failed to impress. The Shanghai composite index finished 1.8 percent lower, and in Hong Kong, where many mainland companies are listed, the Hang Seng Index fell 1.9 percent.Many of the Chinese leadership's broad priorities — raising incomes for China's 1.3 billion inhabitants, for example — had already been widely telegraphed in speeches and editorials over the past year and had been welcomed by analysts who say China urgently needs to overhaul its outdated economic growth model.As a result, a summary of the leadership's deliberations was largely a reiteration, leaving analysts hungry for more details of how and when the changes would occur."There's a fair bit of disappointment," said Chris Weston, chief market strategist at IG in Melbourne, Australia. The new 2020 deadline for reaching "decisive outcomes" provided a useful time frame, he said, but "people were expecting a bit more." The market, he added, wanted "more meat to sink its teeth into."Fred Hu, founder of Primavera Capital, and a former chairman for greater China at Goldman Sachs, is optimistic about China's prospects. But he cautioned at an investor forum in Hong Kong on Wednesday, "Obviously this political commitment to a free-market economy has yet to be translated into concrete measures — the laws, regulations or policies remain to be seen."The initial communiqué from the leadership conference was never expected to lay out in specific detail the complicated puzzle of changes that are needed to put the Chinese economy on the path to more balanced and sustainable growth. This left analysts reading the runes of the communiqué's precise wordings, and continued the longstanding guessing game as to what detailed changes would be announced and, just as importantly, how thoroughly and quickly they will be carried out.The meeting, said Yao Wei, an economist at Société Générale in Hong Kong, laid out a broad road map and a rough time frame, and had the potential to mark a new beginning with positive change.The task facing China's policy makers is complex. Economists say leaders need to wean the economy off the credit and government-led investments that have fueled growth for years. In addition, they say China needs to reduce its reliance on exports and manufacturing, get its people to spend more at home, and combat the corruption and environmental degradation that have accompanied the strong growth of the past few decades.For many investors, one of the most optimistic elements of the communiqué was a change in rhetoric.Previously, the party had spoken in terms of the market taking a "basic" role. The shift to "decisive" role was significant because it "seems to suggest that a consensus has been reached about deepening market-driven reforms while avoiding embracing fundamental capitalistic changes," said Kevin Lai, an economist in the Hong Kong office of Daiwa Securities.Another potentially significant development analysts pointed to on Wednesday is the planned establishment of a new party leadership group on economic policy to oversee the introduction of market-oriented changes.The details on who will head the group have not yet been announced. But analysts said on Wednesday that the development could be positive if it succeeds in providing China with a high-level body that can circumvent the opposition that could come from players in state- owned companies and local governments who have benefited from the system and would want to preserve the status quo.It could also help speed up the process of making overhauls, which now often get bogged down in a "swamp of bureaucracy and vested interests," said Louis Kuijs, chief China economist at the Royal Bank of Scotland in Hong Kong.The communiqué released on Tuesday suggested that important changes could come in the form of overhauling tax policies, cutting red tape, and speeding up social security changes.It also hinted that farmers could be given a degree of rights over the land on which they live — a change that analysts have long said is crucial to increasing consumption and migration to cities.For more concrete evidence of how the leadership will progress, however, analysts and investors will have to wait for more detailed action plans and announcements that are likely to come in the next few weeks and months as the fuller set of decisions made at the four-day meeting is published.
HONG KONG — While relief efforts for Typhoon Haiyan have been focused on the Philippine city of Tacloban, aid groups say other cities in Leyte Province have also suffered vast devastation, with residents facing increasing dangers with the passage of time.One such place is Ormoc, a city of 190,000 on the opposite side of Leyte Province from Tacloban and the province's second-largest city. Both cities experienced storm surges of 13 feet in Friday's typhoon. While the typhoon appears to have killed far fewer people in Ormoc, aid groups say that more than 90 percent of the city's structures have been destroyed or damaged, leaving residents exposed to the elements as food shortages become an increasing problem."People are worried that the aid will bypass them," said Julien Anseau, the Asia communications manager for ChildFund International, who was in the city Wednesday surveying the damage. "They fear that aid will come into Ormoc and then bypass them to go to Tacloban," since Ormoc has a functioning airport that can be used to deliver aid supplies to other parts of the province.Mr. Anseau described a worsening food supply situation, as stores had largely been emptied of their stocks and relief was only slowly starting to trickle in. Also worrisome are increasing reports of illnesses like pneumonia and diarrhea, with residents living in rain-soaked, exposed structures and consuming contaminated food and water."It's continuing to rain as well, so water is coming right into the housing," he said.City officials put the latest death count in Ormoc at 31 people, with 1,779 people injured by the typhoon or in its aftermath. Hospitals were either shut down or not fully functioning.Power remained down throughout the city, and communications have been spotty. Still, Ormoc has been largely peaceful, spared the widespread looting that has afflicted Tacloban.The most pressing needs in the city are food and tarpaulins to keep rain out of structures until they can be permanently repaired, Mr. Anseau said."The monsoon season is not over," he said. "They expect another three storms before Christmas."In the city of Baybay, just south of Ormoc, a lawmaker representing the area issued an urgent plea on Facebook seeking help for the municipality of more than 100,000 people."More people are dead. Scarce supply of food, water, medicine," Representative Jose Carlos L. Cari wrote in a posting Sunday. "People are outraged, taking everything they can get due to lack of supplies! These areas need medical attention immediately!"As with other coastal cities in Leyte, it was not the first time Ormoc had been battered by a deadly storm. In 1991, Tropical Storm Thelma killed nearly 5,000 people in the region and left an estimated 3,000 missing. It was the highest death toll from flooding in the Philippines in a decade. Officials said then that the flash floods that resulted from the storm were a result of deforestation caused by illegal logging, which has been stripping hillsides of tree cover throughout much of the Philippines.Communities near Ormoc were not spared by Friday's storm. "A lot of coastal communities were completely decimated," Mr. Anseau said.
HONG KONG — A prominent human rights campaigner in southern China won his first meeting with a lawyer on Thursday after more than three months in detention and said he had been on a hunger strike, one of his lawyers said.Yang Maodong, a writer and businessman better known by his pen name, Guo Feixiong, was detained by the police in Guangzhou, in Guangdong Province, in early August on allegations of "assembling a crowd to disrupt order in a public place." He is one of several well-known rights advocates held on similar accusations after participating in grass-roots campaigns pressing the Communist Party for stronger legal and political rights.Until now, Mr. Yang has not been allowed to see a lawyer, which his lawyers and supporters have said is a blatant violation of Chinese law. Mr. Yang's lack of access to visitors prompted speculation from some of his supporters that he was ill, had been physically abused or was on a hunger strike.Mr. Yang told a lawyer who was allowed to visit him, Chen Guangwu, that days after he was detained, he began to refuse to eat food, accepting for 25 days only glucose drinks and a nutritional intravenous drip. Mr. Chen declined to talk about the meeting. The account of it was given by Mr. Yang's other lawyer, Sui Muqing, who said the police had excluded him from the meeting."Guo Feixiong's health now is still poor," Mr. Sui said in a telephone interview, citing a description from Mr. Chen. "He's still suffering the effects. He staged the hunger strike because he felt that the police simply don't have a good reason to arrest him. It was to show defiance."Officers who answered the phone at the Tianhe District Detention Center in Guangzhou, where Mr. Yang is held, declined to comment.According to Mr. Sui, police interrogators have focused on Mr. Yang's role in a demonstration in January, when rights campaigners and other aggrieved citizens gathered near the offices of Southern Weekend, a newspaper in Guangzhou, while journalists there held a strike against censorship. The police also questioned Mr. Yang about a petition that urged China to ratify the International Covenant on Civil and Political Rights.Mr. Yang was formally arrested in September on the charge of disrupting order in a public place, Mr. Sui said.He said the police could add other charges, including the much more serious crime of political subversion."If the police decide that he planned and organized these activities, then it would be normal for them to consider the crime of inciting subversion," Mr. Sui said.
BEIJING — Treasury Secretary, Jacob J. Lew, described China's declaration that market competition should have a decisive role in the country's economy as an "ambitious reform agenda," according to remarks on Friday by the secretary to the Chinese leader, Xi Jinping.After meeting with Mr. Xi and other officials here, Mr. Lew said the outcome of China's long-awaited meeting on its economic program showed there would "continue to be progress, but the question is how much and how quickly.""The direction is significant, but the character and the pace of change matters," Mr. Lew said.Mr. Lew arrived in Beijing after visiting four Asian countries that are negotiating with the United States to join the Trans-Pacific Partnership, or T.P.P., trade agreement. When completed, the trade group of 12 countries would represent 40 percent of the global economy.The Obama administration aims to have the trade talks completed by Dec. 31, a deadline that many of the participants consider optimistic. The administration is pushing for fasttrack negotiating authority that would make it easier for an agreement to move through Congress.The pact would lower tariffs, reduce the barriers to investment, improve labor rights and limit government favoritism of state-owned enterprises.The trade deal is a critical part of the administration's so-called pivot toward Asia, and for many of the countries participating in the talks, the demands are high. Japan must agree to lower barriers to agricultural trade, and in Malaysia there is growing resistance to the pact because of the need to reform state-owned enterprises.Trade ministers of the 12 countries are scheduled to meet in Singapore in December for a final round of talks."While we still have work to do, my conversations leave me with the hope that we can still complete T.P.P. this year," Mr. Lew said. "In each capital, it was clear that this is in their interest. There was a very strong focus on economic growth and T.P.P. as a part of that."China was not invited by the Obama administration to join the trade group, and Beijing initially reacted to the proposed pact as an effort by Washington to create a group it would dominate. But in recent months, some Chinese officials have expressed interest in the possibility of China joining the pact at some point.
HONG KONG — The Chinese government will ease its one-child family restrictions and abolish "re-education through labor" camps, significantly curtailing two policies that for decades have defined the state's power to control citizens' lives, the Communist Party said Friday.The changes were announced in a party decision that also laid out broad and potentially far-reaching proposals to restructure the economy by encouraging greater private participation in finance, vowing market competition in several important parts of the economy, and promising farmers better property protection and compensation for confiscated land.Senior party officials, led by President Xi Jinping, endorsed the 60 initiatives at a four-day Central Committee conference that ended Tuesday, but details were released Friday. Mr. Xi described the document as a bold call for economic renewal, social improvement and patriotic nation-building — all under the firm control of one-party rule."We must certainly have the courage and conviction to renew ourselves," he said in a statement accompanying the decision. Both were issued by the official news agency, Xinhua.Mr. Xi, who assumed China's top party leadership post a year ago and the presidency eight months ago, has tried to project an image as a leader who can pursue a potentially conflicting agenda: making China's economy more responsive to market forces and giving its people greater social and economic freedom while fortifying traditional one-party rule.For months, analysts have speculated about the economic policies that could be introduced at the meeting. But the planned changes to population policy and punishment, two areas where overhauls have been debated, and delayed, for years, gave the decision significance beyond the economy. They could stir public expectations of even bolder changes under Mr. Xi and Prime Minister Li Keqiang in the decade they are likely to spend in office."Xi Jinping may have the most concentrated power of any Chinese leader since Deng Xiaoping," said Xiao Gongqin, a professor of history in Shanghai who closely follows Chinese politics and advocates "neo-authoritarian" rule to protect the march of market overhauls. "Politically, he has pursued an ideological tightening, because he wants to prevent the kind of explosion in political demands that could come in a relaxed environment. That's the biggest danger for any government entering a period of reform."For decades, most urban couples have been restricted to having one child. That has been changing fitfully, with rules on the books that couples can have two children if both parents are single children. But that policy will now be further relaxed nationwide. Many rural couples already have two children, and some have more."This is the first time that a central document has clearly proposed allowing two children when a husband or wife is an only child," said Wang Guangzhou, a demographer at the Chinese Academy of Social Sciences in Beijing. "Now it's just talking about launching this, but the specific policies have to be developed at the operational level."If carried through, the relaxation would be the first significant nationwide easing of family size restrictions that have been in place since the 1970s, said Wang Feng, a demographer who teaches at both the University of California, Irvine, and Fudan University in Shanghai. He estimated the policy could lead to one million to two million more births in China every year, on top of the approximately 15 million births a year now."This step is really, I think, the middle step toward allowing all couples to have two children, and eventually taking away the state's hand," Professor Wang said. "But this shift is historical. It's fundamental. To change the mentality of the society of policy makers has taken people more than a decade."The one-child restrictions were introduced to deal with official fears that China's population would devour too many resources and suffocate growth. But they have created public ire and international criticism over forced abortions, and have created a population of 1.34 billion, according to a 2010 census, that is aging relatively rapidly, even before China establishes a firm foothold in prosperity. Experts have for years urged some relaxation of the controls.
HONG KONG — China's Communist Party has burnished President Xi Jinping's plans for an economic overhaul with exultant propaganda about a historic turning point. But the success of his proposals, and the long-term health of the Chinese economy, could rest on policy battles reaching down into thousands of towns and villages over land, money and a misshapen fiscal system that has bred public discontent and financial hazards.The Communist Party Central Committee under Mr. Xi endorsed a package of 6o overhaul goals, released to the public on Friday, that the government said would propel China closer to becoming a secure, powerful and well-off country by the end of this decade. The economic goals include expanding the role of markets in energy and natural resources, encouraging private investment in finance and easing state controls on interest rates."If the implementation of these reforms is successful, the structures of the Chinese economy and society will change in profound ways," said Eswar S. Prasad, a professor of economics at Cornell University who was previously in charge of the China division of the International Monetary Fund. "The timeline for accomplishing them is ambitious."But the Central Committee's decision and Mr. Xi's accompanying statement also dwelled on another set of problems, far from bank headquarters, that could matter just as much for China's economic health: farmland rights and revenues, local government taxes and finances, and chronic shortfalls between many local governments' outlays and the money they receive from the central government.Mr. Xi spent part of his career as a county official, becoming familiar with the countryside; he said in a statement accompanying the overhaul goals that the barriers to rural development were among China's biggest worries."There has been not-fundamental reversal of the constantly growing disparity between urban and rural development," he said in the statement, which was issued through the official news agency, Xinhua.In many ways, China's rural problems are a knot of issues about land and revenues. Local governments have grown dependent on taking farmers' land for relatively little compensation and selling it to developers for a profit. They have been encouraged to do so because the central government takes the bulk of revenues, while assigning many tasks to local governments that require expenditures. In China, farmland is, by law, owned by the village collectively, but in practice, the land is controlled by the state, giving officials a powerful voice over when to develop land and on what terms.The central government transfers revenues to local governments, but many town and county officials say the amount is not enough to meet ambitions set by central leaders, economists who study China said. Officials in county and city governments, eager to secure jobs for their constituents and to advance their careers, have also gone into dangerous debt to pay for building and business projects that often use that land as collateral for loans, or as a lure for investors."Some acute problems in our country's economic and social development are also related to the inadequacies of the fiscal and taxation system," Mr. Xi said.The national audit office last made an estimate of local government debt in 2010, when it reached a figure of 10.72 trillion yuan, or about $1.7 trillion. Many economists expect that a recent audit, using broader criteria, will produce a much higher estimate.Solving these problems is all the more pressing for Mr. Xi and Prime Minister Li Keqiang because absorbing tens of millions of rural residents into cities is a crucial part of their policy.Unless China's leadership finds a way to unravel this knot of land and finance problems, many farmers will remain too poorly compensated to make a safe passage to life in cities, said Hua Sheng, an economist at Southeast University in Nanjing, Jiangsu Province. Chinese cities also impose household registration restrictions that exclude rural newcomers from services, such as clinics and schools.
HONG KONG — The Chinese government's decision to relax a decades-old one-child limit on couples has already encountered two problems likely to test dozens of social and economic changes promised by President Xi Jinping — vagaries about implementation and magnified public expectations of even bigger changes ahead.The limited curtailing of rules that restrict most city-dwelling couples to raising just one child was a highlight of 60 proposed reforms endorsed by a Communist Party Central Committee, which were released to the public on Friday. The change will allow couples to have two children if either the husband or wife is an only child. Couples can now have two children only if each of the spouses is an only child. Most rural families are already allowed to have two children.The Chinese state-run news media have celebrated the shift as demonstrating that Mr. Xi's government is willing to make changes that have been debated, and delayed, for many years. But over the weekend, a senior official in the National Health and Family Planning Commission said that provincial-level governments would decide when to carry out the new policy, and he stressed that the government had no plans to further relax family size restrictions."There will not be a uniform nationwide timetable for starting implementation," Wang Pei'an, a vice minister of the commission, said in a question-and-answer transcript issued by Xinhua, the state-run news agency. "But it would be inadvisable for the lag in timing of implementation between each area to be too long."Provincial-level governments include large municipalities, like Beijing and Shanghai, which answer directly to the central government.Wang Feng, a demographer who teaches at the University of California, Irvine, and Fudan University in Shanghai, has estimated that the policy change could lead to one million to two million extra births in China every year, on top of the 15 million or so births a year now. But that limited change has aroused hopes among experts and citizens that the government could let all couples have two children, and eventually even scrap state limits on family size."Two children should be the standard," Zhang Yuan, a civil servant in Nanjing, a city in Jiangsu Province, eastern China, said in a telephone interview. She said she was already eligible to have two children, as both she and her husband were only children."Even if the policy was further relaxed, it's not necessarily so that every couple will have more kids," she said. "It's a huge pressure to raise a kid, especially in China."But, she said, she and her husband were thinking about having a second child in two or three years, in addition to their 2-year-old daughter. "I'm not very concerned about the financial pressure. Rich or not, you can raise the kids either way."Mr. Wang, the health commission official, emphatically said no to ideas of a further relaxation of the general one-child rule."Adjusting and improving family-planning policy is not tantamount to relaxing that policy," Mr. Wang said. Allowing all urban couples to have two children would create too many burdens for society, he said."There would be a quite serious concentration of births that would impose very heavy pressure on basic public services," he said. "In the longer term, that would create a cyclical surge in births, so the total population would experience sustained growth, and the arrival of the population peak would be delayed."The relaxation was possible because of China's slowed population growth, and in the longer term it will help to offset the pressures of coping with an aging society, Mr. Wang said. But the policy change will not significantly alter China from its course toward an increasingly old society with a slowly shrinking labor force, said Hua Sheng, an economist at Southeast University in Nanjing."There's unlikely to be a major short-term impact," Professor Hua said. "The economic impact also will depend on how much actual behavior changes. But the real significance is that it's a positive signal — the first major change in family planning after many years."The party Central Committee meeting that endorsed the change in family policy also vowed to abolish re-education through labor, a form of punishment that can be used to imprison people for up to four years without any real judicial scrutiny or chance to appeal. But that proposal, as well as a slew of economic changes promised by the committee, also await detailed rules for implementation.For eligible couples, the question of whether to have a second child will come down to choosing between the pleasure and benefits of another child against the pressures in a society where health care, schooling and housing costs can be daunting even for prosperous members of the middle class.Li Xuebing, a real estate advertising salesman in Beijing, said he and his wife would be eligible to have another child under the new policy, in addition to their 18-month-old son."Ever since the first, we've wanted to have a second child," he said."I'm an only child, and my experience growing up was that an only child carries too many burdens from the family's expectations," Mr. Li said. "I think this policy opening will grow bigger and bigger."
When David Tod Roy entered a used-book shop in the Chinese city of Nanjing in 1950, he was a 16-year-old American missionary kid looking for a dirty book.His quarry was an unexpurgated copy of "The Plum in the Golden Vase," an infamously pornographic tale of the rise and fall of a corrupt merchant, written by an anonymous author in the late 16th century.Mr. Roy had previously encountered only an incomplete English translation, which switched decorously into Latin when things got too raunchy. But there it was — an old Chinese edition of the whole thing — amid other morally and politically suspect items discarded by nervous owners after Mao Zedong's takeover the previous year."As a teenage boy, I was excited by the prospect of reading something pornographic," Mr. Roy, now 80 and an emeritus professor of Chinese literature at the University of Chicago, recalled recently by telephone. "But I found it fascinating in other ways as well."So have readers who have followed Mr. Roy's nearly 40-year effort to bring the complete text into English, which has just reached its conclusion with the publication by Princeton University Press of the fifth and final volume, "The Dissolution."The novelist Stephen Marche, writing last month in The Los Angeles Review of Books, praised Mr. Roy's masterly rendering of a richly encyclopedic novel of Ming dynasty manners, which Mr. Marche summed up, Hollywood-pitch style, as "Jane Austen meets hard-core pornography." And Mr. Roy's scholarly colleagues are no less awe-struck at his erudition, which seemingly leaves no literary allusion or cultural detail unannotated."He is someone who believes it's his obligation to know absolutely everything about this book, even things that are only mentioned passingly," said Wei Shang, a professor of Chinese literature at Columbia University. "It takes a certain kind of stubbornness to complete this kind of project."It also may take a certain stubbornness on the part of ordinary readers to make it all the way through this five-volume work, given its Proustian length (nearly 3,000 pages), DeMille-worthy cast (more than 800 named characters) and "Ulysses"-like level of quotidian detail — to say nothing of Mr. Roy's 4,400-plus endnotes, whose range and precision would give one of Nabokov's obsessive fictional scholars a run for his money.They touch on subjects ranging from the novel's often obscure literary references and suggested further reading on "the use of impatiens blossoms and garlic juice to dye women's fingernails" to obscure Ming-era slang whose meaning, Mr. Roy notes with pride, had long eluded even native Chinese-speaking scholars."It's not just a translation, it's also a reference book," said Yihong Zhang, a visiting scholar at the University of Pittsburgh who is translating some of Mr. Roy's notes into Chinese as part of his doctoral dissertation at Beijing Foreign Studies University. "It opens a window onto Chinese literature and culture."And then there is the sex, which has fed fascination with the book, even though few people could actually read it. In Mao's China, access to the unexpurgated edition was restricted to government high officials (who were urged to study its depiction of imperial corruption) and select academics. Today, complete versions remain hard to find in China, though it is easily downloadable on Chinese Internet sites.The level of raunch remains startling even to some Western literary scholars — particularly the infamous Chapter 27, in which the merchant, named Ximen Qing, puts his most depraved concubine to particularly prolonged and imaginative use."When I taught it, my students were flabbergasted, even though they knew about the novel's reputation," said Patricia Sieber, a professor of Chinese literature at Ohio State University. "S-and-M, the use of unusual objects as sex toys, excessive use of aphrodisiacs, sex under all kinds of nefarious circumstances — you name it, it's all there."
Typhoon Haiyan, which ravaged the Philippines earlier this month, might have been one of the strongest tropical cyclones ever to hit land, but its exact strength was a matter of dispute. Forecasting agencies said it would pack winds of up to 195 miles (about 315 kilometers) an hour, but meteorologists in the Philippines said that top measured speeds were closer to 150 m.p.h., or 240 k.p.h.The difference means little to the millions of people who were affected, but precise data on the intensity of hurricanes and typhoons — monsters like Haiyan, as well as far more frequent weaker storms — is important to scientists, especially those who are trying to determine the possible effects of climate change on weather.But the tools for determining the strength of tropical cyclones have limitations, and not all of them are available everywhere or for every storm. Other than the United States, for example, few countries make direct measurements by flying planes into these kinds of storms.Worldwide, hurricanes and typhoons are analyzed primarily with imagery from satellites that measure the temperature of the sea surface and clouds by sensing the infrared radiation emitted from them. Called the Dvorak technique, after Vernon Dvorak, the scientist who developed it four decades ago, the method is used by trained analysts and, increasingly, computers."It's basically an inkblot test for hurricanes," said James Franklin, chief of the hurricane specialist unit at the National Hurricane Center. Analysts or automated programs pore over heat maps of clouds in search of patterns that reveal the degree to which they are organized into a storm. "You can relate the appearance of the storm to intensity," Mr. Franklin said.Among other things, the analysis includes how cold the cloud tops are, which is an indication of their depth, and the width and temperature of the eye, he said. A storm system is then given a rating that corresponds to certain wind speeds and air pressures as determined through direct measurements of past storms.John A. Knaff, a researcher with the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration's Center for Satellite Applications and Research, who has evaluated the Dvorak technique, said that it has been tweaked over the years and worked well, especially for stronger storms with a high degree of organization.Haiyan, for example, was rated a T-8, the highest number, through Dvorak analysis. It was clear from the satellite imagery that this was a superstorm. "From the technique's standpoint, this was about as good as you can get," Dr. Knaff said.But the technique is not without its problems. Two analysts looking at the same image can come up with different ratings, especially for weaker storms. And some meteorological agencies relate the same ratings to different wind speeds, which can lead to confusion.Ultimately the wind speeds are only estimates, and can be off by 25 m.p.h. or more. That may account for some of the differences between the forecast and the actual measurements during Haiyan. It is also not clear that the instruments in the Philippines captured peak wind speeds, which occur in the wall of clouds surrounding the eye."You'd have to be pretty lucky, or unlucky, to encounter them," Mr. Franklin said.For direct measurements before a storm hits land, the only real tools are airplanes. The United States flies aircraft through storms in the Atlantic and the eastern Pacific, but has not conducted flights in the western Pacific since 1987. Hong Kong and Taiwan fly into typhoons, but less extensively than the United States."Nobody out there does routine inner-core reconnaissance in the way we do it here," Mr. Franklin said. But even the United States flies into only about one-third of Atlantic storms — those that threaten land, he said.A flight passes through the eyewall at 10,000 feet, and instruments gather wind speed and other data. If there is no other way to get data near the surface, "we will take 90 percent of whatever we measure at 10,000 feet and use that," Mr. Franklin said.But usually the flights also eject parachute-equipped instruments, called dropsondes, that are caught in the winds and transmit data as they descend. Even with them, there is no guarantee of measuring maximum winds, as they have to be precisely ejected to fall into the eyewall. "It's kind of like a bombing exercise," Mr. Franklin said.
BEIJING — An 85-year-old American veteran of the Korean War was detained in North Korea last month as he was about to depart after having visited the country on a tourist visa, his son said on Wednesday.The veteran, Merrill Newman of Palo Alto, Calif., was taken from an Air Koryo flight on which he was to leave the country on Oct. 26, his son, Jeff Newman, the chief financial officer of a real estate company, said in a telephone interview from California."He was on a nine-day tour with a friend and two tour guides. He went through the normal visa process," the younger Mr. Newman said. "Everything was going very well. They day before they were due to leave he had a meeting with his tour guide and without his companion."At that meeting, where at least one other North Korean aside from the tour guide was present, the Korean War was discussed, his son said. "That was the only hiccup," he said. Mr. Newman's traveling companion, Bob Hamrdla, who is not a Korean War veteran and lives in the same retirement village as Mr. Newman, assumed there must have been some misunderstanding from that meeting, Jeff Newman said.There has been no word of the whereabouts of Mr. Newman, who has a heart condition and a bad back, since he was escorted from the plane, his son said."All we would like is for whatever misunderstanding to be put aside and, on a humanitarian basis, he be able to leave the country and come home and be with his two grandchildren," Mr. Newman said in the interview.The detention of Mr. Newman, who was traveling with a tour group based in Beijing, came almost a year after the arrest of another American citizen, Kenneth Bae, who remains incarcerated in North Korea.A spokesman at the United States Embassy in Beijing, Nolan Barkhouse, said, "We are aware of reports that a U.S. citizen was detained in North Korea, but we have no additional information to share at this time."Mr. Newman's detention has not been reported in the North Korean state-run news media.In reaction to Mr. Newman's detention, the State Department further tightened the United States travel warning to North Korea, making it clear that travel to North Korea was highly dangerous for American citizens who were likely left vulnerable to arbitrary arrest.The updated warning, released on Tuesday, noted that "U.S. citizens crossing into North Korea, even accidentally, have been subject to arbitrary arrest and long-term detention."Tours of North Korea that take American tourists to the capital, Pyongyang, and a few scenic places under strictly circumscribed conditions have become more frequent. Such tour groups provide a source of hard currency for the North Korean government, and can serve to give the impression that living standards in the capital are improving.Mr. Newman was traveling with just his friend, and they were accompanied by two tour guides, Jeff Newman said."He was a curious guy who had done many different things," Mr. Newman said of his father. Among the countries his father had visited since his retirement were South Korea and Cuba, and Mr. Newman prepared for the trip for several months, taking a Korean language course, his son said.Mr. Newman, a retired technology executive, served as an infantry officer during the Korean War, and later earned a master's degree in education from Stanford. He lives at Channing House, a retirement community, with his wife, his son added.Mr. Bae, 44, a Christian missionary, was arrested in the port of Rason in the northeast region of North Korea last November after leading a group of businessmen on a tour from the city of Yanji in northern China.In May, he was sentenced to 15 years' hard labor for committing "hostile acts" against the North. The work at the prison camp was so severe that Mr. Bae became ill and was sent to a hospital.In October, Mr. Bae's mother, Myunghee Bae, was permitted to visit him at a hospital in Pyongyang. She left North Korea without him.
HONG KONG — For all of Beijing's political control over Hong Kong, in the city itself the tables are often turned: Mainland Chinese provide low-cost labor that propels the booming economy, and pregnant mothers have long flocked to Hong Kong's hospitals, where giving birth is a child's ticket to permanent residency in the city, with its better doctors and quality schools.This tension is at the heart of "Bends," a film that opens here on Thursday and in Taiwan on Friday. In it, a wealthy Hong Kong woman finds herself enmeshed in the complicated life of a poor mainland couple. Her driver — worried about facing penalties for violating China's one-child policy and wishing for a better life for his child — seeks to have his wife deliver her second baby across the border in Hong Kong.From her lavish apartment on Victoria Peak, the woman also sees her affluent lifestyle start to crumble as her businessman husband disappears, her credit cards are frozen and her daughter's boarding school tuition is left unpaid.The movie, which has echoes of Woody Allen's recent "Blue Jasmine," is the big-screen debut of the Hong Kong filmmaker Flora Lau, who wrote and directed the film after receiving notice for her short films, one examining the plight of the tens of thousands of foreign domestic helpers in the city. The movie was shown at the Cannes International Film Festival in May, the only Hong Kong work to get that honor this year.Ms. Lau, 34, a Hong Kong native, was educated at Columbia University, majoring in economics and working at Morgan Stanley before going to film school in London. As she returned to Hong Kong, she saw a city constantly changing, but one increasingly riven by economic inequality fueled by its growing prosperity. "At first, it was the Filipino domestic helpers' situation that interested me," she wrote in an email about the university graduates who had to leave their country to take up domestic work in Hong Kong."As I found out more," she added, "it was their stories that touched me and I felt a need to study film as a language to express what I was observing. Since film school, I returned to Hong Kong once again and saw that the class divide — and the Hong Kong versus mainlander divide — was intensifying."Her movie captures the opulent lifestyle of the "tai tai," the term for a prosperous married woman who need not work, a figure who is alternately ridiculed and envied in Hong Kong. In "Bends," that character, Anna Li, played by Carina Lau (she is not related to the filmmaker), spends her days lunching at pricey restaurants with friends, downing wine at midday and being ferried about by her driver, Fai, played by Chen Kun. Fai has a permit to work in Hong Kong while his pregnant wife raises their daughter across the border in Shenzhen.As Anna's life falls apart, she keeps up appearances, paying for an expensive lunch with friends as the money gets harder and harder to find. She starts selling the house valuables. The Filipino housekeeper one day announces she is leaving to return to her homeland, and Anna barely raises her head, showing her emotional distance from the people who share her home.But Anna is unwittingly thrust into Fai's life as he grows increasingly desperate to come up with the money to get his wife to Hong Kong to deliver the child. He starts selling parts of her Mercedes to a mechanic who puts on cheap replacements. When the car's air-conditioning no longer works, Anna complains.While Ms. Lau, the filmmaker, had a familiarity with Anna's lifestyle in Hong Kong, capturing life across the border in Shenzhen was more challenging."I started to get to know families who are separated by the border and people who had to cross the border to get to work every day," she said. "I went with a friend to the baby agencies pretending to be pregnant and wanting to go to Hong Kong to give birth."In a sign of how quickly change happens in China, the movie was almost overtaken by events. Last week, Beijing announced it was relaxing the one-child rule, but officials later said the overhaul would be carried out by provincial-level officials, raising doubts about how quickly the policy would change.The movie gives a gripping view of the fear held by a family facing the prospect of having a child in violation of the rule — where families are subject to ruinous financial penalties. The wife suggests getting an abortion, and Fai desperately schemes to get the documentation to have her give birth in Hong Kong as time runs out on her pregnancy.But it is the portrayal of mainland-Hong Kong relations that may strike a particular chord. Ms. Lau's film, which was several years in the making, is being released as tensions have grown between the locals and the wealthy mainland Chinese who descend on the city's malls and draw scorn for what many view as their crass behavior. Ms. Lau shows another side to that caricature: The struggling Chinese worker who greases Hong Kong's labor-starved economy and brings the mainland's vexing problems with him, too.
BEIJING — Merrill Newman is 85 and suffers from a heart ailment, but that did not deter him from fulfilling his wish to return to North Korea, where he fought as a young man, his family and friends say.With a companion from his California retirement village, Mr. Newman booked a nine-day trip to the most closed society in the world, a nuclear-armed state that keeps its people in poverty and is an enemy of the United States. Some call the country the last frontier of travel."Why do World War II veterans go back to Normandy?" Mr. Newman's son, Jeff, asked this week as he dealt with the reality that his father has been detained in North Korea for nearly a month and that his whereabouts remained unclear. "The war had a powerful impact on him."Mr. Newman and his friend had completed their tour and were on board an Air Koryo plane in Pyongyang ready to leave for Beijing on Oct. 26 when uniformed North Korean officers escorted Mr. Newman off, his son said. He has not been heard from since.The day before they were scheduled to leave North Korea, Mr. Newman had a conversation about the Korean War and his service as a soldier with one of his tour guides and another Korean whose identity is not known, his son said. According to the son, Mr. Newman was upset afterward and indicated to his friend, Bob Hamrdla, that the talk had not gone well.Mr. Newman is part of a small but growing number of Americans, Europeans and Chinese who have signed up in recent years to visit the North on state-approved tours, despite the difficulties inherent in traveling to an impoverished police state.Tourists must be accompanied at all times by state-authorized guides who prevent much interaction with ordinary people, itineraries are set in advance and creature comforts are limited."It tends to be for curiosity seekers who have been everywhere and want to see the place," said Tony Namkung, a North Korea expert.Mr. Newman, who has visited Cuba, according to his son, traveled to North Korea with Juche Travel Services, an agency that advertises offices in Beijing, London and Berlin. The group was founded in 2011, according to its website. Reached by telephone, the head of the London office, David Thompson, said that because of Mr. Newman's detention he could not talk.In the last several years, and particularly under Kim Jong-un, who became the country's leader in 2011, North Korea has tried to attract Western tourists.The government opened a dolphin aquarium in Pyongyang last year, and despite a lack of money that keeps many of its people hungry, it has started to build a ski resort at Masikryong on the east coast. The Swiss government recently refused to sell ski equipment for the project, saying the country should not be able to afford such a luxury.A wealthy European businessman who visited last year said he and his family were drawn by the desire to see a Communist country where a three-generation family dynasty has ruled with an iron hand. "You don't even see that in Cuba," said the businessman, who declined to be named for fear of publicity. During the visit, the family paid 200 euros a person for a seat at the main stadium to see a synchronized dancing show, visited a farm and was taken to a power plant. "As a tourist there is no freedom," the businessman said. "After two days I was ready to leave."For the last decade or so, two travel agencies, Young Pioneer Tours and Koryo Tours, have been the main conduits for Western tourists, North Korea experts said. Juche Travel Services, which bills itself as tailored for the "modern independent traveler," was a relative newcomer, they said. Named after the state ideology of "self-reliance," Juche Travel Services advertises offbeat tours, including a bird watching tour for October, and suggests an arms and equipment exhibition run by the Korean People's Army as an attraction.All travel agencies outside North Korea must make their arrangements through the state-run Korea International Travel Company, which provides the guides, said Mr. Namkung, who has arranged trips for Bill Richardson, the former United Nations ambassador, and Eric E. Schmidt, the executive chairman of Google. Mr. Newman and his traveling companion, Mr. Hamrdla, stayed at the Yanggakdo Hotel in Pyongyang, a 47-floor building located on an island. The hotel is one of the two main Western-style hotels in the capital, and it is increasingly favored by the North Koreans for tourists because its location makes it difficult for visitors to wander very far without being seen.
HONG KONG — China's highest court issued demands on Thursday that judges bar confessions obtained through torture and avoid applying the death penalty when the evidence is shaky. The directive was unlikely on its own to curb such abuses, but reflected a growing official recognition of the need to stop gross injustices, experts said.The Supreme People's Court of China published the "opinion" seeking to curtail abuses a week after China's Communist Party leadership published a set of proposed reforms, including a commitment to end "re-education through labor," a form of imprisonment without trial or effective judicial overview.The court document listed many of the problems that lawyers and human rights groups have said plague China's criminal legal system, including torture by the police, concocted evidence, faulty forensic investigations and a tendency for judges to be swayed by official pressure or inflamed public opinion."A defendant cannot be determined as guilty based solely on testimony from the defendant with no other evidence," said the court's instructions, which were dated Oct. 9 but published on the official national court website on Thursday."Testimony of the defendant acquired through torture, freezing, starvation, baking in the sun, roasting, exhaustion and other illegal collection methods shall be excluded," the instructions said.The demands mostly repeated previous rules and pronouncements, and the document did not prescribe penalties for violating them. But it demonstrated some official effort to end gross miscarriages of justice, which have battered public confidence in courts, said Nicholas Bequelin, a senior researcher for Human Rights Watch, an advocacy group."It reads like a catalog of the defects of China's criminal justice system," Mr. Bequelin said. "It's generally a reiteration, but it reflects some level of the commitment by the leadership to actually curb the most glaring defects of the criminal justice system."In a statement accompanying the opinion, an unidentified supreme court official said, "Only if the defendant's human rights are given legal protection during the judicial process can we truly avoid the occurrence of false and unjust cases."China's courts, however, come under the control of the Communist Party and are usually deferential to the police and prosecutors, especially in politically sensitive cases."This is a document from the realm of the courts, and the courts are the weakest institution," Mr. Bequelin said. "That will have a limit on its influence right out of the start."Last Friday, the party Central Committee said the government would abolish re-education through labor, a system of punishment that since the 1950s has housed prisoners whom the government has not wanted to put on trial, including dissidents and large numbers of petty criminals and users of illegal drugs.The supreme court told judges not to hand out death sentences when evidence is lacking — not a self-evident point after a series of reports about executions or life sentences imposed on defendants later proved to be innocent. The court warned judges to respect the principle that defendants were presumed innocent and should not be found guilty, or innocent, just to mollify public opinion.But the demands have "ambiguous force," said Joshua Rosenzweig, a researcher at the Chinese University of Hong Kong who studies human rights and criminal legal issues in China."Presumably, it has some sort of binding nature within the courts themselves," he said. "But it seems to be more a sort of an aspirational document — that these are the kinds of things we need to address."
BEIJING — Merrill Newman is 85 and has a heart ailment, but that did not deter him from fulfilling his wish to return to North Korea, where he fought as a young man, his family and friends say.With a companion from his California retirement village, Mr. Newman booked a nine-day trip to the most closed society in the world, a nuclear-armed state that keeps its people in poverty and is an enemy of the United States. Some call the country the last frontier of travel."Why do World War II veterans go back to Normandy?" Mr. Newman's son, Jeff, asked this week as he dealt with the reality that his father has been detained in North Korea for nearly a month and that his whereabouts remained unclear. "The war had a powerful impact on him."Mr. Newman and his friend had completed their tour and were on board an Air Koryo plane in Pyongyang ready to leave for Beijing on Oct. 26 when uniformed North Korean officers escorted Mr. Newman off, his son said. He has not been heard from since.The day before they were scheduled to leave North Korea, Mr. Newman had a conversation about the Korean War and his service as a soldier with one of his tour guides and another Korean whose identity is not known, his son said. According to the son, Mr. Newman was upset afterward and indicated to his friend, Bob Hamrdla, that the talk had not gone well.Mr. Newman is part of a small but growing number of Americans, Europeans and Chinese who have signed up in recent years to visit the North on state-approved tours, despite the difficulties inherent in traveling to an impoverished police state.Tourists must be accompanied at all times by state-authorized guides who prevent much interaction with ordinary people, itineraries are set in advance and creature comforts are limited."It tends to be for curiosity seekers who have been everywhere and want to see the place," said Tony Namkung, a North Korea expert.Jeff Newman said his father "was there as a tourist on an approved tour itinerary with Korean guides.""He had all the paperwork and was doing all the things you're supposed to do in order to go see the country," he added.Mr. Newman, who has visited Cuba, according to his son, traveled to North Korea with Juche Travel Services, an agency that advertises offices in Beijing, Berlin and London. The group was founded in 2011, according to its website. Reached by telephone, the head of the London office, David Thompson, said that he could not talk because of Mr. Newman's detention.In the last several years, and particularly under Kim Jong-un, who became the country's leader in 2011, North Korea has tried to attract Western tourists.The government opened a dolphin aquarium in Pyongyang last year, and despite a lack of money that keeps many of its people hungry, it has started to build a ski resort at Masikryong on the east coast. The Swiss government recently refused to sell ski equipment for the project, saying the country should not be able to afford such a luxury.A wealthy European businessman who visited last year said he and his family were drawn by the desire to see a Communist country where a three-generation family dynasty has ruled with an iron hand. "You don't even see that in Cuba," said the businessman, who declined to be named for fear of publicity. During the visit, the family paid 200 euros, or about $270, a person for a seat at the main stadium to see a synchronized dancing show, visited a farm and was taken to a power plant. "As a tourist, there is no freedom," the businessman said. "After two days, I was ready to leave."For the last decade or so, two travel agencies, Young Pioneer Tours and Koryo Tours, have been the main conduits for Western tourists, North Korea experts said. Juche Travel Services, which bills itself as tailored for the "modern independent traveler," was a relative newcomer, they said. Named after the state ideology of "self-reliance," Juche Travel Services advertises offbeat tours, including a bird-watching tour for October, and suggests an arms and equipment exhibition run by the Korean People's Army as an attraction.All travel agencies outside North Korea must make their arrangements through the state-run Korea International Travel Company, which provides the guides, said Mr. Namkung, who has arranged trips for Bill Richardson, the former United Nations ambassador and governor of New Mexico, and Eric E. Schmidt, the executive chairman of Google. Mr. Newman and his traveling companion, Mr. Hamrdla, stayed at the Yanggakdo Hotel in Pyongyang, a 47-floor building on an island. The hotel is one of the two main Western-style hotels in the capital, and it is increasingly favored by the North Koreans for tourists because its location makes it difficult for visitors to wander very far without being seen.
HONG KONG — The Chinese government on Saturday claimed the right to identify, monitor and possibly take military action against aircraft that enter a newly declared "air defense identification zone," which covers sea and islands also claimed by Japan and threatens to escalate an already tense dispute over some of the maritime territory.The move appeared to be another step in China's efforts to intensify pressure on Japan over the Japanese-controlled islands in the East China Sea that are at the heart of the dispute.The declaration, from a Ministry of National Defense spokesman, Col. Yang Yujun, accompanied the ministry's release of a map, geographic coordinates and rules in Chinese and English that said "China's armed forces will take defensive emergency measures to respond to aircraft that do not cooperate in identification or refuse to follow orders.""The objective is to defend national sovereignty and territorial and air security, as well as to maintain orderly aviation," Colonel Yang said in comments issued on the ministry's website.Later Saturday, China's air force said it had sent its first planes, including fighter jets, to enforce the rules. Soon afterward, Japan scrambled its own fighter jets, Reuters reported, citing Japan's Defense Ministry. A ministry spokesman said two Chinese reconnaissance planes had flown within about 25 miles of what Japan considers its airspace, Reuters said.The Chinese announcement followed months of increasing tension over the uninhabited islands as China appeared to be taking moves to establish its claim to them, including more frequent ship patrols in the area. Those patrols have led to cat-and-mouse games between Chinese and Japanese ships near the islands, known as the Senkaku in Japan and the Diaoyu in China.But trying to control the airspace over the islands could prove particularly problematic. Japan considers that airspace its own and has scrambled fighter jets in the past to try to ensure that Chinese aircraft did not enter. As the potential for a miscalculation that leads to conflict has increased, the United States has become worried that as an ally of Japan, it could be dragged into any conflict with China.Secretary of State John Kerry said the United States was "deeply concerned" about China's announcement. "Escalatory action will only increase tensions in the region and create risks of an incident," Mr. Kerry said in a statement. He urged China "to exercise caution and restraint."The Japanese Foreign Ministry said the government had lodged a "serious protest" with China. An official there, speaking on the condition of anonymity as is ministry practice, said the head of Asian affairs had called the Chinese Embassy in Tokyo on Saturday to warn that the move could escalate tensions and was "extremely dangerous as it could trigger unpredictable events."Colonel Yang said that the declaration of the air zone was not aimed at any particular country, and that it would not impede the freedom of commercial flight over the East China Sea. But his words left little doubt that the move could be used against the Japanese government and military aircraft.The longstanding dispute between Beijing and Tokyo over the islands flared last year, before Xi Jinping assumed leadership of the Chinese Communist Party in November. The spark was a decision by the Japanese government to buy some of the islands from a Japanese citizen. Japan said the move was to keep the islands out of the hands of a nationalist politician who might increase tensions, but China saw the purchase as Japan's effort to strengthen its hold on the islands.The new Chinese rules left unclear how frequently and thoroughly China intends to enforce them. But Chinese state-run news media widely reported the announcement, which could kindle public expectations that the government will take steps to back up its words.Military experts have said that even if Japan and China seek to avoid outright confrontation over the islands, there is the risk that an unplanned episode could spiral into a wider military conflict.
Champagne flowed last Monday night as Hong Kong's business elite gathered with top Bloomberg L.P. executives at a dinner for 100 guests at a cultural center in a former British colonial military complex.Daniel L. Doctoroff, the company's chief executive and the steward of the business empire behind the wealth of Mayor Michael R. Bloomberg of New York, had flown in to toast a corporate milestone: In 20 years, sales of Bloomberg's financial data terminals in Hong Kong had ballooned into a business bringing in more than half a billion dollars a year.But behind the celebration were some troubling developments. The growth of Bloomberg's terminal sales worldwide had softened over the last several years, and had dropped significantly in the last year in mainland China, a vast untapped market. Bloomberg News's tough reporting last year about China had prompted officials to cancel subscriptions for the lucrative terminals, frustrating the company's Beijing sales staff.And, just blocks from last week's celebratory dinner, at the Hong Kong bureau of Bloomberg News, anxious journalists were still dealing with the implications of a decision by top editors weeks earlier not to publish a hard-hitting article about a Chinese tycoon. Bloomberg employees had asserted in published reports that Matthew Winkler, the editor in chief, had justified killing the piece, citing concerns that Bloomberg journalists would be expelled from China in retaliation.Later that night, just hours after Mr. Doctoroff raised his glass, the company confirmed that one of the writers of the article was no longer an employee.As Mr. Bloomberg prepares to leave office and resume a more direct role in the company he founded, he rejoins an operation whose core business, after two decades of heady growth, has slowed, and whose news division has more than doubled since he left. Interviews with current and former employees show that the business and news operations exist in uneasy tension, and occasionally collide.Bloomberg suddenly faces newsroom layoffs, a shift in emphasis back to financial news and skepticism from the business side that investigative journalism might not be worth the potential problems it could create for terminal sales.Mr. Winkler and other senior editors denied that the article from China was killed, saying it was still active but not ready for publication. The episode, however, brought more unwanted attention after embarrassing revelations this spring that some reporters had used a function on the terminals to monitor some customer activity, angering some of Bloomberg's biggest clients.Against this backdrop, some top executives have begun to question the role of the company's news operation. Executives on the business side insist that short bursts of market-moving news, not prize-winning investigative journalism, are what Bloomberg's paying customers want. Editors are increasingly asked to send only brief, bullet-point news reports to terminals — easily digestible facts for traders and hedge fund managers."To the bankers that run the place, you have a redheaded stepchild that is a rounding error in the scheme of things that is managing to create a lot of trouble," one news employee said.This person, like the more than two dozen current and former business and news executives interviewed for this article, agreed to discuss the company's operations but insisted on anonymity, citing strict nondisclosure agreements.In an interview last week, Mr. Doctoroff said the backlash this spring over reporters' monitoring of clients "did prompt self-reflection," and one senior executive said the mayor's return would be a "reset" moment for the company.Last Monday, Bloomberg began to lay off roughly 40 people, about 2 percent of its news staff. Coverage of culture and sports would be scaled back, and the investigative unit had losses as well. The signal accompanying the announcement was clear: "We must have the courage to say no to certain areas of coverage in order to have enough firepower in areas we want to own," Mr. Winkler wrote to the staff.Bloomberg said it would add around 100 newsroom positions next year, many in a division called First Word, which produces a Twitter-like burst of short-form news of market-moving importance. (A spokesman said that even with the recent cuts, the number of employees at Bloomberg News by the end of 2013 would be up from last year.)Mr. Doctoroff said the terminals' users are a "very narrow audience" for news articles. (One of the most popular articles on Friday was "Day J.F.K. Died We Traded Through Tears as N.Y.S.E. Shut.") But, he added, the company's journalism serves a vital role in bringing credibility to Bloomberg, and added value to the terminals, which make up about 85 percent of the company's revenue.
GUANGZHOU, China — Slack-jawed and perspiring, Chen Weizhou gazed at a pair of life-size female dolls clad, just barely, in lingerie and lace stockings. Above these silicone vixens, an instructional video graphically depicted just how realistic they felt once undressed.A 46-year-old tour bus driver, Mr. Chen had come earlier this month to the Guangzhou National Sex Culture Festival "for fun," which was not how he described intimacy with his wife, who did not attend. "When you're young sex is so mysterious, but once you're married it gets really bland," he said, barely taking his eyes off the screen.With an official theme of "healthy sex, happy families," the 11th annual exposition sought to remedy the plight of Chinese men like Mr. Chen — and their wives, if they are married.The overwhelming presence of men at the festival mirrored a demographic imbalance in China, where decades of the one-child rule and a cultural preference for sons combined with illegal sex-selective abortions have distorted the country's gender ratio to 118 newborn boys for every 100 girls in 2012, rather than the normal 103 boys. In Guangdong Province, home to a migrant worker population of 30 million — China's largest — the scarcity of women leaves bachelors with limited options.Filling an exhibition center here in the capital of Guangdong in southern China, the festival was a three-day mating ritual between capitalism and hedonism, all diligently observed by that most prudish of chaperones: the Chinese government. Erotic possibilities abounded, including a transgender fashion show, sliced deer antler marketed as an aphrodisiac, naughty nurse costumes and some flesh-color objects disconcertingly called "Captain Stabbing."Three decades after China began shedding its priggish Mao-era mores, sex is now a big business here. Across the country, pink-lit "hair salons" staffed by provocatively garbed women compete with massage parlors and late-night paid companions who slip their business cards under hotel room doors. Those looking to enhance their encounters can shop at countless "adult health product" stores and on the Internet.Most of the inventory is made in China. According to state news media, more than 1,000 Chinese companies manufacture around 70 percent of the world's sex toys, generating $2 billion a year as of 2010.The bounty of carnal titillation must contend with the firm hand of the Communist Party, which bans pornography and punishes those guilty of "group licentiousness" in the name of protecting traditional Chinese values. But the party's moral authority has frayed of late because of the publicized antics of its friskier members. In June, a government official was sentenced to 13 years in prison for corruption after a video surfaced showing him in bed with an 18-year-old woman. His fall came three months after photos depicting a coterie of six naked people, including a party official and his wife, exploded on the Internet.In an attempt to give the sex festival a veneer of respectability, government-run medical organizations sponsored booths in a side room, which were, unsurprisingly, desolate. The main draw was lust.Thousands of visitors, nearly all middle-aged men wielding cameras, poured through the aisles in search of any visible flesh. "Guys have been taking my picture all day," said a bikini-clad model, Liang Lin, 23, who was hugging her bare midriff defensively as a throng of men jostled desperately to get a better shot.Not far away, a male crowd waited for a diminutive Japanese pornography star named Rei Mizuna to appear. When she finally emerged from a dressing room to hand out racy autographed photos, her frenzied fans surged forward with such zeal they shattered a glass display case.Those unrequited desires have helped spawn a booming domestic sex toy industry. "A stuffed man doesn't know what it's like to be hungry," explained a salesman at one booth filled with inflatable dolls. Just then, an older gentleman approached and tried to bargain over an $8 figure with black tresses and a vacant stare.
BEIJING — "But you see, when your only child dies, then you're not a mother anymore. You're not anything really. And that's what I'm trying to get used to," Mrs. Crawley tells Lady Edith in season four of the English period drama " Downton Abbey ," explaining the special agony of losing her son, Matthew.China is full of Mrs. Crawleys. About 76,000 only children die annually from accidents or disease, according to the Chinese news media, citing 2010 government health statistics. More than a million "orphan parent" families have been created since the one-child policy was formally instituted in 1980 and the number of single-child families began to soar.To use a phrase the aristocrats of "Downton Abbey" would have recognized, many Chinese couples were never allowed "an heir and a spare," with terrifying consequences for some. Social security in China is primarily the responsibility of the family, not the state, and adult children are legally obliged to support their parents in old age. Losing one's only child can mean destitution, as well as grief.But the policy is drawing down. This month, the government announced further changes, to allow couples in which one spouse is an only child to have two children (previously that was possible only for couples in which both spouses were only children). There are other exceptions, including for ethnic minorities and for rural couples whose first child is a girl.As the policy unravels, long-suppressed emotions are rising to the surface. Some people are wondering: Did we take a hit for the state? Were we right to comply?"I should have had a second child. I know many people who did," said Ms. Tao, a retired 52-year-old from Shijiazhuang, an industrial city in Hebei Province, who asked to be identified only by her surname. Her 25-year-old daughter is a student in Britain.Some city folk hid their illegal children in the countryside, buying a hukou, the all-important household registration, from local officials, she said. The price in villages can be as low as 300 renminbi, or about $50, far below the fee in cities, say people who have paid.But Ms. Tao, like many, did not dare break the law. The prospect of fines, forced abortion and, most important, losing her job in a state-owned factory were too intimidating."We are the victims of the one-child policy," she said.Not so much, perhaps, as parents who lost their only child. Slowly, they are attracting more attention and financial support. Chongqing, the earliest city to do so, gives 3,120 renminbi to each such parent per year, and Zhengzhou will increase payments to 3,240 renminbi from 1,200, China News.Net reported. Beijing will spend 2,800 renminbi on each bereaved parent, buying health insurance, among other things, the report said.Responding to the social challenge, in July 2012, Wang Haipeng, an I.T. worker in his 20s in Beijing, set up a website called "Lost Singles Family" and an instant messenger group, "Love for Lost Singles Families."Their biggest need is support and communication, said Mr. Wang. "Some have financial difficulties; some are well-off. But they all need to talk."The site has about 1,000 registered users, Mr. Wang said, but about 50,000 people who read it. Suicide is a risk."Some people say they can't take it anymore, don't want to live, it's too painful," he said. After that they may disappear. Though it is not always clear what happened, there have been reports of people who choose to die rather than face old age with no one to care for them.Fuxian Yi, a medical scientist at the University of Wisconsin and author of "Big Country With an Empty Nest," estimates that far more than one million families are involved. He calculates that 220 million single children were born between 1975 and 2010. News reports in China often quote a lower figure of 190 million.Over all, of 10,000 people born, 463 will die by the age of 25, he said in an email, citing state data. If so, eventually about 10 million families in China may face a grief like Mrs. Crawley's.
BEIJING — China has permitted rare street protests and sent armadas of fishing boats to show its growing national interest in a small string of islands in the East China Sea. Earlier this year, the Chinese military locked its radar on a Japanese navy vessel.Each step seemed like a measured escalation in the long-running territorial dispute, intended to press Japan to negotiate over jurisdiction of the islands. But they also seemed calibrated to avoid a sharp international backlash — or to raise expectations too high at home.But by imposing a new air defense zone over the islands last weekend, Beijing may have miscalculated. It provoked a quick, pointed challenge from the United States, set off alarm bells among Asian neighbors and created a frenzy of nationalist expression inside China on hopes that the new leadership team in Beijing would push for a decisive resolution of the longstanding dispute.On Wednesday, after the Pentagon sent two B-52 bombers defiantly cruising around China's new air defense zone for more than two hours, Beijing appeared to backpedal. The overflights went unchallenged, and some civilian airlines ignored China's new assertion of air rights."We will make corresponding responses according to different situations and how big the threat is," the spokesman at the Foreign Ministry, Qin Gang, said when asked about China's lack of enforcement against the American planes.Under President Xi Jinping, China has suggested that it intends to make a more robust defense of its national interests, including in maritime disputes, to match its rising economic and military power. But even some Chinese analysts say they wonder if the new leadership team fully anticipated the response to the latest assertion of rights — or had in mind a clear Plan B if it met with strong resistance."I believe Xi Jinping and his associates must have predicted the substance of this reaction; whether they underestimated the details of the reaction, I'm not sure," said Shi Yinhong, an occasional adviser to the government and a professor of international relations at Renmin University.China does appear determined to escalate the issue of the uninhabited islands, known as Diaoyu in China and the Senkaku in Japan, as a way of forcing the Japanese to negotiate and give up control of territory that has symbolic and strategic value for both countries. In the long term, China has not tried to disguise its goal of weakening the alliance between the United States and Japan and supplanting the United States as the dominant naval power in the Western Pacific.Beijing is especially frustrated that its previous, more cautious steps to convince Japan of the seriousness of its claim to the islands have not prompted Japan, which administers them, to negotiate in earnest."Japan always has the backing of the United States and shows unbelievable arrogance to the Chinese proposal to have talks on a bilateral basis," said Zhu Feng, a professor of international relations at Beijing University and one of China's more moderate voices on Japan. "Japan's arrogance is unacceptable."But if China has been trying to drive a wedge between Washington and the Japanese government of Prime Minister Shinzo Abe, their strategy seems to have backfired, at least for now.The United States had for months seemed reluctant to get involved or take sides in a dispute that carries so much emotional weight for China. American officials complained that some Japanese leaders had made nationalist gestures that antagonized China, worsening the tensions. And the Obama administration dodged requests by Japanese leaders to take a clearer stance in their favor.That hesitation seems to have largely vanished since China pronounced it was expanding its hold on the region's airspace.With the flyover by the B-52s, the United States has shown it is more willing to work with Japan in opposing China's efforts to unilaterally force a change in the status quo, even if the United States still takes a neutral stance in the islands dispute itself. Hours after China declared its new air zone, Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel reaffirmed that the United States would stand by its security treaty obligations to aid Japan if it was attacked.
BEIJING — China sent fighter jets on the first patrols of its new air defense zone over disputed islands in the East China Sea on Thursday, the state news agency, Xinhua, said.The patrols followed announcements by Japan and South Korea that their military planes had flown through the zone unhindered by China.The tit-for-tat flights between China on one side and South Korea and Japan on the other heightened the tensions over the East China Sea where China and Japan are at loggerheads over islands they both claim.The airspace in the new zone announced by China last week overlaps a similar zone declared by Japan more than 40 years ago. Both zones are over the islands known as Diaoyu in China and Senkaku in Japan.China has said that noncommercial aircraft entering the zone without prior notification would face "defensive emergency measures."China would take "relevant measures according to different air threats" to defend the country's airspace, Xinhua reported.In a direct challenge to earlier threats by China that it could take military action against foreign aircraft entering the zone, the United States sent two unarmed B-52 bombers to fly through the airspace for more than two hours overnight Monday. The Chinese military said it had monitored the flight path of the American planes, and China appeared to backpedal from its initial threats of action.In an unusually strong editorial in English, Global Times, a newspaper that often strikes a nationalist tone, said in Friday's editions: "Maybe an imminent conflict will be waged between China and Japan. Our ultimate goal is to beat its willpower and ambition to institute strategic confrontation against China."Elsewhere, the paper said that the United States was not the target of the new zone.Responding to the situation, the State Department said, "We have urged the Chinese to exercise caution and restraint, and we are consulting with Japan and other affected parties throughout the region."Analysts have said that China's declaration of the new zone is meant to whittle away at Japan's hold on the islands. But the unexpected move is also seen as another attempt by an increasingly assertive China to establish itself as the dominant regional power, displacing the United States.China had seemed to be stepping back this week from its original harsh tone, when it said aircraft entering the airspace needed to file flight plans in advance or face the possibility of military action. On Wednesday, a Foreign Ministry spokesman said China would decide on a case-by-case basis how strongly to respond to those who break its rules.In a further clarification of its original stance, the People's Liberation Army said Thursday that the new air zone was "not a territorial airspace" and did not mean that China would take immediate military action against aircraft that entered the zone.At a monthly briefing for Chinese reporters, a spokesman, Yang Yujun, said it was "incorrect" to suggest China would shoot down planes in the zone. On Thursday, Japan's top government spokesman, Yoshihide Suga, said that the Chinese had not been notified of the Japanese flights, and reported that China had not scrambled its fighter jets to intercept them.The South Korean government announced that it, too, had flown aircraft through the zone without alerting Beijing. Chinese officials said they had monitored the flight by what the South Koreans described as a surveillance aircraft. Like Japan, South Korea claims sovereignty over some territory in seas beneath the airspace, but Seoul enjoys warmer ties with Beijing than does Tokyo.During a previously scheduled defense meeting on Thursday, South Korea asked China to change the boundaries of the new zone, according to the South Korean Yonhap news agency. But China rejected the request, said a spokesman for South Korea's Defense Ministry, Kim Min-seok, according to the Yonhap report.
BEIJING — China is investigating an executive at the China Export and Credit Insurance Corporation for graft, the ruling Communist Party's corruption watchdog said on Sunday, making him the latest target of a widening corruption crackdown.Dai Chunning, a vice president at the company, which is also called Sinosure, is "suspected of serious discipline violations", the Central Commission for Discipline Inspection (CCDI) said on its website.It gave no further details in a brief statement but in China the term discipline violations generally denotes corruption. The company could not immediately be reached for comment.China's President Xi Jinping has said endemic corruption threatens the party's very survival and has vowed to go after high-flying "tigers" as well as lowly "flies".Authorities have already announced the investigation or arrest of a handful of senior officials, among them former officials of oil giant PetroChina in what appears to be the biggest graft probe into a state-run firm in years.
BEIJING — Two aspiring American rappers said Saturday that they had filmed part of a music video in North Korea, hoping the novel locale will make a hit.The rappers known as Pacman and Peso did not say where and how they filmed the footage, which their fundraising proposal suggested would be done on a karaoke party bus in Pyongyang.Their custom trip was arranged through a travel agency specializing in taking Westerners to North Korea, according to the proposal.Americans are able to travel to North Korea on arranged tours and are constantly accompanied by North Korea minders.After an elderly American was detained in the country, the U.S. State Department issued a travel warning on Nov. 19, advising against all travel by U.S. citizens to North Korea.The two rappers said their trip shied away from politics."I mean we did not go there to be political. We just go down there to shoot our video and that about the reason why we went, not political," said Pacman — whose real name is Anthony Bobb.The duo from the Washington area spoke to reporters at an airport in Beijing upon their return from a five-day trip to North Korea."Nobody shot a video in North Korea, let alone thought of it. Nobody even thought of making a video in North Korea. You know what I'm saying?" said Peso, whose real name is Dontray Ennis.They raised more than $10,000 on the crowdsourcing site Kickstarter to fund their trip.The rappers said the unusual move could jumpstart their music careers. They hope to release the video next month.North Korea has detained at least six Americans since 2009, including journalists accused of trespassing and others accused of trying to spread Christianity. North Korea state media claimed Saturday that 85-year-old Korean War veteran Merrill Newman had apologized for committing "hostile acts" against the state during a trip in October, but the report could not be independently verified.The rappers said they encountered no problem while in North Korea. "They treated us well, like I was sick out there for good two days and they took care of me until I got over the sickness," Peso said.
WASHINGTON — The United States on Friday advised U.S. commercial airlines to notify Chinese authorities of flight plans over the East China Sea although a U.S. administration official said that did not mean Washington accepted China's new rules.The directive came as tensions escalated over disputed islands in the East China Sea and China scrambled jets on Friday in response to two U.S. spy planes and 10 Japanese aircraft entering its new air defense zone.China last week announced that foreign aircraft passing through the new air defense zone should identify themselves to the Chinese authorities."The U.S. government generally expects that U.S. carriers operating internationally will operate consistent with NOTAMs (Notices to Airmen) issued by foreign countries," the State Department said in a statement."Our expectation of operations by U.S. carriers consistent with NOTAMs does not indicate U.S. government acceptance of China's requirements."On Wednesday, State Department spokeswoman Jen Psaki said U.S. carriers were being advised to take steps to operate safely over the East China Sea, but she did not know whether the new rules would affect commercial airlines, or just military aircraft.A U.S. administration official told Reuters on Friday that China's action appeared to be an attempt "to unilaterally change the status quo in the East China Sea and thus will raise regional tensions and increase the risk of miscalculation, confrontation and accidents.""We urge the Chinese to exercise caution and restraint, and we are consulting with Japan and other affected parties, throughout the region," the U.S. official said.Beijing's new rules mean aircraft have to report flight plans to China, maintain radio contact and reply promptly to identification inquiries as well as display clear markings of their nationality and registration.
TAIPEI, Taiwan — Twenty-five miles west of here on Taiwan's rugged northwest coast, a cavernous warehouse under construction represents the new priorities for an island where the streets were once littered with piles of discarded electronics and other refuse.At the clean and tidy construction site, building materials are stacked neatly and even workers' cigarette butts are carefully collected. The surroundings are designed to evoke a Roman villa, with lagoon, garden and canopies. The energy-saving shade tiles are made out of old CDs, DVDs and computer motherboards.It is the latest expansion effort in a vast industrial park that recycles electronics, glass, plastics, paper and just about anything than can be reused or mined for materials. When the warehouse project is complete, Super Dragon Technology, one of the island's biggest recyclers, will be able to securely store gold and other precious metals.Trash is valuable here — the byproduct of a world now dependent on technology. Taiwan, which is home to a host of technology companies like Asus, Acer and HTC, produces more electronics per capita than any other country."Recycling became huge because of the electronics firms," said Chen Wei-Hsian, the secretary general of the Formosa Association of Resource Recycling, an industry organization. "That's why it's grown from about 100 recycling outfits to over 2,000."In 2012, waste companies had revenue of 65.8 billion Taiwan dollars, or $2.2 billion, according to the Industrial Development Bureau at the Ministry of Economic Affairs. That is up from 24.9 billion Taiwan dollars a decade earlier.With gold accumulating in its vaults, Super Dragon is even considering a new venture, according to Ding Guo-tsuen, the company's chief technical officer."We are thinking about changing to a precious metals trading business, because we can make pure gold at about 99.99 percent," said Mr. Ding, adding that the company could apply to the London Bullion Market Association, a trade organization focused on the gold and silver market. "We have some great inventory."The commercial efforts, along with a government fund and increased consumer awareness, have helped clean up the country.The country has one of the highest household recycling rates in the world, roughly 42 percent, up from 5 percent in 1998, according to Taiwan's Environmental Protection Administration. The development bureau estimates that the rate for industrial waste — the bulk of the country's total — was about 80 percent last year, amounting to roughly 14 million tons.The industry was born out of necessity.In the boom days of the 1980s and 1990s, factories in Taiwan made products as varied as plastic umbrellas and high-tech electronics for the rest of the world. As production soared, the land-poor island of 23 million people began running out of places to dump its waste.Mountains of fetid household waste rotted in the streets. Public and disused spaces became dumping grounds for some of the toxic waste from the industrial boom.At the time, infrastructure to tackle the problem barely existed. Large-scale, commercial waste-processing facilities were scant. Few households recycled. And pulling valuable materials from scrapped technology was dangerous. Wu Yao-hsun, the chairman of Super Dragon Technology, says he believes he got cancer from the toxic processes used to extract gold, silver and other precious metals from the country's discarded electronics."In the old days, nobody knew the dangers, they just knew there was money inside," said Mr. Wu, who is now cancer-free. "The environmental problems were also huge. But the research and infrastructure were lacking. We had to modify our own machinery."With trash and toxic materials accumulating, public anger simmered over how local governments should deal with the problem. At the same time, a growing army of social activists, buoyed by the island's first free presidential elections, demanded higher standards of living from a government that had focused on economic growth at any cost.
BEIJING — British Prime Minister David Cameron oversaw the signing of agreements in areas from space exploration to football training during an official visit to China on Monday that compensates for one earlier scrapped by Beijing in retaliation for his meeting with the Dalai Lama.Cameron was leading Britain's largest trade mission to China, with six government ministers and representatives from business, universities and the health care sector participating in the three-day visit.Cameron was expected to voice support for a deal to free up trade between China and the European Union, China's largest trading partner. Such a deal could be worth up to 1.8 billion British pounds ($2.95 billion) a year to the British economy, according to the U.K. government.Economic exchanges with Britain were held up after Cameron met last year with the Dalai Lama, Tibet's exiled Buddhist leader, whom China reviles as a separatist. Those exchanges were restored only in October following London's assurances that Cameron had no further plans to meet the 78-year-old cleric.Cameron met with Chinese Premier Li Keqiang on Monday and oversaw the signing of 10 agreements that included a treaty on legal assistance in criminal matters, a pact on space exploration cooperation, and agreements on enhancing bilateral investment and developing China's use of gas.Li said the sides would seek to strengthen cooperation between their traditional and new media and Cameron said Britain would open a consulate in the central Chinese city of Wuhan, the country's fifth in mainland ChinaSeparately, an agreement was announced to expand the British Premier League's program to train Chinese coaches and referees and to boost cooperation between it and China's top-flight Super League.Cameron told Li the delegation was interested in building trade relations."We particularly want to explore all the opportunities of economic openness, openness of Britain to Chinese investment, which we've seen huge amounts of in recent months and years, but also the opportunities for further opening our trade relations," Cameron said.Neither leader mentioned the Dalai Lama meeting in their statements after the signing ceremony, although Li said China appreciated Britain's respect for its "core interests and its major concerns."Cameron said discussions should include "those issues where we have differences," and said Britain looked forward to holding a human rights dialogue with China early next year."We should approach these with mutual respect and understanding, as we did today," Cameron said.
TOKYO — Japanese Chief Cabinet Secretary Yoshihide Suga said on Monday there was no change to Japan's policy of not notifying Chinese authorities when its commercial aircraft fly through China's new air defense identification zone.Asked if the government planned to alter its earlier request to domestic air carriers that they not notify China of their flight plans, Suga said, "Our stance won't be changed."Japan's top air carriers, Japan Airlines and ANA, earlier told Reuters they have made no change to their plans of not notifying China of their flight plans for aircraft flying through the zone.
HONG KONG — Chinese manufacturing barely expanded in November, growing at about the same rate as the previous month, two surveys showed in further evidence that the world's No. 2 economy is undergoing a sluggish recovery.HSBC's purchasing managers' index released Monday slipped to 50.8 from 50.9 in October, on a 100-point scale on which numbers above 50 indicate expansion.HSBC said that while November's reading was little changed, it was the second-highest level in eight months, indicating China's massive manufacturing industries are improving, though marginally.The reading was also an improvement from a preliminary reading of 50.4 released earlier last month."China's manufacturing sector kept relatively steady growth momentum in November, as the final manufacturing PMI was revised up from the flash reading on the back of faster new business gains," HSBC economist Qu Hongbin said.The report comes a day after an official survey that found manufacturing activity was unchanged.The China Federation of Logistics and Purchasing said on Sunday that its PMI remained at 51.4, the same as October.China's leaders are counting on a continuing recovery to avoid the need for further stimulus as they focus on longer-term reforms aimed at reorienting the economy to growth based on domestic consumption instead of exports and investment.China's economic growth rose to 7.8 percent in the third quarter after slumping to a two-decade low of 7.5 percent in the previous three months.The HSBC report, based on responses from 420 businesses, found that manufacturing output grew for the fourth straight month and at the strongest pace since March.New orders also expanded at the fastest rate in eight months, although new orders from customers in the U.S. and Europe expanded by a fraction, "suggesting that new order growth was largely driven by domestic demand," the report said.
SHANGHAI — Acclaimed film director Zhang Yimou said he and his wife have three children after authorities summoned his agent amid speculation he had violated China's one-child policy and fathered seven children.In a statement posted on the verified Weibo account of Zhang's office late on Sunday, the director of epics "Hero" and "House of Flying Daggers" apologised for his actions.He said he was cooperating with family planning authorities in the eastern city of Wuxi and would accept any punishment."Zhang Yimou and his wife Chen Ting confirm that they have two sons and a daughter," the Weibo post read. "For the negative consequences of my actions, I would like to express to the public my heart-felt apologies."The official Xinhua news agency reported last week that Wuxi authorities would question Zhang's agent after the director went missing.In May, online reports surfaced that Zhang, who staged the dazzling Beijing Olympics opening ceremony in 2008, had at least seven children and could be liable for a 160 million yuan ($26 million) fine, Xinhua said.Authorities said they were unable to locate Zhang and had dispatched teams to track down the director and his wife Chen Ting.Zhang, 61, was once the bad boy of Chinese cinema, his movies banned at home but popular overseas. He has since become a darling of the ruling Communist Party, while long being a subject of tabloid gossip for alleged trysts with his actresses.The government said last week that it would allow couples to have a second child if one of the parents was an only child. It was the most significant relaxation of its population control regime in nearly three decades.
BEIJING — North Korea has accused an American veteran of war crimes and on Saturday released a video of him confessing to what it said were "hostile acts" during the Korean War and while he was visiting the country in October.The veteran, Merrill Newman, 85, of Palo Alto, Calif., who has been held since Oct. 26, appeared on the video dressed in casual Western clothes and wearing glasses as he read excerpts from an apology written on several sheets of white paper. The text contained several awkward English constructions and grammatical errors.In the apology, Mr. Newman said he was an adviser for the Kuwol Unit of the United Nations Korea Sixth Partisan Regiment, which served with the Intelligence Bureau of the Far East Command.A person familiar with Mr. Newman's military record and his current situation in captivity in North Korea said that Mr. Newman served as an adviser in that unit in 1953 before the armistice. The unit operated behind the lines in North Korea, but Mr. Newman conducted his duties as an adviser on Chodo, an island off the west coast of what is now North Korea, the person said. In the beginning of the video, Mr. Newman mentioned Chodo as the place where he was stationed. The person speaking about Mr. Newman's situation declined to be identified because of the delicacy of the case.The Swedish ambassador visited Mr. Newman on Saturday, and told his family that he was in good health and being treated well, according to a statement from the family. The United States has no diplomatic relations with North Korea and has been dealing with Mr. Newman's situation through the Swedish Embassy, which represents its interests in the North."Our focus now is on getting him home quickly to join his loved ones, who miss him deeply," the statement said. "We are asking that the D.P.R.K. authorities take into account his health and his age and, as an act of humanitarian compassion, allow him to depart immediately for home." The Democratic People's Republic of Korea, or D.P.R.K., is North Korea's official name.In the apology, Mr. Newman describes how he wanted to meet "surviving soldiers and pray for the souls of the dead soldiers" from the unit he worked with. If he met any surviving soldiers he planned to put them in touch with members of the Kuwol Partisan Comrades-in-Arms Association who had escaped to South Korea, the apology said.An email from Mr. Newman to friends in South Korea telling them of his impending trip to North Korea and his hopes of meeting with relatives of the partisan group is embedded in the video of the apology.Mr. Newman said in the apology, the text of which was released by the state-run Korean Central News Agency, that he had asked his tour guide to look for families and relatives of the Comrades-in-Arms group, which is described in the apology as "an anti-Communist strategic plot organization."In a statement also released by the Korean news agency that accompanied the apology, North Korea characterized Mr. Newman's activities during the tour as "trying to look for spies and terrorists who conducted espionage and subversive activity" and to "connect them" to an anti-North Korean organization. It charged that Mr. Newman was "slandering" North Korea and had "perpetrated acts of infringing upon the dignity and sovereignty" of the country. The statement also referred to Mr. Newman's wartime activities."As I killed so many civilians and K.P.A. soldiers and destroyed strategic objects in the D.P.R.K. during the Korean War, I committed indelible offensive acts against the D.P.R.K. government and Korean people," the apology said.Col. Ben S. Malcom, who commanded a unit of about 800 North Korean anti-Communist partisans during the war, said American soldiers commanded and advised more than 20 partisan units that did everything from raiding North Korean military redoubts to counterfeiting North Korean currency, robbing banks and stealing oxen."We were the people who were leading the North Korean guerrilla forces" against the North Korean Army, said Colonel Malcom, 84. "That's probably the reason they are holding him at the present time," he said of Mr. Newman. Speaking Saturday from his home in Atlanta, Colonel Malcom said that given the partisan fighters' destructiveness, he was not surprised at North Korea's treatment of Mr. Newman."I wouldn't even consider going into North Korea," he said.
BEIJING — China launched its first ever extraterrestrial landing craft into orbit en route for the moon in the small hours of Monday, in a major milestone for its space programme.The Chang'e-3 lunar probe, which includes the Yutu or Jade Rabbit buggy, blasted off on board an enhanced Long March-3B carrier rocket from the Xichang Satellite Launch Centre in China's southwestern Sichuan province at 1:30 a.m. (1730 GMT).President Xi Jinping has said he wants China to establish itself as a space superpower, and the mission has inspired pride in China's growing technological prowess. State television showed a live broadcast of the rocket lifting off.If all goes smoothly, the rover will conduct geological surveys and search for natural resources after the probe touches down on the moon in mid-December as China's first spacecraft to make a soft landing beyond Earth."The probe has already entered the designated orbit," the official Xinhua news agency quoted Zhang Zhenzhong, director of the launch centre, as saying."I now announce the launch was successful.""We will strive for our space dream as part of the Chinese dream of national rejuvenation," he added.In 2007, China launched its first moon orbiter, the Chang'e-1 - named after a lunar goddess - which took images of the surface and analysed the distribution of elements.The lunar buggy was named the Jade Rabbit in a public vote, a folkloric reference to the goddess's pet.Chinese scientists have discussed the possibility of sending a human to the moon some time after 2020.In China's latest manned space mission in June, three astronauts spent 15 days in orbit and docked with an experimental space laboratory, part of Beijing's quest to build a working space station by 2020.If the lunar mission is successful, China will become the third country, after the United States and the former Soviet Union, to soft-land on the moon.But it is still far from catching up with the established space superpowers, whose moon landings date back more than four decades.China is looking to land a probe on the moon, release a moon rover and return the probe to the Earth in 2017, Xinhua said.Beijing insists its space programme is for peaceful purposes, but the U.S. Department of Defense has made clear it wants to prevent China's increasing space capabilities giving it any strategic advantage.China says it will share the technological achievements of its manned space programme with other nations, especially developing ones, and will offer to train astronauts from other countries.
HONG KONG — American expatriate Nancy Kissel, who is serving a life sentence for the "milkshake" murder of her Merrill Lynch banker husband, lost a bid to appeal against her conviction in Hong Kong on Tuesday.Kissel, 49, has been in jail since 2005 when she was found guilty of murdering her husband after giving him a drug-laced milkshake and then clubbing him to death with a metal ornament in their luxury home. She was convicted for a second time in 2011, following a retrial.The case engrossed Hong Kong with its tales of domestic violence, rough sex and adultery that cast a shadow over the high-flying expatriate lifestyles enjoyed by many financial professionals in the former British colony.The conviction was "neither unsafe nor unsatisfactory" and a significant amount of time had been given to the case, Court of Appeal Judge Wally Yeung said in rejecting Kissel's appeal.Kissel, looking calm, walked out of the court with the help of two policewomen. There were no family members present.Her defense team had argued that the prosecution had made errors in its case, including stating that the murder happened when her husband, Robert Kissel, was on a bed, which they said contradicted testimony from a prosecution expert that the death was more likely to have happened on the floor.They also said the prosecution improperly led the jury to ignore the fact that Kissel was suffering from depression at the time, and that the judge should have reminded jurors of the significance of this.During her retrial in 2011, Kissel had pleaded guilty to the lesser charge of manslaughter, with the defense arguing that she suffers from depression and had been provoked into the crime after years of sexual and physical abuse by her husband.
HONG KONG — Hong Kong confirmed its first case of deadly H7N9 bird flu on Monday in a further sign that the virus is continuing to spread beyond mainland China's borders.The case coincides with the 10th anniversary of the outbreak of Severe Acute Respiratory Syndrome, which killed nearly 300 people in Hong Kong and had a significant impact on the city's travel and retail industry.A 36-year-old Indonesian domestic helper with a history of contact with poultry and travel to Shenzhen in mainland China just north of Hong Kong has been confirmed infected by H7N9 and has been hospitalized in critical condition, Secretary for Food and Health Ko Wing-man told reporters late on Monday.
BEIJING — Famed film director Zhang Yimou and his wife violated China's strict family planning rules by having three children without approval and before they were married, local authorities said Monday.Zhang, the director of "The Flowers of War" starring Christian Bale, had on Sunday admitted flouting the rules by having three children with his wife but refuted reports that he had fathered seven children.A family planning bureau in Wuxi city in eastern Jiangsu province said on its microblog that their investigation had found that Zhang and Chen Ting flouted family planning policies and that the case was being handled according to laws and regulations.Reports had circulated online since May that Zhang, 62, had fathered seven children from two marriages and relationships with two other women. The People's Daily newspaper, the ruling Communist Party's mouthpiece, had reported that Zhang could face a fine of up to 160 million yuan ($26 million). People caught breaking China's family planning policy must pay a "social compensation fee" based on their annual income.In his first response to the reports, Zhang's office issued an open letter through its verified microblog account on the Twitter-like Sina Weibo site late Sunday denying that the director had seven children but admitting that he and his wife have two sons and a daughter in violation of China's one-child limits.Zhang and his wife "expressed their sincere apology to the public for the negative social impact that this has created," the letter said.The letter said Zhang and his wife were willing to be investigated by the family planning committee in Chen's hometown, the eastern city of Wuxi, and would accept whatever penalty the couple might incur. It did not provide details on how the couple had been able to evade family planning authorities thus far.The family planning office of Wuxi's Binhu district said in their online statement that the couple had had three children — in 2001, 2004 and 2006 in Beijing — without first seeking approval from family planning authorities, and out of wedlock. They obtained a marriage certificate in 2011, the statement said.Family planning policies and the fines for breaking them vary from city to city. Some consider unmarried childbearing illegal.The statement quoted an unnamed spokesman as saying the office hoped Zhang and Chen would continue to cooperate with family planning authorities and truthfully report their income at the time.Zhang's office rejected reports that he had fathered more children. It said unidentified individuals with "ulterior motives" had sent people to follow Zhang's children and photograph them and that Zhang's office reserved the right to take legal action.Known to many as China's one-child policy, the rules limit most urban couples to one child and allow two children for rural families if their firstborn is a girl. The government introduced the policy in 1979 as a temporary measure to curb a surging population, but it is still in place despite being reviled by many citizens.Last month, the party announced that it would allow couples to have two children if one of the parents is a single child, the first substantial easing of the one-child policy in nearly three decades.Zhang's 25-year career has made him one of Chinese cinema's top names. He is part of China's "fifth generation" of directors — those who gained attention in the West as their country emerged from economic and political isolation in the 1980s. Many of his films portray gritty rural life. In recent years, he has experimented with big-budget blockbusters, such as the 2011 "The Flowers of War," with an estimated $94 million budget.Zhang also designed the opulent opening and closing ceremonies for the 2008 Beijing Olympics.
KUNMING, China — Li Zhongying was freed from a Chinese labor camp ahead of schedule in September because, guards told her, the government was scrapping 're-education through labor', a heavily criticized penal system created in the 1950s.Several hundred other inmates were not so lucky, she said. Like Li, they were held without trial and forced to do factory work under what she called "cruel" conditions. They remained because they were drug offenders, she told Reuters.Many of China's re-education through labor camps, instead of being abolished in line with a ruling Communist Party announcement this month, are being turned into compulsory drug rehabilitation centers where inmates can be incarcerated for two years or more without trial.Human rights activists and freed inmates said drug offenders were still being forced to do factory work, as has been the practice under the re-education through labor system, colloquially known as 'laojiao'.New York-based Human Rights Watch estimates more than 60 percent of the 160,000 people in labor camps at the start of the year were there for drug offenses. Those people were unlikely to see any change in their treatment, it said."The drug detox people are doing exactly the same work," said Li, who spent 19 months in a labor camp in Kunming, the capital of southern Yunnan province.Police caught Li in Beijing early last year trying to petition the government over a grievance that dated back to the mid-1990s. They sent her home to Yunnan, where she was sentenced without trial to 21 months.Li, speaking from Beijing, said she worked at a biscuit factory inside the camp for up to 15 hours a day.A production line manager, speaking to Reuters outside the facility on a dusty road near Kunming airport late last week, said the inmates left inside were undergoing drug rehab. Among the items they made were handicrafts, including embroidered items, said the manager, declining to be identified.China's re-education through labor law, in place since 1957, empowered police to detain petty criminals for up to four years without trial.Many of the camps have housed drug rehab centers since mid-2008, when a new Anti-Drug Law came into force. Police can sentence drug offenders without trial to two years or more of compulsory rehabilitation, which can include forced labor, according to the law.Labor camps across China began changing their names to drug centers earlier this year, after a surprise announcement in January from Public Security Minister Meng Jianzhu that the network of 350 camps would be scrapped.They also took it as a cue to start releasing some people who were there for non-drug offences. The camps also hold petty criminals, prostitutes, petitioners and members of the banned spiritual group Falun Gong, rights activists say.Government websites and state media have reported steps to change the names of camps to drug rehab centers or to re-train staff this year in provinces including Guangdong, Hainan, Henan, Jiangsu, Jilin, Liaoning, Sichuan, Yunnan and Zhejiang, as well as in Shanghai and Beijing.The Communist Party's policymaking Central Committee announced the formal abolition of the re-education through labor camp system this month as part of a series of sweeping societal and economic reforms.Nicholas Bequelin, senior Asia researcher at Human Rights Watch, said he believed the "great majority" of forced labor camps would keep functioning as drug rehab centers.The shift did not represent a change of "direction or principles" on the part of the party, added Jiang Tianyong, a human rights lawyer in Beijing."It's wrong to say it has no meaning, but it's too optimistic to think it will change a lot," he said."This is how power in this country operates ... They can't use re-education through labor camps to control people, so they just change the name and control people."Rights groups have said conditions in labor camps are terrible and that detainees frequently had to do hard labor with minimal health and safety precautions.Despite long-standing international criticism of the camps, many Chinese are largely oblivious to them because many of those who are locked up are poor and on the fringes of society.The party this month said it saw the scrapping of the re-education through labor regime as an improvement to the justice system that would help it regain credibility with the populace and better protect human rights.Neither the Public Security Ministry nor the Justice Ministry responded to questions from Reuters about the transformation of the camps into drug rehab centers.In Shanghai, shiny metal characters saying "Shanghai No.4 Re-education Through Labor Facility" still adorn the gate, but the last inmates were released months ago and the compound is now a drug rehab centre, said a guard at the facility."The official documents, everything, has already been changed," said the guard, who did not give his name.On September 14, Su Yuhong left the Masanjia forced labor camp in northern Liaoning province.Masanjia made international headlines last year when a woman in the U.S. state of Oregon found a note in a Halloween decoration kit from Kmart that was supposedly written by a camp inmate who claimed to have played a part in making the product."Only the drug addicts were left," Su said by telephone from the city of Shenyang, where she now lives.By mid-June, the 21st Century Business Herald newspaper quoted Justice Ministry researcher Wang Gongyi as saying there were only 50,000 labor camp inmates left in the country, compared with hundreds of thousands in compulsory drug rehab centers.Beyond drug centers, Chinese authorities still have many ways to detain people without trial, rights activists said.Police can detain sex workers, for example, under a mechanism known as "custody and education".The terminology even appears to be interchangeable.An article in July on the Public Security Ministry website said prostitutes in Zhejiang province had been sentenced to "re-education through labor at a custody and education facility".Jiang, the lawyer, said police had used other means to curtail the freedom of some, including Falun Gong adherents and repeat petitioners.The number of court convictions of such people was on the rise, as was the use of 'rule of law study classes', which amounted to unlawful detention, he said."So long as (the authorities) feel a need to maintain stability, simply abolishing laojiao will not solve the problem," he said.
BEIJING — The wife of jailed Nobel Peace Prize Laureate Liu Xiaobo is unwell under house arrest and possibly suffering from severe depression, but refuses to seek medical help as she is afraid of further punishment, her friends said on Monday.The accounts from Liu Xia's friends shed a rare light into her condition since being held at home after Liu Xiaobo won the Nobel Prize in 2010.They also come two days ahead of a visit to China by U.S. Vice President Joe Biden, during which human rights will likely be raised amid a broader crackdown on dissent and freedom of speech and assembly.Liu Xia wrote to prominent human rights lawyer Mo Shaoping in August that she was "close to going crazy, close to mental collapse" during the time of the trial of her brother, Liu Hui, on fraud charges, Mo told Reuters."Her family is very worried and they've been giving her anti-depressants," Mo said. "It's been long-term and sustained - when you are cut off from the world for so long, how do you think your mental state would be like?"Mo said Liu Xia fears officials may force her to accept government-appointed doctors, citing how the government has previously used mental institutions to lock up dissidents.Liu is rarely allowed out of her home, except for occasional visits to her husband and family, and is almost never permitted visitors. She has not been convicted of any crime.Hao Jian, who teaches at the Beijing Film Academy and is a friend of Liu, said a friend saw Liu two days ago, when Liu stood wordlessly weeping as she stood at her apartment window."Based on our observations, it is getting more and more serious," Hao said. "Before she could speak but now she can't say anything."Hao, who saw Liu Xia in March, said Liu Xia was "extremely terrified and does not dare to consult doctors".Xu Youyu, a professor with the Chinese Academy of Social Sciences, a government think-tank, said he felt Liu Xia's "mental state was on the verge of collapse" the last time he saw her last December."She kept on repeating that the stress she was suffering is unthinkable," he said.Liu Xiaobo, a veteran dissident involved in the 1989 Tiananmen Square pro-democracy protests crushed by the Chinese army, was jailed in 2009 for 11 years on subversion charges for organizing a petition urging the overthrow of one-party rule.Liu Xia last month filed an extraordinary appeal for her husband's retrial, in a move that could renew the focus on China's human rights record.
BEIJING — Ping-pong diplomacy gave way to its football equivalent on Monday when the English Premier League, part of British Prime Minister David Cameron's delegation to China, agreed to help nurture the sport in its most promising growth market.The Chinese Super League (CSL) will give marketing advice to the Premier League and its clubs in China in exchange for help fostering elite, youth and community football there, part of a deal inked on the first of the prime minister's three-day visit.The Premier League and British Council also announced plans to expand a coaching and referee training programme under the Chinese Ministry of Education called Premier Skills with the aim of reaching more than 1.2 million Chinese students by 2016."It's great to kick off this visit to China with such a tangible example of how we are strengthening ties between our peoples and creating business opportunities for British companies along the way," Cameron said in a statement.Cameron's 100-person strong business delegation, the largest British mission of its kind ever, includes Premier League chief Richard Scudamore.The Premier League and British Council will also launch a referee training effort with the Chinese Football Association.Successful Olympic outings have made China a sporting powerhouse, but it has little in the way of a grassroots sports movement, with most of the country's top athletes churned out of state-sponsored training programmes.In FIFA's "Big Count" in 2006, China had only 708,754 amateur and youth football players from a population of 1.3 billion compared to 738,800 from 41 million in England.An opaque and powerful football bureaucracy, poor management, piecemeal youth training schemes and widespread underground betting rings have corroded the sport and restricted China to just one World Cup finals appearance and no Asian Cup success.Chinese football grabbed eyeballs when players such as Nicolas Anelka and Didier Drogba and high-profile coaches, including Italian Marcello Lippi, chose the big-spending CSL as their preferred destination to continue their careers.However, after just a season, both Drogba and Anelka ended their Chinese sojourn, accepting that the desire to play at a higher level was more important for them.Early this year, the Chinese Football Association (CFA) sanctioned 58 people, including two football chiefs, concluding a three-year long push to clean up rampant corruption in the sport.
BEIJING — U.S. Vice President Joe Biden should not expect to make much progress in defusing tensions over the East China Sea if he plans to repeat "erroneous and one-sided remarks" on the issue when he visits China, a top state-run paper said on Wednesday.Beijing's decision to declare an air defense identification zone in an area that includes disputed islands has triggered protests from the United States, Japan and South Korea and dominated Biden's talks in Tokyo on Tuesday.The United States has made clear it will stand by treaty obligations that require it to defend the Japanese-controlled islands, but it is also reluctant to get dragged into any military clash between rivals Japan and China.Biden is scheduled to meet Chinese President Xi Jinping and Vice President Li Yuanchao in Beijing on Wednesday before flying to Seoul later in the week.But he "should not expect any substantial headway if he comes simply to repeat his government's previous erroneous and one-sided remarks", the official English-language China Daily, often used by China to get its message across to the outside world, said in a strongly worded editorial."If the U.S. is truly committed to lowering tensions in the region, it must first stop acquiescing to Tokyo's dangerous brinkmanship. It must stop emboldening belligerent Japanese Prime Minister Shinzo Abe to constantly push the envelope of Japan's encroachments and provocations."All aircraft have to report flight plans to Chinese authorities, maintain radio contact and reply promptly to identification inquiries under the zone's rules.U.S., Japanese and South Korean military aircraft have breached the zone without informing Beijing since it was announced on November 23. Japanese and South Korean commercial carriers have also been told by their governments to ignore the rules.China has repeatedly said the zone was designed to reduce the risk of misunderstandings, and stressed that since it was set up there had been no issues with freedom of flight for civilian airlines.The Defense Ministry on Tuesday slammed what it said were "distortions" and "mud throwing" over the zone and the country's intentions."It is not aimed at any specific country or target, and it certainly does not constitute a threat towards any country or region," ministry spokesman Geng Yansheng said in a statement.Still, the move has added to regional nervousness about China's strategic intentions as Beijing presses its territorial claims in the South China Sea and ramps up an ambitious military modernization program.In Tokyo, Biden called on Japan and China to find ways to reduce tensions, repeating Washington was "deeply concerned" by the announcement of the zone.However, influential Chinese tabloid the Global Times, published by the Communist Party's official People's Daily, noted that Biden had not come down heavily on Japan's side, saying he failed to "sate Japan's appetite" for strong words.White House spokesman Jay Carney said on Tuesday that China's decision was a provocative attempt to change the status quo in the East China Sea and urged Beijing not to implement the zone.He urged China to work with Japan and South Korea "to establish confidence-building measures, including emergency communications channels, to address the dangers its recent announcement has created and to lower tensions".The China Daily said it was obvious Washington had taken Tokyo's side in the dispute."Biden needs to be reminded that Japan holds the key to peacefully solving the East China Sea dispute, because it is the Abe administration's recalcitrant denial of the existence of a dispute that has prevented Beijing and Tokyo from conducting meaningful communication and crisis control," it said.China wants Japan first to acknowledge that a formal dispute over sovereignty exists, experts say, a step that Tokyo has rejected for fear it would undermine its claim over the islands, known as the Senkaku in Japan and the Diaoyu in China."Again, our timely visitor needs to be told: It is Japan that has unilaterally changed the status quo... China is just responding to Japanese provocations."
BEIJING — In what was supposed to be a warm reunion, Vice President Joe Biden and Chinese President Xi Jinping meet instead Wednesday in a climate fraught with tension over an airspace dispute that has put Asia on edge. A day before seeing Xi, Biden stood in Japan and publicly rebuked China for trying to enforce its will on its neighbors, escalating the risk of a potentially dangerous accident.Although Biden had hoped to focus on areas of cooperation as the U.S. seeks an expanded Asia footprint, China's declaration of a new air defense zone above disputed islands in the East China Sea has pitted the U.S. and China against each other, creating a wide gulf that Biden will seek to bridge during his two-day trip to Beijing.Stepping off his plane in Beijing in his signature aviator sunglasses, Biden was met by a Chinese military honor guard before being whisked to the U.S. Embassy, where the vice president was visiting the consular section to highlight efforts to reduce visa processing times for Chinese visitors to the U.S. After an official welcome ceremony later at the Great Hall of the People, Biden was to meet with Vice President Li Yuanchao before his evening session with Xi.Despite Washington's preference not to get involved in a territorial spat, concerns that China's action could portend a broader effort to assert its dominance in the region has drawn in the U.S., putting Biden in the middle as he jets from Japan to China to South Korea on a weeklong tour of Asia."We, the United States, are deeply concerned by the attempt to unilaterally change the status quo in the East China Sea," Biden said after meeting in Tokyo on Tuesday with Japanese Prime Minister Shinzo Abe. "This action has raised regional tensions and increased the risk of accidents and miscalculation."To that end, Biden said he would raise those concerns with China's leaders "with great specificity" during his Beijing visit.As if to make a point that the newly declared air defense zone will be a major topic of Biden's talks with the Chinese, China's Defense Ministry issued a statement reiterating the country's determination to enforce the zone just as the vice president was arriving in Beijing on Wednesday. China's military is "fully capable of exercising effective control" over the area covering the disputed islands in the East China Sea, said ministry spokesman Geng Yansheng.Although the U.S. has repeatedly said it rejects the zone, Biden has avoided calling publicly for Beijing to retract it, wary of making demands that China is likely to snub. Rather, the U.S. hopes that with enough pressure, China will refrain from strictly enforcing the zone, essentially nullifying it for practical purposes.What's more, the U.S. wants to show that the diplomatic consequences for such actions are severe enough that China will think twice in the future about asserting its authority in such heavy-handed ways. Already, China has claimed it has a sovereign right to establish a similar zone over the South China Sea, where China and the Philippines are locked in another long-running territorial dispute.The East China Sea zone covers more than 600 miles from north to south above international waters separating China, South Korea, Japan and Taiwan. China says all aircraft entering the zone must notify Chinese authorities beforehand or face unspecified defensive measures.The new round of tensions with China comes as the U.S. is striving to increase its own engagement, influence and military presence in Asia, in part as a hedge against China's growing power. But the Obama administration has said it's pursuing a new model for engagement with China, where the two countries can cooperate economically while maintaining a healthy competition."There is a mistrust here by China of U.S. intentions," Sen. Ben Cardin, D-Md., who chairs the Senate's Asia panel, said in an interview. "China is not clear why the U.S. is interested in Asia. They think it may be to affect China's development in a negative way — and nothing could be further from the truth."It wasn't always this way.When Biden came to China two years ago, Xi brought him far away from Beijing's congested streets and sober government buildings to Chengdu, an ancient city in lush southwestern China. At the end of a long day of touring, the two set off for a stroll to view an irrigation site built by the Qin Dynasty in 256 B.C. and still used today.Walking with Biden along an ornately painted walkway overlooking the canal below, Xi had ditched his jacket — a rare departure from the stiff formality traditional of Chinese officials.Aides traveling with Biden said it was moments like these that offered some of the first clues that Xi, now China's president, might be different. During hours spent with Biden on the road, Xi began to reveal a bit about his personal style, giving the American delegation a glimpse into how he might one day rule the world's second-largest economy and a potential U.S. rival.Knowing Xi was poised to eventually become president, the White House had turned to Biden to feel him out during a pair of official visits while Xi was still vice president. The goal was to make an early down payment on a relationship that would surely be critical as China gained political and economic clout on the world stage."If you look at Xi Jinping's personality, he seems to really demonstrate some aspects of Chinese traditional culture. You give high regard to personal trust," said Li Mingjiang, a China expert at Singapore's Nanyang Technological University. "Not a formal or legal commitment per se, but in Chinese culture, a lot of things can be done simply on trust."Whether that trust can serve as a basis for Biden and Xi to de-escalate tensions during Biden's stop in Beijing remains to be seen. Unlike Biden's last trip to China, this visit will have few of the casual moments or long get-to-know-you sessions that also characterized Xi's 2012 visit to the U.S., where he visited small-town Muscatine, Iowa, and spent hours with Biden in Los Angeles.Before departing China on Thursday, Biden will have breakfast with American business leaders and meet with China's premier, Li Keqiang. The vice president will then fly to Seoul, South Korea, for the final leg of his trip.
BEIJING — The new air defense zone declared by China appears to have been approved by President Xi Jinping, the culmination of more than a year of pressure by Beijing to weaken Japan's grip on disputed islands in the East China Sea, and by extension to expand China's long-term access to the Western Pacific.As Mr. Xi amassed power in the past year, he voiced increasing displeasure with Japan, and in a curt, impromptu encounter in St. Petersburg, Russia, in September with the hawkish prime minister, Shinzo Abe, Mr. Xi said Japan must face "history squarely," according to an account in China's state-run news media.Mr. Xi has rebuffed Mr. Abe's requests for a formal summit meeting, another sign of Mr. Xi's firm stance on Japan.Mr. Xi's position as leader of the Communist Party and chairman of the military commission that runs China's armed forces made him the primary decision maker on issues like the air defense zone, Chinese experts said. Over the past year, they say, he has been particularly attentive to the East China Sea dispute.Unlike some other Chinese leaders, Mr. Xi had little involvement with Japan as he climbed the ranks of the Communist Party.On a visit to Japan in 2009 as vice president, he was granted an audience with the emperor, met numerous politicians and was treated to a gala dinner. In 2001, when he was governor of Fujian Province, he toured the prefecture of Nagasaki and visited Okinawa. He has spoken little of these trips, although as vice president he did welcome the governors of Nagasaki and Shizuoka when they came to Beijing, Japanese officials say.Most likely he sees the country as a policy lever, said Rana Mitter, a historian at Oxford University and the author of "Forgotten Ally," an account of China's struggle with militarist Japan from 1937 to 1945."He does not appear to have any direct experience with Japan or connection with it through his family background," Mr. Mitter said. "This is different from some other politicians, for instance Bo Xilai, who courted Japanese business quite strongly through his period as mayor of Dalian and later as commerce minister." Mr. Bo is the disgraced Communist Party leader of the city of Chongqing now serving a life sentence in prison.The idea for the air defense identification zone had been circulating within the Chinese military for some time before it reached Mr. Xi's level, said Jia Qingguo, professor of international relations at Beijing University.The military was acutely aware that other countries, including Japan and the United States, had air defense zones but China did not, he said.As the tensions mounted this year in the East China Sea, with Chinese and Japanese planes flying in close quarters over the disputed islands — known as Diaoyu in China, and Senkaku in Japan — Japan often complained that China's planes were flying in the Japanese air defense zone.The leadership reasoned that if Japan had an air defense zone for the past 40 years, China should have one, too, as a way of achieving parity, and as a tool to eventually wrest the islands from Japan's control, Mr. Jia said.But Tokyo's position on the islands is simply that there is no dispute, that the islands belong to Japan and there is nothing more to discuss.It is this Japanese position that Mr. Xi and his top military and foreign policy advisers wanted to change.China's top foreign policy makers believed that China's new air defense zone overlapping with Japan's and covering the islands would be "another way to force Japan to recognize there is a dispute," and come to the negotiating table, Mr. Jia and other experts said.Even before Mr. Xi became general secretary of the Communist Party in November 2012, he was in charge of a small leading group of maritime affairs that had principal responsibility for the problems in the East China Sea — both in the air and on the sea.
HONG KONG — A recruitment firm looking to track down Asia's most highly prized investment bankers would normally begin searching in their natural habitat — Hong Kong.Now, a headhunter would more likely book a flight to Manila, home to the one-man deal factory — Lauro Baja of the Swiss bank UBS.Mr. Baja is among Asia's highest-paid bankers, with estimated income topping $3 million, according to recruitment consultants and a former UBS colleague, and he personifies Southeast Asia's emergence as a major new center for deal makers.The region has seen $46.5 billion in capital raisings and mergers and acquisitions during the past two years, up 9 percent compared with 2010-11, Thomson Reuters data shows. The data includes deals that have been announced but not yet closed.That has created fevered demand for the few experienced, connected bankers who can make those deals happen."In Southeast Asia you have a minuscule pool," said Russell Kopp, managing director in Hong Kong at the executive search firm Correlate Search. "Everybody knows who they are, and there's probably only three people who could fill each of these very specific roles, so that drives up pay."Financial industry recruiters and hiring managers at investment banks say that some recent poaches of Southeast Asian bankers involve total compensation packages of about $1 million or more — putting them on par with many Wall Street colleagues.That would still be much less than what Mr. Baja earns in a good year at his post in the Philippines, which has seen a steady wave of stock, debt and merger deals since 2009.Mr. Baja, who declined to be interviewed for this article, is known as a savvy and well-connected banker whose father was a Philippine ambassador who at one time also served as president of the United Nations Security Council.Mr. Baja's 2002 wedding was a top story in Manila's society pages, attended by the former presidents Gloria Macapagal Arroyo and Fidel Ramos and an array of elite politicians and bankers.Big contracts for connected bankers in Asia were once the realm of China deal makers, who earned premiums sometimes worth millions of dollars over their peers in New York and London to take on a vast and growing market.As deal volumes in China have fallen, that premium has shifted to Southeast Asia, where they have steadily risen. As a result, investment banking fees jumped to an estimated $1.6 billion last year, up 23 percent from 2009, Thomson Reuters data shows. That compares with a 6 percent decline in fees for Chinese investment banking — excluding local A-share deals, which are available only to mainland residents — over the same period, Thomson Reuters data shows.Among Southeast Asian merger and acquisition markets, the Philippines has brought down a shower of fees for rainmakers like Mr. Baja.Through stock, bond, and merger and acquisition advisory and underwriting, UBS earned an estimated $28.7 million in fees in the Philippines this year, Thomson Reuters data shows, taking 17 percent market share — or more than double its closest rival, Deutsche Bank. Those fees do not include work in areas like brokering and derivatives.Bankers in a relatively small but active market like the Philippines benefit from fee distributions going to a small pot of advisers, as opposed to larger markets.A managing director in the capital markets division at a top investment bank in Hong Kong can earn around half of Mr. Baja's estimated total compensation in a good year, according to banking recruitment specialists who declined to be identified because they were not authorized to speak to the news media.Mr. Baja paid the third-highest individual taxes in the Philippines in 2011, according to a list released by the Bureau of Internal Revenue, when he paid 34.3 million pesos, or about $785,000. He was 26th on the 2012 list, paying 26.3 million pesos in tax.Deal fees have also rained down on Thailand and Malaysia.Deutsche Bank's hiring in July of UBS's veteran head of investment banking in Thailand, Phumchai Kambhato, nearly doubled his compensation, according to people familiar with the matter. One headhunter, also familiar with the matter, said that would mean a package of anywhere from $600,000 to $1.5 million.In October, UBS hired Sufyan Abdul Jabbar from Malaysia's CIMB for a top banking role in that country. One person familiar with the matter said Mr. Jabbar's move handed him a compensation package of nearly $1 million. Like the others discussing compensation, the person was not authorized to speak to the news media.Deutsche Bank and UBS declined to comment for this article, citing company policy not to talk about individuals' pay. Mr. Jabbar and Mr. Kambhato did not respond to calls seeking comment.Estimated fee revenues in Malaysia for arranging bond, equity, debt and other deals amounted to $633.8 million last year, Thomson Reuters data shows, the largest haul in the region and 32 percent higher than the next-highest country, Singapore. This year, Goldman Sachs earned hundreds of millions of dollars from arranging debt offerings for a single Malaysian client, the state fund 1MDB, IFR reported. Goldman Sachs declined to comment."Everyone is fishing from the same pond, which puts pressure on salary expectations and leads to wage inflation," said Mark Ellwood, managing director for Southeast Asia at the recruitment firm Robert Walters.
HONG KONG — Chinese investors on Monday gave a frosty reception to the country's plans to end a yearlong ban on new stock offerings, sending some domestic markets down sharply.China's securities regulator announced on Saturday a package of overhauls to the domestic market for initial public offerings that could see new share sales resume as early as January, with a first batch of about 50 companies ready for listings.The new measures, which came after a major meeting of the Communist Party leadership last month that concluded with promises of sweeping financial overhauls, would unfreeze an I.P.O. market that has not seen a new listing since October 2012.The moratorium on share sales has created a tremendous backlog of Chinese companies seeking to tap investors for financing. As of Friday, 763 companies were waiting to list on domestic markets — with some of them on hold for several years — according to figures from the China Securities Regulatory Commission.An additional 145 companies have withdrawn their listing applications during the past year. Some of those companies that gave up opted instead for a Hong Kong listing, like the Bank of Chongqing, which raised more than $500 million in a Hong Kong I.P.O. in October.Now investors appear worried that a sudden wave of new listings will flood the Shanghai and Shenzhen markets and push down prices for I.P.O.'s and companies that are already listed.The ChiNext index, a secondary board in Shenzhen that mainly features start-up companies, fell 8.26 percent on Monday. The benchmark Shanghai Composite Index closed down 0.59 percent, and the Shenzhen composite ended 4.96 percent lower.By contrast, shares in mainland Chinese stock brokerages rose on Monday, as investors bet they would see an increase in fees from handling the anticipated wave of new I.P.O.'s.In addition to announcing the resumption of I.P.O.'s, the authorities also unveiled on Saturday several changes meant to partly shift market oversight from an approval-based regime, where the regulator vets deals individually, to a disclosure-based system where, similar to that in the United States, the burden of full compliance is on the companies.The measures include changes that would better protect minority shareholders and give the market a bigger role in the pricing of I.P.O.'s. They would also permit companies to buy back shares and issue preferred shares."The latest reforms appear serious about tackling the chronic, longstanding problem of high I.P.O. valuations," Steven Sun, the head of China equity strategy at HSBC, wrote Monday in a research report.Mr. Sun noted that China has suspended new share offerings eight times in the 20 years since the country's modern stock markets were set up, and that markets fell on five of seven occasions after the authorities announced I.P.O.'s were to resume.He said the benchmark index in Shanghai, which is made up of large state and private companies, was unlikely to see much impact. Smaller companies that trade on the ChiNext would feel the biggest drag, he added.The ChiNext index has more than doubled since November 2012 as speculators have driven up valuations, but it is expected to come under pressure in the coming months as many smaller and younger companies seek to list there."ChiNext, given its hefty valuation and the bull run this year, might see a much bigger correction due to the anticipated supply shock," Mr. Sun wrote.
BEIJING — Chinese warehouse worker Liu Fei was fined 330,000 yuan ($54,200), or 14 times her yearly wage, for having a second child and her failure to pay means the boy has no access to basic rights like schooling and healthcare.Liu's desperation prompted a fruitless attempt to sell her kidney and her eight-year-old boy's plea to sell his instead.Their dilemma has now triggered a rare legal battle against the police for denying the boy a "hukou" - household registration - due to strict family planning laws.The case will be heard in a Beijing court on Friday.Liu's inability to pay the fine has left her son, Xiaojie, without an official identity. Family planning officials in Beijing told Liu in 2011 she would not be able to obtain a "hukou" if she did not pay up."When I saw (the fine), I thought this was inconceivable," a tearful Liu, 41, told Reuters. "I had no idea I would be fined so much. If I had known, I would never have given birth."Liu's ordeal underscores the punitive nature of China's family planning policy, beyond the more well-known stories of forced abortions and sterilizations, and highlights the plight of an estimated 13 million undocumented children, known as "black children".In China, "black" implies something illegal, outside of the mainstream or unofficial. Liu asked for her and her son to be identified by pseudonyms to avoid drawing attention.Beijing gives local governments a wide mandate to enforce the one-child policy. Even as China relaxes the rules, allowing millions of families to have a second child, government encroachment into family matters will continue. Family planning officials will still require families to apply for licenses to have children, leaving room for possible abuse.Ma Jiantang, head of the National Bureau of Statistics, said in 2011 that in most of these cases, authorities denied children documentation because the families could not pay the family planning fines, media quoted him as saying.In July, a 16-year-old girl in southwestern Sichuan was granted a "hukou" after she tried to kill herself by swallowing poison, media said."China is a country in which one is unable to move without documentation," said Yang Zhizhu, a former Beijing-based law professor, who lost his job in 2010 after he and his wife had a second daughter."Without a 'hukou', one cannot go to school, join the army, take an exam, get married, open a bank account or take a plane or train."On Tuesday, a group of 10 lawyers and academics sent letters to four government agencies, including the State Council, China's cabinet, and the ministry of public security, urging them to review requirements to file for a "hukou" and scrap the need for fines to be paid first."Without this document, you're just like a puppy or a kitten, raised at home," said Huang Yizhi, Liu's lawyer."This is related to a person's most fundamental right, but because she didn't pay the social support fee, the police refused to give him (Xiaojie) a hukou. I think this condition is certainly unreasonable and illegal."The fine, known as the "social support fee", is meant to go towards the government budget to compensate for resources and public services the child would use, according to state news agency Xinhua.But there is mounting anger at the lack of transparency as to where the fees, which amounted to more than 16.5 billion yuan ($2.7 billion) in 2012, end up, according to Wu Youshui, a lawyer based in the eastern province of Zhejiang.Wu said local officials had told him the fines were often either returned to village and township governments as rewards, or kept by county family planning commission officials "for their own expenses"."The less developed the area, the more dependent the government is on birth-control fines, because they have very little tax revenue," he said. "Some village and township officials have told me explicitly: 'This is how we make money.'"Liu's legal nightmare started in 2011 when she sought out the police and family planning officials to apply for a "hukou" for Xiaojie. According to family planning officials, Liu's son is considered her third child. She had been married and divorced twice - she has a 20-year-old daughter from her first marriage and her second husband also had a son.Liu works in the warehouse department of an air-conditioning company, earning 2,000 yuan ($330) a month. Her two ex-husbands have died and she has tried to persuade officials that she should not be fined on account of her ex-husband's child.TRIED TO SELL HER KIDNEY IN DESPERATIONOn Friday, Liu goes to court. Police and local family planning officials could not be reached for comment.Liu said she was so desperate at one point that she tried to sell a kidney. She looked on the Internet, but was told by some would-be buyers she was too old.So Xiaojie came up with another idea."I went to the Family Planning Commission and said: 'My mother wants to sell her kidney'," he said in their apartment on the southern outskirts of Beijing. "I said: 'I wouldn't let my mother sell it, I'll sell my own kidney'."Xiaojie attends a primary school close to his house which has not asked for his "hukou", though he will need it to register for high school and university.Liu said she sought out a deputy director of the Family Planning Commission in the district of Fangshan, where she lives. He told her that her fine was the "lowest" possible.Liu looked on the Internet for help and saw that a group of lawyers was demanding disclosure of the use of family planning fines. She got in touch with Huang, who took her case on for free.But neither Huang nor Liu is hopeful."After all, the court and the police are all in the same area," Huang said. "Although there should be no relationship between an independent judiciary and the administration, in reality, there is a definite link, so it's difficult to say what the result will be. I'm not very optimistic."The two-year battle has taken its toll on Liu. She said she cried every day."If the law is fair, I think this problem will be solved," Liu said. "But who among us dares to believe in the law now? If this doesn't work, I will appeal. If I don't succeed, I will have destroyed my son's whole life."
BEIJING — The movements of the eldest son of retired Chinese domestic security chief Zhou Yongkang have been restricted while he helps with a corruption investigation, three sources said, a case that could cause division within the ruling Communist Party.If Zhou Yongkang, 71, one of China's most powerful politicians of the last decade, were directly implicated in the probe, he would be the most senior Chinese politician ensnared in a graft scandal since the Communists came to power in 1949."Zhou Yongkang is 100 percent in trouble. The question is will he be put on trial or will he be dealt with internally by the party," Ho Pin, editor-in-chief of New York-based Mingjing News, said by telephone. Mingjing, a media and book publishing firm, has reported extensively on the scrutiny into Zhou since he retired last year.One of the sources, who has ties to the leadership, said the investigation that Zhou Yongkang's son, Zhou Bin, is helping with was linked to a probe into Jiang Jiemin, until recently the top regulator of state-owned enterprises.The official Xinhua news agency announced on September 1 that Jiang was being investigated for "serious discipline violations", shorthand generally used to describe graft.Jiang was previously chairman of energy giant China National Petroleum Corp - Zhou Yongkang's power base - as well as one of its subsidiaries, oil-and-gas behemoth PetroChina.The three sources told Reuters that Zhou Bin was under quasi-detention on the outskirts of Beijing so he could assist the party's anti-corruption watchdog with the investigation."Zhou Bin agreed to return from abroad for questioning by the Central Commission for Discipline Inspection," said a second source, who has direct knowledge of the matter.All three sources requested anonymity because they were not authorised to speak to foreign reporters about the politically sensitive matter.Zhou junior and his family could not be reached for comment. It was unclear if he had hired a lawyer. The cabinet spokesman's office, which doubles as the party's public affairs office, declined immediate comment.The younger Zhou, who is married to a Chinese-American woman and is a U.S. permanent resident, had been barred from leaving the country, the sources said. They said his movements had been restricted for up to six months.It was unclear where he was staying or when he returned to China, but the questioning began around September.Zhou Bin, in his 40s, has business interests in China's energy sector, Chinese media have reported."The investigation had to do with Jiang Jiemin," the first source said.Jiang is among several former CNPC and PetroChina executives under investigation. Authorities have given no details on their alleged wrongdoing but the corruption probe is one of the biggest into China's massive state enterprise sector in years.Zhou Yongkang was a patron of the once high-flying politician Bo Xilai, who was jailed for life in September for corruption and abuse of power.Bo's career was stopped short last year by a murder scandal in which his wife was convicted of poisoning a British businessman who had been a family friend.The elder Zhou retired as domestic security tsar and from the party's all-powerful Politburo Standing Committee during a sweeping leadership reshuffle a year ago.As security chief from 2007 to 2012, Zhou senior oversaw the police force, the civilian intelligence apparatus, judges, prosecutors and paramilitary police. During his watch, government spending on domestic security exceeded the defence budget.Given the divisions Bo's downfall triggered among party leaders, any attempt to go after Zhou would cause far worse ructions because he still retains significant political clout and support throughout the party, experts have said.Hong Kong's South China Morning Post newspaper reported in late August that the leadership had agreed to open a corruption investigation into Zhou Yongkang.But sources with ties to the leadership told Reuters at the time that Zhou was helping authorities with the investigation into the state energy companies and, contrary to media reports, was not the target.Zhou was all smiles when he attended an alumni celebration at the China University of Petroleum on October 1.He was also among party leaders who offered condolences or sent flowers to the family of a respected educator who died last month, state media reported on November 26. Zhou's name would not have appeared if he had been in trouble then."They're definitely going to do in Zhou Yongkang," said the third source, who has ties to the leadership and the military, adding it was unclear for now if the elder Zhou would be arrested.The source added that the party was in a quandary about Zhou because there was also a lot of anger within the party over former premier Wen Jiabao's family, following a report in the New York Times last year about how his family used their political connections to accumulate wealth."It would look strange to only go after Zhou Yongkang and ignore Wen Jiabao's family," the source said.
BEIJING — About 200 thugs harassed lawyers and relatives of three civil rights activists outside a courthouse in eastern China on Wednesday, as top judges in the capital marked the anniversary of China's constitution by hailing the rule of law.The three activists were standing trial in the city of Xinyu on illegal assembly charges that supporters say were trumped up to punish them for being part of a group that urges citizens to embrace their constitutional rights.The trial's second day, ironically, coincided with the 31st anniversary of China's constitution, and top judges in Beijing marked the day with pledges to promote the rule of law and judicial transparency.In Xinyu, lawyer Pu Zhiqiang said the thugs surrounded six attorneys and the defendants' relatives as they approached the court, hurling abuse — and clumps of mud — at them. The court barred most of the public from attending the trial."They called us traitors, scumbags and hooligans," Pu said. "Today is China's constitution's anniversary. But we see how Xinyu is treating us. None of our rights have been respected."At this time last year, newly appointed Communist Party leader Xi Jinping, who is now China's president, marked the anniversary of the constitution by pledging to uphold the rights of Chinese citizens and urging officials to build confidence in the law.Xi's remarks last December prompted the country's liberal intellectuals, activists and others to advocate that China adopt constitutionalism — in which the government's power is restricted by the country's laws.The three Xinyu activists — Liu Ping, Wei Zhongping and Li Sihua — are among those who sought to push the party's new leadership to live by the promises laid out in the constitution, which guarantees freedoms of speech, assembly, religion and other rights that in reality are rarely protected in China.The three are part of the New Citizens Movement, a loose network of campaigners who have lobbied for officials to declare their assets to help curb corruption. Participants have held small, peaceful demonstrations and organized dinner parties.The three activists are accused of "illegal assembly" — a charge their lawyers say stems from a photo of them holding signs calling for the release of other protesters — and other charges.A woman surnamed Peng who answered the phone at the Xinyu public security bureau said police had not received any reports of anyone being harassed at the courthouse.
BEIJING — U.S. Vice President Joe Biden encouraged Chinese visa applicants to "challenge their government" during a brief meeting at the U.S. embassy in Beijing on Wednesday.Biden, accompanied by Ambassador Gary Locke, waved and greeted hundreds of Chinese queuing at the visa hall."Innovation can only occur when you can breathe free, challenge the government, challenge your teachers, challenge religious leaders," Biden said.Biden is visiting the Chinese capital at the invitation of his Chinese counterpart Li Yuanchao, though he is also meeting President Xi Jinping.Top of the agenda on his trip is China's new air defense identification zone in the East China Sea, which has rattled Washington, Tokyo and Seoul.Biden has sought to reach out to ordinary Chinese before, visiting a noodle restaurant for lunch during a visit to Beijing in 2011."If you come to Washington, tell them you spoke to me here and I promise you'll be able to get to see me," Biden added, to laughter from the waiting visa applicants.
NEW YORK/SHANGHAI — Yum Brands Inc's KFC website in China trumpets the slogan "Trust in every bite."That message is part of the company's new "I Commit" campaign intended to reassure customers in its largest market, who have cut back on visits since Chinese media reports a year ago about excessive antibiotic use by a few KFC suppliers.There is a lot at stake for Yum. It is China's largest Western restaurant operator with roughly 4,500 KFC outlets, and the company reaps more than half of its overall operating profit there.Despite a decades-long reputation for serving safe food in China, KFC has struggled to fully restore diners' trust in a country where dangerous contamination scandals are commonplace.Interviews with Chinese consumers suggest that rather than soothing concerns, KFC's new ads are reminding diners about the food safety scare at the fried-chicken chain, which could undermine Yum's mission to revive sales there.Yum Chief Executive David Novak said he is confident that "I Commit" is on target - noting that "hundreds and hundreds of consumers" in testing said they felt better about the KFC brand after the chain directly addressed safety worries."We don't want to be doing it forever, but we want to communicate it and get it out there because it's a lingering issue," Novak told Reuters in an interview following Yum's annual investor meeting in New York on Wednesday.A survey conducted in November found nearly 40 percent of respondents were still very concerned about antibiotic use in KFC chickens. Yum, which cut off some of its suppliers after the television report on antibiotics, initially predicted safety fears would quickly fade.Yum's sales, which fell sharply in late December 2012 after the antibiotic residue media report, took another hit from a bird flu outbreak in China in April.Analysts on Wednesday pressed company executives for details on their plan to reignite KFC sales in China in the face of quality concerns, tougher competition and choppy consumer spending.Yum executives said they planned to back the "I Commit" campaign with new food and value offers, but they did not offer details.Nevertheless, KFC China will soon be putting up results that will compare with the steep declines that started in December 2012."That's what I call an unfortunate benefit," Novak said of the easier comparisons."I think we should start seeing progress as we move into the year," Novak said after declining to predict when that turn would come.Some diners told Reuters that Yum's ads bring back memories of China national television's December 2012 report showing that a few poultry farmers supplying Yum misused antibiotics in their poultry production."This strategy just risks fanning the flames rather than letting people forget about it," said Yu Kaixin, 24, a recent university graduate from Shanghai, while eating a beef burger at McDonald's, which has also taken a hit from the food safety worries.In response, Novak said "there will always be sideline critics. I would put our marketing capability up against a 24-year-old university student."The Shanghai Food and Drug Administration investigated the chicken contamination incident. It did not bring a case against Yum China and did not assess a fine.The restaurant operator quickly responded by cutting less-modern farms from its poultry supplier network. Its "I Commit" public relations push features KFC workers, including KFC China CEO Su, who said the chicken in China is the same as what is served at its restaurants around the world.The chain also is investing in social media programs, retraining employees and arranging consumer visits to chicken farms - one of which is featured in an ad.The message also was not having the desired effect on Ao Kun, 25, an investment manager from Jiangxi Province.The more KFC promotes its food quality, "the more I go off them," he said while eating a hamburger combo meal at Burger King. "They keep harking on about it again and again. It's not their competitors that are beating them. It's themselves."An online poll of 1,000 Chinese conducted by ConsumerEdge Research during the first three weeks of November found that safety concerns remained prominent.About 39 percent of survey respondents "strongly agreed" that they were concerned about antibiotics in KFC chicken, while 33 percent said the same about bird flu and KFC chicken."This antibiotic thing is really being stubborn," said Peter Reidhead, the ConsumerEdge analyst who runs the China survey.
BEIJING — A ban on the construction of new government buildings in China is not being enforced effectively, the government said on Friday, ordering a new crackdown to ensure promises are kept to rein in extravagance and pervasive corruption.Numerous scandals in recent years have centered on excessive expenditure on new government buildings by officials, often in poverty-struck inland regions.Some local governments have embezzled poverty-alleviation and disaster-relief funds to build themselves offices and other facilities, sometimes with dazzling opulence.Chinese President Xi Jinping has made fighting graft and extravagance a key platform of his new government, seeking to calm public anger over waste and corruption by government officials.In July, the government ordered a five-year suspension of the construction of new official buildings.The central government said in a statement on its website that the campaign - which also includes cutting official spending on cars, entertainment and foreign travel - had achieved "initial results", but not across the board."Some places or government departments have not achieved obvious results and have not dealt with problems in a timely manner," it said."There have even been cases of continuing approval for and construction of government buildings, which has seriously affected the image of the party and government leading to a strong reaction by the public," the statement added. It did not provide details or examples.Similar orders in the past to rein in construction of over-the-top government buildings have had little apparent effect, partly due the long-existing problem of enforcing Beijing's edicts in vast and populous China.The latest statement said that people who approved such projects would be held accountable and punished."Relevant departments must seriously fulfill their responsibilities and earnestly strengthen checks on the approvals process," it added.Those who break the rules would be named and shamed in public.Last month, the government said it would seize and auction off official buildings which had gone up without permission.
HONG KONG — The yellow jumpsuit worn onscreen by martial arts legend Bruce Lee in the movie "Game of Death," his final film, has sold at a Hong Kong auction for $100,000.The yellow polyester suit with black stripes down the sides went to an unidentified telephone bidder at Spink auction house's Thursday night sale.It was part of a collection of 14 items of Bruce Lee memorabilia that raised more than 2 million Hong Kong dollars ($258,000).The suit was one of two Lee commissioned from his Hong Kong tailor for "Game of Death." The auction house said the zipper on the back is damaged from a fight scene in the movie. The selling price of 780,000 Hong Kong dollars ($100,000) was about triple the auction house's initial estimate.Lee died in 1973 before he could finish the film. An incomplete version came out that year, followed by a feature-length version released posthumously in 1978 using stand-ins.Lee's death at 32 from an allergic reaction to painkillers came at the height of his fame. Born in San Francisco and raised in Hong Kong, Lee became a global superstar thanks to his legendary martial arts skills and screen presence. He helped popularize martial arts films across the world, inspiring directors such as Quentin Tarantino, who paid tribute to him by dressing Uma Thurman in a similar suit for his "Kill Bill" movies.Collectors also snapped up "Game of Death" prop weapons used by Lee. A pair of wooden yellow lacquered "nunchaku" that match the jumpsuit sold for HK$540,000 ($70,000) to British collector George Philips, an investment manager based in Hong Kong."It's an iconic item," he said.
BEIJING — China's Foreign Ministry said on Thursday that China told visiting U.S. Vice President Joe Biden that Beijing's decision to set up an air defense identification zone in the East China Sea accorded with international law."During the talks the Chinese side repeated its principled position, stressing that the Chinese move accorded with international law and practice and that the U.S. side ought to take an objective and fair attitude and respect it," ministry spokesman Hong Lei said in a brief statement.
HUADU, China — His Chinese sedan was a disappointment. So when truck driver Xie Yanzhen needed to replace it, he turned to Venucia, a 2-year-old no-frills brand launched by Nissan and a Chinese partner.The Chinese-brand Chang'an "doesn't work well," said Xie, who was back at a Venucia dealership in this southern city with a friend. At about 80,000 yuan ($13,000), his Venucia D50 compact sedan cost a little more, but "the engine is pretty good."That is encouraging news for Nissan Motor Co., which wants Venucia and Chinese buyers like Xie to help drive its global turnaround.Venucia is a leader in the latest twist in the world's biggest auto market: Chinese brands created by global automakers with local partners to sell foreign cachet at lower prices.The trend started with government pressure on global automakers to help create Chinese brands. But some are trying to turn that into a commercial advantage.Most ambitious are Nissan and General Motors Co. Their local brands have rolled out ultra-low-cost models to make deeper inroads into China, especially in the countryside, home to 700 million people.GM created Baojun in 2010 with two local partners. Mercedes Benz parent Daimler AG is launching a joint-venture electric car brand. Volkswagen AG and France's PSA Peugeot Citroen have said they are looking at creating local brands. Honda Motor Co. and a local partner launched the first joint-venture brand, Linian, in 2007.Venucia is especially important to Nissan. China is a centerpiece of the struggling Japanese automaker's plan to emphasize faster-growing developing markets. It announced an $8 billion expansion plan for China in 2011 with a local partner, state-owned Dongfeng Group.Nissan wants to build its share of China's crowded auto market from 6 percent to 10 percent."Venucia is one of the key pillars of that," said Akihiro Nakanishi, brand director for Dongfeng Nissan Passenger Vehicle Co., the joint venture that owns Venucia.The new brand's target market is urban workers and better-off rural residents who aspire to the "car lifestyle," according to Ye Lei, general manager of Venucia's business development department. One new model is planned each year and the brand is forecasting total sales of 1 million by 2015."This is a market that hasn't been served by joint ventures, which are too expensive, or domestic brands, which don't have good enough quality," Ye said in an interview at Venucia's headquarters in the southern business center of Guangzhou.Beijing has avoided publicly ordering global automakers to set up local brands. That might give its trading partners grounds to accuse it of violating market-opening pledges. But industry analysts say regulators have made clear manufacturers must help create one if they want approval to expand production in China."It's something of an open secret by now that foreign brands have little choice but to acquiesce to the government's demands," said Bernstein Research in a report earlier this year.Asked whether Venucia was created at Beijing's request, Nissan said Venucia was intended to be a "Real Chinese National Car by Chinese for Chinese."GM declined to comment on what role Chinese policy played in the creation of Baojun.Venucia launched its third model this month, a roomy, four-door hatchback called the R50X. Comparable in size to a Volkswagen Golf, it starts at 79,800 yuan ($12,600) with a 1.6-liter engine and a manual transmission. That brings it within range of Chang'an Automotive Group's similarly equipped CX30 sedan, which starts at 64,000 yuan ($10,100).With 147 dealerships, Venucia's main marketing tactic is driving cars to towns for impromptu displays, Ye said. He said one dealer drives more than 10,000 kilometers (6,000 miles) every month doing that.The brand might consider exporting, but its focus for now is fast-growing China, Ye said.China's auto market has cooled since growth peaked at over 40 percent in 2009 but October sales rose 24 percent over a year earlier to 1.6 million vehicles.Venucia sold 79,322 vehicles in the first 10 months of this year, triple the same period last year. GM's Baojun sales rose 27.8 percent in the first nine months of this year to 69,187 vehicles.Communist leaders want auto manufacturing to create higher-paid jobs in fields from electronics to chemicals. They are frustrated by China's failure to follow neighboring Japan and South Korea in launching global auto brands.Since the 1980s, foreign auto manufacturers in China have been required to work through state-owned partners. Beijing hoped the local partners would learn enough to launch their own globally competitive brands. A government plan in 1994 called for China to have at least three by 2010. But three years after that target, it has yet to give rise to even one.The mandate for foreign automakers to help set up local brands, which might give Chinese partners more control over advanced technology, could help to accelerate that.Still, success is far from guaranteed. Industry analysts say the Chinese market, crowded with global majors and ambitious locals, has little room for new brands."There will be a segment in the market that can absorb one or two of these brands, but I don't think it will become a mainstream development," said Ivo Naumann, a Shanghai-based analyst for research firm AlixPartners.The added competition will squeeze China's own independent brands, which are struggling to defend their market share."There will be a lot of losers," said Naumann.
HONG KONG — Hong Kong reported its second human case of H7N9 bird flu just days after the first, raising fears that the virus is spreading beyond mainland China.The Health Department said late Friday that an 80-year-old man being treated for a chronic illness in the hospital was found to have the bird flu strain.Authorities in the Asian financial and transport hub have been monitoring H7N9 closely since it was first identified in April. Infectious diseases are a particular concern in Hong Kong, where a decade ago the Sars virus killed 299 people. Hundreds in other countries also died.H7N9 has sickened about 140 people and killed 45, almost all of them in mainland China. Taiwan has had one case.The virus appears to have stalled since Chinese authorities cracked down on live animal markets following the initial outbreak. Medical authorities say it doesn't appear to be easily contagious between humans.Health officials said that the second patient lived in Shenzhen, the mainland Chinese city across the border from Hong Kong, and sought treatment in the hospital. Authorities were looking for people who may have been in contact with him, including relatives, hospital staff and the taxi driver who brought him to the hospital.Officials have stepped up border checks and raised the alert level after the first case, an Indonesian maid, was reported on Monday.
BEIJING — North Korea freed an 85-year-old retired American soldier on Saturday after detaining him for more than a month for crimes it said he committed during the Korean War six decades ago.The veteran, Merrill E. Newman, has arrived in China from North Korea and is likely to fly home soon.North Korea's official KCNA news agency earlier said he was being deported on humanitarian grounds and because he had admitted to his wrongdoing and apologized."I'm very glad to be on my way home," Newman told Japanese reporters at Beijing airport. "And I appreciate the tolerance the DPRK government has given to me to be on my way. I feel good, I feel good. I want to go home to see my wife."The DPRK - Democratic People's Republic of Korea - is the official name of North Korea.Newman looked healthy in pictures taken at the airport. He later left the terminal with two men believed to be U.S. diplomats. The U.S. Embassy in Beijing declined to comment.Newman, who was a U.S. special forces soldier during the 1950-53 Korean War and worked with guerrillas fighting behind the lines against the socialist North, has been held by the Pyongyang regime since late October.North Korea has called him a war criminal. "He masterminded espionage and subversive activities against the DPRK and in this course he was involved in killings of service personnel of the Korean People's Army and innocent civilians," KCNA has said.He was visiting North Korea as a tourist when he was pulled off an Air Koryo flight in North Korea minutes before it was due to depart for Beijing on October 26.KCNA said the secretive North had decided to let Newman leave "taking into consideration his admittance of the act committed by him on the basis of his wrong understanding, apology made by him for it, his sincere repentance of it and his advanced age and health condition".The United States quickly welcomed North Korea's decision to release Newman and called on Pyongyang to pardon another U.S. citizen being held since November last year and release him to his family.Kenneth Bae, a Korean American who worked as a Christian missionary and was convicted by the North in May of crimes against the state, has been serving a 15-year hard labor sentence.U.S. Vice President Joe Biden, who is visiting South Korea, said he spoke to Newman by telephone."I offered him a ride home on Air Force Two but as it was pointed out, there is a direct flight to San Francisco, his home. So I don't blame him, I'd be on that flight too," said Biden."It's a positive thing they have done but they have Mr Bae who has no reason being held in the North and should be released immediately and we are going to continue to demand his release as well."U.S. Congressman Charles Rangel, a fellow Korean War veteran who last month wrote to North Korean leader Kim Jong Un calling for Newman's release, also welcomed the news."His release is a step towards building good will and trust with the international community," said the New York Democrat."As a member of Congress who has long advocated for peace and reunification on the Korean Peninsula, I am pleased that we are making progress on the humanitarian front with North Korea."North Korea had accused Newman of being a criminal who took part in the killings of innocent civilians during the war. Last week, KCNA published what it said was an apology by him for "a long list of indelible crimes against the DPRK government and Korean people".The regime also released a video of Newman making the confession and apology.The United States and Newman's family had called on the North for his release given his age and medical conditions that required him to take medications.
TOKYO — Japan's parliament approved a state secrets law that stiffens penalties for leaks by government officials and for journalists who seek such information, overriding criticism that it could be used to cover up government abuses and suppress civil liberties.Despite stalling tactics by opposition parties, the full upper house approved the bill on Friday by 130 to 82. The more powerful lower house passed the bill last week.Prime Minister Shinzo Abe, who is seeking to increase Japan's global security role and create a more authoritarian government at home, says the law is needed to protect national security and assuage U.S. concerns over the risks of sharing strategically sensitive information with Tokyo.Critics worry the law could be used to hinder public disclosures, punish whistleblowers or muzzle the media since journalists could be jailed for seeking information they do not know is classified as secret.It allows heads of ministries and agencies to classify 23 vaguely worded types of information related to defense, diplomacy, counterintelligence and counterterrorism, almost indefinitely.Even some members of Abe's Liberal Democratic Party complained that the government rushed too quickly to get the bill approved before the end of the current parliamentary session."I think there needs to be more explanation," party member Takashi Uto said. "Naturally people are concerned because they don't know what will be a secret."In Washington, U.S. State Department deputy spokeswoman Marie Harf said that information security played a critical role in alliance cooperation and that the U.S. welcomed progress "on strengthening policies, practices and procedures related to the protection of classified information.""A foundation of our alliance is also a shared commitment to universal values, freedom of expression, freedom of the press," she said.Most objections to the legislation were over human rights implications and over the lack of a guarantee of independent or parliamentary oversight over secrecy decisions. However, during the final debate, lawmakers also questioned how the law might affect civilian employees doing business with government agencies."People will be living in a society where they could be punished for not knowing what's secret and what's not," Japan Communist Party lawmaker Sohei Nihi said in arguing against the bill. "Arrests, court judgments, all could be secret. This would violate the constitution."Foreign businesses engaged in defense contracting, or even companies dealing in "dual-use" technologies and products that have military applications could be affected, said Lawrence Repeta, a law professor at Meiji University in Tokyo."If you're in contact with the government, you're at risk of crossing a line even if you don't know there's a line there," Repeta said. "You could be in the position of trying to sell a product that might involve designated secrets. It's something companies have to think about. It's an entirely new area."Steve Vickers, CEO of Steve Vickers Associates, a risk mitigation and political risk company operating throughout Asia, said that the legislation was mainly aimed at concerns over leaks of sensitive information to China.The law mandates prison terms of up to 10 years for government officials who leak secrets. Journalists who get information in an "inappropriate" or "wrong" way could be jailed for up to five years. It bans attempted leaks, inappropriate reporting, complicity and solicitation.Associated Press writer Mari Yamaguchi contributed to this report.
SHANGHAI — Hundreds of flights were delayed or cancelled on Friday in China's commercial hub of Shanghai as record levels of air pollution shrouded the city in smog, prompting authorities to issue the highest level of health warning.The incident is especially embarrassing at a time when China seeks to build Shanghai into a global business hub on par with the likes of London, New York and Hong Kong by 2020.On Friday afternoon, the Shanghai government issued its severest health warning as the city's pollution index ranged between 23 times and 31 times the levels recommended by international health officials.In the first such advice since a new health warning system was launched in April, authorities urged residents to stay indoors and asked factories to either cut or halt production."I don't think it's fit for people to live in this kind of environment," said Shanghai resident Fan Jianjun, 34, who wore a face mask as he walked through the opaque air in the Lujiazui financial district."But I have no choice. I still need to work. I can only take preventive measures but I have no idea whether they work."Air quality in cities is of increasing concern to China's stability-obsessed leaders, anxious to douse potential unrest as more affluent citizens turn against a growth-at-all-costs economic model that has polluted much of the country's air, water and soil.The government has announced many plans to fight pollution over the years but has made little apparent progress.Most of the flights leaving Shanghai's Pudong International Airport have been delayed, according to the airport's website. Pudong was the world's third busiest cargo airport in 2011, data from the Airports Council International shows.Hazardous air pollution forced schools to shut or suspend outdoor activities in at least two cities in eastern China on Thursday. Some schools in Shanghai cancelled outdoor activities on Friday, as well.The unusually noxious haze was caused by several factors, including industrial pollution and auto emissions trapped by cold, windless weather, said Xu Bin, an associate professor at Shanghai's Tongji University.By 0700 GMT, the level of PM2.5 particulate matter, or tiny particles in the air that are the most hazardous to health, reached a "severely polluted" 466, according to the Shanghai government's monitoring website, http://www.semc.gov.cn/aqi/home/English.aspx.A similar measure by the U.S. consulate in Shanghai showed a reading of 503, a level described as being beyond the index on its website http://www.stateair.net/web/post/1/4.html.Levels above 300 are considered hazardous, while the World Health Organization recommends a daily level of no more than 20.
HONG KONG — Jbe Kruger of South Africa paid tribute to Nelson Mandela after taking a one-shot lead at the Hong Kong Open on Friday."Our country has lost a real-life hero and wearing this (black ribbon) is a real honor for me," said Kruger, who wore black ribbons on his chest and arm while shooting a 4-under 66 in the second round."I don't think our country will ever have another leader like Mandela. He has been sick and in hospital for a long time yet it was sad when I heard this morning of his passing away. Unfortunately I never met him but I know his death will affect everyone, white and black, in my country."Kruger made seven birdies and three bogeys for a 7-under 133 overall at the Hong Kong Golf Course. He is one shot ahead of Stuart Manley (67), who bogeyed his final hole."It wasn't the finish I wanted. But it's OK, I'm still in the mix," Manley said. "I started slowly, maybe (I had) too much coffee, but then began to control the ball well."Alex Cejka (67), Shiv Kapur (66) and Wade Ormsby (68) were tied for third at 5 under.Defending champion Miguel Angel Jimenez (67) began the second round with a flurry of birdies but lost momentum and finished at 137.Chinese teenager Guan Tianlang, who made the cut at the Masters in April, failed to make it through to the weekend after a 75 left him at 6 over, five shots below the cut.
BEIJING — Famed Chinese film director Zhang Yimou is being sued by two lawyers for breaking China's one-child policy, in what they say is a protest against rich people flouting the rules.Jia Fangyi said Friday he and Guo Chengxi want Zhang to pay 1 billion yuan ($164 million) in compensation for the use of public services and as a punishment. Although Zhang already faces a fine that could run into the millions of dollars, Jia said he and Guo didn't feel that was enough to deter other wealthy people from defying the regulations."We made the move because the government failed to fulfil its duty in protecting the public interest," Jia said in a telephone interview. "We believe that more and more rich people in China are having more children with money, therefore leaving a destructive effect on China's efforts to control population."People caught breaking China's family planning policy must pay a "social compensation fee" based on their annual income.Zhang, who directed "House of Flying Dragons" and "Hero," admitted Sunday to having three children with his wife, Chen Ting. Local authorities in the eastern city of Wuxi, where his wife is from, said the births came without approval and before the two were married.The couple issued an apology to the public for the "negative social impact that this has created."Reports had circulated online since May that Zhang, 62, had fathered seven children from two marriages and relationships with two other women. The People's Daily newspaper, published by the ruling Communist Party, reported that Zhang could face a fine of up to 160 million yuan ($26 million).Chinese media reports said the lawsuit had little chance of succeeding because the two lawyers were not directly related to the case. Calls to the Wuxi Intermediary Court where it was filed rang unanswered.Jia declined to rate his chances of success, saying only that, "We hope the court could handle the case in an innovative way and the public continue to monitor the development of the incident."Zhang is one of China's most famous film directors, most recently of "The Flowers of War" starring Christian Bale. He also designed the opening and closing ceremonies for the 2008 Beijing Olympics.
SHANGHAI — Shanghai authorities ordered schoolchildren indoors and halted all construction Friday as China's financial hub suffered one of its worst bouts of air pollution, bringing visibility down to a few dozen meters, delaying flights and obscuring the city's spectacular skyline.The financial district was shrouded in a yellow haze, and noticeably fewer people walked the city's streets. Vehicle traffic also was thinner, as authorities pulled 30 percent of government vehicles from the roads. They also banned fireworks and public sporting events."I feel like I'm living in clouds of smog," said Zheng Qiaoyun, a local resident who kept her 6-month-old son at home. "I have a headache, I'm coughing, and it's hard to breathe on my way to my office."Shanghai's concentration of tiny, harmful PM 2.5 particles reached 602.5 micrograms per cubic meter Friday afternoon, an extremely hazardous level that was the highest since the city began recording such data last December. That compares with the World Health Organization's safety guideline of 25 micrograms.The dirty air that has gripped Shanghai and its neighboring provinces for days is attributed to coal burning, car exhaust, factory pollution and weather patterns, and is a stark reminder that pollution is a serious challenge in China. Beijing, the capital, has seen extremely heavy smog several times over the past year. In the far northeastern city of Harbin, some monitoring sites reported PM 2.5 rates up to 1,000 micrograms per cubic meter in October, when the winter heating season kicked off.As a coastal city, Shanghai usually has mild to modest air pollution, but recent weather patterns have left the city's air stagnant. On China's social media, netizens swapped jokes over the rivalry between Shanghai and Beijing, saying the financial hub was catching up with the capital in air pollution.Alan Yu, a chef in Shanghai, satirized the air on his microblog as though he were sampling a new vintage of wine."Today, Shanghai air really has a layered taste. At first, it tastes slightly astringent with some smokiness. Upon full contact with your palate, the aftertaste has some earthy bitterness, and upon careful distinguishing you can even feel some dust-like particulate matter," Yu wrote.The environmental group Greenpeace said slow-moving and low-hanging air masses had carried factory emissions from Jiangsu, Anhui and Shandong provinces to Shanghai. But it said the root problem lies with the excessive industrial emissions in the region, including Zhejiang province to the south."Both Jiangsu and Zhejiang should act as soon as possible to set goals to reduce their coal consumption so that the Yantze River Delta will again be green with fresh air," Huang Wei, a Greenpeace project manager, said in a statement.Tang reported from Beijing. Associated Press researcher Fu Ting in Beijing contributed to this report.
HONG KONG — China moved on Thursday to restrict its banks from using Bitcoin as currency, citing concerns about money laundering and a threat to financial stability.The action comes as monetary authorities around the world have begun to confront the issue of Bitcoin, a virtual currency whose value has soared in recent months as interest in it has spread. Part of its rise has been driven by intense demand for the virtual currency in China.The notice curtailing financial institutions' involvement with Bitcoin was issued by the People's Bank of China and four other ministries and agencies, and the directive said the step was needed to "protect the status of the renminbi as the statutory currency, prevent risks of money laundering and protect financial stability."The notice said that Bitcoin was "not a currency in the real meaning of the word" but was rather a "virtual commodity that does not share the same legal status of a currency. Nor can, or should, it be circulated or used in the marketplace as a currency."Last month, in a sign of Bitcoin's growing acceptance, American regulatory officials told a Senate hearing that financial networks like Bitcoin offered tangible benefits for the financial system. But they warned of the potential for money laundering and other criminal activity associated with such networks.The remarks by United States officials, along with wider acceptance of the virtual currency by merchants, had helped propel the value of the virtual currency beyond $1,100, leaving its total worldwide value at more than $11 billion. It dropped more than $100 on Thursday, according to the Mt.Gox exchange, which handles Bitcoin trading online, to $1,100 from $1,217.Bitcoin was established in 2009 by an anonymous programmer or collective known as Satoshi Nakamoto. Part of the value of the currency is attributable to its limited supply. A maximum of 21 million units can be created, leading investors to bid up the price as demand grows.But with the growing acceptance of the virtual currency has come increasing concerns about its potential use in illicit transactions. In October, the American authorities arrested Ross Ulbricht, the alleged founder of the online marketplace Silk Road, after claiming that the site was being used to buy and sell drugs, weapons and pornography. Bitcoin was the primary form of payment on Silk Road, where people could make purchases anonymously.The Chinese move came after officials in Beijing had expressed some support for the legitimacy of Bitcoin. Yi Gang, the deputy governor of the People's Bank of China and the director of the State Administration of Foreign Exchange, said in November that although the virtual currency might not find favor with China's central bank, people should be free to participate in the Bitcoin market.That sentiment was echoed in the announcement Thursday."Ordinary members of the public have the freedom to participate in Bitcoin transactions as a kind of commodity trading activity on the Internet, provided they assume the risks themselves," the statement said.In China, Bitcoin was starting to gain favor even among merchants. In the Chaoyang district in Beijing, a restaurant started accepting Bitcoins for payment in defiance of earlier regulation stating that virtual currencies could not be used to purchase real-life goods or services.But in its statement Thursday, the Chinese central bank raised questions about whether Bitcoin could ever gain true legitimacy as legal tender: "In essence, Bitcoin is a kind of special virtual commodity, and does not have the same legal status as a currency.""Currently, the public lacks sufficient understanding of Bitcoin, and some individuals have been caught up by faddishness or a speculative mentality in holding, using and trading in Bitcoins," the statement said.The explanation said that Bitcoins possess "quite high speculative risks," because of the relatively small market and 24-hour trading, with no curbs on market declines. It said: "The price can be easily controlled by speculators, creating severe turbulence and huge risks. Ordinary investors who blindly follow the crowd can easily suffer major losses."
Joe Biden on Press Freedom in China: While on an official visit to China, Vice President Joseph R. Biden Jr. criticized China's treatment of journalists and urged the Chinese government to allow for more freedoms.BEIJING — China appears ready to force nearly two dozen journalists from American news organizations to leave the country by the end of the year, a significant increase in pressure on foreign news media that has prompted the American government's first public warning about repercussions.Vice President Joseph R. Biden Jr. raised the issue here in meetings with President Xi Jinping and other top Chinese leaders, and then publicly chastised the Chinese on Thursday for refusing to say if they will renew the visas of correspondents and for blocking the websites of American-based news media."Innovation thrives where people breathe freely, speak freely, are able to challenge orthodoxy, where newspapers can report the truth without fear of consequences," Mr. Biden said in a speech to an American business group.At a meeting on Thursday with Beijing-based reporters from The New York Times and Bloomberg, Mr. Biden said that he warned Chinese leaders, in a formal session and over dinner, that there would be consequences for China, especially in the Congress, if it forced out the journalists. But he said Mr. Xi appeared unmoved, insisting that the authorities treated reporters according to Chinese law.Between them, The Times and Bloomberg have nearly two dozen journalists whose visas are up for renewal by the end of the month, and China has declined to act on them.The growing tension with China over its treatment of American news media outlets comes at a moment when Washington and Beijing are increasingly at odds and publicly more critical of each other than at any time in recent memory.The Obama administration has refused to recognize China's recently declared air defense identification zone over disputed territory with Japan — a subject that dominated Mr. Biden's visit — and the countries have sparred over what Washington regards as the organized daily intrusion into United States government and industry computer systems by Chinese entities, mostly to steal intellectual property. A two-day summit meeting in June between President Obama and Mr. Xi, intended to calm the tensions, was followed by a series of actions that have accentuated the rivalry between the world's established superpower and its fastest-rising competitor.The Chinese Foreign Ministry, responding to Mr. Biden, said on Thursday that it managed foreign reporters "according to law and regulations." A spokesman, Hong Lei, said, "As for foreign correspondents' living and working environments in China, I think as long as you hold an objective and impartial attitude, you will arrive at the right conclusion."Chinese officials have all but said that American reporters know what they need to do to get their visas renewed: tailor their coverage.The Times has been in regular contact with the Obama administration on the issue; with time running out on the current visas for its correspondents, repeated efforts to obtain new ones have so far been unsuccessful.Jill Abramson, The Times's executive editor, said in an interview that "unfettered coverage of China is a crucial issue" and that she was determined to continue "the highest quality journalism about China," whether or not the visas were renewed. Asked about the Chinese argument that its authorities were enforcing laws that apply to all journalists in China, she noted, "Our laws make clear there is respect for freedom of expression."Over the decades, there have been periodic crackdowns on news organizations in China. But the pressure has increased since China emerged as the world's second-largest economy, and scrutiny of its government and business practices — and Western-style investigative reporting — has led the Chinese government to both protest and threaten foreign news organizations.Chinese officials have privately told reporters that the refusal to deal with their visa applications was linked to their reporting. Mr. Biden intervened during his trip, his aides said, partly out of a concern that Beijing might be trying to drive entire news bureaus — including The Times and Bloomberg — out of the country and harm their business prospects in one of the world's most booming news markets.
HONG KONG — Stuart Manley of Wales put himself in position for a first European Tour title by shooting a 4-under 66 Saturday to take a one-shot lead into the final round at the Hong Kong Open.Manley made the most of benign conditions at the Hong Kong Golf Club to roll in six birdies mixed with two bogeys for a total of 10-under 200.Wade Ormsby of Australia and Shiv Kapur of India both shot 66 as well to sit tied for a second, while defending champion Miguel Angel Jimenez of Spain (65) was among a trio of players a further stroke back.Manley has never finished better than ninth on the European Tour, and the most notable moment of his career so far came last month at the World Cup of golf when he followed up a hole-in-one by making 11 on the next hole.He was a lot more consistent on Saturday, and knows he needs to keep that up to close out the victory."I will use the same approach tomorrow. I not going to change anything," the Welshman said. "I have nothing to lose. I will go out there and get it done."His only mishap this time came on the 16th when his approach shot hit a sprinkler head and the ball bounced away from the hole. He ended up collecting his second bogey for the day."That was a stiff one to take and very disappointing but the good thing is that I bounced straight back with a birdie on the 17th," Manley said.Overnight leader Jbe Kruger on South Africa only managed a 73 after four bogeys and a double bogey and plummeted down the leaderboard to a tie for 21st.In contrast, Kapur managed to stay bogey free to put himself in contention."I stayed patient and I was rewarded for it. Today was all about putting myself into position," Kapur said.Jimenez is a three-time champion in Hong Kong and made seven birdies mixed with a double-bogey on the 15th."I'm hitting the ball well and I'm just a couple of shots behind and in in the right place," Jimenez said.
BEIJING — An 85-year-old U.S. veteran of the Korean War detained for more than a month in North Korea left Beijing on Saturday on a flight to San Francisco, hours after being deported from the secretive state, sources at the airport said.Merrill Newman, who had earlier arrived in Beijing from Pyongyang, left China on a United Airlines direct flight to California, where he lives in a retirement community in Palo Alto. A Reuters witness saw U.S. embassy officials at the airport as the flight departed.North Korea, which had detained him over his role in special forces operations in the war six decades ago, said he had been released on humanitarian grounds and because he had admitted to his wrongdoing and apologized.
HONG KONG — The police in Beijing have recommended that one of China's most prominent human rights advocates, Xu Zhiyong, be tried for his role in organizing demonstrations demanding that the Communist Party disclose officials' wealth and provide equal educational opportunities, his lawyer and a friend said Friday.The recommendation from investigators in Beijing brought Mr. Xu one step closer to a trial, but prosecutors must still decide whether to indict him, his lawyer, Zhang Qingfang, said in a telephone interview."Legally speaking, this means that the public security office believes that Xu Zhiyong's actions constituted a crime," Mr. Zhang said.Teng Biao, a friend of Mr. Xu's, said in a telephone interview: "The prosecutors can choose to indict, demand further investigation or reject the charges. Indictment is most likely, I'm afraid."Mr. Teng said another of Mr. Xu's lawyers had told him about the police decision.Mr. Zhang said Mr. Xu maintained he is innocent."Mr. Xu has always been adamant that he never committed any crimes, that he was acting entirely within the bounds of his lawful rights," Mr. Zhang said.The accusations show that the government has targeted Mr. Xu for his leading role in a citizens' rights movement that since last year has gained a public following with its demands for greater political freedom and disclosure of officials' assets as a way to fight corruption.The movement has also protested China's education system, which prevents students from rural areas from sharing the same resources and opportunities as those in big cities.Mr. Zhang said the criminal charge against Mr. Xu was "assembling a crowd to disrupt order in a public place, the one he was arrested for.""The public security claimed that he organized people to assemble and demand disclosure of officials' wealth and equal educational rights, disturbing the public order," he said.The police also accuse Mr. Xu of helping to arrange banners and other paraphernalia for the small, usually brief protests in Beijing and elsewhere, Mr. Teng said.The Communist Party closely controls Chinese prosecutors and judges, especially in politically delicate cases, and Mr. Xu appears unlikely to escape trial and a prison sentence.The police detained Mr. Xu in July, after he had already spent more than three months under informal house arrest in his apartment. Several other supporters of the citizens' movement and parallel rights campaigns have been arrested, including a wealthy investor, Wang Gongquan, and a veteran dissident, Yang Maodong. This week, a court in eastern China tried three other participants in the movement.Mr. Xu, 40, has been prominent in China's network of rights advocates since 2003, when he took up the case of Sun Zhigang, a young clothing designer who was fatally beaten in a detention center for people lacking the right residency documents. The resulting outcry led the government to abolish arbitrary detention in such centers.Mr. Xu studied law, but government authorities have refused to give him a license to practice.Mr. Zhang, his lawyer, said prosecutors might spend a month to six months or more considering the case. He said his most recent visit to Mr. Xu was in late November."He's doing O.K.," Mr. Zhang said. "He is very firm that he will defend himself as innocent."
TAIPEI, Taiwan — Lydia Ko rallied to win her first title as a professional.The 16-year-old from New Zealand won the Swinging Skirts World Ladies Masters on Sunday, closing with a 4-under 68 for a three-stroke victory over South Korea's So Yeon Ryu.Ko had an 11-under 205 total at Linkou Miramar and earned $150,000 in the event sanctioned by the Taiwan and Korean tours. Ryu finished with a 73. Top-ranked Inbee Park was third at 7 under after a 70.Ko tied for 21st last month in the LPGA Titleholders in her only other start as a professional. She won four pro events as an amateur, taking the Canadian Women's Open the last two years.
BEIJING — Chinese authorities have banned shark fin and bird's nest soup from official receptions and told lower level officials they cannot stay in suites on business trips in the latest step in a crackdown on extravagance and waste.The official Xinhua news agency said on Sunday that cigarettes and expensive alcoholic drinks were also banned from official receptions, citing a document issued by the Communist Party's Central Committee and the State Council."Shark fins, bird nests and products of rare wild animals are popular materials in luxury dinners in China," Xinhua cited the document as saying. "Officials on business tours should arrange their own meals according to relevant expenditure standards."Chinese President Xi Jinping has sought to address growing public anger at the illegal or unethical behavior of party officials, especially those with flamboyant lifestyles, often seen as a sign they are corrupt.Since taking office in March, Xi has called corruption a threat to the party's survival and a number of government officials and executives of top companies have been detained over corruption allegations.Authorities have also issued directives aimed at curbing extravagance, including cutting personal use of government vehicles and banning the sending of new year cards at public expense.The latest document also said that officials below provincial level cannot stay in suites when on business trips, while their hosts are banned from giving them cash, souvenirs or local products as gifts, Xinhua said.Officials will also not get welcoming ceremonies at airports or stations, and conferences at tourist attractions will be banned.Oversight will be tightened to ensure the rules are followed, the Xinhua report said.
BEIJING — China's November exports accelerated but import growth slumped in a sign the recovery of the world's second-largest economy might be slowing.Exports surged 12.7 percent over a year earlier to $202.2 billion, up from October's 5.6 percent expansion, trade data showed Sunday.Imports rose 5.3 percent to $168.4 billion, but that growth was down from the previous month's 7.6 percent.China's economic growth rebounded in the three months ending in September to 7.8 percent after plunging to a two-decade low the previous quarter. But forecasters have warned that was likely to be temporary and growth would fall back late this year or early in 2014.The rebound was driven by a government mini-stimulus based on higher spending on building railways and other public works.Chinese leaders are trying to guide the economy to slower, more sustainable growth based on domestic consumption instead of exports and investment. An unexpectedly sharp decline raised the risk of politically volatile job losses and prompted them to reverse course temporarily to prop up growth.The relative strength in November exports should help to reassure communist leaders who faced the prospect of job losses in trade-dependent industries due to weak global demand.Slower Chinese growth and weaker demand would have global repercussions for suppliers of raw materials, technology and consumer goods.The import slowdown caused China's global trade surplus to widen by 73 percent to $33.8 billion over a year earlier, one of its widest trade gaps this year.China's trade surplus with the 27-nation European Union was $10.2 billion, while that with the United States was $22.4 billion.General Administration of Customs of China (in Chinese): www.customs.gov.cn
HONG KONG — Health officials in Hong Kong late Friday reported the city's second confirmed case of avian influenza in a week, in an 80-year-old man who resides in the neighboring mainland Chinese city of Shenzhen.The man, whom officials did not name, had spent two weeks in a hospital in Shenzhen being treated for chronic illness before arriving in Hong Kong on Tuesday and checking in to the Tuen Mun Hospital. He developed a fever on Friday morning and was immediately put into isolation, where he tested positive for the H7N9 avian influenza, Hong Kong's Center for Health and Protection said in a statement.It is the second case of the deadly virus in the city, after a 36-year-old Indonesian woman was confirmed on Monday to have contracted the disease after traveling across the border to Shenzhen, where she purchased a chicken, slaughtered it and then ate it.The H7N9 influenza virus normally circulates among birds and has only recently begun to affect humans. So far it has infected 136 people across 12 Chinese provinces, killing 45 of them, according to an October report by the World Health Organization, the most recent one available on the organization's website.Most of those cases were reported in March and April of this year, and almost none emerged over the warm summer months. But as the weather turns colder, the arrival of the traditional flu season has been cause for greater vigilance on the part of health officials and the general public.Confirmation of a second case in Hong Kong raises concerns because the city of 7 million is a global transportation hub, and also because it has a long history of viral outbreaks.In 2003, the SARS epidemic that originated in neighboring Guangdong Province spread rapidly through Hong Kong — where it killed 299 people and infected 1,800 — and caused deaths in places including Taiwan, Singapore, Vietnam and Canada.So far, health officials say there is no indication that the new avian flu virus is being transmitted between people, and that animal-to-human transmission is the most likely means of infection.In the most recent case, Hong Kong health officials have put the man's family members, the patients who shared the same cubicle at the Tuen Mun hospital and others he may have had contact with under medical surveillance.The officials are still searching for the taxi driver who drove the man and three of his family members from the immigration checkpoint at Shenzhen Bay to the hospital in Tuen Mun. The man has since been transferred to Princess Margaret Hospital, where the Indonesian woman who first contracted the virus remains in critical condition."The Serious Response Level under the government's preparedness plan for influenza pandemic has been activated while the Center for Health and Protection's epidemiological investigation and follow-up actions are currently in full swing," a spokesman for the health center said Friday in a statement.After the first H7N9 case was discovered in Hong Kong Monday, local health officials tightened infection controls at hospitals and limited visiting hours, while strictly enforcing cleaning rules at live chicken stalls in local markets. Hong Kong also said it planned to step up health checks at its borders to screen visitors for the virus. It was not known if the man in the latest case who came in from Shenzhen had been subject to such screening.Also on Friday, health officials in the eastern Chinese province of Zhejiang confirmed an additional case of the H7N9 virus, in a 30-year-old man who is being treated at a hospital in the city of Hangzhou.
BEIJING — A satellite jointly developed by China and Brazil failed to enter orbit after the rocket carrying it malfunctioned after launch on Monday, state media reported.The high-resolution remote-sensing Ziyuan I-03 satellite was launched aboard a Chinese Long March 4B rocket in northern Shanxi province, the official Xinhua News Agency said.Citing unidentified military sources, Xinhua said Chinese and Brazilian experts were analyzing the cause of the malfunction.China has a range of Long March rockets for use in commercial launches.Earlier this year, a Chinese space program official said the country was looking to increase its share of the global commercial satellite launching business from 3 percent to 15 percent by 2020.
BEIJING — China expressed regret on Monday over South Korea's expansion of its air defense zone, which partially overlaps a similar zone declared by Beijing.South Korea's move followed China's announcement last month of its zone, believed aimed at claiming disputed territory. Beijing's zone has been criticized by its neighbors and the United States, which say they will not honor it.The South Korean zone announced Sunday covers a submerged reef that South Korea controls but that China also claims, and it enlarged areas of airspace also included in the Chinese zone.Chinese Foreign Ministry spokesman Hong Lei said that South Korea had informed Beijing of its expanded zone, and called it "regrettable." He said China remains in contact with Seoul and hopes it will "properly handle the issue."Beijing was criticized for raising regional tensions by unilaterally declaring its zone, which also includes a chain of disputed islands claimed by Japan.
BEIJING — The last meal at Maison Boulud in China, at least for now, was served on Sunday.The restaurant, run by the New York chef Daniel Boulud in the former American Embassy not far from Tiananmen Square, closed after five years, the victim of a falling out with Chinese partners and perhaps the staid habits of Beijing.At brunch on Sunday, patrons from 7 to 70 dined on golden chicken from Dongbei in northern China and plump shrimp from the Yellow Sea. Gray skies cast a soft light through tall windows into the dining room of the mansion, constructed in 1903 as one of the first Western-style buildings in Beijing, the capital.The guests, including women dressed in pearls and high heels, men in sweaters and jeans and two children, Audrey, 7, and Alex, 13, who with their mother, Ly Vu, have been frequent patrons, all gathered to say farewell."We adore the restaurant, the ambience and the service," said Mrs. Vu, a Vietnamese-American living in Beijing, as she and her children finished eating a chicken that had been carved at the table by the executive chef, Brian Reimer. "We love the juicy chicken with crispy skin," she said. "The dining room is homey yet elegant. It's very sad it is closing."For Mr. Boulud's dining empire, now at 13 restaurants, including establishments in Singapore, London and Toronto, a closing is unusual. A venture in Las Vegas shut in 2010 but another is set to open there, said Brett Traussi, director of operations for the Dinex Group, which manages the Boulud gourmet brand.Beijing is known as a tough restaurant town, a place of politicians and bureaucrats, banquet halls and back-room deals. Shanghai is China's boisterous city, still nurturing the traditions left over from the Europeans who lived and played there in the 1920s and '30s.Along the Bund in Shanghai, at least five European restaurants, lavishly decorated and with sparkling views of the Huangpu River, vie for expense account customers. In Beijing, where foreign diplomats are penurious and government officials prefer Chinese restaurants, there were three distinguished Western eateries. Now there are two."Shanghai is pragmatic, moves faster and is more business-focused," said Michelle Garnaut, chief executive of the M Restaurant Group, which runs M on the Bund in Shanghai, and Capital M, one of the surviving Western-style restaurants in Beijing."Let's hope Boulud finds somewhere else in Beijing," Ms. Garnaut said. "It has been an excellent restaurant."Mr. Boulud has not given up on the Beijing restaurant scene. "Our partners have other ambitions for the building," he said in a telephone interview from Lyon, France. "Beijing is becoming a very cool place. I've always liked Beijing. I want the setup to be right, the partners to be right."Acquiring the ingredients for a Western menu was one of the great challenges in Beijing, he said. Many were imported: beef from Australia, salmon from Alaska, oil and vinegar from Hong Kong. He was delighted to find yellow-skinned chicken from Dongbei that came close to the stronger taste of the free-range poultry of the Landes region of France.But a few items, including some herbs, were impossible to find. Thyme, rosemary and basil could be grown fresh in the kitchen. Chervil and tarragon plants proved too delicate to flourish. Dried tarragon was the only solution.Maison Boulud had a certain cachet because of its home in the two-story structure that served as the American Embassy; it was one of the first buildings in the capital to use imported steel and lumber from the United States.Newspaper accounts from the period note that Sidney H. Nealy, an architect for the State Department, designed the chancery, separate residences, servants' quarters and an ice factory. "These buildings are such as might be put up in Washington for a similar purpose," said an article in The Washington Post. "They are in every respect first-class gray brick and granite structures with every modern improvement." The article said Mr. Nealy learned "enough of the language to handle the native laborers," who "had to be taught in an American way."When the Communists took power in 1949, the embassy, set on a square known as the Legation Quarter, became the property of the government. Before the 2008 Olympics, developers leased the chancery and the accompanying buildings and renovated them for commercial use in what was planned as a plaza of restaurants and galleries.The interior of the chancery, where the Maison Boulud dining room is on the first floor, retains much of its original look. The white carved banister of the staircase, the black and white marble floors in the bar area and broad beam timber floors in banquet rooms upstairs are still intact.A large room at the back of the lobby, now swathed in red wallpaper, was described by the restaurant as the place where Henry A. Kissinger and Zhou Enlai met secretly in 1971 to plan President Richard M. Nixon's visit to China the following year.In fact, those meetings took place at the Diaoyutai State Guest House compound some distance from the old American Embassy, said Winston Lord, who participated in the 48 hours of talks as an aide to Mr. Kissinger. Mr. Lord later became United States ambassador to China."We left Diaoyutai once — for a secret tour of the Forbidden City, followed by a secret lunch with Zhou Enlai in the Great Hall of the People," Mr. Lord said.But if the legend of the Kissinger-Zhou meeting turned out not to be accurate, there are many memories to cherish for the Maison Boulud archives, some of them quintessential Beijing.Not long after the restaurant opened, a successful Chinese businessman from a coal-mining region in Shanxi Province hosted a dinner for a dozen guests. He ordered the best vintage French burgundies and the most expensive dishes, Mr. Reimer, the chef, said.When the $23,000 bill arrived, the businessman called his driver, who delivered two bags filled with Chinese bank notes to the table to pay the tab.
HONG KONG — China's exports rose more than expected last month, government figures released Sunday showed, as resurgent demand from consumers in the United States and the European Union helped put the Asian manufacturing juggernaut on track for its biggest annual trade surplus since 2008.China's exports of goods rose 12.7 percent in November compared with a year earlier, while imports increased 5.3 percent, resulting in a trade surplus for the month of $33.8 billion, according to data from the General Administration of Customs.The reported export growth outpaced expectations of a 7.1 percent increase, while the increase in imports was less than the 7.2 percent economists had forecast, according to the average estimates from a survey of economists by Thomson Reuters.Analysts said that although the yearly comparison figures were partly bolstered by companies' overinvoicing — an anomaly of Chinese trade data — the underlying export trends were encouraging."The year-on-year growth data overstates the actual export momentum," Louis Kuijs, the chief China economist at the Royal Bank of Scotland in Hong Kong, wrote Sunday in a research note. "Nonetheless, there are signs that the global activity and trade cycle is gaining momentum, driven by the recovery in high-income countries, and China's exporters are benefiting from that."Improving demand in the West for Chinese goods led to greater-than-expected growth in shipments to major trading partners. China's exports to the United States rose 17.3 percent last month, while shipments to the European Union rose 18.5 percent, customs figures show.As a result, China's trade surplus is soaring to levels not seen in years — a development that could draw scrutiny from Western trading partners.Liu Li-Gang, the chief economist for greater China at the Australia and New Zealand Banking Group, wrote Sunday in a research note that China's trade surplus was likely to exceed $240 billion this year, the highest level since 2008.This, Mr. Liu wrote, is "contrary to the fact that renminbi appreciation has significantly eroded trade competitiveness." A stronger currency makes the goods that Chinese manufacturers export relatively more expensive to foreigners.China's currency has risen more than 16 percent against the dollar in the last five years to about 6.08 renminbi per dollar from around 7.3 per dollar at the start of 2008.The stronger currency, coupled with rising wages at home and weak demand from overseas, have made profitability more difficult for Chinese manufacturers and trading firms in recent years. For example, shares in Li & Fung, the Hong Kong merchandiser that is one of the biggest sourcing agents in the world, are down about 25 percent this year, compared with a 4.8 percent increase in the benchmark Hang Seng Index.Still, appreciation of the currency has slowed substantially in recent months, which could be seen as contributing to China's growing trade surpluses. The renminbi has strengthened only about 0.7 percent against the dollar since May.Analysts were quick to caution that China's monthly trade figures could not be taken entirely at face value.Chinese officials have been working in recent months to compile more accurate trade figures after having reported widely aberrant monthly export and import data early this year and late last year — irregularities that analysts have said were caused by companies seeking to evade taxes, known as "round-tripping," or to disguise capital inflows to China by falsifying the invoiced value of the goods they were shipping abroad."The data in January-November suggest that China could achieve the 8 percent trade growth target for the whole year," Mr. Liu wrote in his note. "However, we cannot be overly optimistic, as the overinvoicing and round-tripping clearly inflated export growth in the first half of the year."
BEIJING — An overnight fire at a farmers' market in the southern Chinese city of Shenzhen killed at least 16 people and injured five others, local authorities said Wednesday.The Shenzhen municipal government said in a statement that the fire broke out at about 1:30 a.m. at the Rongjian Wholesale Produce Market and engulfed an area of 1,000 square meters (1,200 square yards) before being put out at 3 p.m.It said 16 people were dead and five injured. Those hospitalized were in stable condition, the statement said. The official Xinhua News Agency reported later that the manager of the market was in police custody.The Shenzhen government did not say what might have caused the fire but said the authorities would perform a thorough, citywide safety check to prevent similar incidents.
BEIJING — Commentaries by two of China's most influential news outlets suggesting that the country's air pollution crisis was not without a silver lining drew a withering reaction on Tuesday from internet users and other media.In online commentaries on Monday, state broadcaster CCTV and the widely read tabloid the Global Times, published by the Communist Party's official People's Daily, both tried to put a positive spin on China's smog problem.The Global Times said smog could be useful in military situations, as it could hinder the use of guided missiles, while CCTV listed five "unforeseen rewards" for smog, including helping Chinese people's sense of humour.While both pieces have since been deleted from their websites, Chinese newspapers lost little time in denouncing their point of view, in an unusual case of state media criticising other state media, showing the scale of the anger."Is the smog supposed to lift if we laugh about it?" wrote the Beijing Business Today, published by the city government's official Beijing Daily. "Smog affects our breathing. We hope it does not affect our thinking."The Dongguan Times, from a heavily industrial city close to the border with Hong Kong, said CCTV's comments were so bizarre people did not know "whether to laugh or cry"."There's nothing funny about the health dangers of smog," it wrote.Even the main Xinhua news agency - which had initially picked up CCTV's commentary - weighed in, writing on one of its official microblogs late on Monday that it was "totally inappropriate" to make fun of air pollution.Air quality in cities is of increasing concern to China's stability-obsessed leaders, anxious to douse potential unrest as a more affluent urban population turns against a growth-at-all-costs economic model that has poisoned much of the country's air, water and soil.The top U.S. environmental regulator, on a visit to Beijing, said that China was trying to deal with the same sort of problems the United States once faced."We have to acknowledge that significant pollution challenges are being faced today in China," Environmental Protection Agency administrator Gina McCarthy told students at Tsinghua University. "The thing is, not too long ago, the U.S. faced similar challenges."She made no concrete suggestions for sharing technology as her Chinese counterpart, Ministry for Environmental Protection head Zhou Shengxian, had urged on Monday.Large parts of eastern China, including the country's prosperous and cosmopolitan commercial capital Shanghai, have been covered in a thick pall of smog over the past week or so, though Beijing's normally filthy air has been relatively clear.Users of Sina Weibo, China's answer to Twitter, also vented their outrage over the CCTV and Global Times' comments."The smog crisis covering large parts of China has revealed the failure of the government's development strategy of only going after GDP (growth). CCTV is shameless in trying to cover up for their masters," wrote Wu Bihu, a professor at the elite Peking University."The Global Times thinks that pollution will cause missiles to miss their targets ... How shameful! So that's what all this smog has really been about. People had thought it was just bad pollution...," state television in the eastern province of Shandong wrote on one of its microblogs.
BEIJING — A Chinese law professor said Tuesday that he has been expelled from his college after he refused to recant an article he wrote calling for constitutional rule in China.The expulsion of Zhang Xuezhong from East China University of Political Science and Law in Shanghai comes at a time when the Chinese authorities are tightening ideological controls, and weeks after Peking University in Beijing dismissed the liberal economist Xia Yeliang from its faculty. Both Zhang and Xia champion free speech and the rule of law, and both believe their expulsions are politically motivated to punish their views.Zhang, a lecturer at the Shanghai school since 2001, said he was notified orally of the university's decision Monday and that he plans to defend himself with a lawsuit against the school once he receives written notice."Taking up the legal means will have no effect on my case, but I will use every possibility to counter the (state) power so that the power would think twice when it persecutes others in the future," Zhang said.The university's Communist Party chief, Du Zhichun, declined to discuss the matter when reached by phone.Zhang said the institute accuses him of using the school's email system to share his book "New Common Sense." The book criticizes China's one-party rule.The school also says Zhang has imposed his political views upon university faculty and staff and that he has taken advantage of his teacher's role to spread among students his political views in violation of teachers' ethical rules, Zhang said.Zhang said university officials failed to give one example in which he fed his political views to students in the classroom and that exchanging political views with students as equals should be allowed. Zhang said he noted to school officials that the university has forced the government-sanctioned political views upon students.Political indoctrination is part of the curriculum for Chinese students throughout their school years.In June, Zhang riled the university leadership with an article in which he criticized the unusual campaign by the Beijing establishment against advocacy of constitutionalism. The Chinese Communist Party leadership has been wary of constitutionalism because it has the potential to undermine the party rule.Following the June article, Zhang was banned from teaching any course at the university, but the censure failed to make Zhang contrite. The internal notice said Zhang has failed to realize his mistakes and act to correct them."I cannot admit mistakes that do not exist," Zhang said.
BEIJING — China on Tuesday rebuffed an expression of concern by U.S. Secretary of State John Kerry over the fate of two prominent Chinese dissidents, saying only the Chinese people had the right to talk about the country's human rights.Kerry, in a statement on the fifth anniversary of the detention of Nobel Peace Prize-winning dissident Liu Xiaobo, called for his release, and also said he was concerned about Liu's wife, who is under house arrest, and another well-known activist, Xu Zhiyong, who is expected to face trial soon.Chinese Foreign Ministry spokesman Hong Lei said both Liu and Xu had broken the law."China is a country with rule of law, and all are equal before the law. Nobody can be above the law. Liu Xiaobo and Xu Zhiyong are Chinese citizens who broke the law and have naturally been punished according to Chinese law," Hong told a daily news briefing."What I want to stress is that, China's 1.3 billion people have the best right to talk about the country's human rights. We hope that the U.S. side can act in accordance with the broader perspective of bilateral ties and do more to increase mutual trust."China is in the midst of a renewed crackdown on dissidents and freedom of speech, defying initial expectations among many that Xi Jinping would take a softer stance after he became president this year.Western governments have sparred repeatedly with Beijing over human rights and both the United States and European Union have expressed concern about Liu and Xu.Liu, a veteran dissident involved in the 1989 Tiananmen Square pro-democracy protests crushed by the Chinese army, was jailed in 2009 for 11 years on subversion charges for organising a petition urging the overthrow of one-party rule.Xu is in jail awaiting trial after being arrested for campaigning for Chinese officials to reveal their wealth, in a case that has exposed shortcomings in the government's drive against deep-rooted corruption.
HONG KONG — A Chinese bad-debt management company's shares soared in their Hong Kong debut Thursday, highlighting strong investor appetite for a business that will flourish if the world's No. 2 economy stumbles.China Cinda Asset Management's shares rose 27 percent to close at 4.50 Hong Kong dollars ($0.58) after rising as much as 34 percent during the day.The state-owned company is China's first ever distressed asset management company to go public.It's a so-called "bad bank," one of four big entities originally tasked with moving nonperforming loans off the books of China's state-owned banks.Cinda raised HK$18.5 billion ($2.4 billion) from its stock offering, making it the biggest initial public offering in Hong Kong this year.There was exceptionally high interest from local retail investors, whose demand for the shares was 160 times the number available, and big institutional investors, whose portion of the global offering was "significantly oversubscribed," according to a filing with Hong Kong's stock exchange this week.The company offers investors a new twist on China's growth story that has been based for decades on the promise of supercharged economic expansion.Investors are betting the company, which makes money buying up distressed assets at a discount and reselling them for a profit, will benefit from rising levels of bad debt as China's economy undergoes an uneven recovery after slowing to a two-decade low in the second quarter.The country's leaders say they're comfortable with that slower pace. They are trying to shift the economy from reliance on exports and investment in favor of domestic consumption.In its prospectus, Cinda said net profit last year rose 8 percent to 7.3 billion yuan ($1.2 billion). The company looks set to benefit as the number of loans in China going sour rises further.Nonperforming loans at Chinese banks surged to 563.6 billion yuan ($93 billion) in the July-September quarter, 18 percent more than the year before, according to data from the China Banking Regulatory Commission. However, they accounted for less than 1 percent of total loans as overall bank lending continued to grow."Investors are clearly attracted to Cinda's IPO, which is also driven in part by the novelty factor," said Mark Chan, a partner specializing in corporate finance at law firm Berwin Leighton Paisner."It is definitely tempting for other asset managers to follow suit, especially if Cinda is able to continue performing well after its listing."
BEIJING — Chinese authorities have told pilots who fly to Beijing they must be qualified to land their aircraft in the low visibility brought about by smog, state media said on Thursday, as the government tries to reduce flight delays due to pollution.Beginning January 1, pilots flying from the country's 10 busiest airports into the Chinese capital must be qualified to use an instrument landing system on days when smog reduces visibility to around 400 metres (1,315 feet), the official China Daily said, citing China's civil aviation regulator."It is part of a series of measures the administration took recently to raise the flights' on-time performance," the newspaper quoted an unnamed aviation official as saying.Despite investing billions of dollars in new airports and advanced Western-built aircraft, China suffers a chronic problem with flight delays, partly because of the country's often wildly-fluctuating weather and partly because the military tightly controls most of China's airspace.Chinese media frequently reports fights, attacks on airport and airline workers and passengers storming aircraft in response to delays and the poor way they are handled, and the government has demanded airlines and airports address the issue.In recent years, smog has added to the problem of delays, especially in Beijing but also in other parts of the country like cosmopolitan business hub Shanghai."Considering the recent smog and haze has bought numerous troubles to air transport in eastern and southern regions, it seems necessary for authorities to ask pilots to improve their landing capability in low visibility," the China Daily quoted Ouyang Jie, a professor at Civil Aviation University of China, as saying.The report added that only a handful of Chinese airports have the instrument landing systems required for aircraft to land in poor visibility.Air quality in cities is of increasing concern to China's stability-obsessed leaders, anxious to douse potential unrest as a more affluent urban population turns against a growth-at-all-costs economic model that has poisoned much of the country's air, water and soil.China's state media came under fire this week for arguing the smog had a benefit, that it would hinder the use of guided missiles and could help Chinese people's sense of humour.
BEIJING — A dozen residents of a central Chinese city protested the demolition of their homes by drinking pesticide in Beijing in a desperate bid for attention that underscores the failures of a decades-old petitioning system.The 12 survived the protest Tuesday near a historic watchtower in the heart of China's capital after police sent them to a hospital, where they were being treated Wednesday for poisoning, said Wang Yuping, one of the residents.Chinese petitioners sometimes are driven to extreme measures as their frustration boils over after years of unresolved grievances and routine beatings by local authorities.Wang, 40, and the others had traveled to Beijing from a district in Wuhan, the provincial capital of Hubei province, to draw attention to their complaints. Wang described the protest as a group suicide attempt."We have been petitioning for so many years, but either we have been dragged back home or locked in secret jails and beaten, and no one has been willing to help us," Wang said by telephone. "We felt like there was no hope left."Each petitioner drank about 50 milliliters (1.7 ounces) of pesticide, Wang said, then lay down on the ground until police bundled them into vehicles and drove them to a hospital."I felt dizzy and nauseous," he said from a hospital in the southwestern Fengtai district.Wang said the petitioners have been unsuccessfully seeking redress since 2010 for the razing of their homes by local authorities who provided little or no compensation.Local government and police offices in Wuhan could not be reached by phone.Every year in China, millions of complaints are filed about what petitioners see as injustice or incompetence by local officials in issues such as land expropriation, forced home demolitions and labor disputes, or the failure of local authorities to prosecute crimes.The system is criticized as ineffective and being prone to abuse. Petitioners are often met with violence when they attempt to take their cases to Beijing, with local governments sending "interceptors" to stop them — with force — and keep them in informal "black jails" until they can be sent home.Last month, Chinese officials announced steps to reform the petitioning system by diverting cases to courts and improving ways for complaints to be lodged online. But critics say the measures are unlikely to help as long as the judiciary is controlled by the Communist Party.Liu Feiyue, a Wuhan-based veteran activist who runs a rights monitoring network, said he receives reports about petitioners hurting themselves or attempting to take their lives at least once a month. Some have jumped off buildings, cut themselves or self-immolated.In some cases like Tuesday's protest, the petitioners are treading a thin line between a suicide attempt and a desperate plea for help, Liu said."They have been petitioning for so many years, and the authorities either don't pay attention or they lie to them or deny any responsibility," Liu said by phone. "The petitioners end up taking extreme measures because they hope it will attract the attention of some officials who might solve their problems. This is definitely one of their considerations."In August, state media reported that more than 10 people drank pesticide in an apparent group suicide bid in northeastern Beijing. The reports carried few details, though overseas news websites said they were parents of military veterans from the northeastern city of Harbin who had been petitioning unsuccessfully for years to get the city's railway bureau to hire their children.
SHANGHAI — A Chinese university has fired a professor for failing to admit wrongdoing in posting an article criticizing President Xi Jinping, the academic said on Wednesday, underscoring questions about academic freedoms for foreign colleges setting up shop in China.Many liberals had hoped that the new government under Xi, who became president in March, would be more tolerant of calls for political reform.But the sacking of law professor Zhang Xuezhong on Monday by the East China University of Political Science and Law in Shanghai appeared to be fresh evidence the ruling party is hardening its stance toward dissent.The sacking follows the dismissal of liberal Peking University economist Xia Yeliang in October for blog posts calling for democratic reforms and rule of law in China.Zhang's article, which he posted in June, and an online book he wrote entitled "New Common Sense" that was critical of Communist Party rule, rankled authorities and he said university officials tried on several occasions to get him to recant.He was suspended from teaching in August. Last month, law department and human resources officials asked if he had learned his lesson and would admit wrongdoing, he said on Wednesday."I said I did nothing wrong, so there's nothing to admit to," he told Reuters.The dean of the law school summoned him and said on Monday that the school administration had decided he was unfit to continue as a teacher in the law department."I told him that for a university to persecute a teacher based on his views or thoughts is a serious public event. It could become a scandal of historic proportions," said Zhang, 36, who also practises human rights law.A law school official with the same surname declined to comment when contacted by telephone. Calls to the university's information and propaganda office, to which she referred Reuters, went unanswered.Zhang's June article "The Origin and the Perils of the Anti-constitutionalism Campaign of 2013" criticised Xi, also Communist Party chief, as anti-constitutional, anti-free media and anti-judicial independence. His online book, "New Common Sense", says one-party rule is illegal.In November, Xi emerged from a key policy meeting of top Communist Party officials with what analysts said was a strengthened mandate. The meeting endorsed sweeping economic reforms but no political opening.Foreign universities have rushed to set up partnerships and branch campuses in China. The zeal to gain access to the huge education market has raised questions over whether prestigious schools would have to sacrifice academic freedoms under tightly government-controlled curricula.The website of East China University of Political Science and Law boasts "good working relationships" with dozens of schools, including the University of Maryland, St. Louis University, Willamette University and Golden State University.Xia's case drew international attention when it broke, including from faculty members at Wellesley College in Massachusetts, which has an exchange program with Peking University.More than 130 members of the Wellesley faculty wrote an open letter to Peking University officials in September, saying they would ask college administrators to cancel the exchange program if Xia was fired for political reasons.
HONG KONG — The Chinese economy is no longer as red-hot as it once was, but it remains solidly growing, judging by data released over the past few days.Figures released by the national statistics bureau on Tuesday showed that industrial output, an important gauge of economic activity, grew 10 percent in November, compared with a year earlier. That was a touch below analysts' forecasts, but in line with the performance of the past few months.Retail sales climbed 13.7 percent, solidly beating analyst expectations and picking up from the previous few months, the government said.And investment in fixed assets such as equipment and machinery — an important factor in China's growth in recent years — climbed 19.9 percent in the first 11 months of 2013, compared with the same period a year ago. That was slightly less than expected.Those numbers followed solid trade data reported on Sunday, which showed November exports gaining 12.7 percent — nearly twice what analysts polled by Thomson Reuters had forecast. And a survey of purchasing managers in the manufacturing sector produced a reading of 51.4 for November, unchanged from the previous month but solidly above the 50-point mark that separates expansion from contraction.Taken together, analysts said, the data painted a picture of an economy that is ticking along with perhaps a little less gusto than in the past few months, but much more robustly than at the start of this year. That was when slowing growth prompted Beijing to deliver a series of measures aimed at propping up activity. Those moves, and somewhat firmer demand for Chinese-made goods from overseas, have helped put the economy on track for an expansion of about 7.5 percent this year, economists said.The November data, China analysts at the Spanish bank BBVA said in a research note on Tuesday, "point to a moderating, though still strong, growth momentum."The performance also provides a generally solid backdrop to an important meeting of Communist Party leaders that began in Beijing on Tuesday.At that meeting — the annual Central Economic Work Conference, as it is formally known — China's top leaders are expected to map out the country's economic policy agenda for the coming year, effectively putting more flesh on the bones of the broad-brush policy pronouncements made at a larger party gathering last month. That meeting laid out the longer-term goals for revamping the Chinese economy in a bid to put its once supercharged growth on a more sustainable and balanced footing.The economic work conference this week is expected, among other things, to set a target for the pace of economic expansion next year.Analysts reading the runes of statements and recommendations made by government research organizations in recent weeks said it remained unclear whether the official 2014 growth target would be kept at 7.5 percent or trimmed closer to 7 percent.Although there were some signs last month that policy makers could lean toward trimming back the official target, the momentum more recently seems to have shifted toward 7.5 percent, according to Zhang Zhiwei, chief China economist in the Hong Kong office of Nomura, citing a forecast of 7.8 percent this week by the Chinese Academy of Social Sciences. That number, in Mr. Zhang's view, implied an official target of 7.5 percent for the coming year.
BEIJING — A gas explosion on Friday trapped 22 workers underground in a coal mine in western China.The blast at a coal mine in Changji prefecture occurred at 1:26 a.m. local time Friday when 34 miners were working, the prefecture's government news office.Twelve miners were able to scramble to safety but 22 others remained trapped, the news office of the prefecture in Xinjiang region said on its official microblog.China News Service reported that rescuers were searching for the trapped miners and that it was unclear whether there were injuries or fatalities among them.Such accidents are usually caused by a failure to ventilate methane gas from the shaft. China's mines, which are the deadliest in the world, suffer frequent explosions, floods and cave-ins.Safety improvements have reduced the number deaths in recent years, but regulations are still often ignored.
BEIJING — A 6-year-old Chinese boy whose eyes were gouged out in an attack more than three months ago was discharged Thursday from a hospital in the southern Chinese city of Shenzhen where he was successfully fitted with prosthetic eyes.Guo Bin — nicknamed Binbin — danced to music at a send-off ceremony at the C-MER Dennis Lam Eye Hospital, where he expressed gratitude and happiness.The prosthetic eyes look and move much like normal eyes, but do not restore vision. Doctors plan to fit Binbin with navigation sensors next summer that would allow him to get around on his own in familiar places.Police in the boy's hometown in northern China's Shanxi province say they suspect his aunt was the culprit in the attack, although they have not identified a motive. The woman has since committed suicide, and Binbin's parents have raised doubts.On Thursday, the boy's mother said Binbin can put on his clothes, brush his teeth and climb stairs by himself, according to reports in Hong Kong media."He has adapted well and is smart," mother Wang Wenli said before thanking the medical staff.The attack on the boy horrified the Chinese public and added to outrage over violence against children.
SHANGHAI — China has designated the eve of Lunar New Year as a working day in 2014, triggering an outcry over the disruption of plans to celebrate the year's most important traditional holiday.Each year in mid-December, the government announces public holidays for the following year.They often follow a similar pattern, but next year's schedule, announced late on Wednesday, has surprised and angered many, as the Spring Festival holiday is when millions travel home to be reunited with families, many for the only time in the year."Many people need to go home and prepare for the Chinese New Year," said Ran Ying, a 26-year-old office worker in Shanghai's financial district of Lujiazui. "It's a mistake to swap the holiday plan between the eve and the seventh day of New Year."The holiday plan approved by China's cabinet, or State Council, designates February 6 as a public holiday for the 7-day-long Spring Festival break, instead of January 30, the eve of Chinese Lunar New Year.An overwhelming number of users also expressed anger on China's popular Sina Weibo microblogging site."I want to ask the people who made the plan: are you able to go home right after work?" wrote one Weibo user. "What about the people who work outside their hometown? How can they hurry home and have the family reunion dinner?"Even the influential Global Times tabloid criticized the new schedule, saying those who lived away from their hometowns needed time to return, and calling for more public holidays."It is the desire of the urban Chinese society to increase public holidays as many people are feeling tired and care more about rest than money," it said in an editorial.The new schedule will do nothing to avert the chaos that results when the entire nation goes on holiday at the same time. Riot police had to be deployed to control crowds at some popular tourist sites over the week-long National Day break in October.Cai Jiming, a professor at Beijing's Tsinghua University who studies national holiday policy, told Xinhua news agency the only way to deal with the problem would be to spread the burden by enforcing paid vacations - which few Chinese get.The government also said only January 1 would be a public holiday next year, as opposed to the usual three days for the Western New Year holiday."It takes so long for the holiday plan to come out ... and it turns out that we only have a one-day holiday for New Year," wrote a Weibo user. "I have already bought my plane tickets."
BEIJING — Fifteen Chinese lawyers began a hunger strike on Thursday to protest being blocked from meeting a Christian pastor and several of his aides who were detained in a crackdown highlighting the ruling Communist Party's often prickly attitude toward religious groups.Lawyers Xia Jun and Liu Weiguo said they and the other attorneys who traveled to Nanle county in Henan to help the leaders of a state-approved church were repeatedly prevented from seeing them at a detention center."We strongly believe that this is a clear case of persecution of a religious group," Liu said in a phone interview. He said police were violating Chinese law by preventing the detainees from having access to lawyers.The lawyers were staging a hunger strike at least until they were allowed to see their clients, Liu and Xia said.The crackdown is unusual for a state-approved church. China's Communist government officially allows Christians to only worship in such churches, while unregistered congregations tend to be harassed.The lawyers say the detained pastor, Zhang Shaojie, and other church leaders are being punished for resisting local authorities' attempts to seize the church's land. Officials in Nanle either could not be reached or said they were unaware of the case.Liu said around 100 thugs surrounded the lawyers Thursday outside the detention center after their fifth and latest attempt to meet Zhang. He said the thugs harassed the attorneys and took many of their cellphones.Activists say local Chinese authorities often hire men from the area to intimidate and harass people or groups that police and other officials want to drive away.The lawyers said Zhang and the other church leaders were arrested for "obstructing official business" and gathering a crowd to disrupt public order, a vaguely worded charge that has recently been used in politically motivated cases. Around two dozen other churchgoers have also been rounded up, but have not been officially arrested, Liu said.
HONG KONG — When the Hong Kong school year began in September, tutor Tony Chow arranged to have his face plastered on the sides of double decker buses to raise his profile.For many of Chow's students, the advertisements may be the closest they'll ever get to him.The 30-year-old teaches English grammar to thousands of secondary school pupils, who attend his after-school lessons or watch video replays of them at Modern Education's 14 branches. Chow is a celebrity tutor in Hong Kong, where there's big money to be made offering extracurricular lessons to parents desperately seeking an edge for their children preparing for the city's intense public entrance exam for university.Global student rankings out last week highlighted the city's cutthroat academic atmosphere. Hong Kong teens, along with Shanghai, Singapore, South Korea and Japan, dominated the list compiled by the Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development. American students showed little improvement and failed to reach the top 20 in math, science or reading.Students in East Asian societies have long relied on so-called "cram schools," but Hong Kong has taken them to a new level in recent years, with the majority of students attending the city's nearly 1,000 tutorial centers. Academies use brash marketing, dressing their tutors in miniskirts and high heels or leather jackets to make them look like pop stars. Advertisements for these "tutor kings" and "tutor queens," as they are known in Cantonese, are splashed on giant roadside billboards, on the sides of shopping malls and on newspaper front pages.Many promise students they can help them ace the entrance exam."Basically the examination is just a game. When there's a game there must be both winners and losers. They have to know the tricks on how to win the game," said Chow. "We are trying to get them the shortcuts, the fast track to the answers."Chow and others promise, for example, that they will help students learn keywords that many believe examiners award points for when used in written answers.Hong Kong's tutorial industry is worth $260 million a year, according to a report by market research firm Synovate commissioned by Modern Education's parent company, which went public in 2011 and is one of a handful dominating the market.The industry has made some tutors extremely wealthy. One of the best known, Richard Eng, is famous for his love of Lamborghinis and Louis Vuitton. He's credited with kicking off the transformation of Hong Kong's tutoring industry starting around 1996 when he had the inspiration to market himself like a performer.While Chow won't say how much he earns, the top tutors can be paid many times what a public school teacher earns. Modern Education's highest paid tutor earns at least 16 million Hong Kong dollars ($2 million) a year, according to its parent company's latest annual report. The second highest earned $1.9 million and third highest made $1 million. Their identities were not disclosed.The salary figures may not include marketing costs, which the schools share with the tutors, who work as contractors. Chow says he spends thousands of dollars printing glossy exercise books he gives free to students. He split the cost of the bus ads, which cost HK$15,000 per bus, with Modern Education.Another tutor, Karson Oten Fan Karno, moonlights as a rapper and is popularly known by the name K. Oten. Lung Siu Kwan was a public school teacher who released an album of pop songs and was then recruited as a Chinese tutor by the King's Glory Education chain.Facebook profiles, YouTube videos and other social media are also part of the aggressive marketing tactics."Every night after they finish their classes I will send them messages through WeChat," a popular smartphone app, said Chow. After all, he said, "the most powerful tool is word of mouth within students."To many students, the glamorized images of Hong Kong's celebrity tutors has also, paradoxically, made their regular teachers appear less credible."It's like he has the teaching skills whereas I don't know if my teachers have the same qualification," said Amy Wong, a 16-year-old who was one of about 60 pupils taking Chow's weekly class on a recent night at branch in a suburban shopping mall.Some students watched the lesson through a glass wall — regulations limit classrooms to 45 pupils so cram schools get around this by subdividing the room.Others who couldn't make his live lesson watched a replay at other branches around the city. But the most they saw of Chow was a close-up of his hand using a pen to complete English idioms in a workbook while explaining almost exclusively in Cantonese. Questions from students are discouraged. Modern Education, which has 428,000 course enrollments, charges up to $74 for four of Chow's one-hour classes each month.Nearly three quarters of Hong Kong students attend tutorial classes, according to a survey by Mark Bray, director of Hong Kong University's Comparative Education Research Center.With the rate so high, others "that don't go to tutoring begin to feel nervous," Bray said. "The companies like that, the companies like nervous people and they trade on anxiety."Pressure is also rising after Hong Kong's education authorities in 2012 reduced the number of university entrance exams to one from two. The move was designed to reduce student anxiety but Bray said it had the opposite effect, turning it into a "make or break" test.He said Hong Kong's tutoring companies are using technology to lower costs to students, but that doesn't necessarily mean students are learning as much as they would if they had one-on-one tutoring."It's a bit like the fast food Industry. You can go to a fancy restaurant and have white table cloth and beautiful music in the background or you can go to fast food," Bray said. "You can still fill your stomach but maybe the quality is different."
BEIJING — Sooty skies are not the only reliable indicator that winter has finally descended on the Chinese capital. Vendors selling roasted sweet potatoes occupy street corners with their repurposed oil-drum ovens. To ward off the sniffles, Beijing cabdrivers nibble on cloves of raw garlic, making taxi rides especially trying.Then there are the piles of cabbage that accrue in communal courtyards, high-rise hallways and window ledges across the city.The vegetal escarpments sometimes tower waist-high in public stairwells, competing for space with rusting bicycles and neatly stacked piles of the honeycomb coal briquettes that still heat countless homes here."When you see a mound of cabbage outside your front door, you feel confident that you won't starve to death during the winter," said Wang Jianrong, 62, a retired government worker standing proudly beside a heap of white-and-jade roughage.In a city crowded with BMWs, upscale malls and produce-packed supermarkets, the stockpiling of cabbage is a vestigial impulse that speaks to an era of scarcity that still haunts Chinese of a certain age.Older Beijingers vividly recall the hungry winters of the 1950s and '60s, especially after Mao Zedong's disastrous attempt to industrialize the nation during the Great Leap Forward, when state-rationed turnips, leeks and cabbage sustained millions. "Back when I was a kid, you never saw a fat person," said Yang Renzhi, 60, a retired math teacher who was buying three dozen heads for her parents.The hoarding begins in earnest each November, when farmers from the outskirts of the capital deliver tons of newly harvested cabbage to city sidewalks for a state-sanctioned sale. The green mountains draw armies of gray-haired bargain hunters, who squeeze and prod the vegetables with the intensity of a wizened diamond trader."Give me 200 jin of your crispest heads," Zhang Libao, a 72-year-old former factory worker, barked one recent morning as Li Xueqing, a cabbage grower, loaded up the equivalent of 220 pounds on the back of a flatbed tricycle.Mr. Li, 46, a no-nonsense man who has been growing cabbage for two decades and sleeps on the sidewalk beside his wares, said he sold just under a ton each day during the capital's two-week run on cabbage.But he bemoaned an inexorable decline in business. He noted that the average purchase was less than 100 pounds, down from 500 pounds in the early 1980s, when market changes began transforming the nation's communal agriculture system, making food supplies more plentiful.Mr. Li and other sellers say chronically low prices — the result of modern farming practices and overplanting — have made the decline in winter stockpiling more painful. Although 30 percent higher than last year, according to Beijing Youth Daily, a state-run newspaper, the seasonal price of cabbage is still a meager 8 cents a pound. "Once it starts snowing, it could triple," he said.Even as they scoff at the hoarding, younger Beijingers are often forced to indulge their elders, many of whom rarely get through their cabbage reserves and are forced to throw out the moldering, mushy remains come spring."My 90-year-old mother sent me out today to see if the cabbage is good and cheap," said a 68-year-old woman who would give only her last name, Xia. "She won't stop sending me out until we have bought enough. She can't live without it."Mrs. Xia sighed when describing her family's annual cabbage-storing ritual. To protect them from rot, the heads are individually wrapped in newspaper. Every two weeks, she checks the cache for signs of decay and reshuffles the pile, moving those on the bottom to the top.But it would be unfair to view the annual hunt for cheap cabbage as simply a hard-wired, existential quest for sustenance.As they circled Mr. Li's beauties, buyers shared storage tips (drape them in old blankets) and traded recipes to ensure relatives maintained their ardor for a vegetable that traditionalists insist is the key to a healthy heart."Who can resist stir-fried cabbage, with eggs, pork and a dash of vinegar and hot pepper?" one retired engineer exclaimed with relish.A woman stepped forward to boast that she kept a file of 500 cabbage dishes in her head. "In soups, in dumplings, you name it: Cabbage goes with everything," she said.But Ms. Yang, the retired math teacher, said the cabbage hoarding was more than just about food."It's about nostalgia for a simpler time, perhaps one that these old people romanticize," she said, tying cabbage heads to her bike rack. "When my father sees cabbage piled on our 16th-floor balcony, he smiles and knows everything is going to be O.K."
NEW DELHI — The Indian Supreme Court reinstated on Wednesday a colonial-era law banning gay sex, ruling that it had been struck down improperly by a lower court.The 1861 law, which imposes a 10-year sentence for "carnal intercourse against the order of nature with man, woman or animal," was ruled unconstitutional in a 2009 decision. But the Supreme Court held that only Parliament had the power to change that law.There is almost no chance that Parliament will act where the Supreme Court did not, advocates and opponents of the law agreed. With the Bharatiya Janata Party, a conservative Hindu nationalist group, appearing in ascendancy before national elections in the spring, the prospect of any legislative change in the next few years is highly unlikely, analysts said.Anjali Gopalan, founder of a charity that sued to overturn the 1861 law, said she was shocked by the ruling."This is taking many, many steps back," Ms. Gopalan said. "The Supreme Court has not just let down the L.G.B.T. community, but the Constitution of India."S. Q. R. Ilyas, a member of the All India Muslim Personal Law Board, which filed a petition in support of the reversal, praised Wednesday's ruling."These relationships are unethical as well as unnatural," he said. "They create problems in society, both moral and social. This is a sin as far as Islam is concerned."India has a rich history of eunuchs and transgender people who serve critical roles in important social functions and whose blessings are eagerly sought. Transgender people often approach cars sitting at traffic lights here and ask for money, and many Indians — fearing a powerful curse if they refuse — hand over small bills.Despite this history, Indians are in the main deeply conservative about issues of sexuality and personal morality. National surveys show that Indians widely disapprove of homosexuality and, on average, have few sexual partners throughout their lives.The pressure to marry, have children and conform to traditional notions of family and caste can be overwhelming in many communities. Indian weddings are famously raucous and communal affairs. So gay men and women are often forced to live double lives.Asian nations typically take a more restrictive view of homosexuality than Western countries. In China, gay sex is not explicitly outlawed, but people can be arrested under ill-defined laws like licentiousness.The law banning homosexuality is rarely enforced in India, but the police sometimes use it to bully and intimidate gay men and women. In rare cases, health charities that hand out condoms to gays to help prevent the spread of H.I.V. and AIDS have had their work interrupted because such efforts are technically illegal under the law.But inspired by gay rights efforts elsewhere, activists in India have in recent years sought to assert their rights, holding gay rights marches and pushing for greater legal rights and recognition.As part of this effort, the Naz Foundation, a gay rights advocacy group, filed suit in 2001 challenging the 1861 law, known here as Section 377. After years of wrangling, the group won a remarkable victory in 2009, when the Delhi High Court ruled that the law violated constitutional guarantees for equality, privacy and freedom of expression.India's judges have sweeping powers and a long history of judicial activism that would be all but unimaginable in the United States. In recent years, judges required Delhi's auto-rickshaws to convert to natural gas to help cut down on pollution, closed much of the country's iron-ore-mining industry to cut down on corruption and ruled that politicians facing criminal charges could not seek re-election.Indeed, India's Supreme Court and Parliament have openly battled for decades, with Parliament passing multiple constitutional amendments to respond to various Supreme Court rulings.But legalizing gay sex was one step too far for India's top judges, and in a rare instance of judicial modesty they deferred to India's legislators.India's central government had offered conflicting arguments during the many years of wrangling around the case. But Indira Jaising, an assistant solicitor general of India, said in a televised interview that she was surprised that the court had decided to punt on the underlying legal case."They have never been deterred by the argument that the government, the legislature or the executive has not done this or that on other policy matters," she said.
BEIJING — A gas explosion at a coal mine in western China has killed 21 workers, an official said Saturday.The miners were earlier reported trapped by the blast in Xinjiang region's Changji prefecture early Friday. Twelve others escaped the explosion.An official at the Xinjiang region's work safety bureau said that 21 miners were confirmed dead and another one who had been trapped was injured. The official, surnamed Wang, refused to give further details and said the incident was under investigation.China's mines are the deadliest in the world and suffer frequent explosions, floods and cave-ins.Such accidents are usually caused by a failure to ventilate methane gas from the shaft.Safety improvements have reduced the number of deaths in recent years, but regulations are still often ignored.The official Xinhua News Agency reported that the mine had been ordered to suspend production in June to make safety improvements, citing the State Administration of Coal Mine Safety.
BEIJING — A blast at a coal mine in China's far-west Xinjiang province killed 21 people on Friday, state agency Xinhua said.The gas explosion initially trapped 34 workers at the Baiyanggou coal mine. Thirteen were rescued by Friday afternoon while the rest had died, the agency said, adding that investigations were under way.Although the toll from accidents has fallen, China's coal mines are the deadliest in the world because of poor safety and the rush to feed energy demand from the world's second-largest economy.The government plans to shut about 2,000 small coal mines by 2015 to improve safety standards.
BEIJING — China on Friday formally charged a prominent campaigner for officials to reveal their wealth, his lawyer said, after police accused him of breaking the law by organizing demonstrations.Xu Zhiyong, who has also pushed for greater civil rights, was arrested in August in a case that exposed shortcomings in the government's drive against deep-rooted corruption.Western governments have sparred repeatedly with Beijing over human rights and both the United States and the European Union have expressed concern about Xu's case.Xu's lawyer, Zhang Qingfang, said Xu had been charged with "disturbing public order", a common accusation against rights activists who attempt any form of protest, and that he was surprised at how fast the case was moving."Unexpectedly they've managed to decide within a week that they want to prosecute such a complex case. This is inconceivable," Zhang told Reuters.Asked when the trial might be held, Zhang said, "All I can say is that it will be very quick, within a month."China has detained at least 16 activists in the asset disclosure campaign, in what rights groups say is the new leadership's first crackdown targeting graft campaigners.Three of those activists went on trial last week in the poor southern province of Jiangxi.Last year's once-in-a-decade leadership change, which brought Xi Jinping to power as Communist Party chief, had inspired many Chinese with hope for political reform, spurring citizens nationwide to push for the asset disclosures.But the detentions signal the Communist Party will not tolerate any open challenge to its rule, despite the claims of greater transparency.Xu, the founder of the "New Citizens' Movement", advocates working within the system to press for change.He had urged officials online to disclose their assets and fellow activists have taken to the streets to exhort citizens to fight corruption.Beijing police, in a letter recommending Xu's prosecution, said he organized activities to hang banners in public spaces calling for the disclosures and equal access to education.Xu has also campaigned for the right of children from rural areas, who lack the correct residence paperwork, to be educated in cities where many live with their migrant worker parents.Xu's activities "created serious disturbances in public order in public places" and he interfered with the work of public security officials, according to the police document.Reuters was unable to reach Beijing police for comment.Xu has long been a thorn in the government's side. In 2009, he was briefly arrested on tax evasion charges his defenders said had been trumped up in a bid to stifle his work. The charges were dropped after a public furor.
BEIJING — An official sacked after a sex scandal was sentenced to 14 years in jail for bribery on Friday, state media said, in the latest fallout from a case that transfixed the country.Han Shuming, a former district head in the southwestern city of Chongqing, was convicted of accepting bribes worth 4.4 million yuan ($724,759), according to a local court ruling, the Xinhua news agency said.Han was one of more than 20 officials and executives at state-owned companies who were investigated after a gang blackmailed them with secretly recorded sex videos.The case first ricocheted around China's gossip-obsessed Internet when it surfaced last November after another Chongqing official, Lei Zhengfu, was caught on video having sex with an 18-year-old mistress.Lei was sentenced to 13 years in prison for bribery in June."Han, 48, took advantage of his position and assisted with land leasing and construction contracts for two businessmen surnamed Jiang and Li in exchange for bribes between 2001 and 2013," Xinhua said, citing a court statement.In June, six members of the extortion gang received jail terms ranging from 18 months to 10 years, the agency said.Chinese Communist Party officials are banned from having mistresses, and the video came to symbolize to many people the excesses and corruption of the ruling elite.Sensitive to public outrage and warning that corruption threatens its very survival, the ruling Communist Party has pledged to crack down on corruption at all levels.
BEIJING — A group of Chinese rights lawyers advocating for a detained Christian pastor and his aides in central China said they were assaulted Friday by a crowd of unidentified people who also harassed a British television crew.Lawyer Liu Weiguo said someone threw a brick at his head, causing it to bleed, and several other attorneys also were hurt as the crowd of men and women roughed up the lawyers, who had traveled to Henan province's Nanle county.Earlier, about 50 women surrounded a two-person Sky News television crew and grabbed at their camera, Sky correspondent Mark Stone said.The lawyers helped the Sky crew barricade themselves for several hours in an office at the county prosecutor's office until the crowd dispersed and a government foreign affairs officer arrived to escort the journalists out, Liu said.The confrontation was the latest in a land dispute that pits an influential local church leader against the county government. The crackdown has drawn the scrutiny of lawyers and activists around the nation.The pastor, Zhang Shaojie, several of his aides, and about 20 churchgoers have been detained for three weeks with no access to lawyers. Their supporters say they are being punished for resisting attempts by the local authorities to seize the church's land."Christianity in the Chinese system does not have any real standing," said Yang Xingquan, a Beijing attorney who traveled to Nanle to help defend Zhang. "In Nanle, if they respected or attached importance to the church, they would not try to seize their land. They would reasonably provide adequate land for the building of the church."The crackdown is unusual for a state-approved church. China's Communist government officially allows Christians to only worship in such churches, while unregistered congregations tend to be harassed.Activists say local Chinese authorities often hire residents from the area to harass people or groups that police and other officials want to drive away.
WASHINGTON — U.S. military officials say a Chinese warship nearly collided with an American Navy guided missile cruiser operating in international waters.U.S. Pacific Fleet says it happened Dec. 5 in the South China Sea, and that the USS Cowpens maneuvered to avoid the collision.The State Department has raised the matter at a high level with the Chinese government.The incident comes amid heightened tension over China's growing assertiveness in the region.Despite strenuous objections from Washington, Beijing recently declared a new air defense zone over parts of the East China Sea.Pacific Fleet says it's not uncommon for navies to operate in close proximity and that's why it is paramount they all follow international standards for maritime "rules of the road."
SHANGHAI — China has added details to its plans to migrate millions of its citizens from the countryside into cities, state media reported Saturday, to help restructure the economy by boosting consumer demand.The government hopes 60 percent of China's population of almost 1.4 billion will be urban residents by 2020 as the country's new leaders seek to sustain growth that last year slowed to a 13-year low of 7.8 percent.However, the leadership is struggling to balance multiple, occasionally conflicting goals such as encouraging the migration of millions of former farmers into cities without creating the slums and unemployment problems that have occurred in other countries experiencing similar migration.Restrictions on migration, which have created a de-facto illegal immigrant population in many Chinese cities, composed of Chinese citizens who have migrated without permission, have proven a significant source of social instability and have highlighted the uneven distribution of the fruits of China's economic growth.At the same time China wants to maintain an agricultural sector capable of keeping the country fed independently without recourse to imports, and some officials worry that this will become impossible if too many farmers leave their farms.The statement issued at the end of a government conference committed to improving the quality of the process, without mentioning any new policies or timetables.Indeed, the report specifically warned of undue haste in pursuing quick results.The statement said it would improve the quality of "human-centred urbanisation" in an orderly manner. It said doing so would be key to dealing with the problem of rural poverty.It also said more attention would be given to environmental protection during the process, and said care would be taken to more efficiently use land. China is short on arable land given its enormous population, and the government is concerned that too much farmland is being converted to residential or commercial property for the purposes of speculation."Endeavours will be exerted to gradually allow migrant workers to become more integrated in cities, fully remove hukou restrictions in towns and small cities, gradually ease restrictions in mid-sized cities, setting reasonable conditions for settling in big cities while strictly controlling the population in megacities," said an article in the official Xinhua news service describing the report.But despite much talk, Beijing has proven reluctant to eliminate the system and has given mixed signals about how aggressively it is prepared to move in the near future.Similarly, regulators have given mixed signals on how land reform will be managed. Giving farmers rights to sell their land and keep the proceeds would transfer wealth to individuals and give them a source of savings if they moved to a city, but it would also deprive local governments the ability to sell that land, which is currently a major source of revenue for them.
BEIJING — China's first moon rover has touched the lunar surface and left deep traces on its loose soil, state media reported Sunday, several hours after the country successfully carried out the world's first soft landing of a space probe on the moon in nearly four decades.The 140-kilogram (300-pound) "Jade Rabbit" rover separated from the much larger landing vehicle early Sunday, around seven hours after the unmanned Chang'e 3 space probe touched down on a fairly flat, Earth-facing part of the moon.State broadcaster China Central Television showed images taken from the lander's camera of the rover and its shadow moving down a sloping ladder and touching the surface, setting off applause in the Beijing control center. It said the lander and rover, both bearing Chinese flags, will take photos of each other Sunday evening.Later, the six-wheeled rover will survey the moon's geological structure and surface and look for natural resources for three months, while the lander will carry out scientific explorations at the landing site for one year.The mission marks the next stage in an ambitious space program that aims to eventually put a Chinese astronaut on the moon. China's space program is an enormous source of pride for the country, the third to carry out a lunar soft landing — which does not damage the craft and the equipment it carries — after the United States and the former Soviet Union. The last one was by the Soviet Union in 1976."It's still a significant technological challenge to land on another world," said Peter Bond, consultant editor for Jane's Space Systems and Industry. "Especially somewhere like the moon, which doesn't have an atmosphere so you can't use parachutes or anything like that. You have to use rocket motors for the descent and you have to make sure you go down at the right angle and the right rate of descent and you don't end up in a crater on top of a large rock."On Saturday evening, CCTV showed a computer-generated image of the Chang'e 3 lander's path as it approached the surface of the moon, saying that during the landing period it needed to have no contact with Earth. As it was just hundreds of meters (yards) away, the lander's camera broadcast images of the moon's surface.The Chang'e 3's solar panels, which are used to absorb sunlight to generate power, opened soon after the landing.The mission blasted off from southwest China on Dec. 2 on a Long March-3B carrier rocket. It is named after a mythical Chinese goddess of the moon and the "Yutu" rover, or "Jade Rabbit" in English, is the goddess' pet.China's military-backed space program has made methodical progress in a relatively short time, although it lags far behind the United States and Russia in technology and experience.China sent its first astronaut into space in 2003, becoming the third nation after Russia and the United States to achieve manned space travel independently. In 2006, it sent its first probe to the moon. China plans to open a space station around 2020 and send an astronaut to the moon after that."They are taking their time with getting to know about how to fly humans into space, how to build space stations ... how to explore the solar system, especially the moon and Mars," Bond said. "They are making good strides, and I think over the next 10-20 years they'll certainly be rivaling Russia and America in this area and maybe overtaking them in some areas."
TOKYO — Prime Minister Shinzo Abe will likely push with fresh urgency next year a bid to ease legal limits on the Japanese military's ability to fight shoulder to shoulder with allies overseas, a goal that eluded him in his first troubled term.Lifting Japan's self-imposed ban on exercising the right of collective self-defence would mark a major turning point for Japan's post-war security policy and could increase tensions in the region, where a row over tiny uninhabited islands in the East China Sea encapsulates growing Sino-Japanese mistrust.Since its World War Two defeat in 1945, Japan's military has not engaged in combat. However, successive governments have stretched the limits of the U.S.-drafted, pacifist constitution to allow non-combat missions abroad.Abe -- whose first term as premier ended when he abruptly quit in 2007 due to parliamentary deadlock and ill health -- returned in triumph a year ago this month, pledging to revive Japan's stagnant economy and bolster its global security clout."Although there is no national election scheduled until 2016, if he doesn't resolve various issues in parliament next year, momentum will falter and he will run out of time," said Hokkaido University professor Jiro Yamaguchi."Abe probably feels strongly that next year will be the last chance to implement his long-held goals."Until last month, Abe's popularity ratings were above 60 percent, rare for a Japanese leader after a year in office, thanks to an economic recovery and buoyant stock prices which were in turn fuelled by hyper-easy monetary policy, a pillar of his "Abenomics" growth agenda.Last month he achieved one cherished goal in his conservative agenda when parliament enacted a law to create a National Security Council, which will concentrate control over security and diplomatic policies in the prime minister's hands.A first-ever National Security Strategy to be approved next Tuesday will underscore Abe's push to bolster the military and raise Japan's security profile in the face of a rising China.Public concerns in Japan about China's growing military assertiveness have so far provided support for Abe's stance.Abe's support, however, slid to about 50 percent this month after his ruling bloc steamrolled through parliament a strict state secrets act that the government says is vital to persuade allies to share intelligence. Critics, however, say it echoes Japan's wartime authoritarian regime and will muzzle the media.Ironically, the drop in opinion polls -- plus fears of an economic relapse after the national 5 percent sales tax rises to 8 percent in April -- may encourage the Japanese leader to push for the change rather than wait and risk further declines that would undercut his clout in his own party, some experts said."You should not forget that the strength of Abe comes not from his conservative agenda but from his management of the economy," said a former government official. "An economic downturn could change that picture."Another sales tax hike to 10 percent, to rein in Japan's huge public debt, is slated for 2015 and would be especially controversial if the economy sags, sapping political energy."If he pushes it (lifting the ban) through, it will be disastrous but it is quite likely that he will," said lawmaker Seiichiro Murakami. A rare outspoken critic of Abe in the ruling Liberal Democratic Party, Murakami predicts that steamrolling controversial security policies risks sparking a voter backlash, especially if the economy stumbles."The state secrets act, the National Security Council, collective self-defence and a revision of U.S.-Japan defence co-operation guidelines are a package," he added. Tokyo and Washington have agreed to update guidelines on how their militaries interact by the end of next year.Still, a continued fall in support ratings would complicate Abe's efforts but would not deter him."There will be no change in his stance, but the problems have increased," said former defence official Kyouji Yanagisawa. "If he rushes, criticism will emerge from inside the ruling parties," added Yanagisawa, who handled security matters at the prime minister's office during Abe's first term.Abe's high popularity rates have been a key factor silencing potential critics in the ruling bloc. Critics have said lifting the ban is more likely to mean Japan gets involved in armed conflicts overseas that put Japanese lives at risk.A panel of Abe advisers is set to urge Japan to lift the ban in a report next year, a change the United States would welcome as a way for Tokyo to take on more of the burden for the alliance but that China would likely see as a disturbing sign Japan wants to flex its military muscle.Tensions between the two Asian rivals spiked last month after China announced a new air defence zone that overlapped with air space above disputed isles in the East China Sea.The report by Abe's advisers, however, has been delayed until after the passage of the budget for the year from April because his junior coalition partner, the more dovish New Komeito, is wary.The party, which gets most of its votes from a lay Buddhist group, has a track record of compromising to stay in power, but how far it is prepared to bend this time is unclear. "For the New Komeito, its stance as a peace party is fundamental. They cannot reject that," Yanagisawa said. "The question is, to what extent can the New Komeito make its views felt."If Abe can persuade the New Komeito to sign off and thus gain cabinet approval, the government would need to submit to parliament bills to provide a legal basis for the change.Liberal media and intellectuals would probably try to rally public opinion against the change, but many in the opposition Democratic Party and smaller parties support lifting the ban."It is important to have a more effective framework for Japan-U.S. (military) operations, including collective self-defence," said Democratic Party lawmaker Seiji Maehara, a former foreign minister.
BEIJING — Chinese prosecutors have formally indicted a prominent rights advocate for his role in an anticorruption campaign that prompted street rallies across the country and deeply alarmed Communist Party leaders, his lawyer said Friday.Prosecutors in Beijing did not publicly release the charges against the activist, Xu Zhiyong, but his lawyer said officials notified him by telephone Friday afternoon and told him to pick up a copy on Monday.The lawyer, Zhang Qingfang, said he expected the charges to identical to those recommended last week by the police, primarily that Mr. Xu helped "assemble a crowd to disrupt order in a public place." If convicted, Mr. Xu faces up to five years in prison.While not unexpected, the indictment of Mr. Xu underscores the perils faced by Chinese reform advocates who seek to turn their ideals into street activism. A dogged rights defender who once won a seat on a party-dominated local council, Mr. Xu, 40, made a name by using laws to address social injustice and by leveraging the domestic media and the Internet to win public sympathy to the cause of legal reform.The charges against Mr. Xu stem from his role organizing the New Citizens Movement, an ad hoc effort to promote the rule of law, education reform and greater financial transparency for government officials.His arrest in August came amid a far-reaching crackdown on a movement that featured street rallies calling on Chinese leaders to publicly disclose their wealth. Most of the protests were short-lived and small, but the authorities were unnerved by the group's ability to harness public disgust over corruption and growing social inequality.In recent months, at least 18 people associated with the group have been detained; last week three of them stood trial in Jiangxi Province, in the southeast, in a proceeding said that legal advocates say was rife with irregularities, including allegations of torture. On Friday night, lawyers for two other activists, Li Wei and Yuan Dong, said they, too, had been indicted on similar charges for gathering on a Beijing street with banners calling on government officials to reveal their hidden wealth. The lawyers said they had yet to receive the indictments.Mr. Xu has maintained his defiance behind bars, and Mr. Zhang said his client welcomed the opportunity to stand trial, even if his chances for acquittal were almost nil."Xu doesn't think his behavior is a crime and believes it constitutes a citizen's rational push for social improvement," Mr. Zhang said in an interview. "He told me, 'If you insist on bringing my trial to the nation's consciousness, then I'll calmly accept the honor.' "Officials at the Beijing Municipal No. 1 People's Procuratorate did not respond Friday to a faxed request for comment. It is the same office that successfully pursued the conviction of Liu Xiaobo, the political reformer and Nobel laureate who is serving an 11-year sentence for subversion.Human rights advocates have been dispirited by the continuing crackdown, which has netted veteran activists but also mainstream pragmatists like Wang Gongquan, a liberal businessman who provided financial support to the New Citizens Movement and who was arrested in October.Maya Wang, a researcher at Human Rights Watch in Hong Kong, said the prosecution of Mr. Xu and his associates was a barometer of just how far the Chinese leadership under President Xi Jinping will go to quash dissent. Mr. Xu, she noted, did not explicitly call for the overthrow of the Communist Party, but focused on building broad support for political and legal reforms."What he was trying to do was both innovative and moderate," she said. "He attracted the participation of a lot of middle-class people drawn to his vision and campaigns focusing on education and corruption."In their report recommending Mr. Xu's indictment, the police cited seven protests in Beijing last year and this year that demanded that officials disclose their assets and others that called on the government to rescind rules barring the children of rural migrants from urban public schools. The document said one rally in front of the Ministry of Education attracted more than 100 people who "insulted education officials."Mr. Zhang expressed frustration with the way the authorities have handled the case so far. In comments he posted online Friday evening, he noted the unusual speed with which prosecutors issued the indictment, which was based on 129 case files that they had received from the police a week earlier. He questioned how officials could have read all the documents given that his office was still having them photocopied. "Why don't you at least have some decency?" he wrote.
BEIJING — Police in China's restive far western region of Xinjiang shot dead 14 people during a riot late on Sunday in which two policemen were also killed, the regional government said on Monday.Police were attacked by a mob throwing explosive devices and wielding knives when they went to arrest "criminal suspects" in a village near the old Silk Road city of Kashgar, the government said on its official news portal Tianshan (www.ts.cn).
HONG KONG — Chinese manufacturing grew a bit slower in December than the previous month, according to a survey released Monday, in a new sign of the shaky recovery in the world's second-biggest economy.The preliminary version of HSBC's purchasing managers' index released Monday slipped to 50.5 from 50.8 in November.The index uses a 100-point scale on which numbers below 50 indicate a contraction.China's economic growth fell to a two-decade low of 7.5 percent in the three months ending in June before rebounding by 7.8 percent in the latest quarter.While the survey found that growth slowed marginally from November, "it still stands above the average reading for the third quarter, implying that the recovering trend of the manufacturing sector starting from July still holds up," HSBC economist Qu Hongbin said, adding that he expected China's economic growth to stabilize at about 7.8 percent in the fourth quarter.New orders grew at a faster rate compared with the month before though employment fell and production growth slowed, the survey said.The survey is based on 85-90 percent of responses from 420 manufacturing companies in mainland China. The full version of the survey will be released on Jan. 2.
SHANGHAI — China's northern city of Tianjin will restrict issuance of new car licenses, the latest city to clamp down on car ownership in a bid to ease traffic congestion and combat air pollution.The city government will issue new plates via auction and lottery from Monday, it said in a notice posted on its website on Sunday.It will also introduce a quota system similar to Beijing's traffic restriction scheme, which allows cars access to the city on certain days depending on the last digit of their plates, the official Xinhua news agency quoted Miao Hongwei, head of the city's traffic management bureau, as saying.The capital Beijing, infamous for its choking smog, announced last month it will slash the city's new car sales quota by almost 40 percent next year.Other major cities such as Shanghai and Guangzhou have also implemented measures to restrict car ownership.The Chinese government has announced many plans to fight pollution over the years but the country's manufacturing base and heavy dependency on coal for energy continues to dog efforts to clean up the smog that has enveloped many cities.
BEIJING — China hailed its lunar probe mission a success after the country's first moon rover and the landing vehicle that carried it there took photos of each other on the surface, state media reported.The six-wheeled rover moved to a spot about 9 meters (10 yards) north of the landing vehicle on Sunday night China time and the pair took photos for about a minute, the official Xinhua News Agency reported. The color images transmitted back to Earth showed the Chinese flag on the Yutu, or "Jade Rabbit" rover, named after a mythological creature.President Xi Jinping and Premier Li Keqiang were at the Beijing Aerospace Control Center to hear lunar program chief commander Ma Xingrui declare the Chang'e 3 mission a success, Xinhua reported.In a congratulatory message, the Communist Party's central committee, State Council or China's Cabinet, and the Central Military Commission hailed the mission as a "milestone" in the development of China's space programs, a "new glory" in Chinese explorations and the "outstanding contribution" of China in mankind's peaceful use of space, Xinhua said.The Chang'e 3 landed on a relatively flat part of the moon known as Sinus Iridum, or the Bay of Rainbows, on Saturday evening, marking the world's first soft landing of a space probe on the moon in nearly four decades. China is the third country to do that after the former Soviet Union and United States.The lander and rover have now embarked on separate scientific explorations. The 140-kilogram (300-pound) rover will survey the moon's geological structure and surface and look for natural resources for three months at a speed of 200 meters (200 yards) per hour. The landing vehicle will conduct scientific examinations for one year at the landing site.Xinhua said the two will have more chances in the coming days to take photos of each other at different angles.The Chang'e 3 mission is named after a mythical Chinese goddess of the moon and the Yutu rover, or "Jade Rabbit" in English, is the goddess' pet.China's military-backed space program has made methodical progress in a relatively short time, although it lags far behind the United States and Russia in technology and experience.
BEIJING — In a sign of the increased tensions between the United States and China on the open seas, navy vessels from the two countries almost collided in the South China Sea when a Chinese ship cut across the bow of an American cruiser, a senior United States defense official said on Saturday.An accident was averted when the missile-carrying cruiser Cowpens, traveling in international waters, maneuvered to avoid the Chinese vessel, the official said. At the time, the American ship was observing China's new aircraft carrier, which was also in the vicinity.The near collision, which occurred on Dec. 5 but did not become public until Friday, was one more example of the growing rivalry between China, a rising maritime power, and the United States, the dominant naval power in the Pacific region since World War II.The episode at sea came as the Obama administration has chastised China for imposing an air defense identification zone in the East China Sea over islands and airspace that are also claimed by Japan. In announcing the zone, the Chinese said they would require planes entering the area to file advance flight plans, a demand the United States and Japan have both defied.The information office at the Chinese Ministry of National Defense did not immediately respond to a request for comment on the maritime encounter.The Cowpens was observing the Chinese carrier, the Liaoning, as it made its first voyage in the South China Sea from its home base in Qingdao, the headquarters of China's North Sea Fleet, the defense official and American Navy experts said. All of them spoke on the condition of anonymity because of the sensitivity of the matter.The Chinese vessel cut across the bow of the America ship at a distance of less than 200 yards, the defense official said. The vessel was similar to an American tank landing ship and was accompanying the aircraft carrier.The tactic of the Chinese ship "was particularly aggressive" and "unhelpful in trying to increase cooperation between the two navies," he said.Analysts said the tense encounter underscored the dangers of the current situation in the area."This illustrates the anxieties between the United States and China, and it is very troubling," said Lyle J. Goldstein, an associate professor at the China Maritime Studies Institute at the United States Naval War College in Rhode Island. "International politics on both sides call for ratcheting up of tensions, and I don't see either side finding compromises. Neither side knows the other's red lines."In March 2009, five Chinese ships harassed the surveillance ship Impeccable in international waters in the South China Sea, forcing the American ship to make an emergency maneuver to avoid a collision.Surveillance activities by the United States of Chinese military operations have always been sensitive. In 2001, an American EP-3 spy plane collided with a Chinese fighter jet in the waters off southern China, an accident that sent relations between Washington and Beijing into a freeze.Ever since, Chinese officials have complained to senior American officials about American planes' peering into Chinese waters, saying that the practice treats China like the enemy, a senior American official said recently. The United States replies with its own complaint: that the lack of transparency by China impels America to do its reconnaissance, the official said.American officials said the Cowpens had been adhering to international guidelines."Our cruiser was operating in international waters of the South China Sea, not close into the coast and in the general vicinity of the aircraft carrier," the defense official said.The Chinese ship accompanying the aircraft carrier began shouldering the American cruiser, and then crossed its bow, he said. After the American ship took the evasive maneuver, there was "bridge-to-bridge" contact, in English, between the two ships, the official said. "It was tense but professional," he said.In a formal statement, the Pacific Fleet based in Hawaii said, "This incident underscores the need to ensure the highest standard of professional seamanship, including communications between vessels to mitigate the risk of an unintended incident or mishap."It was not clear how far the Cowpens was sailing from the Chinese aircraft carrier. But because of sophisticated American radar, it did not have to be particularly close to observe it, naval experts said.The Chinese aircraft carrier, a refurbished Ukrainian vessel, was launched last year. It is not yet fully operational and does not carry a full complement of aircraft. Still, the United States Navy wants to understand how the Chinese are planning to use the carrier as China more aggressively asserts territorial claims in the region.When it left port, the carrier was accompanied by two missile destroyers and two missile frigates, Chinese news media reported.Officials from the American and Chinese navies meet every year to discuss maritime rules and episodes at sea, but so far, the gatherings have been fairly desultory, Mr. Goldstein said. "The maritime consultative agreement has been a disappointment to the American side," he said.The American defense official drew a comparison between the behavior and operations of Iranian and American navies, and that of the Chinese. "We operate in the vicinity of the Iranian navy," he said. "The exchanges are curt but professional."The fact that the episode between the Cowpens and the Chinese ship took place in the South China Sea is bound to raise concerns, naval experts said. China contends that more than 80 percent of the sea is under its purview, and in a signal of its intention to enforce that claim, the nation has taken virtual ownership from the Philippines of the disputed Scarborough Shoal in the South China Sea.
BEIJING — China claimed Tuesday that a clash between police and locals in a restive far western region was an organized and premeditated attack by a small terrorist group.The official Xinhua News Agency said that 16 people were killed in the Sunday night incident — 14 assailants and two police officers — in China's northwestern region of Xinjiang, home to a simmering rebellion against Chinese rule among parts of the Muslim Uighur population who want more autonomy from Beijing. Recent clashes, including an attack on a police station, left dozens of people dead this year.The Chinese government typically calls such incidents terrorist attacks linked to radicals based overseas, although there is little evidence that they are carefully organized. In many cases, the violence appears caused by anger over poverty and strict rules on Uighur culture and Muslim worship.Xinhua described the assailants as "terrorists" and said an initial investigation found that they were from a 20-member terrorist group led by a man identified as Hasan Ismail. Tuesday's report said six members of the group were captured, but it did not say if Ismail was among those killed or apprehended.Police had been searching for Ismail in a village in Shufu county in far-west Kashgar prefecture came under attack with explosive devices and firearms at around 11 p.m., Xinhua said.Calls to local authorities rang unanswered or were picked up by officials who said they did not know about the attack.Sweden-based Uighur (pronounced WEE'-gur) activist Dilxat Raxit said Sunday's incident was the latest example of how Chinese security forces are increasingly opting to kill suspects at the scene rather than capturing them and putting them on trial. Police also killed nine assailants in the attack on the police station in November."They are now opening fire and killing people, then calling them terrorists," Raxit said by phone. "This deprives them of their right to defend themselves in a court."
BEIJING — China said Monday it was on track to launch a fifth lunar probe with the aim of bringing back lunar soil and rock samples following the successful moon landing of a space probe.The new mission planned for 2017 would mark the third and final phase of China's robotic lunar exploration program and pave the way for possibly landing an astronaut on the moon after 2020.On Saturday, Chang'e 3 set down on the moon, marking the first soft landing of a space probe on the lunar surface in 37 years. The landing vehicle will conduct scientific research for a year and its accompanying rover will survey the moon's structure and probe for natural resources.A challenge for both is to withstand temperatures ranging from 120 degrees Celsius (248 Fahrenheit) to minus 180 C (minus 184 F), said Wu Zhijian, spokesman for the State Administration of Science, Technology and Industry for National Defense.Chang'e 4 is intended to be an improved version of the Chang'e 3 that will pave the way for the fifth probe.First explored by the former Soviet Union and the United States in the 1960s and 70s, the moon has become the subject of renewed interest, even as the focus shifts to Mars exploration.The U.S. Lunar Reconnaissance Orbiter is currently circling the moon to detail its features and resources as a prelude to building a lunar outpost. In 2009, India's lunar orbiter, the Chandrayaan-1, detected water on the moon. Two years earlier, Japan sent a spacecraft to orbit it."People have started saying we're looking for water and we're looking for minerals and it's becoming a much more interesting place to go to," said Peter Bond, consultant editor for Jane's Space Systems and Industry. "Especially for new countries like China and India who are testing out new technologies — it's an ideal place to practice these before they go to Mars and beyond."China says its moon exploration program is about gaining a scientific understanding of the moon and developing space engineering and other technologies to prepare it for deep space exploration in the future. It is also a source of national pride.President Xi Jinping and Premier Li Keqiang were at the Beijing Aerospace Control Center to hear lunar program chief commander Ma Xingrui declare the Chang'e 3 mission a success, the official Xinhua News agency reported."China's moon probe is a way to exhibit to the world that we have acquired advanced space technology, which is more sophisticated than nuclear technology, and it is also a way to win international recognition as a big power," said He Qisong, a space expert at the Shanghai University of Political Science and Law.He said that finding and developing mineral resources on the moon could help solve future problems on Earth.China sent its first astronaut into space in 2003, becoming the third nation after Russia and the United States to achieve manned space travel independently. It launched the Tiangong 1 prototype space station in 2011 and plans to replace it with a larger permanent station seven years from now.The space program's close military links have raised questions about its ultimate intentions and dissuaded other countries from cooperating too closely with it. In 2007, the military shot down a defunct weather satellite in an apparent show of force that created a large amount of debris imperiling other spacecraft.Associated Press researcher Yu Bing and news assistant Zhao Liang contributed to this report.
BEIJING — Sending tremors across China's political landscape, President Xi Jinping and other party leaders have authorized a corruption inquiry against the powerful former head of the domestic security apparatus, Zhou Yongkang, according to sources with elite political ties.It is the first time since the founding of the People's Republic of China that an official who has held such high office has been the focus of a formal corruption investigation, and in pressing his antigraft crusade to new levels, Mr. Xi has broken a longstanding taboo. Mr. Zhou was once a member of the Communist Party's top rung of power, the Politburo Standing Committee, and even retired members of that body have always been spared such scrutiny.The principal allegations against Mr. Zhou emerged from investigations over the past year into accusations of abuse of power and corruption by officials and oil company executives associated with him. Those inquiries have already encircled his son, Zhou Bin, and other family members, the sources said.Mr. Xi and other leaders agreed by early December to put the elder Mr. Zhou directly under formal investigation by the party's commission for rooting out corruption and abuses of power, the sources said. They said a senior official went to Mr. Zhou's home in central Beijing to inform him about the inquiry, and Mr. Zhou and his wife, Jia Xiaoye, have since been held under constant guard.The people who gave the account were an official with a state broadcaster, a former province-level party corruption investigator, a lawyer with family connections to the party elite, a businesswoman with similar ties and a businesswoman who is the granddaughter of a late leader. They all spoke on the condition of anonymity, citing the risk of recriminations for discussing sensitive politics."It's not like in the past few months, when he was being secretly investigated and more softly restricted," the lawyer said. "Now it's official."Mr. Xi has amassed imposing power since taking leadership of the party in November 2012, and appears to be pressing the case to bolster his leverage over possible challengers.But even in retirement, Mr. Zhou is a potentially formidable adversary.He occupied an extraordinary nexus of state-blessed money and power, even by the standards of Chinese politics. Educated in oil-field exploration, he spent much of his career in the state oil industry and wielded considerable influence over the sector, which expanded rapidly at home and abroad as demand for energy surged with China's booming economy.Later, while a member of the Politburo Standing Committee, he oversaw the party's sprawling security apparatus, with control over the police, prosecutors, courts and the main intelligence service. During his watch, the party leadership stressed "stability maintenance" as vital to its survival, and the domestic security budget expanded to overshadow even the military's. Mr. Zhou's grim, rough-hewed features added to his image as a politician not to be trifled with.In taking on Mr. Zhou, Mr. Xi could jeopardize elite unity if the case falters or ignites dissension among party officials and elders, including the retired president, Jiang Zemin, under whose tenure Mr. Zhou became a minister for land and then a province party secretary."On the one hand, this would be such a dramatic change from previous practice, and risks generating pushback," said Christopher K. Johnson, an expert on Chinese politics at the Center for Strategic and International Studies in Washington. "On the other hand, this is a guy who likes to send messages and who has been consistently defying longstanding regime rules of physics now for some time."Until now, the highest-ranking politicians subjected to corruption inquiries were serving members of the Politburo, a rung lower than the Standing Committee in the party hierarchy. They included Bo Xilai, an ally of Mr. Zhou's who was sentenced to life in prison in September for taking bribes, embezzlement and abuse of power.It is not yet clear whether Mr. Zhou will be prosecuted and punished; internal party inquiries do not necessarily end in criminal charges, even when culpability is found. The government has not made any public announcement about the case, nor has Mr. Zhou, who like other senior Chinese politicians is inaccessible to reporters. The decision to investigate Mr. Zhou was first reported by overseas Chinese news sites, including Mingjing and Boxun, and later by Reuters.After Mr. Xi took leadership of the Communist Party, he vowed to take on corruption both low and high in party ranks — both "flies and tigers."Mr. Zhou, who turns 71 this month, is undoubtedly a tiger. But his power and reputation for highhanded ruthlessness also brought critics, and he appeared diminished after Mr. Bo was detained last year.
BEIJING — China on Wednesday confirmed an incident between a Chinese naval vessel and a U.S. warship in the South China Sea, after Washington said a U.S. guided missile cruiser had avoided a collision with a Chinese warship maneuvering nearby.Experts have said the near-miss between the USS Cowpens and a Chinese warship operating near China's only aircraft carrier, the Liaoning, was the most significant U.S.-China maritime incident in the disputed South China Sea since 2009.China's Defense Ministry said the Chinese naval vessel was conducting "normal patrols" when the two vessels "met"."During the encounter, the Chinese naval vessel properly handled it in accordance with strict protocol," the ministry said in a statement on its website (www.mod.gov.cn)."The two defense departments were kept informed of the relevant situation through normal working channels and carried out effective communication."Washington said last week its ship was forced to take evasive action on December 5 to avoid a collision.The incident came at a time of heightened tensions in the region following Beijing's declaration of an air defense identification zone further north in the East China Sea, which prompted protests from Washington, Tokyo and Seoul.China's Defense Ministry said, however, there were "good opportunities" for developing Sino-U.S. military ties."Both sides are willing to strengthen communication, maintain close coordination and make efforts to maintain regional peace and stability," the ministry said.The Liaoning aircraft carrier, which has yet to be fully armed and is being used as a training vessel, was flanked by escort ships including two destroyers and two frigates during its first deployment into the South China Sea.Friction over the South China Sea has surged as China uses its growing naval might to assert a vast claim over the oil-and-gas rich area, raising fears of a clash between it and other countries in the area, including the Philippines and Vietnam.The United States had raised the incident at a "high level" with China, according to a State Department official quoted by the U.S. military's Stars and Stripes newspaper.Beijing routinely objects to U.S. military surveillance operations within its exclusive economic zone, while Washington insists the United States and other nations have the right to conduct routine operations in international waters.China deployed the Liaoning to the South China Sea just days after announcing its air defense zone, which covers air space around a group of tiny uninhabited islands in the East China Sea that are administered by Japan but claimed by Beijing as well.
LONDON — British drug company GlaxoSmithKline said Tuesday it would stop paying doctors to promote its products at speaking engagements and scrap individual sales targets, months after its ethics were challenged by a bribery scandal in China.The group announced sweeping changes to its marketing practices, which also included a halt to direct financial support to health care professionals to attend medical conferences. However, it left open the possibility of funding through grants."It is patients' interests that always come first," Andrew Witty, the company's chief executive, insisted. "We recognize that we have an important role to play in providing doctors with information about our medicines, but this must be done clearly, transparently and without any perception of conflict of interest."GSK is influential in big pharma, the world's sixth-largest drugs company in terms of global sales. Its major products include the asthma drug Advair and the prostate drug Avodart.The practice of paying doctors to attend conferences or discuss treatments has undergone growing scrutiny for years in the United States, where drugmakers will be required to disclose financial relationships with care providers as part of the federal health care overhaul. Several have already started doing that."I think that's a dying practice," said Erik Gordon, a professor at University of Michigan's Ross School of Business who follows the pharmaceutical industry. "It's caught the eye of regulators and it makes the public wonder whether drug companies and even their doctors can be trusted."GSK's move follows another drug company, AstraZeneca, in tightening its practices on conferences. In 2011, AstraZeneca decided that it would offer support for a medical professional to attend a conference only in limited circumstances, with the specific aim of contributing to high-quality scientific discourse.GSK insists that the changes were unrelated to the scandal, but they come as it tries to distance itself from the troubles engulfing its operations in China, which Witty has said were conducted by people "acting outside of our processes." In July, he insisted that "99.9 percent" of company employees play by the rules.Chinese police allege that four employees paid bribes to doctors to encourage them to prescribe medications.The company says that under its new program, individual sales targets will be replaced by a new system in which GSK employees will be rewarded for their technical knowledge, their quality of service and overall performance. The goal is for the new system to be in place by early 2015.It added that these changes were influenced by a similar program introduced in the United States in 2011."The 'Patient First' program bases compensation for sales professionals who work directly with prescribing health care professionals on a blend of qualitative measures and the overall performance of their business, rather than the number of prescriptions generated," the company said.But analysts such as Alastair McCaig at IG argued the company decided to act with an ethical bent rather than await the consequences of the China scandal."With the bribery investigation going on in China, it looks like the company has decided to jump before being pushed, as it is forced to do something to tackle its conflict of interest," he said.The company said the changes were also unrelated to past troubles in the United States. It paid $3 billion last year and pleaded guilty to promoting two drugs for unapproved uses and failing to disclose important safety information on a third. The criminal case was accompanied by a civil settlement in which the government said the company's improper marketing included providing doctors with European hunting trips, high-paid speaking tours and even tickets to a Madonna concert.At the time, the company said it had learned from its mistakes.Health care advocates welcomed the change in GSK's position, but some, like Tim Reed, the executive director of Health Action International, said self-regulation remains a big problem in the industry."It is like marking your own homework," said Reed, who favors strong state regulation.Though he did not expect huge changes, Reed said Glaxo's decision may reflect a change of thinking in the industry — away from targeting doctors and toward those who pay the bills, like agencies that make recommendations on which drugs to buy."It is possible that the role of health care professionals, responsible for writing prescriptions for medicines are becoming of less value to the pharmaceutical industry, in terms of the promotion of products," he said."Rather, it may be those with the ultimate responsibility for paying the bill for medicines, for example insurance companies and governments, so the focus of attention for sales reps may well switch to those making the therapeutic and cost-effectiveness decisions on medicines availability," he added.
BEIJING — A keeper at Shanghai's zoo was mauled to death by a rare South China tiger Tuesday after entering its enclosure to clean it, officials and colleagues said.In brief statements on their Twitter-like microblogs, the zoo and Municipal Landscaping Administration said investigators were looking into the cause of the attack.The administration said the tiger was a 9-year-old male with no prior record of aggression against people. It said the attack occurred at the zoo's breeding facility where safety procedures are in place.State media reports identified the victim as a 56-year-old man surnamed Zhou. They cited unidentified colleagues as saying the man entered the tiger enclosure to clean it and "did not come out again."The highly endangered South China tiger is considered effectively extinct in the wild after decades of being hunted as a pest. Only a few are kept in zoos.Built on a former golf course, Shanghai's zoo is one of China's largest and most popular urban animal parks.
BEIJING — China is increasingly using extra-judicial "black jails" and drug rehabilitation centers to punish people who would formerly have been sent to forced labor camps, rights group Amnesty International said on Tuesday.China vowed last month to do away with hundreds of labor camps, as part of a landmark package of social and economic reforms. Official news agency Xinhua has said there are 350 such camps across the country, with up to 160,000 inmates.But many of those in extra-judicial jails and rehabilitation centers are being punished for their political or religious beliefs, the London-based rights group said."It's clear that the underlying policies of punishing people for their political activities or religious beliefs haven't changed," said Corinna-Barbara Francis, Amnesty's China researcher."The abuses and torture are continuing, just in a different way."China's foreign ministry said on Tuesday that Amnesty is prejudiced against China."This group has always had ideological prejudices against China, and continues to make unreasonable criticisms and starts rumors to smear China," said Hua Chunying, a spokeswoman for the Ministry of Foreign Affairs.The camps are part of a controversial program called re-education through labor that lets police detain political and religious dissidents for up to four years without any judicial process.Such dissidents include petitioners, government critics, members of the banned spiritual group Falun Gong and petty criminals.Amnesty, in a report based on more than 60 interviews with families, lawyers and former inmates conducted over five years, found the use of other forms of extra-judicial detention, especially drug rehab facilities, had widened and could supplant the labor camp system."Many of the policies and practices which resulted in individuals being punished for peacefully exercising their human rights by sending them to re-education through labor camps have not fundamentally changed: quite the contrary," Amnesty said."Black jails", or unofficial detention facilities, are also being used more often, and as they have no legal basis in Chinese law, detainees are potentially at even greater risk of rights violations than in labor camps, it said.Many labor camps said to have shut down have been rebranded as drug rehab centers or used for other forms of detention, Amnesty added.Former detainees told Amnesty that drug detox institutions were very similar to the old labor camps, though a greater proportion of prisoners might be addicts.The drug rehab camps were also used to punish political and religious dissidents "whether or not there is any evidence of them being addicted to drugs," the report said. Inmates can be held there for two years or more without trial.Torture was rife in labor camps, Amnesty said.Those interviewed described being deprived of food, water and sleep, being beaten by other inmates, having their flesh burned with metal rods, and being subjected to simulated drowning.The treatment was often sparked by detainees' refusal to renounce religious beliefs or stop petitioning the government.China has not said what will happen to current camp prisoners in the camps, or what will replace the system of re-education through labor.The government has also expanded the use of what Amnesty calls "brainwashing centers," which China calls "legal education classes", as well as secret black jails, which are not acknowledged at all, the report said.
BEIJING — Growth in activity in China's vast factory sector slowed to a three-month low in December as reduced output offset a pickup in new orders, a preliminary private survey showed on Monday, in line with other recent data pointing to a resilient but slowing economy.The flash Markit/HSBC Purchasing Managers' Index fell to 50.5 from November's final reading of 50.8, but for a fifth consecutive month remained above the 50 line that separates expansion of activity from contraction.Given the approaching year-end holiday season, the flash P.M.I. covers only the short period from Dec. 5 to Dec. 12. The final P.M.I. will be released Jan. 2.Growth in both new orders and export orders grew at a faster rate in the period surveyed, while subindexes measuring employment and stocks of purchases showed faster rates of decrease.The December HSBC Flash China Manufacturing P.M.I. reading "slowed marginally" from November's final reading, said Hongbin Qu, chief economist for China at HSBC, in a comment accompanying the P.M.I. "But it still stands above the average reading for the third quarter, implying that the recovering trend of the manufacturing sector starting from July still holds up."Many economists have said China's economy is likely to show weaker momentum in the final three months of this year after a rebound between July and September, because of slowing credit growth and a fall in restocking demand.Data earlier in the month showed growth in China's factory output and investment eased slightly in November, though retail sales grew at their strongest rate this year, suggesting the economy is on track to achieve the government's 7.5 percent growth target.Beijing has made it clear that it would accept a slower growth rate while it pushes ahead with economic overhauls to wean the growth away from investment and export toward consumption.The leadership pledged to maintain stable economic policies to achieve reasonable economic growth in 2014 while pursuing overhauls, as they wrapped up a meeting Friday. The meeting, the annual Central Economic Work Conference, did not set a target for 2014 G.D.P. growth, with state media reporting that the government would "maintain appropriate growth in gross domestic product."
HONG KONG — At least 16 people were killed late Sunday in Xinjiang, the ethnically tense region of far western China, when the police clashed with attackers who used explosives and knives, according to the region's news service.A brief report from the Tianshan news service on Monday did not give details of the attack, but it appeared to be the latest spasm of ethnic violence in the region. The report said the bloodshed occurred late at night in Shufu County near Kashgar, a part of Xinjiang plagued by tensions between Muslim Uighurs and the government authorities.The police in Shufu County were trying to catch a criminal suspect when they were attacked by a group of "rioters" with explosives and knives, the report said. Two police officers died, while the police fatally shot 14 attackers and captured two others, according to the report. Investigations into the events were underway, it said.Repeated calls to government and police offices in the town where the bloodshed occurred brought no response; calls were not answered, or officials promptly hung up. A spokeswoman for the Chinese Ministry of Foreign Affairs, Hua Chunying, told reporters at a daily briefing in Beijing that the attack was the work of a "terror gang," but she gave no details about its motives or ethnic composition.Uighurs are a Turkic-speaking people who form a minority in Xinjiang as a whole — about 46 percent of the 21.8 million long-term residents, according to recent data. Many Uighurs resent the growing presence of Han Chinese in what they consider their historic homeland, and complain that the best jobs and business opportunities go to Han migrants.Around Kashgar, in the southwest corner of the region, Uighurs make up about 91 percent of the residents; many of them are pious Muslims. The area has experienced outbursts of violence aimed at police stations and other sites of Chinese authority.Tensions in Xinjiang have deepened in recent years, especially after July 2009, when at least 200 people died in Urumqi, the regional capital, when Uighur men attacked Han Chinese people. Han Chinese crowds then retaliated by rioting in Uighur neighborhoods.Xinjiang shares borders with Central Asian countries and Pakistan, and the Chinese government has often blamed militant separatist groups supported from abroad for the unrest in Xinjiang. But many international human rights groups and supporters of Uighur self-determination say the violence is often a homegrown expression of discontent.In June, 35 people, including 11 rioters, died when Chinese security forces opened fire on a crowd of Uighurs who had attacked police and government buildings in Turpan in central Xinjiang, according to China's state-run news agency, Xinhua.In October, five people were killed in central Beijing when a vehicle veered onto a crowded sidewalk and burst into flames at the main entrance to the Forbidden City. The Chinese government blamed Uighur separatists for the attack.
BEIJING — Retired U.S. basketball star Dennis Rodman said on Thursday he was not going to North Korea to talk about politics or human rights, despite political tension surrounding the execution of leader Kim Jong Un's uncle.Rodman has visited Pyongyang twice before, spending time dining as a guest of Kim, with whom he says he has a genuine friendship.His latest visit follows the rare public purge of Kim's powerful uncle Jang Song Thaek, who was executed last week.South Korean President Park Geun-hye has described recent events as a "reign of terror". The purging of Jang, considered the second most powerful man in the North, indicated factionalism within the secretive Pyongyang government."It has nothing to do with me. I mean, whatever his uncle has done, and whoever's done anything in North Korea, I have no control over that. I mean, these things have been going on for years and years and years," Rodman told Reuters at his hotel in Beijing on Thursday before he left for the airport."I'm just going over there to do a basketball game and have some fun," he said.The U.S. State Department has sought to distance the U.S. government from Rodman's visit.Ahead of the trip, Seoul-based North Korean human rights activist Shin Dong-hyuk said in an open letter in the Washington Post that Rodman should talk to Kim about human rights abuses in North Korea.Rodman said it was not his place to talk about such issues."People have been saying these things here and there. It doesn't really matter to me. I'm not a politician. I'm not an ambassador," he said."I'm just going over there to try and do something really cool for a lot of people, play some games and try to get the Korean kids to play," he said."Everything else I have nothing to do with. If it happens that he wants to talk about it then great. If it doesn't happen I just can't bring it up because I don't (want) him to think that I'm over here trying to be an ambassador and trying to use him as being his friend and all of a sudden I'm talking about politics. That's not going to be that way," Rodman said.Rodman is expected to provide North Korea's national basketball team with four days of training during the trip.He also intends to return to Pyongyang in January with a team of fellow former National Basketball Association stars to hold basketball games on Kim's birthday.Rodman's trip was arranged by Irish bookmakers Paddy Power, which has a history of controversial advertising campaigns.
BEIJING — Early next year, Chinese journalists will have to pass a new ideology exam to keep their press cards, in what reporters say is another example of the ruling Communist Party's increasing control over the media under President Xi Jinping.It is the first time reporters have been required to take such a test en masse, state media has said.The exam will be based on a 700-page manual being sold in bookshops. The manual is peppered with directives such as "it is absolutely not permitted for published reports to feature any comments that go against the party line", and "the relationship between the party and the news media is one of leader and the led".The impact of increased control in the past year has been chilling, half a dozen reporters at Chinese state media told Reuters, mostly on condition of anonymity to avoid repercussions for talking to the foreign media without permission."The tightening is very obvious in newspapers that have an impact on public opinion. These days there are lots of things they aren't allowed to report," said a journalist at a current affairs magazine.China has also intensified efforts to curb the work of foreign news organizations. Both the New York Times Co and Bloomberg News have not been given new journalist visas for more than a year after they published stories about the wealth of family members of former Chinese Premier Wen Jiabao and President Xi Jinping, respectively.The General Administration of Press and Publication, a key media regulator, has said via state media that the aim of the exam and accompanying training is to "increase the overall quality of China's journalists and encourage them to establish socialism as their core system of values".It did not respond to questions from Reuters about the exam or press freedom in China.Traditionally, Chinese state media has been the key vehicle for party propaganda. But reforms over the past decade that have allowed greater media commercialization and limited increases in editorial independence, combined with the rise of social media, have weakened government control, academics said.China media watchers point to a flurry of editorials after Xi spoke to propaganda officials in August as evidence of concern within the party that control over public discourse was slipping. The official Beijing Daily described the party's struggle to win hearts and minds as a "fight to the death".Some reporters and academics, however, trace the start of the tougher attitude to a strike lasting several days in January by journalists at an outspoken newspaper, the Southern Weekly, after censors scrapped a New Year editorial calling for China to enshrine constitutional rights. Xi had taken over the Communist Party only several weeks earlier."This was a shock to Xi Jinping's leadership (circle)," said Xiao Qiang, a China media expert at the University of California at Berkeley."They own these newspapers. That makes it an internal, public rebellion, which made the censorship and media control mechanism look really bad."The strike ended after local propaganda officials promised to take a lighter hand with censorship. While journalists there would not talk publicly about the matter, some senior reporters have since left the paper, two sources familiar with the matter said, adding they did not know why. The Southern Weekly declined to comment.Journalists will have to do a minimum 18 hours of training on topics including Marxist news values and Socialism with Chinese Characteristics, as well as journalism ethics before sitting the exam in January or February.Reporters who fail the test will have to re-sit the exam and undergo the training again. It's not clear what happens to reporters who refuse to take it.While in theory all reporters in China need a press card to report, many do so without one, said Zhan Jiang, a journalism professor at the Beijing Foreign Studies University.Recent scandals in the Chinese media had also raised some questions about the industry's professionalism, Zhan said.A reporter for the Guangzhou-based New Express tabloid was arrested in October after confessing on state television to accepting bribes for fabricating more than a dozen stories about Changsha-based Zoomlion Heavy Industry Science and Technology Co Ltd.The reporter wrote that Zoomlion had engaged in sales fraud and exaggerated its profits, accusations strongly denied by the state-owned construction equipment maker."It's hard to say if this is really to improve the actions of journalists, or to control them. You don't know what (the authorities) are thinking," Zhan said.Reporters had little doubt about the aim of the exam."The purpose of this kind of control is just to wear you down, to make you feel like political control is inescapable," said a reporter for a newspaper in the booming southern city of Guangzhou.
BEIJING — Chinese authorities are ramping up prosecutions of rights activists during the year-end holidays, apparently hoping the West will pay less attention to its wide-ranging crackdown on dissent that has drawn international criticism throughout the year.In recent days, prosecutors and courts in various Chinese localities have moved to indict or prepare to put on trial several dissidents and activists in the coming weeks, according to more than half a dozen rights lawyers contacted by The Associated Press.Some of the cases, pending for months, have suddenly picked up speed in the past several days, they said, perhaps in the hope of moving them to court while Western diplomats, rights groups, and China-based foreign reporters might be off-duty for the holidays."Most of the defense lawyers handling these cases feel that the momentum has increased," said one of the attorneys, Zhang Xuezhong. He said courts have been contacting lawyers and urging them to quickly process the necessary paperwork for their cases."I think they hope to hold the trial around Christmas and convict them before the Chinese New Year," Zhang said. The Chinese New Year, or Spring Festival as it is also known, starts Jan. 31.This week, Chinese prosecutors in a southern city indicted activist Liu Yuandong for leading free-speech demonstrations outside a newspaper office in January that were sparked by a censorship dispute. Meanwhile, veteran dissident Zhang Lin stood trial Wednesday for April demonstrations at which dozens of people flocked to an eastern city to protest an elementary school for preventing his 10-year-old daughter from attending class.In Beijing, a lawyer representing Xu Zhiyong, a prominent legal activist who founded the New Citizens Movement, a loose network of campaigners against corruption and for equal access to education, said he was told that Xu would be put on trial in late December. At least a half-dozen other activists associated with Xu's group were charged last week and were also expected to be tried this month, their lawyers said.The office that oversees prosecutors nationwide did not immediately respond to a faxed list of questions about the timing of the legal proceedings.The timing could be a coincidence, but rights lawyers and activists point to a precedent set by Chinese authorities in recent years of choosing the Christmas period to impose heavy prison sentences on well-known activists and dissidents. Among the most famous is now-Nobel Peace Prize laureate Liu Xiaobo, whose 11-year sentence for subversion was handed down on Christmas Day in 2009. Two activists in 2011 separately received nine and 10-year sentences around Christmas."The fact that Xu Zhiyong and others detained have been indicted recently suggests the same (harsh sentencing) might happen this year," said Maya Wang, a researcher for Human Rights Watch. "But however hard China tries, it can't hide the ugly fact that it is punishing individuals simply for exercising basic human rights and for calling an end to corruption."This year, the activists have another thing in common: they have taken their causes to the street in protests that were mainly peaceful, small-scale and fleeting, but crossed a hard line that Chinese authorities have drawn. In most cases, the activists have been criminally charged with public disturbance, which carries a maximum penalty of five years' imprisonment."The authorities are suppressing any kind of street action," said Liu Xiaoyuan, the lawyer of Zhang Lin, the dissident whose pleas for his daughter to attend a school in Hefei city triggered an outpouring of anger online and drew crowds to the city. "They are worried that (the street protests) can spread widely to other cities or become a nationwide movement."The crackdown on public assembly underscores how nervous the Communist Party leadership remains of organized action, however small. This year's prosecutions of activists and overall tightening of controls have been criticized by European and American officials, including U.S. Secretary of State John Kerry, who earlier this month expressed concern about Xu Zhiyong.Xu's trial in Beijing and those associated with the network he founded will likely be the most closely watched, given his prominence both at home and abroad. The New Citizens campaigners have lobbied for rural migrant children to be able to attend city schools and for officials to declare their assets — down-to-earth issues that resonate with the public and make China's leaders worry about protests that could gain momentum and challenge Communist Party rule.The network has organized small street protests and called for people to get together on the last Saturday of each month for dinner to discuss the constitution and other legal issues. In a testament to Xu's broad appeal, one of his key supporters is the well-known and wealthy venture capitalist Wang Gongquan, who has since also been arrested.
HONG KONG — Daryl Ng was taking a long shower, as he does every morning. And his wife, as she does every morning, scolded him for needlessly using so much water."How can I justify the amount of time I'm taking?" Mr. Ng recalled thinking to himself. And while looking at the water running down the drain, he got an idea.Why not harness that wasted water running down the drain? With Hong Kong's high concentration of skyscrapers, could gravity generate a considerable amount of electricity?Fortunately, Mr. Ng is the grandson of the founder of Sino Land, a Hong Kong property developer, and one of the company's executive directors. So he set up a prototype system in Olympian City, one of the company's shopping malls in Hong Kong.The system uses excess pressure in the water system to spin a Swiss-built turbine, which generates electricity to power the lights in a back room. Mr. Ng is also installing turbines in the company's newest apartment development, The Avenue, in Hong Kong's Wan Chai neighborhood, that should be able to power the lighting in the stairwells, elevator shafts and lobby.There are many reasons the novel idea might not work. Small-scale systems cannot easily generate enough power to justify their cost to large developers. The price per kilowatt-hour of generating power can be five times as high as simply buying it from the grid. And factors like simple geography — will water be flowing far enough down? — can derail plans for turbines built into municipal water infrastructure.Nonetheless, the developer has pitched the concept to the governments of Beijing, Hong Kong and Singapore. He said the feedback from Hong Kong in particular had been very positive, with the city's new director of water supplies, Enoch Lam, expressing interest.Hong Kong is one of the most densely populated cities in the world, with about 23,000 people per square mile in its most crowded district. About 40 percent of the city's territory is devoted to parkland, and Hong Kong crowds people into office towers and residential apartment blocks that often top 50 stories."All these buildings are energy-sucking monsters," said Claude Touikan, a Hong Kong-based director at the architecture and engineering firm Benoy, which is not involved with Mr. Ng's project. "Of course there is potential."But putting hydroelectric systems into new buildings is expensive. Mr. Ng has hired Arup, the engineering and project management company, to design a "plug and play" turbine system that would be relatively cheap and easy to fit into a building's infrastructure. He has also asked the company to find a way to charge his electric car, a Renault Fluence, using the water in his office building while he is at work.Hong Kong's water services department said it was pleased to see private developers taking the initiative. After five years of work, the department has also installed a turbine generator at the city's water treatment works in the Tuen Mun neighborhood that started operation in July and should generate 1.5 gigawatt-hours of electricity per year. That would save 10 percent of the plant's electricity bill and cut carbon dioxide emissions by 2,000 tons per year, the department said. It is working on installing a second generator in the same plant by 2015. The city's drainage services department is also exploring the system.Arup estimates that turbines in the public water system in Hong Kong could power 6,000 households, or a population of about 24,000, which both the company and Mr. Ng concede is a tiny fraction of a city of seven million. While Mr. Ng is developing systems that could serve his buildings, he said he would be willing to turn over the technology "at cost, or potentially for free" to the government as well."I don't care if people copy this idea if it can help the planet," Mr. Ng said. "We have to think outside the box so we can maintain our modern consumer lifestyle."This type of hydropower is used on a small scale in places like Mühlau, Austria, where the drinking water network provides 34 gigawatt-hours of electricity a year. But in-building systems are rare.
BEIJING — China has rejected 545,000 tons of imported U.S. corn found to contain an unapproved genetically modified strain, the country's product safety agency announced Friday.China's government is promoting genetically modified crops to increase food production. But it faces opposition from critics who question their safety, especially those imported from the United States.An unapproved strain called MIR162 was found in 12 batches of corn at six inspection stations, according to the Administration of Quality Supervision, Inspection and Quarantine. It said the shipments would be returned to the United States.In a statement, the agency called on U.S. authorities to strengthen controls on corn exports to ensure unapproved strains are not sent to China.China allowed its first imports of a genetically modified crop, soybeans, in 1997. Authorities are trying to develop others that produce bigger yields or can resist insects without use of pesticides.An announcement in June that regulators had approved imports of three new types of modified soybeans prompted an outcry by opponents who said they might be dangerous. The Ministry of Agriculture has launched a publicity campaign to dispel concerns and says the criticisms are unfounded.U.S. officials were in Beijing this week for trade talks. One participant, Agriculture Secretary Tom Vilsack, said earlier that U.S. officials hope they "help open even more markets for U.S. exports."
HONG KONG — Australia's Telstra said Friday it was selling its Hong Kong mobile phone business to Hong Kong billionaire Richard Li's telecom company in a deal worth $2.4 billion.Telstra Corp. said it would earn about 2 billion Australian dollars from selling its 76.4 percent stake in CSL to Li's HKT Ltd., which is also buying the other 23.6 percent from another company, New World Development.The deal allows Li's company, which already owns a separate mobile operator, to beef up its presence in the city's saturated mobile market. It also lets Telstra make a profitable exit ahead of a shakeup by the city's telecommunications regulator aimed at boosting competition.Telstra CEO David Thodey said in a statement that there are a number of dynamics in the Hong Kong mobiles market that means "this is the right opportunity for Telstra to maximise our return on this successful asset."The city's communications regulator plans to take back a third of the spectrum from four current license holders after they expire and auction it off, a move that will allow China Mobile to acquire its own spectrum. Beijing-based China Mobile, which is the world's largest mobile phone company with more than 750 million subscribers, currently leases bandwidth from rivals.The sale will help HKT compete for business from Hong Kongers, who are avid mobile phone users. The city had 16.7 million mobile accounts as of June, more than double the population of 7.1 million.HKT said after the deal, which still needs approval from Hong Kong regulators, the company would have 31 percent of Hong Kong's mobile phone market."HKT believes that no significant competition concerns arise in relation to the proposed acquisition," the company said in a statement.
SHANGHAI — Authorities in the city of Shanghai have arrested the former deputy health commission chief, prosecutors said, at a time when China's health sector has come under the spotlight for widespread corruption.Huang Fengping, formerly second in command of the city's Commission of Health and Family Planning, was arrested on Wednesday for "suspected crimes", the city's prosecution service said in a statement on its website.It gave no more details.The arrest comes as China steps up its scrutiny into corruption in the medical sector, with attention especially on graft in the pharmaceutical and infant milk formula markets.The Shanghai Health and Family Planning Commission and the Shanghai Municipal People's Prosecution Service were not immediately available for comment.Huang worked at Shanghai's Huashan Hospital for more than a decade before taking the vice director role in May last year, the official Shanghai Daily said in a report.China's regulators have been investigating numerous foreign and domestic drug companies, with inquiries ranging from suspected corruption to how drugs are priced.Chinese police launched as investigation into accusations in July that GSK funnelled up to 3 billion yuan ($492 million) to travel agencies to facilitate bribes to doctors and officials to boost its drug sales.GSK said on Wednesday it would stop paying doctors for promoting its drugs and scrap prescription targets for its marketing staff worldwide.However, the company said the measures were not directly related to its Chinese problems and were rather part of a broad effort to improve transparency
BEIJING — Growing scientific power China has begun constructing its fourth Antarctic research base to enhance studies into climate change and other fields, state media reported Thursday.Taishan Station is being built about 500 kilometers (310 miles) inland, the China Daily newspaper and other media said. It is to house as many as 20 people during the Antarctic summer from December to March and be unstaffed the rest of the year.The base is a further sign of China's lofty scientific ambitions following the soft landing of a rover on the moon earlier this month. China also boasts the world's fastest supercomputer and is investing heavily in deep-sea exploration.China currently operates two coastal bases year-round in Antarctica staffed by as many as 140 people during the summer, along with a high-altitude inland base that closes during the winter.Great Wall Station, China's first, opened in 1985, more than 80 years after Argentina inaugurated the first continually staffed base. In 1983, China acceded to the Antarctic Treaty that guarantees freedom of scientific investigation and bans military activity on the continent.The reports said workers constructing Taishan Station flew to the site by helicopter Wednesday from the icebreaker Xuelong, which is carrying 256 personnel, including two Thai scientists. The mission is China's 30th to the Antarctic and will also survey possible sites for the construction of a future fifth Antarctic base.
BEIJING — A Chinese court has ruled that the producer of a hit kids' cartoon was partly to blame for the injuries suffered by two children when their friend tied them to a tree and set them on fire in an imitation of a scene from the show, state media reported.Two brothers aged 7 and 4 from eastern Jiangsu province were badly burned in April by the actions of their 10-year-old friend, who confessed he was copying a scene from "Xi Yangyang & Hui Tailang," which translates as "Pleasant Goat and Big Big Wolf," the official Xinhua News Agency said.The 7-year-old suffered burns over 80 percent of his body and his brother 40 percent.The cartoon popular among children and adults features a wolf who hunts a goat and tries to prevent it from escaping, to no avail. Scenes have included the goat being plunged into boiling water and receiving electric shocks. The wolf's wife regularly beats her husband over the head with a pan when he fails to bring the goat home for their dinner.Xinhua said the court ruled that the legal guardians of the boy who set his friends alight and the producer, Guangzhou-based Creative Power Entertaining Co., Ltd., are jointly responsible for the two brothers' injuries. The boy's guardians will have to pay 60 percent of the injured brothers' compensation and the company will pay 15 percent. It didn't say who would pay the remainder.Xinhua didn't give the total compensation amount, but other media reports said the company would have to pay 39,000 yuan ($6,400), and that the case was a civil one brought by the brothers' family.The Donghai County People's Court refused to answer questions and referred queries to their propaganda office, where calls rang unanswered. The company declined to comment.Users of China's lively Twitter-like sites poured scorn on the assigning of blame on the company, with some questioning why state broadcaster China Central Television, which televises the cartoon, wasn't held responsible.Hao Rui, a lawyer from Beijing Yingke Law Firm who specializes in lawsuits involving the media industry, said it was the first time he had heard of a producer being sued and held liable for a child imitating something seen on TV. One reason may be because the other defendants and the children's family can't afford to pay the medical costs, he said.In 2010, Creative Power Entertaining signed an agreement with Buena Vista International for the latter to air "Pleasant Goat and Big Big Wolf" on Disney channels in the Asia-Pacific region in more than 10 languages, including English.
BEIJING — Former soldier Chen Yongqing has big ambitions for his bodyguard training school, charging 500,000 yuan ($82,400) a year for each protector, as China's rich and famous look to bolster their safety and sense of importance.Chen's company Tianjiao, which he says is China's first professional academy to train former soldiers and others as bodyguards, is doing so well that he is considering a stock market listing."When we started our business, most of our clients were celebrities," Chen, 30, told Reuters. "Most of our clients now are rich entrepreneurs. It's all related to their business because I think bodyguards are also a status symbol."China's newly wealthy are not generally targeted by criminals and kidnappers - as happens in countries such as Venezuela - but anger is growing about the widening gap between rich and poor.There have been isolated incidents of people attacking luxury cars involved in accidents with less well-off citizens.Tianjiao has hired trainers from Israel and Russia, and is looking to France and Britain as well, Chen said, although the company also works closely with the Chinese military."We provide a better platform for retired soldiers, of whom there are thousands every year, so they can get a better job. It would be a waste of talent if these soldiers work as security guards for 2,000 yuan a month," he said."Also if they commit crimes and do bad things, it would be a terrible thing for society. But getting high-end training with us and getting a job as a bodyguard is much better, so the army is very grateful for this kind of arrangement we offer."Chen's clients certainly seem happy with the bodyguards his company trains.One businessman, who asked to be identified only by his family name Zhang, said he approached Chen after a friend was kidnapped and killed. Zhang now employs 18 bodyguards hired from Tianjiao."Apart from the security in my company, they are also responsible for the safety of my family," Zhang said. "Society is not stable nowadays."Chen expects Tianjiao's annual revenues to hit 100 million yuan ($16.5 million) within the next five years."We are planning to collaborate with investors and venture capital firms for a company listing," he said.
TAIPEI, Taiwan — China Mobile, the world's largest mobile phone carrier, said Wednesday that it was still in talks with Apple to sell iPhones, amid mounting industry speculation that the pair were about to announce a deal that could net Apple hundreds of millions of new customers.Xi Guohua, the chairman of China Mobile, said Wednesday that his company had no announcement to make on any deal to carry Apple's smartphones. Mr. Xi was speaking to reporters on the sidelines of a conference in Guangzhou, a city in southern China.A tie-up between the pair in China, the American company's second-largest market after its home turf, has been expected for some time and would bolster Apple in its global rivalry with Samsung Electronics of South Korea.The Wall Street Journal reported earlier this month that an announcement would be made "around Dec. 18." Mr. Xi's comment on Wednesday that talks were continuing was first reported by the local news media and later confirmed by a company spokesman, Ge Qi.A deal with China Mobile could be worth billions of dollars in revenue for Apple. As many as 759 million potential new China Mobile customers could gain access to iPhones, generating up to $3 billion in extra revenue in 2014, equivalent to nearly a quarter of Apple's projected revenue growth in its current fiscal year. But after an expected initial surge, Apple would likely find itself back in a battle with its main smartphone rival, Samsung.Mr. Xi also told the conference that China Mobile aims to sell 190 million to 220 million handsets next year. He said the company planned to step up subsidies to cover the cost of handset sales from the 27 billion renminbi, or $4.5 billion, it spent in 2013, according to the company's official account of his remarks on the Sina Weibo microblogging service.
HONG KONG — China's biggest Bitcoin exchange was forced to stop accepting deposits in the Chinese currency on Wednesday, sending the price of the virtual money tumbling in one of its biggest markets globally.The exchange, BTC China, made the announcement in a post on its verified account on Weibo, China's Twitter-like messaging service.The development comes less than two weeks after China's central bank and four other government agencies that regulate finance and technology issued a joint announcement banning Chinese financial institutions from dealing in the virtual currency."For reasons we all know, BTC China has had to cease renminbi-account charging functions," the exchange said in its message, referring to accounts in the Chinese currency. It said that it would continue operating and that deposits denominated in Bitcoins as well as renminbi withdrawals would be unaffected.By Wednesday evening, the Shanghai-based BTC was quoting Bitcoins at about 2,300 renminbi, or about $380, apiece. That was nearly 40 percent lower than where they had traded on Tuesday and less than half of their peak price of 7,395 renminbi on Dec. 1.According to Chinese news reports, the People's Bank of China, the central bank, met Monday with more than 10 of the country's biggest third-party payment processing companies, ordering them to stop all transactions involving digital currencies. Alibaba's Alipay service, the country's biggest processor of online transactions, was among the companies represented at the meeting, according to the reports.On Dec. 5, the central bank and the four agencies jointly banned dealing in Bitcoin, saying the government was acting to "safeguard the interests and property rights of the public, protect the legal standing of the renminbi, take precautions against the risk of money laundering and maintain financial stability."At the time, a spokesman for the central bank took issue with describing Bitcoin as a currency: "It is not issued by a central monetary authority, it does not have the properties of legal currency and it is not a currency in the real meaning of the word."This is not the first time China has cracked down on digital currencies. In 2009, the government banned an online currency developed by Tencent, one of the country's biggest Internet companies.
BEIJING — Nineteen primary school children in China have been hospitalized after drinking yoghurt said to be laced with rat poison and herbicide, the Xinhua state news said.A 34-year-old woman from Loudi city in the central province of Hunan confessed to poisoning the yoghurt drink before delivering to the students, Xinhua said on Saturday. It said the woman was suspected to be suffering from a mental disorder.Three children were in serious condition but their lives were not in danger, Xinhua said. Investigations were going on.There have been several attacks on schools in China in recent years while at the same time, food safety has become a contentious issue with a rising number of food-poisoning cases due in part to lax safety standards at small factories.
LONDON — Boston Celtics basketball owner Wyc Grousbeck and his business partners have invested millions of dollars in the Formula E electric car racing series that will start next year, its organizers said on Friday.Grousbeck is making the investment through Causeway Media Partners, a fund he set up in May and which has been backed by a number of NFL and NBA team owners.Financial details were not disclosed but media reports said they were injecting $21 million into the project."We believe Formula E is a great evolutionary step in motorsport and a way to entertain millions around the world while driving the development of the best possible electric vehicles," Grousbeck said in a statement.Formula E will stage its first race in Beijing next September and is planning a series of city centre races using battery-powered vehicles capable of speeds of 220 kph.about $100 million to develop the format. Grousbeck will join the board of Formula E as part of the agreement.
(Reuters) - Asia dominated Friday's foursomes to race into a 3-1 lead over Europe on the opening day of the Royal Trophy at the Dragon Lake Golf Club in Guangzhou, China on Friday.Jose Maria Olazabal, the only Europe captain to have tasted defeat in the event, will need his team to lift their game in the next two days of the Ryder Cup-inspired tournament to avoid a third loss, following Asian victories in 2009 and 2012.Thai duo Thongchai Jaidee and Kiradech Aphibarnrat set the tone for Asia, captained by Y.E. Yang, beating Paul Lawrie and Stephen Gallacher 5&3 in the opening match.Japanese pair Ryo Ishikawa and Hiroyuki Fujita extended the advantage by prevailing 3&2 over Nicolas Colsaerts and Bernd Wiesberger.South Korea's Kim Hyung-sung and Kim Kyung-tae beat Alvaro Quiros and Thorbjorn Olesen 4&2 to make it 3-0 but Europe avoided an opening day washout when Englishman David Howell and Marc Warren of Scotland overcame China's Liang Wen-chong and Wu Ashun 2&1.
BEIJING — China promised Friday to ease restrictions on imports of U.S. beef and to speed up work on opening its market for government purchases of software and other goods.The pledges came as American and Chinese envoys ended a meeting of the annual U.S.-China Joint Commission on Commerce and Trade amid disputes over market access for goods from solar panels to genetically modified corn.A Chinese deputy commerce minister, Wang Chao, said at a news conference the two sides agreed to "promote U.S. beef exports to China" but gave no details. A deputy agriculture ministry, Niu Dun, said the two sides will work on technical issues but gave no timetable for when full-scale imports might be allowed.Beijing banned U.S. beef in 2003 due to fears of mad cow disease. It has promised in recent years to ease those restrictions but effectively maintained its ban.Wang said Beijing also committed to submitting a new proposal next year to join the Government Procurement Agreement, which extends the World Trade Organization's free-trade principles to purchases by governments.Government agencies, hospitals and other official entities in China are major purchasers of software and other goods. Business groups say extending the GPA to China could create multibillion-dollar new opportunities for foreign suppliers.Beijing promised to join the GPA when it became a WTO member in 2001. But the United States and other governments complained its proposed terms were unrealistic. They would have kept large areas of government purchasing off-limits on security grounds and allowed Beijing to wait up to 18 years before implementing all of its promises.Wang, the commerce official, said Beijing promised next year's offer would be in line with proposals by other countries.The two governments also pledged to strengthen cooperation in criminal enforcement of trade secrets and in combatting violations of patents, copyrights and other intellectual property.The JCCT, established in 1983, is meant to resolve conflicts over trade issues before they disrupt trade.The U.S. delegation to this week's meeting was led by Commerce Secretary Penny Pritzker, U.S. Trade Representative Michael Froman and Agriculture Secretary Tom Vilsack. In addition to Wang and Niu, the Chinese delegation was led by a deputy finance minister, Zhu Guangyao.The United States and China have one of the world's most active trade relationships, with total commerce of some $500 billion a year, but ties are fraught with tension over Beijing's multibillion-dollar trade surpluses and complaints about market barriers.On Friday, China's product quality agency announced it has rejected 12 batches of U.S. corn totaling 545,000 tons that were found to contain an unapproved genetically modified strain.
BEIJING — China has agreed to make a revised offer to join a global agreement aimed at creating a level playing field for foreign companies competing for government contracts, senior U.S. and Chinese officials said on Friday.Lack of access has been a sticking point with trade partners since China joined the World Trade Organisation (WTO) 12 years ago.If China were to join the Agreement on Government Procurement (GPA), it would potentially open $100 billion of government contracts to foreign competition every year, and offer opportunities ranging from building highways to running data networks.The United States and European Union have found China's past offers of terms for access unacceptable, with Beijing disappointing existing members of the GPA over the amount of business it was ready to throw open.Michael Froman, the U.S. trade representative, speaking after two days of talks known as the United States-China Joint Commission on Commerce and Trade, said China has "agreed to submit a revised offer in 2014 that would be commensurate on the whole with those other GPA members"."We are looking forward to seeing the offer and seeing whether it's a system that would consider accession to the GPA," Froman told reporters.Chinese Vice Finance Minister Zhu Guangyao said that China's bid for the GPA "should be based on mutual respect and equality".The discussions on Thursday and Friday were the first high-level trade talks between the United States and China since Xi Jinping became China's president in March.Bringing the world's second largest economy into the GPA would be a huge boost to the agreement. So far only 42 of the WTO's 157 members have joined.Hitherto, China has resisted calls to include procurement by local governments, which account for 93 percent of total procurement spending, saying it was up to those local governments to decide.Most public procurement in China is carried out at sub-provincial level and through projects implemented by state-controlled enterprises and financed with public money.China also agreed to enhance the protection of trade secrets through a high-level action plan and ease market entry barriers by removing regulatory hurdles in the country's product testing rules, Froman said."We also had concerted discussions on services and investment liberalization that will benefit foreign companies as new markets are open," he said.The United States and China agreed in July to restart stalled negotiations on an investment treaty, with Beijing dropping previous efforts to protect certain sectors of its economy from the start.The United States is engaging in more detailed discussions with China about the requirements of the bilateral investment treaty, Froman said, adding that he could not give a timetable.But he added: "It's certainly something that is high on their agenda, which they see as an important part of the overall reform effort in terms of opening up their economy to further foreign investment."China and the United States began negotiations on a pact to govern bilateral investment in 2008, but discussions were put on hold after President Barack Obama took office the following year.The lack of market access for American firms in China is a major sticking point in trade relations with the United States.The United States has a massive trade deficit with China, which maintains a tight grip on state-owned businesses. It totaled $315.1 billion in 2012, up $19.6 billion from 2011, according to the U.S. Trade Representative's website.
BEIJING — China and the United States have agreed to promote American beef exports in China, one of the world's fastest growing markets for the meat, China's vice commerce minister, Wang Chao, said on Friday.Further details were not immediately available. Wang was speaking to reporters in Beijing after an annual Joint Commission on Commerce and Trade (JCCT) meeting.China has restricted imports of U.S. beef over fears about mad cow disease, a brain-wasting condition formally known as bovine spongiform encephalopathy.Demand for beef in China has soared in the last two years, fuelled by rising incomes and short domestic supply.
BEIJING — China's ruling Communist Party announced Friday that it is banning members from holding lavish funerals for their relatives as part of a drive against waste, corruption and pomp.The ban was contained in a party circular carried by state media that also said party members were forbidden from using funerals to collect condolence money from attendees. Such gifts are intended to defray costs, but often serve instead as bribes in exchange for favors."Party members and officials should set an example with simple, civilized funerals," the document said. It said party officials should cremate the bodies of their loved ones after death and avoid excessively large gravestones.Honoring the dead can be an extravagant affair in many parts of China, with ceremonies sometimes featuring professional mourners, uniformed marching bands and motorcades of limousines.The rituals are also increasingly a way to demonstrate rising social status and the accumulation of excess wealth and influence, but extravagant ceremonies have been criticized for highlighting China's burgeoning income gap."Government officials take advantage of expensive funerals to take bribes, while those who offered money in bribes naturally seek returns," said Hu Xingdou, a political economist at the Beijing Institute of Technology. "The public certainly feels angry about officials' luxurious funerals. They may feel envious, and it also mirrors the gap between the rich and the poor."The directive was the latest in an austerity campaign spearheaded by President Xi Jinping to cut through luxury, formality and waste among party and government officials that have alienated and angered many ordinary citizens.The party has already issued a five-year moratorium on the construction of new government buildings and banned the use of public funds for lavish banquets and expensive gifts such as moon cakes.Fancy funerals came into the spotlight in October when state broadcaster China Central Television reported that a village cadre held a funeral for his wife that included a 3-kilometer (2-mile)-long procession with a marching band and motorcade that stopped traffic for hours. It also raised suspicions about how a village official earning a humble salary was able to afford the extravagance.
WASHINGTON — The Chinese Navy has been "irresponsible," and its actions risk escalating tensions with the United States, Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel said Thursday in the highest-level rebuke of Beijing since a Chinese warship came dangerously close to an American guided missile cruiser this month.Naval vessels from the two countries came close to colliding in the South China Sea on Dec. 5, when a Chinese warship cut across the bow of an American cruiser, the Cowpens.The defense secretary said that the two ships came within 100 yards of each other, and Pentagon officials disclosed that the Cowpens had to carry out emergency maneuvers to avoid hitting the Chinese vessel.Mr. Hagel, at a Pentagon news conference, said the decision by the Chinese warship "was not a responsible action.""It was unhelpful," he said. "It was irresponsible.""What we don't want is some miscalculation here to occur," Mr. Hagel added, and he warned that a near collision "could be a trigger or a spark that could set off some eventual miscalculation."Chinese officials said their vessel was following protocol and handled the episode in an appropriate fashion.There is precedent for high-level concern. In 2001, a collision between a Chinese jet fighter and a Navy surveillance plane in international airspace killed the Chinese pilot, resulted in the 11-day detention of the 24-member American crew and ruptured bilateral relations for months. American officials said the Chinese pilot was flying recklessly close, a charge denied by Beijing.The Cowpens episode, in international waters, occurred after the Chinese declared an air defense identification zone over a disputed area. That move was criticized as likely to increase tensions with Japan and South Korea, which have overlapping claims, as well as with the United States.Gen. Martin E. Dempsey, chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, said that the rules of engagement in the region had not been amended since the near collision. But he said American forces were watching for other potential provocative action."We remain alert for changes in the environment," General Dempsey said. "There are times that are more sensitive than others. And we're in a heightened period of sensitivity, and you can count on our mariners and airmen to be aware of that."When the Chinese warship cut in front of the Cowpens, the American cruiser was watching China's new aircraft carrier, the Liaoning, as it made its first voyage in the South China Sea from its home base in Qingdao, the headquarters of China's North Sea Fleet.Asked to assess the level of American concern over China's fielding of an aircraft carrier — a refurbished older vessel bought from Ukraine — General Dempsey noted that the Chinese were "a long way from being a threat to us with their aircraft carrier."Senior Pentagon officials express greater concern over the Chinese military's focus on long-range bombs and missiles designed at least in part to deny American forces' access to waters closer to China. The Pentagon, to counter, is investing heavily in weapons and defenses to preserve the ability of American warships and warplanes to operate where they want.Both Mr. Hagel and General Dempsey called for continued military-to-military talks with the Chinese to defuse tensions. The goal, General Dempsey said, "was to come to a common agreement about rules of behavior when we encounter each other in three particular domains: air, sea and cyber."American government officials have said that computer hackers operating from China — either officially or with the knowledge, and even encouragement, of the government in Beijing — have been energetically seeking to steal American national security and economic secrets by hacking computer networks in the United States.
SHANGHAI — China's money market rates rose sharply on Thursday, increasing short-term borrowing costs and threatening to recreate the liquidity squeeze that rattled markets in June.To ease concerns, China's central bank extended trading on the interbank market on Thursday by 30 minutes.After the market's close, the bank released a statement on its microblog site saying it had recently injected liquidity into the market.The sharp rise in interest rates comes at a time when the central government is trying to push through reforms that would force financial institutions to be more efficient and market-oriented.For years, the government has kept rates unusually low, helping feed an investment binge that some economists warn has caused inflation and led to overinvestment in property, infrastructure and other industries.The government is trying to wean speculators off cheap money by driving up interest rates.In a sign that this is beginning to take place, short-term borrowing costs have jumped this year in the interbank market.The central bank sometimes steps in to keep the market operating smoothly, but it has signaled this year that the market will play a greater role.Louis Kuijs, an economist with the Royal Bank of Scotland who is based in Hong Kong, said the Chinese government wanted tighter monetary policy and higher rates to rein in credit growth and bank leverage. But he said the central bank's effort to inject liquidity into a jittery market was necessary."This should help reduce tightness and calm the market," he said.
GUANGZHOU, China — The first day of trading in what will be by far the largest carbon market in China started briskly on Thursday with pricing in line with expectations, as Beijing continued its drive to slow its rapid growth of heat-trapping emissions.The first trade on the China Emissions Exchange in Guangzhou, Guangdong Province, was priced at 61 renminbi, or about $10, with the cement firm Hailuo buying 20,000 carbon permits from the new energy arm of the state-owned power producer Huadian Energy.Early trade volume in Guangdong's carbon permit market, expected to be the world's second largest in terms of carbon dioxide covered, surpassed full-day totals that started the country's three other carbon exchanges.China, the world's biggest emitter of greenhouse gases, wants to use markets to achieve its target to cut emissions per unit of gross domestic product to 40 percent to 45 percent below 2005 levels by 2020 — at the lowest possible cost.Beijing, Shanghai and Shenzhen have already opened markets of their own; Hubei Province and the cities of Chongqing and Tianjin are expected to follow in the next few months.The day's first trade was followed by other deals for a total of 120,000 permits, known as Guangdong Emissions Allowances, in the first 20 minutes of the market, all at 60 renminbi each.China's other emissions markets each produced about half that volume during their entire debut days.The price level matched expectations, after a government auction of three million permits sold at 60 renminbi, the official price floor for auctions, on Monday.But some observers warned of potential price volatility in the longer term. Emissions markets are often price-sensitive in early stages, as has been seen in markets in Europe, New Zealand and Shenzhen."The biggest concern for companies is how to manage volatility risks. That's more important than who and how much traded today," said Jeff Huang, China director of the Intercontinental Exchange.Guangdong, home to more than 100 million people and with an economy bigger than Indonesia's, is set to become China's central carbon trading hub in the near term; its number of carbon permits dwarfs the combined volume in Beijing, Shanghai and Shenzhen. Globally it will trail only the European Union.Guangdong's carbon plan caps carbon dioxide emissions from 242 of the province's major power generators and cement, iron and steel producers at 350 million metric tons per year, with a further 38 million metric tons set aside in reserves for new entrants and potential adjustments.Companies must pay for 3 percent of their expected emissions in the first year of the plan, with that share gradually rising in the future.The Guangdong government said this week that it would expand the market to cover five new sectors, including textiles, paper production and metals, although it gave no timeline.In Shenzhen, permits currently trade at 73.50 renminbi, with prices pushed up on small volumes by private speculators after the market opened at 28 renminbi in June. Beijing permits trade at about 50 renminbi, and in Shanghai, they change hands at about 25 renminbi.In comparison, allowances in the European Union market closed Wednesday at $6.81. Observers say the varying price levels in the Chinese markets do not necessarily reflect real differences in the scarcity of permits.Instead, companies are unclear whether they are betting on growth or weakness in the permits, because this is the first year the markets have been in operation, and the data that the allocation was based on is uncertain, experts say.
BEIJING — China's Defense Ministry called Japan's plans to raise its military spending for the first time in 10 years deeply worrying for Asia and the world, saying on Saturday that it strongly opposes its neighbor's policy.Japan said earlier this week it will lift military spending by 2.6 percent over five years, buying early-warning planes, beach-assault vehicles and troop-carrying aircraft.It was seen as the clearest sign since Prime Minister Shinzo Abe took office a year ago that he wants to raise Japan's military profile to meet what he says is a threat from China's rapid military buildup and recent actions to back its claims to Japanese-held islands in the East China Sea.China said Japan's military plans raise questions about whether Japan is going beyond its defense needs to build itself up as an offensive combat power."Japan, on the one hand, claims to be a peace-loving country, exclusively adhering to a defense policy. Yet on the other hand, it peddles a so-called 'active pacifism', " the Chinese Defense Ministry said in a statement on its website."Where is Japan's military security policy actually going from here? This cannot but arouse strong concerns in its Asian neighbors and the international community," the ministry said.Japan and China have been mired in an increasingly fiery row over ownership of tiny islands in the East China Sea, with tensions spiking last month when Beijing announced an air-defense zone over a wide area including the islands.Ties between the world's second- and third-largest economies have for years been strained by what China says is Japan's refusal to confess to atrocities committed by its soldiers between 1931 and 1945. But even amid diplomatic spats, Japan remains one of China's largest foreign investors.In the 20 years to 2012, Japan was the sixth-biggest military spender in the world, according to the Stockholm International Peace Research Institute. China, by contrast, leapt to second place from the seventh after it hiked its defense spending by more than five-fold.
(Reuters) - Asia require three-and-a-half points from Sunday's eight singles matches against Europe to defend the Royal Trophy after the teams split Saturday's fourballs at the Dragon Lake Golf Club in Guangzhou, China to give the holders a 5-3 advantage.Leading 3-1 after Friday's foursomes, Asia stretched their advantage to three points thanks to Thai pair Kiradech Aphibarnrat and Thongchai Jaidee's 2&1 victory over Scots Paul Lawrie and Stephen Gallacher.Europe, led by Ryder Cup-winning captain Jose Maria Olazabal, looked set for victory in the second match with Britons David Howell and Marc Warren two-up on the 17th tee against Liang Wenchong and Wu Ashun only to crumble at the finish.Chinese duo Liang and Wu went birdie-birdie over the closing holes to snatch what looked to be a crucial half with Howell and Warren only able to bogey the par-four 18th.Austria's Bernd Wiesberger and Dane Thorbjorn Olesen managed Europe's only win of the day with a 2&1 victory over out-of-sorts Japanese pair Ryo Ishikawa and Hiroyuki Fujita to make the score 4.5-2.5 in Asia's favour.South Korean duo Kim Hyung-sung and Kim Kyung-tae appeared on the verge of restoring Asia's three-point cushion in the final match but they too let slip a two-up lead with two to play against Spain's Alvaro Quiros and Belgian Nicolas Colsaerts.Quiros hit a brilliant approach from the trees to within four feet that set up a birdie on the last to grab the unlikely half and stay within two points of Asia.
BEIJING — China's military lashed out Saturday at Japan's plans to boost defense spending, accusing Tokyo of raising regional tensions under the pretext of safeguarding national security.China "resolutely opposes" the five-year defense plan adopted by Japan on Tuesday, Defense Ministry spokesman Geng Yansheng said in a statement posted on the ministry's website.Japan "continues to deny its history of World War II aggression, challenge the post-war order, and harm the feelings of the people of those victimized nations," Geng said.The strongly worded statement marks the latest salvo in the ongoing string of accusations over who is responsible for a sharp rise in tensions in the East China Sea.China's military has taken an increasingly hawkish stance amid a bitter dispute with Tokyo over uninhabited islands in the sea controlled by Japan but claimed by China. Japan's nationalization of the islands in September 2012 sparked violent demonstrations in several Chinese cities. In the months since, Chinese patrol vessels have routinely confronted Japanese ships in the area, sparking fears of an incident.Under the arrangement adopted Tuesday, Japan will raise defense spending by 5 percent over the next five years to purchase its first surveillance drones, more jet fighters and naval destroyers, and set up an amphibious unit similar to the U.S. Marines.Broader defense program guidelines also adopted Tuesday say Japan is "gravely concerned" about China's growing maritime and military presence in the East China Sea, and its lack of transparency and "high-handed" approach. Late last month, China said all aircraft entering a vast zone over the East China sea must identify themselves and follow China's instructions.Geng accused Japan of manufacturing fears of Chinese aggression and denying responsibility for having invaded China and other countries in the last century.He accused Japan of maintaining a "Cold War mentality" that runs counter to the trends of peaceful development, cooperation and mutual benefit."We urge Japan to reflect deeply on its history, strictly adhere to its commitment to peaceful development, and take concrete measures to improve relations with its neighbors to play a constructive role in maintaining regional peace and development," Geng said.
HONG KONG — Money market rates in China surged again on Friday, shrugging off the central bank's efforts a day earlier to provide more liquidity to the market and raising fears that the Chinese financial system could be hit by a credit crisis similar to the one that occurred in June.Banks in China are struggling to borrow money to meet their short-term financing needs after interest rates in the bank-to-bank market doubled over the last five days. On Friday, one such rate, the seven-day repurchase rate, briefly rose as high as 9.9 percent. That was a level last seen in June, when China's money markets froze up and some banks defaulted on their payments.Fears of an interbank cash squeeze began to weigh on broader financial markets on Friday, with the benchmark Shanghai Stock Exchange Composite Index closing down 2 percent.The situation this week did not reach the painful levels seen in June, but interest rates have soared again in part because China's central bank appears to be willing to let them rise. The bank has been purposely refraining from its regular open market operations, or the buying and selling of money market instruments to manage liquidity and interest rates.Instead, the central bank, the People's Bank of China, has used short-term liquidity operations, where it provides funds to large commercial banks but does not identify the institutions or disclose the funding amounts. In the last week, the central bank made no formal announcement that it had stepped in to bolster liquidity, choosing instead to reveal the measure through a brief posting late Thursday on its account on Weibo, China's Twitter-like messaging service.China's money markets are huge and dynamic but opaque, and are also a key source of funding for off-balance-sheet lending, or shadow banking. Daily trading turnover on the nation's interbank markets averages more than $100 billion, according to figures from the People's Bank of China.Analysts said the central bank was trying to walk a line between curtailing the country's risky but widespread shadow-banking activities and making sure that ordinary financial institutions can meet their day-to-day funding needs. On one hand, letting the market play a greater role will drive up interest rates and squeeze speculators and shadow financiers by forcing them to pay more for the money they borrow. On the other, failing to provide adequate liquidity to the interbank lending market could inadvertently lead to financial gridlock — a freeze in lending that sets off a wave of defaults among banks.The central bank "learned the lesson in June and it will surely avoid playing with fire again," Lu Ting, China economist at Bank of America's Merrill Lynch unit, wrote Friday in a research note. "We don't think the People's Bank of China will significantly tighten monetary policies as new leaders still need a stable economic and financial environment to carry out reforms."Analysts said the recent upward pressure on rates was driven by seasonal factors, namely the combination of year-end fiscal flows and the need among commercial banks to shore up funds to meet regulatory requirements for their loan-to-deposit ratios."This trend is especially pronounced toward the end of each quarter, as banks rush to get more deposits to fulfill their regulatory requirements," Wang Tao, an economist at UBS in Hong Kong, wrote Friday in a research note."We think clearer communication from the central bank may help to calm market sentiment and prevent rates from rising further," Ms. Wang wrote. "However, it is possible that the People's Bank of China is expecting banks to adjust their behavior accordingly in light of higher rates and tighter liquidity. While we do not expect the current elevated levels in market rates to last, we do expect volatility to continue in China's money market for at least another couple of weeks."
BEIJING — Sales of Apple Inc.'s iPhone are growing in China but their share of the smartphone market has shrunk. Apple faces intense competition from Samsung and Chinese brands. The following list shows how Apple's market share has declined over the past year while those of most of its biggest rivals have grown. All figures are percentages.
BEIJING — One of China's top security officials is being investigated by the Communist Party for "suspected serious law and discipline violations," according to Xinhua , the state news agency.The report said the official, Li Dongsheng, a vice minister of public security, is the subject of an inquiry by the Central Commission for Discipline Inspection, the party's internal anticorruption investigation agency. The Xinhua report, which appeared Friday, also said the agency had noted that Mr. Li was vice head of a leading group for the prevention and handling of cult-related issues.The Xinhua report was brief and did not give further details.Mr. Li has ties to Zhou Yongkang, the former member of the ruling Politburo Standing Committee who oversaw the powerful domestic security apparatus from 2007 to 2012, according to several people with knowledge of party politics. The anticorruption agency recently opened a corruption investigation into Mr. Zhou, the first time since the Communist Party took control of China in 1949 that an official of such high stature has been the target of a formal anticorruption inquiry.For many months, investigators had been looking into the activities of officials linked to Mr. Zhou. Those officials include people in the security apparatus, at a state-owned oil company and in senior party and government posts in Sichuan Province. All are domains in which Mr. Zhou has worked and held sway. Mr. Zhou and his wife, Jia Xiaoye, have been held under a form of house arrest in their home in central Beijing. Mr. Zhou was also an ally of Bo Xilai, a former Politburo member, who was sentenced in September to life in prison. Party insiders say Mr. Bo's spectacular fall last year helped fuel the actions taken against Mr. Zhou by other party leaders.Mr. Li, the subject of the latest investigation, has held his vice minister post since 2009, according to an official biographical outline. It was his first job in the security apparatus. Before that, he served in various party propaganda posts and worked at China Central Television, the state network. He graduated in 1978 from Fudan University in Shanghai after studying journalism and is from Shandong Province in eastern China.The investigation into Mr. Li will not necessarily result in a criminal charge. If the anticorruption agency finds that Mr. Li has violated party discipline, he can be punished internally by the party. But the case can also be handed to the courts and prosecutors, and that could lead to a criminal charge and a trial, which is what happened with Mr. Bo.The party chief and Chinese president, Xi Jinping, has been promoting an anticorruption campaign since he took power in November 2012. Mr. Xi has asserted that he will go after "flies and tigers," meaning low-ranking officials as well as people in the top tiers of the party hierarchy. Some analysts are asking whether Mr. Xi's carrying out of investigations into Mr. Zhou and other senior officials is motivated more by a sincere effort to root out corruption or by a desire to consolidate power and weaken rival factions inside the party.Richard McGregor, the author of "The Party: The Secret World of China's Communist Rulers," said on the Asia Society's ChinaFile website recently that Mr. Xi was motivated more by power politics since corruption investigations had not been opened into other party leaders whose family members had amassed enormous wealth."So while we shouldn't shed any tears for Zhou Yongkang — it couldn't happen to a nicer guy, as the saying goes — let's equally not pretend Xi is ushering in a new era of fearless prosecution of graft," he said.
BEIJING — China's ruling Communist Party told the already tightly monitored state media on Monday that they should not be reporting on "wrong points of view" and instead cover positive stories that promote "socialist values".Traditionally, Chinese state media has been the key vehicle for party propaganda. But reforms over the past decade that have allowed greater media commercialization and some increase in editorial independence, combined with the rise of social media, have weakened government control, according to academics.However, since Xi Jinping became party chief and then national president, he has overseen a media crackdown to bring newspapers in particular back in line.Under new guidelines to enforce "core socialist values", the media must "steadfastly uphold the correct guidance of public opinion"."Strengthen the management of the media, do not provide channels for the propagation of the wrong points of view," read the guidelines, which were published by the official Xinhua news agency."News and publishing organs and those who work in the industry must strengthen self-regulation, and earnestly increase their sense of responsibility and ability to promote core socialist values," it added.China media watchers have pointed to a flurry of editorials after Xi spoke to propaganda officials in August as evidence of concern within the party that control over public discourse was slipping. The official Beijing Daily described the party's struggle to win hearts and minds as a "fight to the death".Some reporters and academics, however, have traced the start of the tougher attitude to a strike lasting several days in January by journalists at an outspoken newspaper, the Southern Weekly, after censors scrapped a New Year editorial calling for China to enshrine constitutional rights. Xi had taken over the Communist Party only a few weeks earlier.Xi has also taken a tough line on internet censorship, and the new guidelines implied that would continue."Strengthen management of the internet in accordance with the law, including the management of new technologies and usages ... strike hard against online rumors and criminal activities to clean up the internet environment," Xinhua said.Xinhua said that "core socialist values" included lofty ideals like democracy, equality and rule of law, but also the guiding position of Marxism in today's China.
BEIJING — China's first and only aircraft carrier has successfully carried out a series of tests during a training mission in the disputed South China Sea, state media reported on Monday.This month's drills off the coast of Hainan Island mark not only the first time China has sent a carrier into the South China Sea but the first time it has maneuvered with the kind of strike group of escort ships U.S. carriers deploy, according to regional military officers and analysts.The Liaoning has carried out more than 100 tests, including of its combat systems, and training tasks since early December, the official English-language China Daily said."The Liaoning successfully performed several tests of the combat system today and organized for the first time comprehensive combat training," the newspaper cited the navy saying in a statement."Through this operation, we tested the carrier's combat capability and tried the performance of its propulsion and seaworthiness."The mission has been characterized by "a large number of tests, rigorous standards, complicated circumstances as well as collaboration with multiple military units", it added.The carrier is being escorted by two destroyers and two frigates."The South China Sea has deep waters, strong wind and big waves, making it a suitable place for the aircraft carrier to conduct tests and training," the China Daily quoted the Liaoning's captain, Zhang Zheng, as saying.Zhang said drills included practicing defending against hostile aircraft, ships and submarines in simulations.The Liaoning - a Soviet-era ship bought from Ukraine in 1998 and re-fitted in a Chinese shipyard - has long been a symbol of China's naval build-up.After two decades of double-digit increases in the military budget, China's admirals plan to develop a full blue-water navy capable of defending growing economic interests as well as disputed territory in the South and East China Seas.Carrier strike groups sit at the core of those ambitions - and successfully operating the 60,000-tonne Liaoning is the first step in what state media and some military experts believe will be China's deployment of several locally built carriers by 2020.The USS Cowpens narrowly avoided colliding with a Chinese warship escorting the Liaoning while operating in international waters on December 5, the U.S. Navy has said. U.S. Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel on Thursday called the Chinese ship's actions "irresponsible".China's official Xinhua news agency said the Cowpens was "warned" by the carrier task force, adding the U.S. vessel was "intentionally" putting the Liaoning under surveillance.
BEIJING — Lawyers and Christian churchgoers said they were blocked from meeting in a central Chinese county Monday to commemorate Christmas and draw attention to the detention of a pastor and his aides.The canceled meeting at the church in Henan province's Nanle county came during a monthlong crackdown on the church over a land dispute that pits its popular preacher against the county government.Nanle's congregation had wanted to hold a prayer meeting on Monday morning to mark Christmas. But they also sought to use the gathering to rally support for their pastor, Zhang Shaojie, and more than a dozen of his aides who have been detained by police for more than a month and denied access to their lawyers.Rights attorney Xia Jun said he and several other lawyers who had traveled to Nanle were on their way to the prayer meeting when they were blocked by about two dozen middle-aged women and some men.The crowd blocked the road with a ladder and harassed the lawyers, preventing them from either going to the church or heading in the direction from which they came. Xia said he believed local authorities hired the group to chase the visitors out of the county."The most serious problem in Nanle right now is that it is practically lawless," Xia said by phone. "The atmosphere is dark and there are no human rights."A Christian woman named Shi Ping said she and several others from Shanghai who had traveled to Nanle were escorted to a police station by plainclothes officers who guarded the church entrance. Nearly 100 people blocked the church's entrance, Shi and another churchgoer said by phone.The case has drawn the scrutiny of rights lawyers and activists who say it exposes a county government's ability to act with impunity against a local Christian church even if it is state-sanctioned. Supporters of the church say the county government reneged on an agreement to allocate it a piece of land for the construction of a new building, leaving them without a place of worship.Reached by phone, a man from the Nanle county government said he had not heard about the case, while calls to local police and the Communist Party's offices rang unanswered.The dispute highlights the vulnerable position that religious groups hold in the Chinese political system under the communist government, an expert said."A religious group in China, no matter what group, is a weak, marginalized social organization," said Prof. Fenggang Yang, a sociologist and expert on religion in China at Purdue University. "They don't have the power, they don't have the social status. Perhaps local officials feel that to take them on is not a big deal."
BEIJING — Former basketball star Dennis Rodman left North Korea on Monday, but he plans to return next month — even if a sponsor won't be with him.Rodman's short visit was aimed at finalizing plans to bring 11 other former NBA players to Pyongyang for a Jan. 8 exhibition game marking Kim Jong Un's birthday. The two struck up a friendship when Rodman first traveled to the secretive state earlier this year, but Rodman did not answer questions from the media on whether he had met with Kim this time.Rodman is the highest profile American to meet Kim since the leader inherited power from his father in late 2011.He wants to bring the group of players to Pyongyang for the exhibition, but has acknowledged that some of the Americans have been reluctant to come. He held tryouts for the North Korean team during his visit, which began Thursday. He has said he expects to announce the U.S. roster soon, and that he is planning another game in June.Later Monday, though, Irish betting company Paddy Power PLC — a driving force behind the exhibition — said it had cut ties with Rodman."Given changed circumstances, Paddy Power has decided to withdraw its association with the Dennis Rodman basketball initiative in North Korea," the company said in a statement.Power explained his company's decision in an email to The Associated Press."This isn't a financial decision. We'll be honoring all our contractual commitments to Dennis and his team," he wrote. "We've reviewed the project, and with the benefit of hindsight, we've recognized we've got this one wrong."Because of this, we have decided to remove our name from the event."Rodman declined to answer questions from reporters on his arrival at Beijing's airport if the two met on his latest visit. On Sunday night, though, he told The Associated Press that he had not yet had a meeting with Kim. He arrived in North Korea on Thursday, a week after North Korea announced the execution of Kim's once-powerful uncle, sparking speculation by foreign analysts over the future of the Kim regime.Rodman's agent acknowledged Paddy Power's decision, and also said the game is on track despite the recent execution of Kim's uncle in a dramatic political purge."We've worked with Paddy Power on several occasions before and we respect their decision," Darren Prince said. "We'd like to thank them for all their solid work helping to make Dennis' dream of basketball diplomacy a reality."
BEIJING — With his image gracing bank notes and staring out from Tiananmen Gate, Mao Zedong remains a constant presence in China 120 years after his birth, revered as a hero who founded the communist state and restored national pride — even as China moves ever further from his vision of a communist society.China is marking Thursday's anniversary of his birth with relatively understated celebrations, a far cry from the cult of personality that once surrounded Mao, and a sign of how far China has traveled in the 37 years since his death and more than three decades since the junking of orthodox Marxism.President Xi Jinping invokes Mao in his fight against corruption and borrows Maoist concepts such as the "mass line" to extol the virtues of close ties between the rulers and those ruled. Yet he has also proposed giving the free market a "decisive role" in the economy, a concept that would have been anathema to the "Great Helmsman," as Mao was called.Still, as heirs of the rigid one-party political system imposed by Mao and his party comrades, the current leadership has a strong interest in venerating his memory."Because Mao was founder of the communist state, to commemorate Mao is to in fact demonstrate the legitimacy of their own rule," says historian and political analyst Zhang Lifan.The run-up to the anniversary has included dozens of symposiums, exhibitions, concerts and television specials.Not surprisingly, many are looking to cash in on the date, especially in his home village of Shaoshan in the central province of Hunan. Mao worship is a cornerstone of the local economy, and the town fathers are using $2.5 billion in public funds to renovate museums and historical sites, along with highways, schools and other infrastructure.Sites associated with Mao around the country are getting facelifts as part of an effort to promote "red tourism" and bring development to some of China's least developed areas. Excess is also making a showing, including a $16 million gilded statue of the man — blinged-out with precious gems — in the city of Shenzhen, and a special-edition offering of China's most expensive liquor.Mao remains a strong symbolic presence, though not nearly as ubiquitous he was during his lifetime. Thousands of Chinese tourists line up daily to view his embalmed body in its Tiananmen Square mausoleum, which has also undergone renovation. His image graces almost all bank notes from 1 to 100 yuan, and Chinese studios crank out a steady flow of new movies and television series based on highly sterilized versions of his life and the party's history.Such hagiographies studiously avoid Mao's central part in China's two worst post-war tragedies: the 1959-63 Great Leap Forward and 1966-76 Cultural Revolution. As many as 30 million Chinese died through starvation and persecution.Instead, they focus on Mao's role as leader of the communist guerrillas who battled Chiang Kai-shek's Nationalists, as founder of the Communist State in 1949, and as a leader who defied both Washington and Moscow to establish China as a new geopolitical center.For many younger Chinese, steeped in the sometimes xenophobic nationalism that has replaced communism as the national ethos, Mao's achievement in winning China respect far outweighs his political misdeeds, said Alexander V. Pantsov, co-author of last year's well-received biography, "Mao: The Real Story.""Overall, most Chinese will always commemorate Mao as a nationalist hero regardless of his communist tyranny," Pantsov said.As China's last truly autocratic leader, Mao also represents a simpler time, and his legacy is invoked both as an emblem of fiery nationalism and to protest current policies seen as favoring the growing wealth gap that has supplanted Mao's impoverished but egalitarian society. Most recently, Mao portraits featured prominently among the crowd during sometimes violent anti-Japanese protests last year."Mao represents the party and the party represents China. That's how a lot of people see it," said Beijing office worker Jenny Zhu, 32, born five years after Mao's death.Mao's image was also embraced by supporters of Bo Xilai, who had been among the country's most powerful politicians before he was sentenced to life in prison earlier this year for corruption and abuse of power. Bo had revived Mao-era songs and slogans as part of an anti-crime campaign targeting newly wealthy property developers in the mega-city of Chongqing, even while pursuing market-oriented growth.Officially, judgments on Mao's legacy have been closed since successor Deng Xiaoping's pronouncement in 1981 that the former leader's contributions were "70 percent positive, 30 percent negative." Amid a general ambivalence about politics among younger Chinese, ideological debates have been pushed to the margins.However, for die-hards such as Fan Jinggang, editor-in-chief of the Maoist website Utopia, Mao remains an untarnished hero nonpareil and Thursday's anniversary is a cause for vast celebration."The people are showing their sincere lofty feelings toward Chairman Mao and their striving for fairness and justice and their love for the party and the socialist nation," Fan said.
BEIJING — A court in northeastern China has sentenced a man to 10 years in prison for trying to kill his baby daughter by inserting sewing needles into her body, state media reported Wednesday.A court in Heilongjiang province found Yin Zhihe guilty of attempting to murder his 2-month-old daughter in August, the official Xinhua News Agency said.The court found that Yin wanted to kill the child because he believed that she was not his daughter, Xinhua reported.Yin first inserted one needle into the baby's ribcage on Aug. 4. The next day, the baby's cries prompted her mother to take the child to the hospital, where the needle was found and surgically removed.But Yin later inserted three more needles in the child's chest, navel and stomach. The needles were removed in an operation but had already caused respiratory failure and injuries to the baby's organs.The court granted Yin some leniency because he turned himself in to police and the baby survived the attacks, Xinhua said.A DNA test showed that Yin was the girl's biological father, the report said.
TAIPEI, Taiwan — A government monitoring body has cast serious doubts on Taiwan's ability to launch a credible all-volunteer military force, undermining a crucial plank in President Ma Ying-jeou's defense policy, and raising difficult questions about the island's ability to defend itself against any attack from China.In a report unveiled Tuesday, the Control Yuan quoted high-ranking retired military officers, including a former navy commander, as saying that the defense ministry's failure to attract enough recruits to replace the existing conscription-based system spells bad news for Taiwan's military deterrent."My gravest concern is that the all-volunteer system may not be fully developed by the time the government scraps the conscription system," said Admiral Miao Yung-ching in the report. "Is it possible to suspend this to a later date?"Taiwan's all-volunteer transition was supposed to have been completed by 2015 but in September the Defense Ministry delayed implementation for two years amid continuing recruiting failures.During the first 11 months of 2013, the government says only 30 percent of the recruiting target of 28,531 was met.Report co-author Huang Huaung-hsiung said the Defense Ministry's recruiting difficulties appeared to leave it with three options heading toward the 2017 deadline: lower force levels from the 175,000 target, opt for a further delay in implementation of the all-volunteer force or revert to the conscription system.Responding to the Control Yuan report, the Defense Ministry said it is still on course for a 2017 transition to an all-volunteer military.The transition to an all-volunteer force is an important part of President Ma's defense policy, despite his insistence that the possibility of armed confrontation with China has receded substantially amid his efforts to lower tensions across the 150-kilometer- (100-mile) wide Taiwan strait through greater commercial engagement. That engagement has been the centerpiece of his administration since he came into office in May 2008.China and Taiwan split after a civil war in 1949. Beijing continues to regard the democratic island of 23 million people as part of its territory and says it is committed to bringing it back into the fold — by persuasion of possible, by force if necessary.Once boasting a standing force of more than 500,000 troops, Taiwan's enthusiasm for its military has declined greatly in recent years, paced by well-publicized horror stories about poor conditions for recruits and Ma's repeated failures to deliver on promises to devote at least 3 percent of GDP to military expenditures.China's own massive defense outlays — at least $90 billion this year — and the lukewarm attitude of Taiwan's once steadfast American ally to providing the island with state-of-the art military hardware have also had a negative impact on the thinking of many Taiwanese, including potential recruits.
Steve Stricker made it clear that money was not important.His plan was to defend his title at Kapalua and walk away from the PGA Tour for the rest of the year. Over the holidays leading into 2013, he reached a compromise and cut his schedule roughly in half. He contacted his sponsors, and they supported him.Stricker didn't have great expectations starting his year of semi-retirement."If I could just make enough money to pay yearly expenses, I'm fine with that," he said. "If we don't have to touch anything I've put away ... I don't need to do what I'm doing just to make money. I'd rather be staying at home, doing things at home with the foundation and with my kids."No one else was around during this conversation, but Stricker still leaned in and lowered his voice as he stated what everyone already knew."You know, we're pretty conservative with our money," he said.Stricker was runner-up that week at Kapalua and made $665,000. He didn't play for six weeks, and then reached the quarterfinals of the Accenture Match Play Championship to earn $275,000. Two weeks later, he was runner-up at Doral and brought in $880,000.That should pay the bills.He finished the year with just over $4.4 million, the third-highest total of his career. His world ranking improved 10 spots to No. 8. And by the end of the year, he had several players contemplating a similar schedule.Along the way, there were plenty of other moments that showed more about players than just their birdies and bogeys, and the checks they cash.Rory McIlroy generated a buzz no matter where he went at the start of the year. He had the hefty deal from Nike. He was No. 1 in the world. And he was struggling early with a missed cut in Abu Dhabi and a first-round departure in Match Play. Nothing caused a stir like Friday at the Honda Classic, when he abruptly shook hands with Ernie Els as they were making the turn and walked straight to the parking lot.Information was a trickle. He was vague during a brisk walk to the car. Later, a statement from his management company said he had a sore wisdom tooth.There was a golf tournament still going on. Michael Thompson shot 65 on that Friday to move to the top of the leaderboard. It was early afternoon and no one seemed interested. The announcement sounded more like a plea. "We have Michael Thompson in the interview room," the official said.One voice broke the awkward silence. "Is he a dentist?" a reported asked.No. But he did win his first PGA Tour event that week.Angel Cabrera is a man of few words and loud actions.A month after losing the Masters in a playoff, he was walking off the 18th green at TPC Sawgrass following a practice round. Fans thrust programs and flags for him to sign. There was bumping and pushing, and a marshal started to bark at everyone to back up.Cabrera stepped back about 10 feet, and then instructed only the children to come under the ropes and join him. He spent the next 15 minutes signing for them.It looked like the scene outside the mansion in "Young Frankenstein," missing only the pitchforks and torches.The Pure Silk LPGA Bahamas Classic was played on a 12-hole course at The Ocean Club because of flooding. The first round didn't finish because of another storm system in the area. Players gathered in darkness outside the rules trailer to find out the plan for Friday. A computer error led players to believe — only for a moment — that they would keep their same tee time for the second round. Chaos ensued, filled with heated arguments among players and rules officials.And it was at this moment the LPGA showed its true international flavor.A group of Swedish players were off to the right, raising their voices in their native language. The Americans were in the front of the pack. The South Koreans were in the back. The Spaniards were in the middle. The Germans were over by the hedges. It was the ultimate melting pot.And they ultimately got it all worked out.Among the visitors at The Players Championship was Ulises Mendez, who plays on the PGA Tour Latinoamerica. The Argentine earned his card last year when he tied for 15th in Latin America Q-school. His player badge allowed him access to the tournament, and he camped out just beneath the bleachers behind the 17th green.He stood there for an hour as the best players came through the 17th. It was an inspiring day."To know where you need to be," Mendez said, "you need to see where you want to go."There is no love lost between Tiger Woods and Sergio Garcia, as both made clear at The Players Championship and in the weeks that followed. The same could be said for Garcia and Padraig Harrington, as the Irishman showed on a couple of occasions this year in his subtle style.Speaking to a small group of reporters at the TPC Sawgrass, where the Woods-Garcia flap was starting to unfold, Harrington said of all the times he has played with Woods he considered his etiquette "absolutely impeccable.""I've played with Tiger many times," Harrington said. "I give him an A-plus on his etiquette on the course. I give him an A-plus for his respect for fellow players on the course."A British reporter then asked Harrington what kind of grade he would give Garcia."I'm not in a position to rank players," he replied.Later that summer, Harrington finished a practice round at Muirfield and was signing autographs. One fan had the British Open program turned to the page that showed Harrington winning his first claret jug. That was in 2007 at Carnoustie, after a playoff with Garcia.Harrington signed the page and held onto the book for the longest time, staring at the photo with a satisfied smile."You like that picture?" the man said."More than you know," the Irishman replied.The woman behind the counter at Starbucks in the Denver suburbs was making small talk with a customer when she learned he was headed to the Solheim Cup."Annika Sorenstam was just in here," she said. "Well, I think that was her."Not only is the Swede the most famous LPGA Tour player of her generation, one would suspect writing the word "Annika" on the cup would be a dead giveaway. Except that in this case, she can be excused. Turns out Sorenstam doesn't go by "Annika" when she's in Starbucks.Her code name is Maria."Maria is the one name that translates on every continent," Sorenstam said when she confessed to her alias. "So I'm Maria Swenson."The first day of the Solheim Cup nearly didn't finish because of a rules decision that took nearly a half-hour to determine — and as it turned out, it was the wrong decision. It proved a pivotal part of the fourballs match, which Europe went on to win.It wasn't the first time a rules official had made the wrong call. Former USGA President Trey Holland, one of the most skilled in the Rules of Golf, mistakenly gave Ernie Els relief in the U.S. Open from a temporary immovable object that was movable. But when an official makes a ruling, it stands.Brad Alexander, a respected LPGA official, made the wrong call at the Solheim Cup. When the day was over, confusion and anger lingered. Alexander volunteered to accompany both captains to the media center to handle any questions from the press. He explained what happened. He made no excuses. He accepted all the blame. It was classy.That kind of accountability would have come in handy at Augusta National this year.The final week of December is the one week no meaningful tournaments are played on any tour in the world.The golf year is endless, and it can feel even longer.Mark Fulcher, the caddie for Justin Rose, has been at this a long time. The crowning moment was at Merion, where Rose won the U.S. Open for his first major. This was in late October, halfway around the world in Shanghai. Everyone was tired. Rose was just starting the stretch run to the end of his year. The caddies were talking about the drudgery of early rounds at a tournament."The day I stop caddying, I'll either be dead or I won't be excited on a Thursday morning," Fulcher said that day. "Thursday is the greatest day in golf. It's the perfect reset, isn't it? You're reminded, even if you won, that everyone starts all over the next week. And if you've played absolute rubbish, there's always the belief that it's about to turn around. I love Thursday. Just love it."It's a good reminder for everyone involved in this game. You never know what's going to happen next. Or when.
WASHINGTON — The United States urged China on Tuesday to quickly implement planned reforms to open up its economy and said it will keep a close eye on progress as officials work to resolve remaining trade tensions with the world's second-largest economy.The Office of the U.S. Trade Representative (USTR) also said the United States would not hesitate to lodge new disputes with the World Trade Organization if bilateral talks on a range of contentious issues from agriculture to intellectual property failed.China, a $450 billion market for U.S. goods and services that has become a key source of revenue for some American companies, announced plans last month to steer its economy towards more sustainable growth and liberalize markets.The USTR said the reforms, which aim to boost productivity and switch the focus of China's economic model from goods exports to domestic consumption and services, had much in common with the U.S. trade agenda with China."The United States shares (the reforms') goals of reducing Chinese government intervention in the economy, accelerating China's opening up to foreign goods and services, reforming China's state-owned enterprises and improving transparency and the rule of law to allow fair competition in China's market," the USTR said in a report to U.S. lawmakers."The United States therefore will urge China to speedily implement these promising Third Plenum Decision economic reform elements."In its latest scorecard of China's compliance with its WTO obligations, the USTR expressed particular concern at intellectual property infringements, including copyright violations and piracy which it said cost U.S. companies billions of dollars every year in lost royalties and revenue.The U.S. is also concerned about the theft of trade secrets by or for the benefit of Chinese companies, and lax enforcement of existing legal protections which means many victims of such thefts do not lodge formal complaints."When bilateral discussions fail to resolve key issues, the United States will remain prepared to take other types of action on these issues, including WTO dispute settlement where appropriate," said the USTR, which reported seven active WTO cases against China during 2013.Other key unresolved issues highlighted in the report include Chinese export restraints on rare earths and other raw materials and a ban on U.S. beef imports, which both countries have said they aim to lift by July 2014.China, which joined the WTO 12 years ago, is the United States' largest agricultural export market with exports of more than $25 billion in 2013 but the USTR said the country remained "among the least transparent and predictable of the world's major markets for agricultural products."The USTR's wish list for China includes reducing market access barriers, more transparency, less discrimination, requiring state-owned enterprises to compete with other enterprises on a level playing field and a stronger legal system.
BEIJING — Changes to China's strict one-child policy, which will allow more parents to have a second child, will begin to roll out early next year, state media said.The policy change is expected to go into force in some areas of China in the first quarter of 2014, Yang Wenzhuang, a director at the National Health and Family Planning Commission, told the official Xinhua news agency.Beijing said last month it would allow millions of families to have two children, the most radical relaxation of its strict one-child policy in close to three decades. The move is part of a plan to raise fertility rates and ease the financial burden on China's rapidly ageing population.Authorities were in the process of calculating the number of eligible couples, Yang said.China's largely rubber-stamp parliament, the National People's Congress, is expected to formally approve the new policy later this week.The policy move has buoyed baby-related stocks and has seen a rush for fertility-boosting products.China would eventually scrap family planning restrictions, but was unlikely to abandon its family planning policy in the near term, a senior official said last month.Xinhua cited members of parliament debating the easing of the rules on Tuesday as saying that it was important the country continues to enforce family planning and that people who violate the rules are punished."China still has a large population. This has not changed. Many of our economic and social problems are rooted in this reality," Xinhua quoted member of parliament Jiang Fan as saying. "We could not risk letting the population grow out of control."China, with nearly 1.4 billion people, is the world's most populous country. The government says the policy of limiting families to one child, which covers 63 per cent of the population, has averted 400 million births since 1980.
BEIJING — A group of rights lawyers and churchgoers supporting a jailed Chinese Christian pastor were attacked by hired thugs on Christmas Eve at his house in central China, his wife and two lawyers said.Wang Fengrui, his wife, said dozens of thugs kicked and punched members of the group on Tuesday when they attempted to leave the house in Nanle county in Henan province.Pastor Zhang Shaojie and his aides were arrested more than a month ago over a land dispute and have been denied access to lawyers. His case has drawn the scrutiny of rights lawyers and activists who say it exposes a county government's ability to act with impunity against a local church even if it is state-sanctioned.While land disputes are common in China, Zhang's popularity has prompted many of the country's Christians to rally around him to defend what they say is religious freedom. They say the county government reneged on an agreement to provide Zhang's congregation with land for a building, leaving them without a place of worship.Among those kept at the house Tuesday were three lawyers and an assistant, who had traveled to Nanle to seek meetings with Zhang and his aides.Five churchgoers who were at Zhang's house along with the lawyers had hoped to hold a prayer meeting on Monday to rally support for him, but were prevented by authorities.The conflict became violent when the thugs forcibly prevented the lawyers and churchgoers from leaving the house on Tuesday, according to Wang and two lawyers at the house."About 20 or so people had staked out the house overnight with lights and bonfires, and they used violence to prevent some of us from leaving, grabbing their clothes, taking their possessions such as bank cards and beating them," said Zhang's lawyer, Xia Jun.Among those beaten was 63-year-old lawyer Cheng Weishan, who said he was praying for forgiveness of the thugs when they came after him, pulling his briefcase while punching him in the back and hitting his hands to force him to release it."I thought they would have some limit when dealing with an elderly person like me, but they had none," said Cheng, who was left with only the briefcase's two handles.The crowd of thugs grew to about 40, and the lawyers said they called police for help but to no avail. A man who answered the phone at the local police station said he had no knowledge of the incident, and calls to the county government office rang unanswered.Both Xia and Wang said Cao Nan, a preacher who came from Shenzhen to Nanle for the prayer meeting, told them he was placed inside a cage at the local police station, beaten, and sprayed with pepper water on Monday before being allowed to go to Zhang's house."I saw his shredded clothes and bruises on his body, his legs and his face," Wang said. "He could not sleep at all last night."Witnesses said Cao was determined to leave the house on Tuesday but was beaten again.The thugs grabbed Cao by his limbs, dumped him in front of the house and beat him before he grabbed a kitchen knife for self-defense, Cheng said."We have been calling police since yesterday for help, but they never came," Cheng said. "The moment Cao went out with a cleaver, they appeared instantly to chase after him."Cao was believed to have been taken away again by police.
BEIJING — China sent health experts to investigate a drug maker Tuesday to see if several recent deaths of babies were related to a vaccine they received in a government immunization program.A team of government investigators was sent to Biokangtai, a drug maker based in the southern city of Shenzhen, state broadcaster China Central Television said, amid growing public concern about the safety of the vaccine.The probe was launched after provincial and health authorities separately reported that since November, about a half-dozen babies died shortly after receiving hepatitis B vaccine made by Biokangtai. One case has been ruled out while the others are still being investigated.Repeated calls to Biokangtai's Shenzhen headquarters were disconnected after a few rings. In a statement earlier this month, the company said it was confident of the safety of its products and that the deaths could be caused by underlying diseases that coincidentally began showing symptoms after the vaccinations."Coincidental diseases arise the most easily and are the easiest to misinterpret," the statement on Biokangtai's website said.A senior government expert on diseases said vaccine-related deaths could be due to coincidence, but that Biokangtai was not in a position to make an objective assessment."We should not treat the company's statement like a conclusion," Dr. Zeng Guang, chief epidemiologist with the China Center for Disease Control and Prevention, said in a phone interview. "They may be trying to protect their self-interest. Or they may have a lot of confidence in their product."Hepatitis B is a chronic liver infection that is spread through the blood or bodily fluids of infected people. It can cause liver inflammation and jaundice.The vaccine was given to children free of charge as part of the government's national immunization program. Chinese health authorities suspended the use of Biokangtai's hepatitis B vaccine last Friday after the first deaths of babies were reported.Four babies reportedly died in the southern province of Guangdong, although one was said to have died from pneumonia. The National Health and Family Planning Commission reported that two babies in Hunan province and another in Sichuan had also died in a similar way.One more child in Sichuan died on Monday, less than 24 hours after receiving a hepatitis B vaccine made by a different company, the official Xinhua News Agency said.Autopsies were being conducted and results were expected in a few weeks, reports said.Public confidence in Chinese health authorities and the country's drug safety regime is shaky at best, though improvements have been made in recent years since government agencies withheld information about the spread of SARS and bird flu.Concerns over vaccine safety have surfaced in recent years after media reports of problems with vaccines for encephalitis, hepatitis B and other diseases, though the health ministry said the vaccines had been improperly stored but were unrelated to subsequent illnesses that were reported.Zeng, the government expert, urged the public not to panic, saying that in general Chinese vaccines were safe and that more people would die if everyone refused inoculations."If the public refuses to be vaccinated, or if they try to change the vaccination procedures, the consequence will be extremely bad," Zeng said. "Instead of several deaths, it will cause tens of thousands of deaths."Associated Press researcher Zhao Liang contributed to this report.
HONG KONG — A bid by China's central bank to curb soaring interest rates and relieve pressure on the financial system appeared to have come up short, as Chinese money market rates shrugged off the measure and continued to surge on Monday.The central bank, the People's Bank of China, said late Friday that it had provided more than 300 billion renminbi, or about $50 billion, in short-term funds to selected banks over a three-day period that week. Even so, rates continued to rise on Monday in China's money markets, a critical source of short-term financing for commercial banks and also for financial institutions engaged in risky, off-balance-sheet lending.The environment is fanning fear of a potential credit crisis.One important figure, the seven-day repurchase rate, rose as high as 10 percent on Monday. That was double the rate of a week earlier and the highest level since June, when the central bank allowed rates to increase to curb speculative investment in the country's sprawling shadow banking sector.Left unchecked, the situation could leave some banks struggling to meet their obligations and could have implications for the broader economy.China's banks typically scramble for short-term cash to meet month-, quarter- and year-end regulatory requirements. Demand for cash is also high among Chinese companies seeking to meet year-end payments, too.Part of the reason for China's liquidity shortage is that the central bank has been purposely refraining from its regular open-market operations — the buying and selling of money-market instruments to manage liquidity and interest rates. Such was the case in June. Analysts see this as a signal that the central bank is serious about reining in the shadow banking sector.But to help ordinary banks meet their day-to-day financing needs, the central bank has been resorting to a method that is less commonly used and less transparent.In a posting on its official account on Sina Weibo, China's Twitter-like messaging service, the central bank confirmed on Friday that it had tried to ease pressure in money markets by providing assistance through short-term liquidity operations — an exceptional measure to provide funding selectively to large banks, which it did not identify.The central bank noted that some commercial lenders appeared to be hoarding cash, with excess reserves in the banking system topping 1.5 trillion renminbi, or about $250 billion, an amount it described as "relatively high" when compared with the same period in previous years."At the same time, we suggest the main commercial banks make rational adjustments to the structure of their assets and liabilities, and improve their liquidity management using a scientific and long-term approach," the central bank said its statement.
BEIJING — The sale of luxury food gift boxes in China fell dramatically in 2013, Chinese state media said, in another sign of the impact the ruling Communist Party's anti-corruption drive has had on consumer behavior.A member of the China National Food Industry Association told official news agency Xinhua late on Wednesday that the sales volume of gift food products is estimated to have fallen roughly 40 percent in 2013.The sale of traditional glutinous rice cakes was particularly hard hit, said Weng Yangyang, a senior official from the rice cake industry association.Xinhua said a gift box of rice cakes, which are wrapped in reed leaves and eaten during the annual Dragon Boat Festival in the spring, could sell for as much as 2,888 yuan ($480)."For those food companies that rely on selling gifts, and seek high profits, the market share has fallen even more, and times are hard," Weng said.Luxury gift boxes containing foods such as premium alcohol, nuts, or traditional mooncakes have been a requisite part of doing business in China, and can be used as a form of soft bribery.However, since taking over the reins of the Communist Party in November 2012 and the government in March, President Xi Jinping has vowed to crack down on corruption. A year ago, the government launched a campaign against extravagance and waste, meant to curtail gift giving and lavish banquets.Demand for gold-encrusted mooncakes stuffed with shark's fin and other lavish pastries waned during the Mid-Autumn Festival this year in favor of less conspicuous gifts.
BEIJING — China's leaders bowed three times before a statue of Mao Zedong on the 120th anniversary of his birth Thursday in carefully controlled celebrations that also sought to uphold the market-style reforms he would have opposed.The approach underscores the delicate balancing act the Communist Party leadership — installed last year — has to perform in managing perceptions of Mao's legacy.As heirs of the authoritarian one-party political system imposed by Mao and his party comrades, the current leadership has a strong interest in venerating his memory to bolster their own legitimacy. But they have also pledged to undertake market reforms needed to rejuvenate a slowing economy, measures that would have been anathema to Mao.President and Communist Party chief Xi Jinping and other top leaders paid tribute to the founder of the communist state with a visit to his mausoleum on Tiananmen Square in the heart of the capital, Beijing, the official Xinhua News Agency said.The leaders "revered" Mao's embalmed body which lies in state in the mausoleum and "jointly recalled the glorious achievements of comrade Mao Zedong," Xinhua reported.In a sign of the relatively understated approach the party is taking with the anniversary, there was no mention of Mao's birthday on the front page of the party's flagship People's Daily.On page seven the paper hailed Mao as a brilliant "proletarian revolutionary, strategist and theorist," but the full-page commentary was accompanied by an editorial that said the "best commemoration" of Mao would be to keep advancing economic reforms that were launched by his successor.Under Mao's leadership, China lurched between industrialization drives and violent political campaigns that left tens of millions dead before he died in 1976 and his successors began their free market experiments. Mao played a central role in China's worst post-war tragedies: the Great Leap Forward and Cultural Revolution, in which millions died from starvation and persecution.In a speech to party leaders Thursday, Xi sought to affirm Mao's legacy while acknowledging vaguely that the revolutionary leader had made mistakes, though Xi said they should be assessed in the context of his time."We should not judge and make demands of our predecessors based on today's conditions, level of development and level of understanding, nor should we make excessive demands for them to achieve what only the descendants could achieve," Xi said.But Xi's speech neglected to note that Mao's critics compare China's situation in his time not with the present day but with other countries which had been going through similar post-war challenges, said Beijing-based Chinese historian Zhang Lifan."While China was busy with power struggles and political campaigns, others were wholeheartedly building their countries," Zhang said. "In Mao's hands, China's modernization was delayed by at least 20 years. This problem is one they're not willing to discuss."Censors appeared to be busy scrubbing criticism of Mao off China's social media sites, with messages that questioned his legacy disappearing within minutes of being posted. But the views of liberal commentators and intellectuals were still circulating widely on a popular smartphone messaging app, WeChat."Speaking of Mao's legacy, it at least includes: the silencing of public opinion, a regime that will never be elected, the harmonious cooperation of the three powers of government, and the creation of a production line of wrongful convictions," wrote ex-government adviser Bao Tong in a recent essay that was being shared on WeChat."Of which the most important is undoubtedly power that leads everything," Bao wrote. "With it, one can possess the manpower and fighting strength of hundreds of millions."The run-up to the anniversary has included dozens of exhibitions, concerts and television specials. On Thursday, the party's Central Committee held a symposium at the Great Hall of the People, Xinhua said without providing much detail.Mao remains a strong symbolic presence, though not nearly as ubiquitous as he was during his lifetime. Thousands of Chinese tourists line up daily to view his embalmed body at the mausoleum, which has also been renovated.His image graces almost all bank notes from 1 to 100 yuan, and Chinese studios crank out a steady flow of movies and television series based on highly sterilized versions of his life and the party's history.
BEIJING — China's ruling Communist Party unveiled on Wednesday a five-year plan to fight pervasive graft, with particular attention on corruption that triggers protests or happens in the course of economic reforms.President Xi Jinping has launched a sweeping crackdown on corruption since taking power, pursuing high-flying "tigers" as well as lowly "flies" in the government, military, state-owned enterprises and universities.The party's anti-graft watchdog, the Central Commission for Discipline and Inspection, said in November it would target all senior officials as part of a deeper war on graft, a problem so serious Xi has said it threatens the party's survival.The five-year plan was approved in late August but has only now been released in full, by the official Xinhua news agency.The commission said the party faced tests in governing, in reform and opening up and danger from being too distant from the people as well as the danger of corruption.The party must "deepen the struggle for party governance and clean government and fighting corruption to ensure that it always maintains the firmness of its core leadership".The lengthy statement was full of jargon but short on specific steps the party would take, only outlining areas that would get particular focus, such as protests and accidents like mine disasters which happen because of corrupt officials."Sternly probe and handle corruption incidents which are behind mass incidents and major accidents where responsibility can be laid," it said.About 90,000 "mass incidents" - a euphemism for protests - occur each year in China, of which some two-thirds are triggered by disputes over land. The government has vowed repeatedly to crack down on illegal land grabs, but to little apparent effect.Forced evictions and land requisitions are widely thought to enrich officials at the expense of residents, as the land is often sold off for huge profit to developers.The commission also said the party would pay particular attention to corruption which happens in the course of economic reforms, which include the reorganization of powerful state-owned industries."Sternly probe and handle commercial bribery and increase punishments for giving bribes," it said.Xi has not only targeted corrupt practices like bribe-taking, but also extravagance and waste, as he seeks to assuage public anger over graft in the civil service and Communist Party offices.While many of those caught up in the anti-graft sweep have been relatively junior, authorities have begun to take on more significant figures.Last week, the party announced that a deputy minister in the powerful Ministry of Public Security was being investigated for "suspected serious law and discipline violations", which normally means corruption.Xinhua said on Wednesday that he had been stripped of his posts.Still, the party has shown no sign of wanting to set up an independent body outside party control to fight corruption, which many experts say is the only way China can really deal with it.Indeed, the party has gone after activists who have pressed for officials to publicly reveal their wealth. One of the most prominent of these, Xu Zhiyong, is expect to go on trial soon.
BEIJING — China has arrested a vice president of a prestigious university for suspected corruption, state news agency Xinhua reported on Wednesday, as the government turns its anti-graft campaign to the education sector.President Xi Jinping has launched a sweeping crackdown on corruption since taking power, pursuing high-flying "tigers" as well as lowly "flies" in the government, military, state-owned enterprises, and now in universities.Xinhua said on its official microblog that Chu Jian, appointed in 2005 as vice president of Zhejiang University in the eastern city of Hangzhou, had been arrested for "suspected economic problems", a euphemism for corruption.Chu, an engineering professor, was in charge of several businesses run by the university, and also ran a technology company based in Hangzhou, according to the university's website.Reuters was unable to reach Chu for comment and the university's news office said it was unable to comment when contacted by telephone. Xinhua provided no other details of the crimes he is suspected of.Last week, An Xiaoyu, vice president of Sichuan University in the southwest, was placed under investigated for suspected serious discipline violations, another official euphemism for corruption. An was responsible for the university's infrastructure construction.Last month, authorities began investigating Cai Rongsheng, the head of admissions at Beijing's elite Renmin University, also for suspected corruption.A lack of transparency and checks on administrative power in public universities, which depend heavily on government funding, has led to widespread corruption in areas such as building projects, research funds and the admission process.Another professor at Zhejiang University went on trial in March for embezzling more than 10 million yuan ($1.65 million) of research funding by fabricating receipts and contracts. He has yet to be sentenced.China invested more than a trillion yuan in research and development last year, more than half of which came from the government. However, a survey by the China Association for Science and Technology showed that only 40 percent of research funding was spent on research projects, while the rest was wasted elsewhere, according to Xinhua.Domestic media has also pointed to corruption in the admission process, particularly in connection with a special programme whereby universities conduct their own tests to select students, rather than looking at scores from the annual national college entrance exam.Renmin University said on Tuesday that it had temporarily halted that scheme, known formally as the "autonomous enrolment programme".
SHANGHAI — China's local government debt has reached an "alarming level" and poses a significant risk to the country's fast-growing economy, according to a Chinese government think tank.Two years after analysts began raising concerns about municipal borrowing, Chinese local governments appear to have piled up even more debt, about $3.3 trillion by the end of 2012, perhaps double the level in 2010.The report, released this week by the Chinese Academy of Social Sciences, is the latest indication that China may be investing too aggressively in property and infrastructure projects, potentially setting the stage for a wave of loan defaults and a severe economic downturn.While many economists expect China's economy to grow 7 percent in 2014, there are mounting concerns about the sustainability of the country's economic engine.In Beijing, the authorities are pushing to restructure the economy to make it more market oriented, in the hopes of tackling inefficiencies and potentially huge hidden liabilities.In recent years, China's growth has been fueled by heavy investment in infrastructure, everything from new highways and railways to ports, subways and shopping malls.Growth weakened at the outset of the global financial crisis. But in 2009, Beijing backed a huge economic stimulus program that accelerated growth and pushed up property prices.Now, analysts say the investment binge may have been excessive."What bothers me is not the current level of debt but the pace of the increase," says Shen Minggao, a Hong Kong based economist at Citigroup Global Markets. "But if the pace of growth is slowed or capped, that will have a direct impact on infrastructure growth."Infrastructure spending, Mr Shen says, has been one of the crucial pillars of China's growth engine over the last decade. If investment slows, it could be difficult and painful.Earlier this year, the authorities in Beijing indicated that managing the risks of local government debt would be a high priority in the coming years. Some officials proposed Holding local authorities more accountable for excessive debt build up; other bureaucrats hinted the central government may be forced to step in and help bail out some localities.One of the unknowns is how much debt exists. There have been a wide range of figures tallied, though all of them suggest trillions of dollars of debt just on the part of local governments.Analysts say much of the debt is masked by "shadow banking" activities. Such activities allow large amounts of lending to take place off the books, through trust companies and so-called local government financing vehicles.
HONG KONG — China's central bank injected fresh money into the markets on Tuesday, easing the pressure on the financial system and quelling fears about a credit crisis.In response, interest rates in China's money markets, a crucial source of day-to-day funding for banks, quickly dropped. Rates had surged over the past week, climbing to six-month highs.The volatility highlights the challenges the government faces as it looks to overhaul the financial system.A plenum meeting of the top Communist Party leadership concluded last month with pledges to deliver on broad new policy mandates that would give the market a larger role in setting the speed and direction of China's economic development.In part, that means reining in the country's sprawling state-owned enterprises, which for the past decade have grown increasingly reliant on cheap and plentiful credit to fund their expansion. At the same time, the government needs to ensure that China's private companies, which typically struggle to get loans from state-owned banks, can gain access to the money they need to continue growing and creating more jobs.The goal for the central bank, the People's Bank of China, which is widely regarded as one of the institutions at the forefront of the country's effort to liberalize the economy, is to experiment where it can with looser rates.China's ceiling on savings deposit rates, for example, remains in place. This helps ensure that commercial banks do not erode their profitability by raising rates in competition for deposits and that they retain an ample supply of cheap money to lend to state-owned enterprises.China's money markets, by contrast, do not have the same direct impact on ordinary savers. Instead, it is banks in need of short-term funding — or those engaging in the so-called shadow banking activities of risky, off-balance-sheet financing — that are most vulnerable to swings in money-market interest rates."The interest rate environment is kind of a means to an end," said Arthur Kroeber, the Beijing-based managing director of GaveKal Dragonomics, an economic research firm. "Broadly speaking, the central bank would like to see rates somewhat higher than they were previously as a way of slowing the rate of growth of credit and also redirecting it from the state to the nonstate sector."One worry is that cheap financing has fueled an aggressive infrastructure expansion, potentially setting the stage for a wave of loan defaults and a severe economic downturn.A recent report by a Chinese government research group found that China's local government debt had reached an "alarming level" and posed a significant risk to the country's fast-growing economy. Two years after analysts began raising concerns about municipal borrowing, Chinese local governments appear to have piled up even more debt, about $3.3 trillion by the end of 2012, perhaps double the level in 2010.But it is unclear just how much debt exists. Analysts say much of the debt is masked by the shadow banking activities.To help keep those activities in check, the country's central bank in recent weeks has started experimenting with unconventional measures to manage interest rates. In early December, the People's Bank of China stopped using its regularly scheduled open-market operations, the buying and selling of money-market instruments.As rates started to rise, China instead provided more than 300 billion renminbi in short-term liquidity to selected, unnamed banks. It then started announcing the efforts via posts on the social messaging service Sina Weibo, which is similar to Twitter.But the central bank backed down after rates continued to surge. The People's Bank of China sold 29 billion renminbi, or $4.8 billion, worth of seven-day reverse repurchase agreements, the official China Securities Journal and other Chinese financial news outlets reported on Tuesday. The cash injection was the first time since Dec. 3 that the central bank had proceeded with its regularly scheduled open-market operations.
BEIJING — China celebrates the 120th birthday of Mao Zedong, the founder of modern China, on Thursday, but will be scaling back festivities as President Xi Jinping embarks on broad economic reforms which have unsettled leftists.Mao has become a potent symbol for leftists within the ruling Communist Party who feel that three decades of market-based reform have gone too far, creating social inequalities like a yawning rich-poor gap and pervasive corruption.In venerating Mao, they sometimes seek to put pressure on the current leadership and its market-oriented policies while managing to avoid expressing open dissent.While members of the party's elite inner core, the Politburo Standing Committee, are likely to attend a high-profile event in Beijing to mark the anniversary, activities nationwide have been toned down, two sources with ties to the leadership told Reuters."The level will be high, but the number of events will be scaled back," one of the sources said, speaking on condition of anonymity to avoid repercussions for talking to a foreign reporter without permission."The attendance of Standing Committee members is to placate leftists after reforms at the third plenum," the source added.China last month unwrapped its boldest set of economic and social reforms in nearly three decades, relaxing its one-child policy and further freeing up markets in order to put the world's second-largest economy on a more stable footing.Still, Xi and his team gave themselves until 2020 to achieve "decisive" results - a tacit acknowledgement of the difficulty of the task when the state-run sector championed during Mao's heyday remains strong and when many are unhappy with growing social problems bought by the party's economic reforms."The celebrations have to be grand or people will not be happy," said another source, who has ties to the party's traditional leftists.His image adorns banknotes and his embalmed body attracts hundreds if not thousands of visitors a day to Beijing.While the party has acknowledged he made mistakes, there has yet to be an official accounting for the chaos of the 1966-76 Cultural Revolution or the millions of deaths from starvation during the 1958-61 Great Leap Forward.Xi suffered personally during the Cultural Revolution when his father was imprisoned. Xi was sent down to the countryside to live with peasants, like millions of other urban Chinese youth.While visiting Hunan, the southern province where Mao was born, in early November, Xi said the celebrations for the anniversary should be "solemn, simple and pragmatic", according to state media.That did not stop Xi from lauding Maoism in several speeches this year, as he sought to appeal to leftists in the wake of a scandal involving Bo Xilai, a former contender for top leadership who pushed an egalitarian, quasi-Maoist agenda until he was felled and jailed for corruption."In the end, probably no side will be very satisfied," said Zhang Lifan, a Beijing-based political commentator and historian, referring to how China will mark the birthday."The reformers don't think Mao should be commemorated, because he committed crimes, but his supporters think the commemorations aren't enough."Chinese newspapers have reported that several events originally planned for Thursday have been adjusted or changed completely, including a concert which was supposed to celebrate Mao but which has been relabeled a new year gala."The authorities don't want the commemorations for Mao to be high-profile," influential tabloid the Global Times, published by the party's official People's Daily, quoted Wang Zhanyang, director of the Political Science Department at the Central Institute of Socialism, as saying."Some regional conservative people and officials with vested interests want to restrain reform by falsely promoting some of Mao's most conservative thoughts, which is not what the party follows," Wang added.Still, the message appears not to have totally seeped through to Hunan, where many still venerate Mao as a demigod.The town of Shaoshan, where Mao was born on December 26, 1893, has spent about 2 billion yuan ($329 million) on 12 projects for the anniversary celebration, the official Xiangtan Daily reported.
BEIJING — Chinese newspapers blasted Japanese Prime Minister Shinzo Abe on Friday, describing his visit to Yasukuni Shrine as "paying homage to devils" and warning that China has the ability to crush "provocative militarism".Abe visited Yasukuni on Thursday, a shrine where Japanese leaders convicted as war criminals by an Allied tribunal after World War Two are honored along with those who died in battle. The move has infuriated China and South Korea, both of which were occupied by Japanese forces until the end of the war, and prompted concern from the United States about deteriorating ties between the North Asian neighbors.In an editorial headlined "Abe's paying homage to the devils makes people outraged", the military's People's Liberation Army Daily said Abe's actions have "seriously undermined the stability of the region"."On one hand, Abe is paying homage to war criminals, and on the other hand, he talks about improving relations with China, South Korea and other countries," the newspaper said. "It is simply a sham, a mouthful of lies."Today, the Chinese people have the ability to defend peace and they have a greater ability to stop all provocative militarism."In a separate commentary published under the pen name "Zhong Sheng", or "voice of China", the Communist Party's People's Daily said: "History tells us that if people do not correctly understand the evils of the fascist war, cannot reflect on war crimes, a country can never (achieve) true rejuvenation."The Global Times, an influential nationalistic tabloid owned by the People's Daily, urged China to shut its door to Abe and other Japanese officials who have visited the shrine this year."If condemnations are China's only recourse, then the nation is giving up its international political rights easily," the newspaper said. "Ineffective countermeasures will make China be seen as a 'paper tiger' in the eyes of the rest of the world."In the eyes of China, Abe, behaving like a political villain, is much like the terrorists and fascists on the commonly seen blacklists."A survey on China's Twitter-like Sina Weibo microblogging site on Thursday showed that almost 70 percent of respondents would support a boycott of Japanese goods, with many users expressing outrage at the shrine visit. The survey was later removed.However, the topic was not one of the most talked about on Weibo, with people being more distracted by the latest celebrity gossip and the upcoming new year.
BEIJING — China's Foreign Minister warned Japan's ambassador to China on Thursday that Japan must bear the "full responsibility for the serious political consequences" of Japanese Prime Minister Shinzo Abe's decision to visit Tokyo's Yasukuni Shrine for the war dead.Wang Yi, in comments carried on China's foreign ministry's website, said Abe's action has pushed Japan in an "extremely dangerous" direction.The conservative Abe, who took office for a second time a year ago, had said he regretted not visiting the shrine - where Japanese wartime leaders are honored along with war dead and which is seen in parts of Asia as a symbol of Japanese militarism - during his first 2006-2007 term.
BEIJING — China will send its special envoy for Africa to South Sudan to help push talks, China's foreign minister was quoted as saying on Thursday, as the world's newest country spirals into violence.The envoy will head to South Sudan "soon" to communicate with all parties, Foreign Minister Wang Yi said during a visit to Saudi Arabia on Wednesday, in comments carried on the Foreign Ministry's website.Wang did not name the envoy, but he was likely referring to Zhong Jianhua, an urbane veteran diplomat who has deep experience of the conflict in South Sudan.The announcement came a day after China called for all sides in the South Sudan conflict to stop fighting.The conflict has killed hundreds and some 45,000 civilians are seeking protection at U.N. bases. Violence erupted in the capital, Juba, on December 15 and quickly spread, dividing the land-locked country of 10.8 million people along ethnic lines."China is highly concerned about the evolving situation in South Sudan," Wang said.It is already the biggest investor in oilfields in South Sudan, through state-owned Chinese oil giants China National Petroleum Corp (CNPC) and Sinopec. Beijing is also one of Sudanese President Omar Hassan al-Bashir's major supporters.The fighting has also affected oil production, which accounts for 98 percent of government revenue in South Sudan. It has forced CNPC to evacuate some of its workers.
BEIJING — Chinese Foreign Minister Wang Yi summoned the Japanese ambassador on Thursday to lodge "strong opposition" to the visit of Japan's prime minister to Tokyo's Yasukuni Shrine for war dead.The announcement was carried by China's official Xinhua news agency.
BEIJING — The widow of late Chinese Communist Party chief Zhao Ziyang, toppled for opposing the 1989 crackdown on democracy protesters in Tiananmen Square, died this week, the family said, leaving a question over what will happen to his unburied remains.Liang Boqi died peacefully in a Beijing hospital late on Wednesday aged 95, the family said in a statement on Thursday.Her husband died under house arrest at age 85 in 2005. His remains were cremated and put in an urn which was still kept at the family's traditional courtyard house as no final resting place had been found, a source close to the family told Reuters.It was now unclear what would happen to those remains, or what would happen to the children who still live in the house in central Beijing, which is provided by the government, the source added, speaking on condition of anonymity due to the sensitivity of the situation.Normally when a senior leader dies, his widow can continue to stay in the government provided home but when the widow dies, the children are usually forced to move out.The cabinet spokesman's office, which doubles as the party's public affairs office, did not respond to a request for comment.Top leaders' remains are normally interred at the Baobashan cemetery in western Beijing, but Zhao was not given that honor as the party wanted him forgotten and offered a resting place in an obscure location. The family turned that offer down as it would have been inaccessible to the public.The party, which values stability above all else, has remained nervous about Zhao's residual influence and has tried to erase him from public memory, blanking out his role in economic reforms that turned China from a economic backwater into a powerhouse.Zhao never recanted in his opposition to the 1989 crackdown.The government has resisted repeated calls from activists and dissidents to change its verdict that the Tiananmen protests were a "counter-revolutionary rebellion" and hold inquiries into what happened.
BEIJING — China is to more than triple the amount of compensation that some parents get if their only child dies, the health and family planning agency said on Thursday, in the latest sign of a more lenient stand on an uncompromising population policy.China's childless parents are emblematic of the problems of the tough one-child policy, which the government says has resulted in 400 million fewer births since 1980.A loosening of the one-child policy, which will allow more parents to have a second child, will begin early next year.Traditionally, Chinese people rely on children to support them in old age so when a sole child dies, elderly parents can find themselves in dire circumstances. China has little in the way of welfare or health insurance systems.From next year, couples in cities who have lost their only child and in which the woman is 49 or older will get 340 yuan ($56) per parent a month, the National Health and Family Planning Commission said in a statement.Previously, urban couples got 100 yuan a month per parent, under rules set in 2010.Couples in rural areas will get 170 yuan per parent a month.In May, about 400 people who had lost an only child gathered in Beijing to appeal in front of the National Health and Family Planning Commission's headquarters, according to the state-run China Daily newspaper.Wang Hailong, a senior official from the National Health and Family Planning Commission who met the protesters, said then he would resign if the issue was not addressed before the end of the year.
BEIJING — The widow of a former Chinese Communist Party chief ousted after the 1989 Tiananmen Square pro-democracy protests has died at age 95, family friends said Thursday.Zhao Ziyang's family told relatives and friends in a text message that Liang Boqi died peacefully at Beijing Hospital on Wednesday night. The cause of death was not disclosed.Zhao helped promote reforms that launched China's economic boom but was purged after he called for compromise and expressed sympathy for some of the students' demands during the 1989 protests.He was accused of splitting the party and placed under house arrest after the military crushed the protests. Liang, who married Zhao in the 1940s, accompanied Zhao in his 16 years of house arrest until he died in 2005 at age 85.Chinese scholar and family friend Wu Jiaxiang said he was among those who received the text message. Hong Kong-based book publisher Bao Pu, one of the editors of Zhao's secretly compiled posthumous memoir "Prisoner of the State," also confirmed that he had received a notice announcing Liang's death from at least two relatives of Zhao.Bao Tong, Zhao's former secretary, said Liang had been in poor health in her final years and dependent on her caregivers.State media did not carry Liang's death notice on Thursday, but the news was circulating in China's social media, where people lit virtual candles to express condolences and reflected on Zhao's political and economic contributions. But the expressions were mostly brief and simple, as openly commemorating Zhao remains a political taboo."It is a huge regret that she did not live to see the day that Zhao's reputation is restored," the scholar, Wu, said. "She didn't get to wait for that day to come."
BEIJING — China celebrated the 120th birthday of Mao Zedong, the founder of modern China, on Thursday, but with scaled-back festivities as President Xi Jinping embarks on broad economic reforms that have unsettled leftists.Mao has become a potent symbol for leftists within the ruling Communist Party who feel that three decades of market-based reform have gone too far, creating social inequalities like a yawning rich-poor gap and pervasive corruption.In venerating Mao, they sometimes seek to put pressure on the current leadership and its market-oriented policies while managing to avoid expressing open dissent.While all seven members of the party's elite inner core, the Politburo Standing Committee, visited Mao's mausoleum on Tiananmen Square, other activities nationwide were toned down.The state-run Xinhua news agency said that the leaders, including Xi, bowed three times in front of a statue of Mao and payed their respects to his embalmed body, "recalling Comrade Mao Zedong's great achievements."Xi said Mao was a great person who stuck to his beliefs and won the love and respect of the people but who also made "serious mistakes" like the 1966-76 Cultural Revolution, Xinhua reported.Still, Xi said Mao's errors should not negate his achievements, echoing previous comments Xi has made in seeking to assuage leftist concern about his agenda and beliefs."Comrade Mao Zedong's mistakes in his later years have their subjective factors ... but because of complicated social and historical reasons both at home and abroad they should be viewed and analyzed comprehensively (and) historically," Xi said.A source with ties to the leadership said that a high profile activity to mark the occasion was necessary even as the party moved to scale back the number of events."The attendance of Standing Committee members is to placate leftists after reforms at the third plenum," said the source, who spoke on condition of anonymity to avoid repercussions for talking to a foreign reporter without permission.China last month unwrapped its boldest set of economic and social reforms in nearly three decades, relaxing its one-child policy and further freeing up markets to put the world's second-largest economy on a more stable footing.Still, Xi and his team gave themselves until 2020 to achieve "decisive" results - a tacit acknowledgement of the difficulty of the task when the state-run sector championed during Mao's heyday remains strong and when many are unhappy with growing social problems brought by the party's economic reforms."The celebrations have to be grand or people will not be happy," said another source, who has ties to the party's traditional leftists.His image adorns banknotes and his embalmed body attracts hundreds, if not thousands, of visitors a day to Beijing.While the party has acknowledged he made mistakes, there has yet to be an official accounting for the chaos of the Cultural Revolution or the millions of deaths from starvation during the 1958-61 Great Leap Forward.Xi suffered personally during the Cultural Revolution when his father was jailed. Xi was sent to the countryside to live with peasants, like millions of other young urban Chinese.While visiting Hunan, the southern province where Mao was born, in early November, Xi said the celebrations for the anniversary should be "solemn, simple and pragmatic," according to state media.That did not stop Xi from lauding Maoism in several speeches this year, as he sought to appeal to leftists in the wake of a scandal involving Bo Xilai, a former contender for top leadership who pushed an egalitarian, quasi-Maoist agenda until he was felled and jailed for corruption."In the end, probably no side will be very satisfied," Zhang Lifan, a Beijing-based political commentator and historian said, referring to how China will mark the birthday."The reformers don't think Mao should be commemorated, because he committed crimes, but his supporters think the commemorations aren't enough."Chinese newspapers have reported that several events originally planned for Thursday have been adjusted or changed completely, including a concert that was supposed to celebrate Mao but which has been relabeled a new year gala."The authorities don't want the commemorations for Mao to be high-profile," influential tabloid the Global Times, published by the party's official People's Daily, quoted Wang Zhanyang, director of the Political Science Department at the Central Institute of Socialism, as saying."Some regional conservative people and officials with vested interests want to restrain reform by falsely promoting some of Mao's most conservative thoughts, which is not what the party follows," Wang added.Still, the message appears not to have totally seeped through to Hunan, where many still venerate Mao as a demigod.The town of Shaoshan, where Mao was born on December 26, 1893, has spent about 2 billion yuan ($329 million) on 12 projects for the anniversary celebration, the official Xiangtan Daily reported.
The Knicks' problems may have begun when Carmelo Anthony arrived for pregame warm-ups Wednesday wearing a brown blazer and grabbed a seat on the bench.But based on two months of evidence, the team was in big trouble even before it disclosed that Anthony would miss the game, against the Oklahoma City Thunder, with a sprained left ankle.With Anthony's activity limited to a series of facial expressions that ranged from morose to anguished, the Thunder rode Kevin Durant's brilliance to a 123-94 victory at Madison Square Garden, where the Christmas Day crowd — and a national television audience — was treated to ugly uniforms, flimsy defense and another loss."There's a lot of holes," Knicks center Tyson Chandler said. "If I started going over them all, I wouldn't make it home. I want my kids to open their gifts. So I'll just stick with: We've got a lot of holes."Durant finished with 29 points for the Thunder (23-5), who shot 53.6 percent from the field and maintained a plush lead throughout the second half. That Russell Westbrook, who finished with 14 points, 13 rebounds and 10 assists, had a triple-double by the end of the third quarter was almost an afterthought.The Knicks, on the other hand, hoisted a handful of jumpers that glanced off the side of the backboard. In the absence of Anthony and Raymond Felton, who did not play because of an injured groin muscle, J. R. Smith tried to fill the void by launching 22 shots. He missed 14 of them.Coach Mike Woodson started his postgame news conference by saying, "Again." It has become a verbal tic for him this season, albeit for good reason. Again, the Knicks (9-19) could not sustain any sort of effort. Again, the Knicks failed to move the ball. Again, the Knicks were eviscerated at home."I don't think we even established anything from a defensive standpoint," Woodson said.Early in the third quarter, with the game in danger of ballooning into a blowout, Smith missed a layup, and Durant promptly knocked down a 3-pointer. The Thunder's lead swelled to 25 early in the fourth with Durant and Westbrook on the bench. Neither returned to the game. It was a luxury against an inferior opponent.The Knicks' loss was the worst by a home team on Christmas Day, according to the Elias Sports Bureau, and late in the game, the Garden crowd booed the players (namely Smith) and chanted for team officials (namely Woodson) to be fired."Yeah, I hear them," Smith said. "They're just fans. When we lose, they're going to boo. When we win, they're going to cheer. That's just how the game goes."Anthony and Felton sustained their injuries in the second half of Monday's win over Orlando, and while Anthony's status against the Thunder was considered a game-time decision — he told the team's medical staff that he "couldn't go," Woodson said — Felton could be out much longer. Groin injuries tend to be problematic, and Felton has already dealt with hamstring and hip injuries this season, his 29-year-old body rusting like a muffler.Anthony and Felton were not made available to the news media. Woodson declined to offer a timetable for either player's return.The two were at least spared the indignity of having to wear the Knicks' short-sleeved jerseys in the latest N.B.A. marketing move. The team also remained winless in seven games this season while wearing the color orange, although Durant and Westbrook had far more to do with the loss than the Knicks' wardrobe. For long stretches, the arena sounded like a morgue. "It felt like no one was in here," Durant said.Woodson turned to Beno Udrih to start at point guard and had Toure Murry, one season removed from the N.B.A.'s Development League, back him up. It was only a coincidence that Stephon Marbury was sitting four rows behind the Knicks' bench. Marbury, now playing in China, spent parts of five seasons with the Knicks, most recently in 2007-8, before the team bought out his contract as he feuded with Mike D'Antoni, the coach at the time.On Wednesday, Marbury sat with family members and chatted with security guards. Perhaps the Knicks could have used him.Amar'e Stoudemire finished with 22 points. It was the first time this season that someone other than Anthony had led the team in scoring. Chris Smith, whose signing before the season drew some accusations of nepotism because he is J. R. Smith's brother, made his N.B.A. debut with 1 minute 21 seconds left in the fourth quarter. The Knicks were trailing by 26.With Anthony sidelined, it was assumed that J. R. Smith would feel even more liberated to shoot with gluttonous frequency. Then again, Woodson has seldom needed to encourage that type of behavior from Smith, and he sank an early 3-pointer as the Knicks sought to match the Thunder's pace.They were not successful. The Thunder shot 70 percent in the first quarter. After the Knicks put three men on Durant in the post on one possession, Durant got the message and drifted to the perimeter, where he hit jumper after jumper. Smith drew the defensive assignment, and Durant simply extended his arms and shot over him. And when Durant was double-teamed (or triple-teamed), he often found Serge Ibaka, who finished with 24 points."Our rotations aren't there," Chandler said. "And that's all right when you're giving it your all. But the worst thing you can do is compound that by hanging your head and not believing in yourself."The Thunder had no such problems, playing with energy and confidence, the outcome never in doubt. Westbrook even picked up a mop to clean the court during a late timeout. The Knicks, though, were the real mess.
SHANGHAI — Health authorities in China are investigating one of the nation's biggest vaccine makers after eight infants died in the past two months following injections that were meant to immunize them against hepatitis B.The government said this week that it had suspended the use of millions of doses of a hepatitis B vaccine produced by the manufacturer, Shenzhen Kangtai Biological Products. Government inspectors have been sent to examine the company's facilities.Six of the deaths have been linked to vaccines produced by Shenzhen Kangtai; the two other infant deaths occurred recently after the use of a hepatitis B vaccine produced by another drug maker, Beijing Tiantan Biological Products. The government did not say whether any action had been taken against Beijing Tiantan or its vaccines. Investigators have not determined the cause of the deaths or linked them directly to the injections, but the cases come at a time of growing public concern in China about food and drug safety problems.In recent years, China has been troubled by a series of scandals, including tainted rice and milk and the mysterious appearance of thousands of dead pigs floating in the Huangpu River in Shanghai. China has vowed repeatedly to crack down on food and drug safety violations and has moved to strengthen the powers of health officials.In the vaccine cases, the government is focusing on the role of Shenzhen Kangtai, a privately run drug maker formed in 1992 with government support and the cooperation of the American pharmaceutical company Merck.Merck helped the company build its drug-manufacturing facility in the city of Shenzhen in the 1990s, and it gave the company the biological technology to produce a hepatitis B vaccine royalty free as part of an unusual joint venture aimed at improving health standards in China. At the time, up to two million Chinese children were being infected annually with hepatitis B.Since then, China has made great strides in early vaccinations under a national program subsidized by the government. And Shenzhen Kangtai has become the country's biggest producer of hepatitis B vaccines, with a 60 percent market share, according to China's state-run news media. The company has also announced plans to build a $140 million research and development and drug manufacturing center in Shenzhen.A representative for Shenzhen Kangtai could not be reached Wednesday, although the company denied last week that its vaccines were at fault in the recent infant deaths.Although the authorities have banned the use of Shenzhen Kangtai's hepatitis B vaccines at medical facilities, health experts say there are enough vaccines produced by five other Chinese drug makers to meet the demands of the national immunization program. In China, most hepatitis B vaccines are provided free to newborns.Hepatitis B, which attacks the liver and can lead to death, is the most virulent form of hepatitis, according to the World Health Organization. Chronic forms of hepatitis affect about 500 million people a year worldwide.
BEIJING — In a step toward rule of law, China's national legislature on Saturday voted to abolish a much-criticized penal system that allowed police to lock up people for up to four years without due process.The standing committee of the National People's Congress adopted a resolution to abolish the re-education labor system, formalizing a November decision by the ruling Chinese Communist Party, according to the official Xinhua News Agency and the state-run China Central Television.State media said all those serving time in the labor camps would be set free starting Saturday, but that the penalties handed out before the abolition would still be considered legitimate, a provision aimed at preventing the victims from suing the state and seeking redress.Established to punish early critics of the Communist Party, the penal system was retooled to focus on petty criminals. In recent years, however, it had been used by local officials to deal with people challenging their authority on issues including land rights and corruption."It has become a tool of revenge and retaliation," Wang Gongyi, a former director of a research institute under the Chinese Ministry of Justice, said earlier this year.The country's senior leadership signaled its intention to end the system in January, and labor camps throughout China stopped admitting people since March, legislative official Lei Jianbin told CCTV on Saturday.Chinese officials, however, remained coy about their plans to dismantle the penal system until November, when the party announced that it would abolish the camps.
BEIJING — A natural gas explosion at a shopping mall in southwestern China killed four people and injured 35 others, local authorities said Friday.Three floors of the Moerma shopping center in the city of Luzhou in Sichuan province were engulfed in fire after the explosion late Thursday night, the local government said in an online statement.The local work safety agency said four people died and 35 were injured — six of whom were in serious condition.Local news reports said a gas leak was reported and that about 200 people inside the mall were evacuated before the explosion shook the building.A moviegoer, identified by the family name of Xiao, told the local newspaper that he had initially mistaken the tremor as special effects. "Then, we saw dust falling inside the theater and thought it was an earthquake," Xiao said.By morning, local authorities had cordoned off the area and urged residents not to gather to look at the scorched structure. News photos showed shattered glasses and blackened wall panels.Local authorities said the cause of the explosion was under investigation.Workplace safety is a major problem in China, where safety regulations are often ignored.
BEIJING — Chinese officials going on business overseas will no longer be able to charter planes or fly in private or corporate jets, guidelines announced on Friday said, part of a broad government crackdown on corruption and waste.The rules also require strict limits on the number of people sent on trips and the number of days spent abroad. Provincial-level officials are permitted to stay in regular hotel suites, while bureau-level officials are allowed to stay in standard rooms."Without exception, any excuse or method for exchanging gifts or souvenirs is not allowed," a statement on the Finance Ministry's website said."It is strictly forbidden to accept, or covertly accept, subsidies from industry units, and strictly forbidden to shift or allot travel expenses to organizations abroad, subsidiary units or companies."Chinese newspaper frequently report on cases of government officials making spurious trips abroad on the public purse, ostensibly for work when in reality they are going on holiday or engaging in shopping sprees.Since taking over the reins of the Communist Party in November 2012 and the government in March, President Xi Jinping has vowed to crack down on corruption, which he has said threatens the party's survival.The government has gone after everything from bribery to gift giving and lavish banquets as it seeks to assuage public anger at widespread graft and the extravagant behavior of some officials.
HONG KONG — Chinese travel far and wide to join their families for the Lunar New Year holiday, but for 60-year-old Xie, whose only child died seven years ago, China's biggest holiday is a reminder that she faces old age with little in the way of financial support.Her daughter, Juanjuan, was 29 when she died, leaving her parents in the ranks of China's more than a million "shidu" families, or those who have lost their only child, in a country where parents have traditionally relied on their children to look after them in old age."We Chinese always consider the child as the most important thing. If the child is gone, the whole family breaks down," said Xie, a retired senior technician living in southeastern Jiangxi province, who declined to give her full name to protect her family's privacy.Many shidu parents are victims of China's strict family planning policy, which since the late 1970s has restricted most families to one child, and have stepped up calls for compensation.China says the policy has averted 400 million births, preventing the population from spiraling out of control. But now it plans to ease the restrictions, fearing that they are undermining economic growth and contributing to a rapidly ageing population the country has no hope of supporting financially.On Thursday, the National Health and Family Planning Commission announced an increase in compensation for shidu couples - although it failed to raise much cheer ahead of the Lunar New Year holiday, or Spring Festival, at the end of January.TOO LITTLE, TOO LATECouples in which the woman is 49 or older will get 340 yuan ($56) per person each month if they live in a city and 170 yuan if they live in the countryside from next year. Shidu parents had demanded 3,150 yuan per person each month.Couples are currently entitled to 135 yuan a month, based on rules set in 2012, although some provinces give significantly more, in some cases up to 1,000 yuan.The compensation falls far short of expectations in a country where there is little in the way of welfare or health benefits. And some shidu couples have further needs."We want to live in an old people's home with other people like us," said 50-year-old Shi Hui, whose only son died in January last year of cancer. "We don't want to live in an ordinary old people's home. When other people's children come to visit... we wouldn't be able to take that."More and more shidu parents have travelled to Beijing in a bid to have their voices heard. In May, about 400 people staged a sit-in outside the National Health and Family Planning Commission's headquarters.One of their strongest arguments is that the compensation on offer pales in contrast to the huge fines paid by parents who break the one-child rule, proceeds of which amounted to 20 billion yuan ($3.3 billion) from 24 provinces in 2012.Xie did not think of having a second child when she was young because that would have meant she and her husband, who both worked at state factories, would have lost their jobs."At the time, the slogan went that 'birth control is good, the state will look after the old'. I hope the government shall do what it says," Xie said."My biggest fear is that some day I might die at home and no one will know."Shidu couples believe their case is different to other disadvantaged groups as theirs is a direct result of national policy."All I want is for someone to call and visit us when we fall ill," said 53-year-old Xu from northeastern Liaoning province. "What we want is not assistance or charity, but the government to be responsible."
BEIJING — General Motors Co. and its main Chinese partner will recall almost 1.5 million cars to replace a bracket that secures a fuel pump, China's product quality agency said Friday.The agency said the recall affects 1.2 million Buick Excelles made from 2006 through part of 2012 and 250,000 Chevrolet Sails produced between April 2009 and October 2011 and some made last year.The bracket to be replaced might crack and in extreme cases cause a fuel leak, the Administration for Quality Supervision, Inspection and Quarantine said in a statement.The recall is GM's second this year in China. In May, the government announced a recall of 2,653 imported Cadillac SRX sport utility vehicles to adjust nuts on wheels that said might loosen due to torque.
BEIJING — A city in southern China has dismissed most members of its legislature after they were found to have taken millions of dollars in bribes in a massive election fraud, a Communist Party-run newspaper reported Saturday.The scandal implicated 518 lawmakers in the city of Hengyang's 529-member legislature, said the Hunan Daily, a newspaper run by the Hunan provincial Communist Party committee.The Hengyang People's Congress had convened earlier this year to pick 76 delegates to represent the city in the provincial people's congress in accordance with Chinese election law.Provincial authorities began to receive complaints of vote buying in February and a special team was set up to investigate the allegations, the Hunan Daily said.It said that after 518 Hengyang lawmakers and 68 staff members were found to have accepted bribes, 512 lawmakers were dismissed. The other six had already quit. The city also dismissed three other lawmakers who did not take money but were severely negligent with work duties, the report said.Provincial authorities disqualified 56 delegates from Hengyang who were found to have paid more than $18 million in bribes to gain entry to the provincial body.People's congresses at all levels of China are essentially rubber-stamping bodies that sanction decisions by the ruling Communist Party, but a seat on any people's congress is still highly coveted, because it provides status, networking opportunities and closeness to power.Candidates are always carefully vetted, but efforts to improve democracy have required the number of candidates to exceed the number of seats to be filled. In the case of Hengyang, the municipal body was to pick 76 delegates out of a panel of 93 candidates.The competition, coupled with a ban on canvassing, has bred an underground market of vote buying, but the public revelation of the pervasive fraud as seen in Hengyang is rare.
BEIJING — More than 500 lawmakers in a Chinese city have resigned after being implicated in a bribery scandal, while another 56 provincial legislators have been sacked, state media said on Saturday, as the government steps up its war on graft.The official Xinhua news agency said the 512 lawmakers in Hengyang city in the poor, landlocked southern province of Hunan resigned after they took bribes from 56 members of the provincial assembly.The total amount of the bribes was more than 110 million yuan ($18.1 million) and the money was used to swing the results of elections, Xinhua said, citing a Hunan government statement.China does not have fully democratic one-man, one-vote elections but has experimented with a selection process at the grassroots for local legislatures, even if most candidates are Communist Party members and there is rarely more than a single candidate for each position available."The number of people involved in the Hengyang election case are many, the amount of money large, the substance serious, the effect pernicious; this is a serious challenge to our People's Congresses system," Xinhua said."It must be seriously dealt with in accordance with the law."Provinces, cities, counties and other administrative districts all have their own People's Congresses, and they all generally act as a rubber stamp for party decisions rather than providing a forum for debate or making policies.The competition, though limited, to become lawmakers in some places has opened the door to corruption, as membership of such bodies brings opportunities to influence decisions about things such as business contracts and promotions.Xinhua said that those found to have broken the law in this bribery scandal would be handed over to judicial authorities for prosecution.President Xi Jinping has launched a sweeping crackdown on corruption since taking power, pursuing high-flying "tigers" as well as lowly "flies", warning the problem is so severe it could threaten the party's survival.Still, the party has shown no sign of wanting to set up an independent body outside party control to fight corruption, which many experts say is the only way China can really deal with it.Indeed, the party has gone after activists who have pressed for officials to publicly reveal their wealth. One of the most prominent of these, Xu Zhiyong, is expect to go on trial soon.
BEIJING — More than 500 lawmakers in a Chinese city have resigned after being implicated in a bribery scandal, while another 56 provincial legislators have been sacked, state media said on Saturday, as the government steps up its war on graft.The official Xinhua news agency said the 512 lawmakers in Hengyang city in the poor, landlocked southern province of Hunan resigned after they took bribes from 56 members of the provincial assembly.The total amount of the bribes was more than 110 million yuan ($18.1 million) and the money was used to swing the results of elections, Xinhua said, citing a Hunan government statement.China does not have fully democratic one-man, one-vote elections but has experimented with a selection process at the grassroots for local legislatures, even if most candidates are Communist Party members and there is rarely more than a single candidate for each position available."The number of people involved in the Hengyang election case are many, the amount of money large, the substance serious, the effect pernicious; this is a serious challenge to our People's Congresses system," Xinhua said."It must be seriously dealt with in accordance with the law."Provinces, cities, counties and other administrative districts all have their own People's Congresses, and they all generally act as a rubber stamp for party decisions rather than providing a forum for debate or making policies.The competition, though limited, to become lawmakers in some places has opened the door to corruption, as membership of such bodies brings opportunities to influence decisions about things such as business contracts and promotions.Xinhua said that those found to have broken the law in this bribery scandal would be handed over to judicial authorities for prosecution.President Xi Jinping has launched a sweeping crackdown on corruption since taking power, pursuing high-flying "tigers" as well as lowly "flies", warning the problem is so severe it could threaten the party's survival.Still, the party has shown no sign of wanting to set up an independent body outside party control to fight corruption, which many experts say is the only way China can really deal with it.Indeed, the party has gone after activists who have pressed for officials to publicly reveal their wealth. One of the most prominent of these, Xu Zhiyong, is expect to go on trial soon.
BEIJING — Chinese President Xi Jinping dropped in unexpectedly at a traditional Beijing bun shop, where he queued up, ordered and paid for a simple lunch of buns stuffed with pork and onions, green vegetables, and stewed pig livers and intestines.Such visits are extremely rare — if not unheard of — for top Chinese leaders, who are usually surrounded by heavy security and are not known for mingling with the public other than at scheduled events.After spotting Xi on Saturday, fellow diners took photos of the president and shared them on China's social media. State media reposted the photos on their microblog accounts, and the official Xinhua News Agency reported about Xi's lunch on its Chinese-language news site."Had it not been for the photos, it would be incredulous to believe Xi, as a dignified president and party chief, should eat at a bun shop," author Wu Xiqi wrote in an editorial carried by the ruling Communist Party's official news site. "Xi's act has subverted the traditional image of Chinese officials, ushering a warm, people-first gust of wind that is very touching indeed."On Sunday, the store welcomed long lines of Chinese, some posing for photos in the room where Xi was and others wanting to order what he had bought. A group from southern Guangdong province who were visiting Beijing had gone to have a look after hearing about Xi's visit online.The manager of the Qing-Feng Steamed Dumpling Shop, who gave only her family name, He, said that Xi and a small entourage arrived at the no-frills eatery in western Beijing at around noon Saturday without prior notification. She said that Xi paid 21 yuan ($3.40) for his lunch."There was no special security measure during his stay," the manager said. "Customers could freely enter and leave the restaurant, and many took photos with him."In one photo, a chef posed with Xi, who continued eating his meal as the picture was taken.Installed as China's president in March, Xi has sought to portray himself as being in touch with regular people, but has done so with scheduled visits to factories and homes.In April, a Hong Kong newspaper reported that Xi had taken a cab ride in Beijing — also highly unusual for a top leader — but the excitement soon dissipated when state media denied the report.Though a socialist country in name, China has a deep-rooted hierarchal system that accords privileges to one's official ranking. In recent years, members of the Chinese public have applauded Western leaders for their regular-person style to vent their disapproval of Chinese officials' aloofness.Some commentators have noted that Xi's team has been savvy in building his image.
SHANGHAI — A Chinese court jailed four security officials for up to 11 years over the death of a watermelon vendor, the official Xinhua news agency reported, an incident that triggered public outcry over perceived abuses of power by city patrols.Deng Zhengjia, 56, died after a fight with the security officials in the south-central province of Hunan in July. Deng and his wife had been trying to sell watermelons at a scenic spot by a river where such activity was apparently banned, according to Xinhua.A court in Hunan found the four men guilty of intentionally assaulting Deng and sentenced them to jail terms ranging from three-and-a-half to 11 years, the report late on Friday said.The security men, members of the "chengguan" that work with police across China to help enforce minor city rules and regulations, are derided by many Chinese as thuggish. Rights groups say they are poorly trained and supervised.The poor reputation of the patrols has been further tarnished by several widely reported cases in which vendors or others were beaten, had goods confiscated, or were illegally detained or evicted.The Hunan incident set off a torrent of online criticism and led to the dismissal of senior officials there.The Chinese government is deeply concerned about stability and has shown growing sensitivity to public criticism.
BEIJING — Chinese President Xi Jinping showed off the common touch on Saturday with a surprise visit to a steamed bun restaurant in Beijing where he paid for his food and happily chatted to surprised customers.In pictures widely shared on China's Twitter-like microblogging service Sina Weibo, and confirmed by state media, Xi could be seen lining up for his food and posing for photographs, apparently not surrounded by the high security which normally accompanies visits by top leaders.While such interactions are considered run-of-the-mill in Western countries, they are highly unusual for senior Chinese officials, more used as they are to scenarios carefully stage-managed by the Communist Party's propaganda arm.Since coming to power as party boss in November and president in March, Xi has demanded officials cut down on waste and extravagance and get closer to the people, as part of a broader campaign to root out pervasive corruption.State media said that Xi's meal of steamed buns, fried liver and stir-fired greens cost 21 yuan ($3.46), a far cry from the expensive banquets Chinese officials are better known for."Uncle Xi is showing that he is one of the people. I approve," wrote one Weibo user.
BEIJING — Authorities in western China said Monday that police fatally shot eight "terrorists" who had attacked them using knives and explosives in the latest in a string of violent incidents in the ethnically tense region.The Xinjiang government news portal Tianshan Net said that the group of nine attacked officers and burned police cars in Shache county, which is overseen by the famed Silk Road city of Kashgar.It was the latest in a series of attacks pointing to growing unrest in the large sprawling region of Xinjiang, home to a simmering rebellion against Chinese rule among parts of the native Muslim Uighur population who want more autonomy from Beijing. Recent clashes, including an attack on a police station last month, have left dozens of people dead.A Xinjiang government press officer confirmed Monday's report but said he had no further information. He gave only his surname, Cao. Police reached by phone in Shache and Kashgar said they had no information about the incident.The Chinese government typically calls such incidents terrorist attacks linked to radicals based overseas, although there is little evidence that they are carefully organized.Xinjiang is home to about 9 million Uighurs, who make up less than half of the population of Xinjiang, which they used to dominate. Many complain that they have been marginalized by policies favoring migrants from China's ethnic Han majority.Beijing says it treats all minorities fairly and spends billions of dollars on development and improving living standards in Xinjiang.Tianshan Net said the police took "resolute measures" by shooting the eight and arresting one, adding the case was under further investigation.Sweden-based Uighur activist Dilxat Raxit said Uighurs were being shot to death "due to their discontent with China's policies.""To label the protesters as terrorists and shoot them to death is a new way of suppressing the Uighurs following China's judicial reforms," he said, referring to recent moves to improve the country's party-controlled justice system.As well as a number of deadly clashes in Xinjiang this year, an attack in October struck at the heart of Beijing. Three Uighurs drove a vehicle through crowds in front of iconic Tiananmen Gate, killing themselves and two tourists.In Washington, U.S. State Department deputy spokeswoman Marie Harf called on all parties to avoid violence."We are closely following reports of continuing violence in the Xinjiang Uyghur autonomous region of China," Harf said in a statement. "We continue to call on the Chinese government to permit its citizens to express their grievances freely, publicly, peacefully and without fear of retribution. We also call on Uyghurs to not resort to violence, for the Chinese security forces to exercise restraint."Associated Press Writer Deb Riechmann contributed to this report from Washington.
BEIJING — Police in China's restive far western region of Xinjiang shot dead eight people during a "terrorist attack" on Monday, the regional government said, the second outbreak of violent unrest this month in a region that has a substantial Muslim population.The attack happened in Yarkand county close to the old Silk Road city of Kashgar in Xinjiang's far south, the Xinjiang government said in a statement on its official news website (www.ts.cn)."At around 6:30 am, nine thugs carrying knives attacked a police station in Kashgar's Yarkand county, throwing explosive devices and setting police cars on fire," the brief statement said."The police took decisive measures, shooting dead eight and capturing one," it added, labeling the incident a "violent terrorist attack" which was being investigated further.Earlier this month, police shot and killed 14 people during a riot near Kashgar in which two policemen were also killed.In a similar outburst of violence, at least nine civilians and two policemen were killed when a group of people armed with axes and knives attacked a police station, also near Kashgar, last month, state media has said.China has previously blamed some of the violence in Xinjiang on Islamist militants plotting holy war.Rights groups and exiles say police often use often heavy-handed tactics against the Muslim Uighur community, which calls Xinjiang home. Violence has broken out previously when groups of Uighurs protest at police stations, they say.China has stepped up security in Xinjiang after a vehicle ploughed into tourists on the edge of Beijing's Tiananmen Square in October, killing three people in the car and two bystanders.China said the attack was carried out by Islamist militants.Many of Xinjiang's Turkic-speaking, Muslim people chafe at restrictions on their culture, language and religion, though the government insists it grants them broad freedoms.Xinjiang has been the scene of numerous incidents of unrest in recent years, which the government often blames on the separatist East Turkestan Islamic Movement, even though many experts and rights groups cast doubt on its existence as a cohesive group.Many rights groups say China has long overplayed the threat posed to justify its tough controls in energy-rich Xinjiang, which lies strategically on the borders of Central Asia, India and Pakistan.
BEIJING — China, which has the world's largest number of smokers, is making another effort at limiting smoking by banning officials from lighting up in public. This time, the edict is coming from the highest levels of the ruling Communist Party and government.Until Sunday's notice from the State Council, or China's Cabinet, and the party's central committee, efforts to curb smoking in public places were largely limited to city and other local-level measures. The health ministry pushed out guidelines banning smoking in venues including hotels and restaurants in 2011, but these were criticized as having no clear punishments or details on how such bans would be enforced.The new rules, which campaigners hope will help bring about a nationwide law banning smoking in public places, call on officials to lead by example by stubbing out their cigarettes. Officials are not allowed to smoke in schools, hospitals, sports venues, on public transport or any other places where smoking is banned, or to smoke or offer cigarettes when performing official duties, the official Xinhua News said. They also cannot use public funds to buy cigarettes, and within Communist Party or government offices tobacco products cannot be sold nor adverts displayed."This is likely a major breakthrough. For the first time, very high-level attention and support is being given to anti-tobacco efforts," said Ray Yip, head of the Bill & Melinda Gates Foundation's China program. The foundation has been working on smoking cessation campaigns in the country."This likely will lead to meaningful legislation and enforcement related to smoking," Yip said.China, with a population of 1.35 billion, has more than 300 million smokers.Experts say huge revenues from the state-owned tobacco monopoly have hindered anti-smoking measures. An order banning party officials from smoking indoors, handed down from the highest levels of power, could help to reduce its influence.Smoking, which is linked to an average annual death toll of 1.4 million people in China in recent years, is one of the greatest health threats the country faces, government statistics show. The annual number of cigarettes sold in the country increased by 50 percent to 2.52 trillion in 2012 compared with 10 years earlier, according to the Chinese Association on Tobacco Control, which is overseen by health authorities."Smoking remains a relatively universal phenomenon in public venues. Some officials smoke in public places, which has not only jeopardized the environment and public health, but tarnished the image of party and government offices and leaders and has a negative influence," the circular read, according to Xinhua.
BEIJING — A former aide to retired Chinese security tsar Zhou Yongkang has been placed under investigation for corruption, the government said, the latest move targeting people close to Zhou who is himself subject to a graft probe.The ruling Communist Party's anti-corruption watchdog said on Sunday that Li Chongxi, head of an advisory body to the legislature in the southwestern province of Sichuan, was being investigated for suspected serious breaches of party discipline and the law, the usual euphemism for graft.It provided no other details and it was not possible to reach Li for comment.President Xi Jinping has launched a sweeping crackdown on corruption since taking power, warning corruption is a threat to the ruling Communist Party's very survival, and vowing to pursue powerful "tigers" as well as lowly "flies".More than 500 lawmakers in Hengyang city in the poor, landlocked southern province of Hunan resigned after being implicated in a bribery scandal, state media said on Saturday.Zhou, who sources have told Reuters has been put under virtual house arrest, was party boss of Sichuan from 1999-2002, and it became one of his powerbases.During Zhou's tenure in Sichuan, Li was promoted to a deputy provincial party boss and head of the province's anti-graft body, according to his official biography.Hong Kong's South China Morning Post, citing an unidentified Sichuan official, said that Li was "particularly close" to Zhou, though added it was not clear whether he was specifically targeted because of his connection with Zhou.Two other senior Sichuan officials are also being investigated, including Li Chuncheng, another former deputy Sichuan party chief.Several of Zhou's political allies have been taken into custody and questioned for corruption, including former Vice Minister of Public Security Li Dongsheng and Jiang Jiemin, the top regulator of state-owned enterprises for just five months until September.Li Dongsheng held a rank equivalent to a cabinet minister, and state media says he is the first member of the Political and Legal Affairs Committee, the powerful domestic security body which Zhou used to head, to be investigated for graft.It is unclear if the government will actually put Zhou on trial and risk the possibility that embarrassing revelations about China's elite become public knowledge, potentially undermining confidence in the party.Zhou was a patron of the once high-flying politician Bo Xilai, who was jailed for life in September for corruption and abuse of power - the worst political scandal since the 1976 downfall of the Gang of Four led by Mao's widow at the end of the Cultural Revolution.Bo's career was stopped short last year by the attempted defection of his estranged police chief who implicated Bo's wife in the murder of a British businessman over a business dispute. Bo's wife and his former police chief have been convicted and jailed.
TAKETOMI, Japan — Prime Minister Shinzo Abe's conservative government has begun to pursue a more openly nationalist agenda on an issue that critics fear will push the country farther from its postwar pacifism: adding a more patriotic tone to Japan's school textbooks.The proposed textbook revisions have drawn less outcry abroad than Mr. Abe's visit on Thursday to a shrine that honors war dead, including war criminals from World War II. However, though Mr. Abe's supporters argue that changes are needed to teach children more patriotism, liberals warn that they could undercut an antiwar message they say has helped keep Japan peaceful for decades."Prime Minister Abe is feeling the heat from his political base, which feels betrayed that he has not pursued a more strongly right-wing agenda," said Nobuyoshi Takashima, a professor emeritus at the University of the Ryukyus in Okinawa who has studied the politics of textbooks. "Classrooms are one place where he can appease ultraconservatives by taking a more firmly nationalist stance."Mr. Abe and the nationalists have long argued that changes in the education system are crucial to restoring the country's sense of self, eroded over decades when children were taught what they call an overly negative view of Japan's wartime behavior.The latest efforts for change started slowly, but have picked up speed in recent weeks.In October, Mr. Abe's education minister ordered the school board here in Taketomi to use a conservative textbook it had rejected, the first time the national government has issued such a demand. In November, the Education Ministry proposed new textbook screening standards, considered likely to be adopted, that would require the inclusion of nationalist views of World War II-era history.This month, a government-appointed committee suggested a change that would bring politics more directly into education: putting mayors in charge of their local school districts, a move that opponents say would increase political interference in textbook screening. And just days ago, an advisory committee to the Education Ministry suggested hardening the proposed new standards by requiring that textbooks that do not nurture patriotism be rejected.The moves come at a time when China is asserting its growing strength, directly challenging Japanese territorial claims and its standing as a regional power. The proposed educational changes are the latest that nationalists in both countries have pushed and that some fear will, over time, harden views and deepen tensions between Asia's two strongest countries.The history issue may also be fraught with political danger for Mr. Abe, who had initially focused on the economy rather than an ultraconservative agenda.He has already seen his popularity levels fall since the recent passage of a secrecy bill that some local media criticized as a throwback to wartime censorship laws. And a battle over textbooks helped drive Mr. Abe from power in 2007 after less than a year the last time he was in office; in that case, his government tried to delete mention of the Japanese military's forcing Okinawan civilians to commit mass suicide during the war.But at least so far, the latest efforts have engendered little backlash from the public, a reflection, teachers say, of increasing anxieties about China's more confrontational stance toward Japan.The new screening standards proposed by the education minister, Hakubun Shimomura, a longtime advocate for teaching patriotism, require that elementary, junior high and high school textbooks give a "balanced picture" of disputed historical facts.In an interview, ministry officials said that in practice this would require that textbooks include viewpoints of nationalist scholars on two highly contested historical issues. One is the death toll of the 1937 massacre in Nanking of Chinese civilians by Japanese soldiers that the Chinese government says stands at 300,000, a figure many Japanese scholars see as grossly exaggerated.
WASHINGTON — In an almost annual ritual, Congress is letting a package of 55 popular tax breaks expire at the end of the year, creating uncertainty — once again — for millions of individuals and businesses.Lawmakers let these tax breaks lapse almost every year, even though they save businesses and individuals billions of dollars. And almost every year, Congress eventually renews them, retroactively, so taxpayers can claim them by the time they file their tax returns.No harm, no foul, right? After all, taxpayers filing returns in the spring won't be hurt because the tax breaks were in effect for 2013. Taxpayers won't be hit until 2015, when they file tax returns for next year.Not so far. Trade groups and tax experts complain that Congress is making it impossible for businesses and individuals to plan for the future. What if lawmakers don't renew the tax break you depend on? Or what if they change it and you're no longer eligible?"It's a totally ridiculous way to run our tax system," said Rachelle Bernstein, vice president and tax counsel for the National Retail Federation. "It's impossible to plan when every year this happens, but yet business has gotten used to that."Some of the tax breaks are big, including billions in credits for companies that invest in research and development, generous exemptions for financial institutions doing business overseas, and several breaks that let businesses write off capital investments faster.Others are more obscure, the benefits targeted to film producers, race track owners, makers of electric motorcycles and teachers who buy classroom supplies with their own money.There are tax rebates to Puerto Rico and the Virgin Islands from a tax on rum imported into the United States, and a credit for expenses related to railroad track maintenance.A deduction for state and local sales taxes benefits people who live in the nine states without state income taxes. Smaller tax breaks benefit college students and commuters who use public transportation.A series of tax breaks promote renewable energy, including a credit for power companies that produce electricity with windmills.The annual practice of letting these tax breaks expire is a symptom a divided, dysfunctional Congress that struggles to pass routine legislation, said Rep. John Lewis of Georgia, a senior Democrat on the tax-writing House Ways and Means Committee."It's not fair, it's very hard, it's very difficult for a business person, a company, to plan, not just for the short term but to do long-term planning," Lewis said. "It's shameful."With Congress on vacation until January, there is no chance the tax breaks will be renewed before they expire. And there is plenty of precedent for Congress to let them expire for months without addressing them. Most recently, they expired at the end of 2011, and Congress didn't renew them for the entire year, waiting until New Year's Day 2013 — just in time for taxpayers to claim them on their 2012 returns.But Congress only renewed the package though the end of 2013.Why such a short extension? Washington accounting is partly to blame. The two-year extension Congress passed in January cost $76 billion in reduced revenue for the government, according to the nonpartisan Joint Committee on Taxation. Making those tax breaks permanent could add $400 billion or more to the deficit over the next decade.With budget deficits already high, many in Congress are reluctant to vote for a bill that would add so much red ink. So, they do it slowly, one or two years at time."More cynically, some people say, if you just put it in for a year or two, then that keeps the lobbyists having to come back and wine-and-dine the congressmen to get it extended again, and maybe make some campaign contributions," said Mark Luscombe, principal tax analyst for CCH, a consulting firm based in Riverwoods, Ill.This year, the package of tax breaks has been caught up in a debate about overhauling the entire tax code. The two top tax writers in Congress — House Ways and Means Committee Chairman Dave Camp, R-Mich., and Senate Finance Committee Chairman Max Baucus, D-Mont. — have been pushing to simplify the tax code by reducing tax breaks and using the additional revenue to lower overall tax rates.But their efforts have yet to bear fruit, leaving both tax reform and the package of temporary breaks in limbo. When asked how businesses should prepare, given the uncertainty, Camp said: "They need to get on board with tax reform, that's what they need to do."Further complicating the issue, President Barack Obama has nominated Baucus to become U.S. ambassador to China, meaning he will soon leave the Senate, if he is confirmed by his colleagues.As the Senate wound down its 2013 session, Democratic leaders made a late push to extend many of the tax breaks by asking Republican colleagues to pass a package on the floor of the Senate without debate or amendments. Republicans objected, saying it wasn't a serious offer, and the effort failed.So should taxpayers count on these breaks as they plan their budgets for 2014?"The best thing I would say is, budget accordingly," said Jackie Perlman, principle tax research analyst at The Tax Institute at H&R Block. "As the saying goes, hope for the best but plan for the worst. Then if you get it, great, that's a nice perk. But don't count on it."
BEIJING — A southern Chinese news company at the center of free speech protests earlier this year has come under fire for turning against demonstrators who sought to defend it in a dispute with censors.The Southern Weekly's editorial staff staged a rare but short-lived revolt against censorship in January that attracted dozens of protesters. Its supporters turned up at the gates of the paper's owner, the Southern Media Group in Guangzhou, to lay flowers, holding signs and shouting slogans in support of free speech and democracy.But it has now been revealed that the Southern Media Group declared in a statement to the police that the protests interfered with the operations of the news company, effectively providing evidence likely to be used against the activists including prominent democracy worker Guo Feixiong.A leaked copy of the declaration circulated online over the weekend. Guo's lawyer Zhang Xuezhong confirmed that the leaked statement matched a copy he had seen at the Guangzhou prosecutors' office.The dispute was quietly resolved after editorial staff and censors reached a compromise. But nearly a year later, at least three of the protesters, including Guo, are now likely to face public disturbance charges.The weeklong fracas at the Southern Weekly in January had evolved from a row over censorship at one newspaper to a call for free speech and political reform across China, handing an unexpected test to the Communist Party leadership headed by Xi Jinping just two months after he was installed.Among those criticizing the company are some of its current and former staff, who have posted messages on their microblog accounts or other social media sites. Others who criticized the media group included liberal intellectuals and activists. Many of the supporting messages were quickly removed by censors."Citizens should have the right to assembly and free speech, and these are also rights that journalists pursue and defend," wrote Zhang Zhe, a reporter who was working at Southern Weekly at the time but has since left. Zhang confirmed when reached by phone that he had written the message and posted it online.Zhang wrote that "there was no violent disruption whatsoever at the time" and that he condemned the media group's statement against the protesters.Calls to the newspaper and Southern Media Group were either unanswered or not returned.The Southern Weekly case is part of a wide-ranging crackdown on peaceful street protests in 2013 that has underscored the anxiety with which the party's leadership regards political activism outside its control.Even though the Southern Weekly is known for its edgy reporting, its parent company remains answerable to the Communist Party, just like most domestic media outlets."It's likely that someone from the media group wanted to use the opportunity to convey a message from above," said Zhan Jiang, a journalism professor at Beijing Foreign Studies University.Supporters of Guo who were also at the January protest said the accusations of public disturbance against him and other demonstrators are trumped up in a bid to convict them as a warning to others.Wang Aizhong, a Guangzhou-based activist, said protesters stayed off the main road and were mindful to avoid blocking traffic. He said activists would continue advocating for Guo and the others now being prosecuted for the protests. "Because he's being politically oppressed, we must speak out for him," Wang said.Associated Press writer Didi Tang contributed to this report.
BEIJING — A former aide to retired Chinese security tsar Zhou Yongkang is being investigated for corruption, the government said, the latest move targeting people close to Zhou who is himself subject to a graft probe.The ruling Communist Party's anti-corruption watchdog said on Sunday that Li Chongxi, head of an advisory body to the legislature in the southwestern province of Sichuan, was being investigated for suspected serious breaches of party discipline and the law, the usual euphemism for graft.The Central Commission for Discipline Inspection (CCDI) provided no other details and it was not possible to reach Li for comment.President Xi Jinping has launched a sweeping crackdown on corruption since taking power, warning corruption is a threat to the Communist Party's very survival.More than 500 lawmakers in Hengyang city in the poor, landlocked southern province of Hunan resigned after being implicated in a bribery scandal, state media said on Saturday.Zhou, who sources have told Reuters has been put under virtual house arrest, was party boss of Sichuan from 1999-2002, and it became one of his powerbases.During Zhou's tenure in Sichuan, Li was promoted to a deputy provincial party boss and head of the province's anti-graft body, according to his official biography.Hong Kong's South China Morning Post, citing an unidentified Sichuan official, said that Li was "particularly close" to Zhou, though added it was not clear whether he was specifically targeted because of his connection with Zhou.Two other senior Sichuan officials are also being investigated, including Li Chuncheng, another former deputy Sichuan party chief.Several of Zhou's political allies have been taken into custody and questioned for corruption, including former Vice Minister of Public Security Li Dongsheng and Jiang Jiemin, the top regulator of state-owned enterprises for just five months until September.Li Dongsheng held a rank equivalent to a cabinet minister, and state media says he is the first member of the Political and Legal Affairs Committee, the powerful domestic security body which Zhou used to head, to be investigated for graft.It is unclear if the government will actually put Zhou on trial and risk the possibility that embarrassing revelations about China's elite become public knowledge, potentially undermining confidence in the party."Corruption is still commonplace, and hotbeds of corruption still exist. The anti-corruption situation remains difficult and complicated," the CCDI said in a statement on Monday, according to the official Xinhua news agency.Xinhua said the CCDI would hold a meeting in January, but did not give further details.Zhou was a patron of the once high-flying politician Bo Xilai, who was jailed for life in September for corruption and abuse of power - the worst political scandal since the 1976 downfall of the Gang of Four led by Mao's widow at the end of the Cultural Revolution.Bo's career was stopped short last year by the attempted defection of his estranged police chief who implicated Bo's wife in the murder of a British businessman over a business dispute. Bo's wife and his former police chief have been convicted and jailed.
BEIJING — Chinese police said the nine people responsible for a deadly "terrorist attack" in the western region of Xinjiang were promoting religious extremism, state media reported on Tuesday.Xinjiang is home to a Turkic-speaking, Muslim people known as Uighurs, some of whom resent what they see as oppressive treatment by the government.The Xinjiang government said police shot dead eight people on Monday during the attack in Yarkand county close to the old Silk Road city of Kashgar in Xinjiang's south. The violence raised the death toll from clashes there to at least 35 since November.State news agency Xinhua said late on Monday an initial probe showed the gang, led by Usman Barat and Abdugheni Abdukhadir, had gathered to watch terrorist videos and promote religious extremist ideas since August.They had also raised funds, made and tested explosives for planned terrorist attacks, Xinhua cited Xinjiang police as saying.Judging from their names, the suspects appear to be Uighur.Many Uighurs chafe at restrictions on their culture, language and religion, though the government insists it grants them broad freedoms.Rights groups and exiles say police often use often heavy-handed tactics against the Uighur community. Violence has broken out previously when groups of Uighurs protest at police stations, they say.At least 91 people, including several police, have been killed in violence in Xinjiang since April, according to state media reports.This month, police shot dead 14 people during a riot near Kashgar in which two policemen were also killed.China has previously blamed some of the violence in Xinjiang on Islamist militants plotting holy war.
BEIJING — Oil stayed edged up Tuesday to stay above $99 a barrel after shedding more than $1 a day earlier.Benchmark U.S. crude for February delivery added 4 cents to $99.33 in electronic trading on the New York Mercantile Exchange. It declined $1.03 the previous day after closing above $100 on Friday for the first time since Oct. 18 on U.S. recovery prospects.While signs of an improving U.S. economy have supported prices, analysts note oil consumption in other parts of the world could be held back by a strengthening dollar, which makes oil more expensive for other countries.Others noted that interest from financial speculators would help push oil prices higher.Brent crude, a benchmark for international oils, gained 6 cents to $111.27 after shedding 97 cents a day earlier.Brent's decline was attributed to reports some of the oil production, refinery and export facilities in Libya — which has struggled to maintain production since the 2011 civil war that ousted Moammar Gadhafi — were back in business.In other energy futures trading on Nymex:
BEIJING — China's ruling Communist Party is investigating a top political adviser in a southwestern province believed to be linked to a former security czar who until recently was one of the country's most powerful leaders.The party's internal disciplinary agency said on its website that Li Chongxi, head of an advisory body to Sichuan province's rubberstamp legislature, was under investigation for serious disciplinary violations.The announcement on Sunday came amid reports in overseas Chinese and some foreign media of an investigation into former security chief Zhou Yongkang, who was Communist Party chief of Sichuan for several years on his way to the apex of political power, the Politburo Standing Committee.Party chief Xi Jinping has made fighting widespread graft a key campaign of his leadership so far, with promises to target both junior and high-level officials.Li is the third Sichuan official to come under a party disciplinary probe, which has also seen investigations into businesspeople, senior executives in the oil sector, and most recently, a vice minister of public security. All were believed to have links to Zhou.Zhou oversaw China's massive state security apparatus and was also said to maintain influence over the state-controlled oil sector in which he spent the early part of his career. He was believed to have maintained strong ties to associates in Sichuan throughout his career.During part of the time that Zhou was Sichuan party boss, Li was general secretary of the provincial party committee and head of its general office from 2000 to 2002, positions that would have made him Zhou's close aide.Li rose quickly through the ranks, holding titles that included deputy provincial party chief — while being head of its provincial anti-graft commission. He later took on senior positions in the legislature and its advisory body.The Beijing News, a prominent Chinese newspaper, cited sources as saying the investigation into Li could be related to irregularities in mergers and acquisitions that took place under his supervision in the mining sector.
BEIJING — More than 8 million acres of China's farmland is too polluted with heavy metals and other chemicals to use for growing food, a Cabinet official said Monday, highlighting a problem that is causing growing public concern.The threat from pollution to China's food supply has been overshadowed by public alarm at smog and water contamination but is gaining attention following scandals over tainted rice and other crops. The government triggered complaints in February when it refused to release results of a nationwide survey of soil pollution, declaring them a state secret.The figure given at a news conference by Wang Shiyuan, a deputy minister of the Ministry of Land and Resources, would be about 2 percent of China's 337 million acres of arable land.Some scientists have given higher estimates of as much as 60 million acres, or one-fifth of the total, though it is unclear how much of that would be too badly contaminated for farming.The issue poses a dilemma for communist leaders who want to maximize food production but face public pressure to ensure safety after an avalanche of scandals over shoddy infant formula and other goods.The explosive growth of Chinese industry, overuse of farm chemicals and lax environmental enforcement have left swathes of the countryside tainted by lead, cadmium, pesticides and other toxins.Investigations by the Ministry of Environmental Protection have found "moderate to severe pollution" on 3.3 million hectares (8.3 million acres), Wang said at a news conference."These areas cannot continue farming," Wang said. He did not say whether the information came from the national pollution survey.Farmers already are prohibited from raising crops for human consumption in areas across China that are deemed too badly polluted. But tainted rice and other crops have made their way into the food supply.The ruling Communist Party's latest five-year development plan, which runs through 2015, promises to reduce heavy metal pollution and clean up contaminated areas.Wang said the government is working on a long-range plan and expects to spend several tens of billions of yuan (several billion dollars) a year on the effort. He gave no details but scientists say one possible approach is to plant trees or other vegetation that will absorb heavy metals from the soil but will not be consumed by humans.Complaints by farmers about lead and other pollutants in their water supplies have led to protests against battery factories.A key concern among scientists is cadmium, a carcinogenic metal that can cause kidney damage and other health problems and is absorbed by rice, the country's staple grain.In May, authorities launched an investigation of rice mills in southern China after tests found almost half of supplies sold in Guangzhou, a major city, were contaminated with cadmium.In February, the newspaper Nanfang Daily reported tens of thousands of tons of cadmium-tainted rice was sold to noodle makers in southern China from 2009 to this year. It said government inspectors declared it fit only for production of non-food goods such as industrial alcohol but a trader sold most of the rice to food processors anyway.Ministry of Land and Resources of China (in Chinese): www.mlr.gov.cn
BEIJING — About 3.33 million hectares (8 million acres) of China's farmland is too polluted to grow crops, a government official said on Monday, highlighting the risk facing agriculture after three decades of rapid industrial growth.China has been under pressure to improve its urban environment following a spate of pollution scares.But cleaning up rural regions could be an even bigger challenge as the government tries to reverse damage done by years of urban and industrial encroachment and ensure food supplies for a growing population.Wang Shiyuan, the vice-minister of land and resources, told a news briefing that China was determined to rectify the problem and had committed "tens of billions of yuan" a year to pilot projects aimed at rehabilitating contaminated land and underground water supplies.The area of China's contaminated land is about the same size as Belgium. Wang said no more planting would be allowed on it as the government was determined to prevent toxic metals entering the food chain."In the past there have been news reports about cadmium-contaminated rice - these kinds of problems have already been strictly prohibited," he said.This year, inspectors found dangerous levels of cadmium in rice sold in the southern city of Guangzhou. The rice was grown in Henan, a major heavy metal-producing region.China's determination to squeeze as much food and resources as possible from its land has put thousands of farms close to chemical plants, mines and other heavy industries, raising the risks of contamination.With food security still the most pressing concern, China is determined to ensure that at least 120 million hectares (295 million acres) of land is reserved for agriculture, a policy known as the "red line". The rehabilitation of polluted land is part of that policy.A government land survey revealed traces of toxic metals dating back at least a century as well as pesticides banned in the 1980s, and state researchers have said that as much as 70 percent of China's soil could have problems.
SHENZHEN, China — Top-seeded Li Na advanced to the second round of the Shenzhen Open by beating Vera Zvonareva of Russia 7-5, 6-3 on Tuesday.Monica Niculescu of Romania also advanced, beating Anna Schmiedlova of Slovakia 4-6, 6-2, 6-3.Also, Yung-Jan Chan of Taiwan defeated Zhang Shuai of China 3-6, 6-4, 6-2 and Timea Babos of Hungary advanced when Nadiya Kichenok of Ukraine retired while trailing 6-0, 2-0.In the second round, Peng Shuai of China beat Silvia Soler-Espinosa of Spain 6-3, 6-3.
BEIJING — Chinese police said the nine people responsible for a deadly "terrorist attack" in the western region of Xinjiang were promoting religious extremism, state media reported on Tuesday.Xinjiang is home to a Turkic-speaking, Muslim people known as Uighurs, some of whom resent what they see as oppressive treatment by the government.The Xinjiang government said police shot dead eight people on Monday during the attack in Yarkand county close to the old Silk Road city of Kashgar in Xinjiang's south. The violence raised the death toll from clashes there to at least 35 since November.State news agency Xinhua said late on Monday an initial probe showed the gang, led by Usman Barat and Abdugheni Abdukhadir, had gathered to watch terrorist videos and promote religious extremist ideas since August.They had also raised funds, made and tested explosives for planned terrorist attacks, Xinhua cited Xinjiang police as saying.Judging from their names, the suspects appear to be Uighur.Many Uighurs chafe at restrictions on their culture, language and religion, though the government insists it grants them broad freedoms.Rights groups and exiles say police often use often heavy-handed tactics against the Uighur community. Violence has broken out previously when groups of Uighurs protest at police stations, they say.At least 91 people, including several police, have been killed in violence in Xinjiang since April, according to state media reports.This month, police shot dead 14 people during a riot near Kashgar in which two policemen were also killed.China has previously blamed some of the violence in Xinjiang on Islamist militants plotting holy war.
WASHINGTON — In an almost annual ritual, Congress is letting a package of 55 popular tax breaks expire at the end of the year, creating uncertainty — once again — for millions of individuals and businesses.Lawmakers let these tax breaks lapse almost every year, even though they save businesses and individuals billions of dollars. And almost every year, Congress eventually renews them, retroactively, so taxpayers can claim them by the time they file their tax returns.No harm, no foul, right? After all, taxpayers filing returns in the spring won't be hurt because the tax breaks were in effect for 2013. Taxpayers won't be hit until 2015, when they file tax returns for next year.Not so far. Trade groups and tax experts complain that Congress is making it impossible for businesses and individuals to plan for the future. What if lawmakers don't renew the tax break you depend on? Or what if they change it and you're no longer eligible?"It's a totally ridiculous way to run our tax system," said Rachelle Bernstein, vice president and tax counsel for the National Retail Federation. "It's impossible to plan when every year this happens, but yet business has gotten used to that."Some of the tax breaks are big, including billions in credits for companies that invest in research and development, generous exemptions for financial institutions doing business overseas, and several breaks that let businesses write off capital investments faster.Others are more obscure, the benefits targeted to film producers, race track owners, makers of electric motorcycles and teachers who buy classroom supplies with their own money.There are tax rebates to Puerto Rico and the Virgin Islands from a tax on rum imported into the United States, and a credit for expenses related to railroad track maintenance.A deduction for state and local sales taxes benefits people who live in the nine states without state income taxes. Smaller tax breaks benefit college students and commuters who use public transportation.A series of tax breaks promote renewable energy, including a credit for power companies that produce electricity with windmills.The annual practice of letting these tax breaks expire is a symptom a divided, dysfunctional Congress that struggles to pass routine legislation, said Rep. John Lewis of Georgia, a senior Democrat on the tax-writing House Ways and Means Committee."It's not fair, it's very hard, it's very difficult for a business person, a company, to plan, not just for the short term but to do long-term planning," Lewis said. "It's shameful."With Congress on vacation until January, there is no chance the tax breaks will be renewed before they expire. And there is plenty of precedent for Congress to let them expire for months without addressing them. Most recently, they expired at the end of 2011, and Congress didn't renew them for the entire year, waiting until New Year's Day 2013 — just in time for taxpayers to claim them on their 2012 returns.But Congress only renewed the package though the end of 2013.Why such a short extension? Washington accounting is partly to blame. The two-year extension Congress passed in January cost $76 billion in reduced revenue for the government, according to the nonpartisan Joint Committee on Taxation. Making those tax breaks permanent could add $400 billion or more to the deficit over the next decade.With budget deficits already high, many in Congress are reluctant to vote for a bill that would add so much red ink. So, they do it slowly, one or two years at time."More cynically, some people say, if you just put it in for a year or two, then that keeps the lobbyists having to come back and wine-and-dine the congressmen to get it extended again, and maybe make some campaign contributions," said Mark Luscombe, principal tax analyst for CCH, a consulting firm based in Riverwoods, Ill.This year, the package of tax breaks has been caught up in a debate about overhauling the entire tax code. The two top tax writers in Congress — House Ways and Means Committee Chairman Dave Camp, R-Mich., and Senate Finance Committee Chairman Max Baucus, D-Mont. — have been pushing to simplify the tax code by reducing tax breaks and using the additional revenue to lower overall tax rates.But their efforts have yet to bear fruit, leaving both tax reform and the package of temporary breaks in limbo. When asked how businesses should prepare, given the uncertainty, Camp said, "They need to get on board with tax reform, that's what they need to do."Further complicating the issue, President Barack Obama has nominated Baucus to become U.S. ambassador to China, meaning he will soon leave the Senate, if he is confirmed by his colleagues.As the Senate wound down its 2013 session, Democratic leaders made a late push to extend many of the tax breaks by asking Republican colleagues to pass a package on the floor of the Senate without debate or amendments. Republicans objected, saying it wasn't a serious offer, and the effort failed.So should taxpayers count on these breaks as they plan their budgets for 2014?"The best thing I would say is, budget accordingly," said Jackie Perlman, principle tax research analyst at The Tax Institute at H&R Block. "As the saying goes, hope for the best but plan for the worst. Then if you get it, great, that's a nice perk. But don't count on it."
Recently, The Art Newspaper reported that Pei-Shen Qian had some of his paintings included in a group exhibition in a Shanghai gallery last spring. Scandal-following readers will recognize the name as that of a Chinese artist, once living in Queens, whose imitations of paintings by Pollock, de Kooning and other Abstract Expressionists were sold as real for millions of dollars by the New York gallery Knoedler & Company, now defunct.In China, where he regularly returned for extended visits after moving to New York in 1981, Mr. Qian, 73, is known for his own paintings. He first emerged as an artist in the late 1970s, one of a group producing and exhibiting abstract work, which Cultural Revolution authorities deemed bourgeois and decadent. In 2006, he had a 25-year retrospective at the BB Gallery in Shanghai. Some of his works are posted on various websites. Naturally, you wonder, are Mr. Qian's own paintings any good? Would I like to review them, my editor asked?I can't, in good conscience, review works I'm able to see only online. But I can say, provisionally, that I'm struck by the absence of any singular vision among his pieces. My laptop screen shows earnestly made, colorful landscapes and cityscapes that evoke early Post-Impressionist paintings by Matisse and André Derain. Some mixed-media works represent faceless women in a style that hybridizes classical Chinese painting and early-20th-century Cubism, made on what appear to be surfaces of patched-together burlap.A picture of a horse including stenciled white letters spelling "This is not a horse" echoes Magritte's painting of a pipe captioned "Ceci n'est pas une pipe" ("This is not a pipe"). Several paintings are of large, generalized heads rendered in a soupy, Expressionist manner.Nostalgia seems to be the unifying mood of Mr. Qian's paintings. That, alone, is remarkable, because the European works that evidently inspired him were revolutionary in their time. The kind of painting he emulates in his own work and the Abstract Expressionist paintings on which he has based his imitations both depended on originality and expressive authenticity, as opposed to academic tradition and technical polish. Yet Mr. Qian seems to be the opposite of original.I suppose he works in styles he loves without worrying about whether they're outmoded. Unless there's something going on that can't be seen in online images, it seems unlikely that Mr. Qian's personal paintings will cause anything like the stir his imitations have.That is disappointing but not surprising. I like the fantasy of the unjustly neglected genius who gets revenge on the art world by making expert-fooling works that mimic the style of famous painters. (Mr. Qian has not been charged with any crime related to the scandal.) But I think it more likely that the typical copyist will be relatively lacking in originality. Copyists need to be able to muffle their own creative selves, and if those creative selves are weak, all the better.What they need in abundance are technical knowledge and skill. It's not easy to make forgeries. However hard it was for Barnett Newman to produce one of his zip paintings, making a convincing fake Newman — reverse-engineering it, in effect, as well as making it look appropriately aged — surely will be more demanding technically, if not spiritually.Mr. Qian's creations, which were not copies of actual works but in the style of famous artists, intrigue me more than his personal work, but not for technical reasons. They raise interesting philosophical questions: Why should we value a painting known to be made by a certain esteemed artist more than a painting that is phony but is nevertheless practically indistinguishable from the authentic work? Why is a real Motherwell worth millions of dollars more than a fake one that looks just as good?The dynamics of supply and demand are what make any artwork worth its price. Real things are worth more than fake ones simply because they are more rare.Demand is more fluid and variable than supply because it's influenced by vagaries of taste and fashion; it's less rational. Demand is partly animated by some quasi-magical beliefs about art and artists, like the idea that there's a sort of organic connection between artists and the things they make. The artist's soul is somehow in the work, and because great artists are supposed to have great souls, there's more soul in their creations than there is in mediocre efforts.From there, it's a short leap of faith to the belief that market valuation reflects soul value — not perfectly, but at least roughly and in the long term. The most expensive works have the most soul. That's why, if you can afford it, you buy the real Motherwell. There's no magic, no soul, in fake artworks, so they are worth less, if not completely worthless.Mr. Qian told Bloomberg Businessweek that he thought he was being commissioned to make paintings for art lovers who could not afford the genuine works but were willing to buy imitations. I don't know if such people really exist, but Mr. Qian seems to have thought they did. He didn't imagine that there was anything ethically or legally wrong with what he was doing. He was a copyist but not a forger, if intention to deceive is part of the definition of a forger.Mr. Qian told a reporter that he was shocked to learn what art dealers actually did with his simulations, for which they paid him a few thousand dollars per piece. He also said that he thought that it was impossible to make fakes that would be undetectable as such. Apparently, he didn't even try: Signs of age and forged signatures, prosecutors say, were added by the man who ordered the paintings, the art dealer Jose Carlos Bergantiños Diaz.The art market depends on the belief, expressed by Mr. Qian, that fakes can always be detected. Collective wisdom supposes that the forgery must, at some level, betray itself, and much connoisseurial scrutiny and forensic investigation goes into ensuring that as many deceptions as possible are ultimately exposed. Forgeries flooding the market unchecked would throw relations between supply and demand out of whack, causing economic chaos.That's what makes stories like that of Mr. Qian and the people he worked for so compelling. They are players in contemporary morality tales, myth-saturated chronicles about the upset and the restoration of order in the capitalist universe. It would make a more thrilling story if Mr. Qian turned out to be a great artist in his own right. Judging from what we can see online, however, that happy ending isn't going to happen.Wouldn't it be great, however, if we could see an exhibition of all his fake paintings?
BEIJING — China's Foreign Ministry said Monday that Chinese leaders, angered over a visit last week by Prime Minister Shinzo Abe of Japan to a contentious war shrine in Tokyo, would not meet with Mr. Abe.A Foreign Ministry spokesman, Qin Gang, said at a regularly scheduled news conference in Beijing that Mr. Abe's visit to the Yasukuni shrine, which pays tribute to some war criminals among the dead, was tantamount to honoring "fascists" and "the Nazis of Asia." Mr. Qin's statements were the strongest public remarks made by China against Mr. Abe.Mr. Abe has been asking for high-level talks with China to discuss points of tension in East Asia. In recent years, the China-Japan relationship has worsened because of disputes over territory in the East China Sea. Most recently, Japan and other countries expressed surprise and anger over China's efforts to expand its flight identification zone in the region.Japan has also encountered friction with South Korea, which, like China, expressed anger at Mr. Abe's visit to the shrine. The visit was the first by a sitting head of government in Japan since Prime Minister Junichiro Koizumi went there in 2006. That visit also stirred rage in the region.Mr. Qin said that the visit by Mr. Abe "betrayed" previous agreements and understandings that had been reached by China and Japan and damaged "the political foundation between the two countries.""It is Abe himself who closed the door of conversation with Chinese leaders," Mr. Qin added.The Yasukuni shrine, an institution of the Shinto religion, honors ordinary soldiers who died fighting in World War II but has long generated enmity among the Chinese because among its honorees are Class A war criminals. These former officials were convicted by the International Military Tribunal for the Far East after Japan's defeat in the war, and the Class A designation means that they had taken part in top-level decisions on the war's execution."Since Abe stepped into power, he has made many mistakes in his relations with China, especially in his visit to the shrine where many Class A war criminals are worshiped," Mr. Qin said. "They are the historic sinners of the Far East Military Tribunal. Their hands are stained with the blood of the people of victimized nations. They are fascists. They are the Nazis of Asia."Mr. Abe, in formal dress, visited the shrine on Thursday, with news helicopters flying overhead. The event was broadcast live on television, though TV cameras were not allowed into the shrine's inner sanctum.Mr. Abe is known for holding conservative views on Japanese history. Though he did not visit the shrine during his first period as prime minister, from 2006 to 2007, he has since expressed regret over that.This article has been revised to reflect the following correction: Because of an editing error, an article on Dec. 31 about the refusal of Chinese leaders to meet with Prime Minister Shinzo Abe of Japan to protest his visit to a contentious war shrine in Tokyo misspelled the name of the shrine in some editions. It is the Yasukuni shrine, not Yasakuni. The article also described incorrectly the shrine in some editions. While it pays tribute to some war criminals from the World War II era, it does not house their remains.
HONG KONG — The total debt of local governments in China has soared to nearly $3 trillion as the country's addiction to credit-fueled growth has deepened in recent years, according to the findings of a long-awaited report released on Monday by the central auditing agency.In the report, which is likely to further raise concerns about China's debt problem, the National Audit Office found that local governments across the country had accumulated 17.89 trillion renminbi, or $2.95 trillion, worth of debt obligations as of the end of June. That was an increase of 12.7 percent from December 2012, when local government debt stood at 15.88 trillion renminbi, the report said.The June figure also represented a sharp increase of 67 percent from the end of 2010, when an earlier report by the Audit Office estimated local government debt at 10.71 trillion renminbi.Other reports have estimated local government debt at significantly higher levels, including one issued last week by the Chinese Academy of Social Sciences, a government-linked research institute, which put the figure at about $3.3 trillion.In the five years since the onset of the global financial crisis, local governments at the provincial, municipal, county and township levels across China have gone on a spending spree, loading up on debt to finance a surge of investment in infrastructure, real estate and other projects.Analysts have expressed fears that many of these investments may never make enough money to repay the interest and principal on the debt.The structure of much of this borrowing has also raised concerns. With a few exceptions for pilot programs, local governments in China are prohibited from directly taking on loans or issuing bonds. Instead, they have set up thousands of special-purpose financing vehicles that borrow on the government's behalf to pay for a given project.Such financing vehicles had confirmed probable and potential debt obligations totaling 6.96 trillion renminbi as of June, according to the Audit Office's report, accounting for nearly 40 percent of all local government debt.Analysts had for months been anticipating the results of the audit office's survey. As part of an investigation that began in July, the agency said, it deployed 54,000 auditors across the country, who combed through the books of more than 62,000 government departments and institutions and examined 3.4 million debt instruments related to more than 700,000 projects.Including financial obligations on the national level, the audit office report found that China's total government debt stood at 30.27 trillion renminbi at the end of June, up from 27.77 trillion renminbi in December 2012.Based on findings of the new report, Lu Ting, a China economist at Bank of America's Merrill Lynch unit, estimated that China's total public debt stood at 53 percent of gross domestic product. Adding corporate and household obligations lifts the total debt ratio to as much as 190 percent of G.D.P., he estimated.China's overall debt ratio "is neither exceptionally high nor low," Mr. Lu wrote on Monday in a research note. Still, he said he was concerned that for the last two years China has been adding debt faster than its economy has been growing."We believe the markets and the Chinese government should be alarmed by the rapidly rising leverage, but we do not believe China is on the brink of a debt crisis, especially if the new leaders can take decisive measures to arrest its rising leverage," Mr. Lu wrote.Under President Xi Jinping, the Chinese leadership has promised to deliver reforms that will be the country's most ambitious financial overhauls in decades. Mr. Xi will head a group that will steer economic and social reforms, Xinhua, the state-run news agency, said on Monday.
SHANGHAI — As China's smog levels crept past record highs in early December, the phone lines at the pollution-busting kit maker Broad Group lit up with Chinese customers worried about the hazardous pollution levels that have gripped China this past year.China's government is struggling to meet pollution reduction targets and has pledged to spend more than 3 trillion renminbi, or almost $500 billion, to tackle the problem, creating a growing market for companies that can help increase energy efficiency and lower emissions."Recently, we haven't been able to make products fast enough to keep up with demand," said Hu Jie, a general manager at Broad Group, whose pollution-related products include hand-held monitors and environmentally friendly buildings. Sales about doubled in 2013 from the previous year, Mr. Hu said, without giving details.Pollution problems in China are by no means new. But heightened public anger and a growing political will to deal with the issue have created opportunities for companies with environmental knowledge to earn a slice of China's clean-technology market, which is set to triple to $555 billion by 2020, the United States Department of Commerce says.Companies like the American clean-energy expert Fuel Tech, the design engineer WS Atkins, and others have seized the opportunity by increasing staff numbers and clinching contracts."China has reached a saturation level which people can no longer tolerate," said Feng An, president and executive director of the U.S.-China Clean Tech Center, which takes American clean technology companies to China to meet potential partners. "Five years ago people could pollute and get away with it. Now they can't. This year you can really see the difference."Pollution cost China's economy at least 1.1 trillion renminbi in 2010, the environment ministry estimated in 2013 — equal to 2.5 percent of gross domestic product that year. Pollution has been tied to "cancer villages" and reduced life expectancy. Smog closed down the major northern city of Harbin in October.Acknowledging public anxiety over the issue, Prime Minister Li Keqiang said in March that China should not sacrifice the environment to pursue economic growth.For the American environmental engineering company LP Amina, which helps coal power plants reduce emissions by retrofitting burners to make them more efficient, China sales doubled in 2013, said the firm's marketing manager Jamyan Dudka, without providing specific figures. Coal accounts for more than two-thirds of China's primary energy consumption.China is pushing to reduce nitrogen oxide pollutants from power plant emissions and offering subsidies to get companies involved. The cost of retrofitting all of China's power plants over a five-year period would be about $11 billion, Mr. Dudka said.Fuel Tech, which is listed in the United States and also focuses in this area, sees China at the forefront of its business development plans and has increased its China-based staff to more than 30 people, Doug Bailey, the company's chief executive, said on an analyst call in November.Companies like Atkins of Britain and the Australian developer Lend Lease Group are also leveraging their global expertise in sustainable construction.Atkins is working with local governments to develop sustainable construction guidelines and will team up with two Chinese cities to put them into action. China's contribution to the company's 88 million pounds, or about $145 million, in Asia-Pacific revenues increased to 40 percent in 2013, it said. The region accounts for about 5 percent of global sales. "Unlike Europe and the Americas, which have already been built out, there's still a huge amount of development going on in China," said Mark Hewlett, an Atkins associate based in Beijing.About 300 million Chinese are expected to move from rural to urban areas over the coming decade as the government pushes ahead with an urbanization drive to lift domestic consumption.Vishnu Amble, Amsterdam-based principal at the private equity firm Global Cleantech Capital, said the positive trends had drawn fund managers back to China's clean-tech market, focusing on energy efficiency, lighting, waste treatment and water."People have been following China's clean-tech market lightly the past year or so," said Mr. Amble, whose firm manages about $200 million in assets and has as much as a fifth of its 2014 deal pipeline set to come from China. "Now they're really diving in."
